α (alpha), β (beta)
Stereodescriptors, used in a number of different ways.1. Relative stereodescriptors used in carbohydrate nomenclature to describe the configuration atthe anomeric carbon by relating it to the anomeric reference atom. For simple cases the anomericreference atom is the same as the configurational reference atom. Thus in α-D-glucopyranose thereference atom is C-5 and the OH at C-1 is on the same side as the OH at C-5 in the Fischerprojection.2.Relative stereodescriptors used by Chemical Abstracts Service to describe the configuration of acyclic molecule (including suitable polycyclic systems) with several stereogenic centres wherebythe α side of the reference plane is the side on which the substituent with CIP priority lies at thelowest numbered stereogenic centre. The other side is β.3.Absolute stereodescriptors originally devised for steroid nomenclature. However in this sense itis only meaningful if there is an agreed absolute configuration and orientation of the structure soas to define the plane and which way up the molecule is represented. Substituents above the planeof the steroid are described as β and are shown as a solid line (or); those belowthe plane are described as α and are shown by a broken line (or). The extensionof this system to tetrapyrroles has been documented and it has been widely used elsewhere.

α- (β-, γ-) ray spectrometer
A measuring assembly incorporating a radiation detector and a pulse amplitude, used for determiningthe energy spectrum of α (β, γ) radiation.

α-addition (alpha-addition)
A chemical reaction resulting in a single reaction product from two or three reacting chemical species,with formation of two new chemical bonds to the same atom in one of the reactant molecular entities.The synonymous term 1/1/addition is also used. For example:(This particular example can also be viewed as an insertion reaction). In inorganic chemistry such αaddition reactions, generally to a metallic central atom, are known as 'oxidative additions'. α-Additionis the reverse of α-elimination or 1/1/elimination.See also: addition, elimination

α-cleavage (alpha-cleavage)
1.(in mass spectrometry) The fission of a bond originating at an atom which is adjacent to oneassumed to bear the charge; the definition of β-, γ-, cleavage then follows automatically. Theprocess:would thus be described as α-fission of a ketone with expulsion of a radical R1. . The carbon atomsof the radical R1. are called the α-, β-, γ-carbons, starting with the atom nearest the functionalgroup.2.



α-decay (alpha-decay)
Radioactive decay in which an alpha particle is emitted.

α-effect
A positive deviation of an α-nucleophile (a nucleophile bearing an unshared pair of electrons on anatom adjacent to the nucleophilic site) from a Brønsted-type plot ofvs.constructed fora series of related normal nucleophiles. More generally, it is the influence of the atom bearing a lonepair of electrons on the reactivity at the adjacent site.See also: Brønsted relationThe use of the term has been extended to include the effect of any substituent on an adjacent reactivecentre, for example in the case of the 'α-silicon effect'.

α-elimination
1.A transformation of the general type:where the central atom Z is commonly carbon. The reverse reaction is called α-addition.2.







α-particle (alpha-particle)
Nucleus of the 4He atom.

'A' value
Also contains definition of: Winstein–Holness A valueThe conformational preference of an equatorial compared to an axial substituent in a monosubstitutedcyclohexane. This steric substituent parameter equalsinfor the equatorial to axialequilibration on cyclohexane. The values are also known as 'Winstein–Holness' A values.







abiotic
Synonym: abiologicalNot associated with living organisms. Synonymous with abiological.

abiotic transformation
Process in which a substance in the environment is modified by non-biological mechanisms.

absolute activation analysis
A kind of activation analysis in which the elemental concentrations in the material are calculated fromknown nuclear constants, irradiation and measurement parameters, rather than by comparing withknown standards.



absolute configuration
The spatial arrangement of the atoms of a chiral molecular entity (or group) and its stereochemicaldescription e.g. R or S.See also: relative configuration, α (alpha), β (beta)



absolute electrode potential
The electrode potential of a metal measured with respect to a universal reference system (not includingany additional metal/solution interface).



























absorber
1.A device used commonly for sampling by absorption in which a gaseous or liquid material isremoved from another gas or liquid by selective absorption; these include: scrubber, impinger,packed column, spray chamber, etc.2.





absorption
1.2.The process of one material (absorbate) being retained by another (absorbent); this may be thephysical solution of a gas, liquid, or solid in a liquid, attachment of molecules of a gas, vapour,liquid, or dissolved substance to a solid surface by physical forces, etc. In spectrophotometry,absorption of light at characteristic wavelengths or bands of wavelengths is used to identify thechemical nature of molecules, atoms or ions and to measure the concentrations of these species.



absorption coefficient
Linear decadic ( , ) and Napierian absorption coefficients ( ) are equal to the correspondingabsorbances divided by the optical path length through the sample. The molar absorption coefficients(decadic , Napierian ) are the linear absorption coefficients divided by the amount concentration.

absorption coefficient
in biologyRatio of the absorbed quantity (uptake) of a substance to the administered quantity (intake).



absorption factor
See: absorptance



absorption line
A narrow range of wavelengths in which a substance absorbs light; a series of discrete absorptionlines can be used as an unambiguous identification for many relatively simple chemical species.



absorption spectrum
The wavelength dependence of the absorption cross-section (or absorption coefficient); usuallyrepresented as a plot of absorption cross-section versus wavelength(or ) of the light.

absorptivity [obsolete]
Absorptance divided by the optical path length. For very low attenuance it approximates the absorptioncoefficient [within the approximation]. The use of this term is not recommended.

abstraction
A chemical reaction or transformation, the main feature of which is the bimolecular removal of anatom (neutral or charged) from a molecular entity. For example:(proton abstraction from acetone)(hydrogen abstraction from methane)See: detachment





ac
See: torsion angle















accommodation coefficient
A measure of the efficiency of capture of molecules or atoms which collide with aerosol particles,cloud droplets, etc. The accommodation coefficient is the fraction of the collisions which result in thecapture of the molecules (atoms, radicals, etc.) by the particle, cloud droplet, etc.; fraction of collidingmolecules which are not reflected but which enter the surface of an aqueous aerosol. Synonymouswith sticking coefficient.







acenes
Polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons consisting of fused benzene rings in a rectilinear arrangement.

acetals
Compounds having the structure R2C(OR')2 ( R' ≠ H ) and thus diethers of geminal diols. Originally,the term was confined to derivatives of aldehydes (one R = H), but it now applies equally to derivativesof ketones (neither R = H ). Mixed acetals have different R' groups.See also: acetonides, ketals, acylals, hemiacetals

acetonides
Cyclic acetals derived from acetone and diols, usually vicinal diols, or polyhydroxy compounds. E.g.

acetylene black
A special type of carbon black formed by an exothermic decomposition of acetylene. It is characterizedby the highest degree of aggregation and crystalline orientation when compared with all types ofcarbon black.Note:Acetylene black must not be confused with the carbon black produced as a by-product during theproduction of acetylene in the electric arc process.

acetylenes
Acyclic (branched or unbranched) and cyclic (with or without side chain) hydrocarbons having oneor more carbon–carbon triple bonds.See also: alkynes

acetylides
Compounds arising by replacement of one or both hydrogen atoms of acetylene (ethyne) by a metalor other cationic group. E.g. NaC≡CH monosodium acetylide. By extension, analogous compoundsderived from terminal acetylenes, RC≡CH.

Acheson graphite
A synthetic graphite made by the Acheson process.Note:Reference to Acheson in combination with synthetic graphite honours the inventor of the firsttechnical graphitization. Today the term Acheson graphite, however, is of historical interest onlybecause it no longer covers the plurality of synthetic graphite.

achiral
See: chirality

aci-nitro compounds
A class name for hydrocarbylideneazinic acids, R2C=N+(–O−)OH. The use of aci-nitro as a prefix insystematic nomenclature to name specific compounds is abandoned.See also: azinic acids

acid
A molecular entity or chemical species capable of donating a hydron (proton) (see Brønsted acid) orcapable of forming a covalent bond with an electron pair (see Lewis acid).See also: hard acid, carboxylic acids, oxoacids, sulfonic acids

acid anhydrides
Compounds consisting of two acyl groups bonded to the same oxygen atom acyl-O-acyl. Symmetricand mixed anhydrides have identical and different acyl groups, respectively. E.g.acetic anhydride,acetic benzenesulfonic anhydride,(thiobenzoic) anhydride.







acidity
1.2.Of a compound: For Brønsted acids the tendency of a compound to act as a hydron donor. Itcan be quantitatively expressed by the acid dissociation constant of the compound in water orsome other specified medium. For Lewis acids it relates to the association constants of Lewisadducts and π adducts.Of a medium: The use of the term is mainly restricted to a medium containing Brønstedacids, where it means the tendency of the medium to hydronate a specific reference base. It isquantitatively expressed by the appropriate acidity function.

acidity constant
The equilibrium constantfor splitting off the nth proton from a charged or uncharged acid, tobe defined. One may writefor.

acidity function
Also contains definitions of: basicity function, Hammett acidity functionAny function that measures the thermodynamic hydron-donating or -accepting ability of a solventsystem, or a closely related thermodynamic property, such as the tendency of the lyate ion ofthe solvent system to form Lewis adducts. (The term 'basicity function' is not in common use inconnection with basic solutions.) Acidity functions are not unique properties of the solvent systemalone, but depend on the solute (or family of closely related solutes) with respect to which thethermodynamic tendency is measured. Commonly used acidity functions refer to concentrated acidicor basic solutions. Acidity functions are usually established over a range of composition of sucha system by UV/VIS spectrophotometric or NMR measurements of the degree of hydronation(protonation or Lewis adduct formation) for the members of a series of structurally similar indicatorbases (or acids) of different strength: the best known of these functions is the Hammett acidity function(for uncharged indicator bases that are primary aromatic amines).

acidosis
Pathological condition in which the hydrogen ion substance concentration of body fluids is abovenormal and hence the pH of blood falls below the reference interval.See also: alkalosis

acid–base indicator
An acid or base which exhibits a colour change on neutralization by the basic or acidic titrant at ornear the equivalence point of a titration.

actinic
Applied or referred to actinism.



actinism
Chemical changes on living and non-living materials caused by optical radiation.

actinometer
A chemical system or physical device which determines the number of photons in a beam integrally orper unit time. This name is commonly applied to devices used in the ultraviolet and visible wavelengthranges. For example, solutions of iron(III) oxalate can be used as a chemical actinometer, whilebolometers, thermopiles, and photodiodes are physical devices giving a reading that can be correlatedto the number of photons detected.See also: chemical actinometer

action spectrum
A plot of a relative biological or chemical photoresponse (=) per number of incident photonsagainst wavelength or energy of radiation under the same radiant power of light. This form ofpresentation is frequently used in the studies of biological or solid state systems, where the natureof the absorbing species is unknown. This type of action spectrum is sometimes called spectralresponsivity or sensitivity spectrum. The precise action spectrum is a plot of the spectral or quantum)effectiveness. By contrast, a plot of the biological or chemical change or response per absorbed photon(quantum efficiency) versus wavelength is the efficiency spectrum.See also: excitation spectrum, efficiency spectrum

activated adsorption process
If the temperature coefficient of the rate of adsorption is substantial, an adsorption process is saidto be activated (i.e. to have a significant activation energy). In this case, the sticking coefficient issmall. In general, the activation energy of activated adsorption is a function of coverage and it usuallyincreases with increasing coverage.

activated carbon
A porous carbon material, a char which has been subjected to reaction with gases, sometimes withthe addition of chemicals, e.g. ZnCl2, before, during or after carbonization in order to increase itsadsorptive properties.Note:Activated carbons have a large adsorption capacity, preferably for small molecules, and are used forpurification of liquids and gases. By controlling the process of carbonization and activation, a varietyof active carbons having different porosity can be obtained. Activated carbons are used mainly ingranular and powdered forms, but can also be produced in textile form by controlled carbonizationand activation of textile fibres. Other terms used in the literature: active carbons, active charcoals.



activated complex
An activated complex, often characterized by the superscript ‡, is defined as that assembly of atomswhich corresponds to an arbitrary infinitesimally small region at or near the col (saddle point) of apotential energy surface.See also: transition state

activation
Also contains definition of: degree of activationThis word is used in different senses:1. Input of external energy into a chemical system is said to bring about activation of the system.2. An added substance that increases the rate of a catalysed reaction is known as an activator, andthe effect is called activation. The degree of activation is defined by:whereis the rate of the catalysed reaction in the absence of the activator andis the rate ofthe catalysed reaction in the presence of the activator3. When some of the energy required for a reaction to occur is provided by a previous exothermicchemical reaction there is said to be chemical activation.See: chemical activation, catalysisSee also: activator, inhibition

activation analysis (nuclear)
A kind of elemental or isotopic analysis based on the measurement of characteristic radiation fromnuclides formed directly or indirectly by activation of the test portion. In general, a specification isadded of the type of the incident radiation (e.g. neutron, photon) and its energy (e.g. thermal, fast).

activation cross-section
The cross-section for the formation of a radionuclide by a specified reaction.



activation
in electrochemical corrosionThe process of transition from the passive to the active state by removal of the passivating film.A necessary condition for activation is an electrode potential negative to the equilibrium potentialof formation of the passivating film. Activation is achieved by cathodic currents, by a reducedsubstance in the adjacent solution, or by contact with an electronic conductor having a suitablynegative corrosion potential.See also: passive state, active state

activation
in radiochemistryThe process of inducing radioactivity by irradiation. In general, a specification is added of the type ofincident radiation (e.g. nuclear, neutron, photon) or its energy (e.g. thermal, fast).

activation reaction
Process leading from the reactants to the formation of an activated complex or transition state.

activator
Also contains definition of: enzyme activatorA substance, other than the catalyst or one of the substrates, that increases the rate of a catalysedreaction without itself being consumed; the process is called activation. An activator of an enzymecatalysed reaction may be called enzyme activator, if it acts by binding to the enzyme.See also: effector

active centre
See: active site

active medium
See: laser





active solid
A porous solid with adsorptive properties by means of which chromatographic separations may beachieved. The separations resulting from this action follow laws different from those deriving fromthe partitioning action of the liquid phase.

active species
See: laser





activity
See: activity (relative activity)







acute toxicity
1.2.Adverse effects of finite duration occurring within a short time (up to 14 d) after administrationof a single dose (or exposure to a given concentration) of a test substance or after multiple doses(exposures), usually within 24 h of a starting point (which may be exposure to the toxicant, orloss of reserve capacity, or developmental change, etc.)Ability of a substance to cause adverse effects within a short time of dosing or exposure.

acyl carbenes
Any compound. In organic chemistry, an unspecified acyl carbene is commonly acarboxylic acyl carbene,.

acyl groups
Groups formed by removing one or more hydroxy groups from oxoacids that have the general structureRkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0), and replacement analogues of such acyl groups. In organic chemistry anunspecified acyl group is commonly a carboxylic acyl group. E.g.

acyl halides
Compounds consisting of an acyl group bonded to halogen, e.g. CH3S(=O)2Cl , methanesulfonylchloride; CH3COCl , acetyl chloride; cyclohexanecarboximidoyl chloride,



acyl species
Also contains definitions of: acyl anions, acyl cations, acyl radicals, acylium ionsAcyl intermediates include acyl anions, acyl radicals and acyl cations (synonym acylium ions) whichare formally derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by removal of a hydroxyl cation HO+, a hydroxyl radical HO. or a hydroxyl anion HO− , respectively, and replacement analogues ofsuch intermediates. Acyl anions, radicals and cations can formally be represented by canonical formshaving a negative charge, an unpaired electron or a positive charge on the acid-generating elementof the oxoacid. Acyl anions. E.g.Acyl radicals. E.g.Acyl cations. E.g.See also: acyl groups

acylals
Diesters of geminal diols; i.e.E.g. benzylidene diacetate:

acyloins
α-Hydroxy ketones, RCH(OH)C(=O)R . So named from the fact that they are formally derived fromreductive coupling of carboxylic acyl groups.See also: ketones

acyloxyl radicals
Oxygen-centered radicals consisting of an acyl radical bonded to an oxygen atom. E.g..

addend
See: addition reaction

addition
1.2.3.Refers to addition reaction or addition transformation.Loosely, the formation of an adduct. (For an example, see Lewis acid.)Loosely, any association or attachment.

addition reaction
A chemical reaction of two or more reacting molecular entities, resulting in a single reaction productcontaining all atoms of all components, with formation of two chemical bonds and a net reduction inbond multiplicity in at least one of the reactants. The reverse process is called an elimination reaction.The addition may occur at only one site (α-addition, 1/1/addition), at two adjacent sites (1/2/addition)or at two non-adjacent sites (1/3/- or 1/4/addition, etc.). For example:If the reagent or the source of the addends of an addition are not specified, then it is called an additiontransformation.See also: addition, α-addition, cheletropic reaction, cycloaddition

additive
A substance added to a sample for any of a variety of purposes.

additive name
1.2.The formal assembly of names for the components of a compound without loss of atoms orgroups of atoms from any component.The addition or attachment of atoms or groups of atoms.



additivity principle
The hypothesis that each of several structural features of a molecular entity makes a separate andadditive contribution to a property of the substance concerned. More specifically, it is the hypothesisthat each of the several substituent groups in a parent molecule makes a separate and additivecontribution to the standard Gibbs energy change (or Gibbs energy of activation) corresponding to aparticular equilibrium (or rate of reaction).See also: transferability

adduct
A new chemical species AB, each molecular entity of which is formed by direct combination of twoseparate molecular entities A and B in such a way that there is change in connectivity, but no loss, ofatoms within the moieties A and B. Stoichiometries other than 1:1 are also possible, e.g. a bis-adduct(2:1). An intramolecular adduct can be formed when A and B are groups contained within the samemolecular entity. This is a general term which, whenever appropriate, should be used in preferenceto the less explicit term complex. It is also used specifically for products of an addition reaction. Forexamples, see Lewis adduct, Meisenheimer adduct, π-adduct.





adiabatic
Also contains definition of: nonadiabaticThis word is used with various different meanings, and when it is used it should be defined. Inthermodynamics 'adiabatic' is used in a macroscopic sense to refer to a process occurring in athermally insulated system, so that there is no flow of heat to or from the surroundings. In reactiondynamics, the word has been used in a microscopic sense, with a range of meanings which have onlya tenuous relationship to the thermodynamic meaning or the etymology. Whereas the thermodynamicmeaning relates to conditions imposed on a process by an observer, the microscopic meaning relatesto conditions under which the process occurs naturally. The microscopic meanings, as used in reactiondynamics, all have in common the feature that quantum states remain unchanged during the courseof reaction. Different quantum states may be referred to:1. A reaction in which there is no change of electronic state or multiplicity has been called adiabatic,or more specifically electronically adiabatic.2. A reaction in which there is no change of vibrational state during the course of reaction has beensaid to be vibrationally adiabatic. More loosely, the expression has been applied to a process inwhich excess vibrational energy in the reactants appears as vibrational energy in the products, orin which ground-state vibration in the reactants leads to ground state vibration in the products.3. A reaction in which excess rotational energy in the reactants appears as rotational energy in theproducts, or in which ground-state rotation in the reactants leads to ground-state rotation in theproducts, has been referred to as rotationally adiabatic.4. In the Rice-Ramsperger-Kassel-Marcus (RRKM) theory of unimolecular reactions, a degree offreedom whose quantum number is more or less preserved during energization and subsequentreaction has been called 'adiabatic'; the word 'inactive' has also been applied to it.A reaction that is not adiabatic is referred to as nonadiabatic or diabatic, and some workers make adistinction between the two words.See also: diabatic coupling

adiabatic electron transfer
Electron transfer process in which the reacting system remains on a single electronic surface in passingfrom reactants to products. For adiabatic electron transfer the electronic transmission factor is closeto unity.See: Marcus equationSee also: diabatic electron transfer





adiabatic photoreaction
Within the 'Born-Oppenheimer' approximation, a reaction of an excited state species that occurs ona single 'potential-energy surface'.See also: diabatic photoreaction







adjuvant
1.2.In pharmacology, a substance added to a drug to speed or increase the action of the maincomponent.In immunology, a substance (such as aluminium hydroxide) or an organism (such as bovinetuberculosis bacillus) which increases the response to an antigen.

adsorbate
A molecular species of gas, dissolved substance or liquid which adheres to or is adsorbed in anextremely thin surface layer of a solid substance.

adsorbent
A condensed phase at the surface of which adsorption may occur.

adsorber
Solid material used to capture either a gas or liquid; often activated carbon is employed as the solidbecause of its high surface area per unit mass.

adsorption
An increase in the concentration of a dissolved substance at the interface of a condensed and a liquidphase due to the operation of surface forces. Adsorption can also occur at the interface of a condensedand a gaseous phase.

adsorption capacity
For strongly adsorbed solutes of limited solubility, the value of the amount of adsorbed substancereached in a saturated solution is called the adsorption capacity of the adsorbent for a specific solute;its value depends also, in general, on the nature and, in the case of more than two components, on therelative composition of the bulk liquid.

adsorption chromatography
Chromatography in which separation is based mainly on differences between the adsorption affinitiesof the sample components for the surface of an active solid.

adsorption complex
The entity constituted by the adsorbate and the part of the adsorbent to which it is bound.

adsorption current
A faradaic current whose magnitude depends on the applied potential, and, at any particular appliedpotential, on the rate or extent of the adsorption of an electroactive substance (or the product obtainedfrom the reduction or oxidation of an electroactive substance) onto the surface of the indicator orworking electrode.See also: limiting adsorption current

adsorption hysteresis
Adsorption hysteresis is said to occur when adsorption and desorption values deviate from oneanother.

adsorption indicator
A substance which is adsorbed or desorbed with concomitant colour change at or near the equivalencepoint of a titration.

adsorption isobar
The function relating the amount, mass, or volume, or corresponding excess of substance adsorbedby a given amount of solid, to the temperature at constant pressure.

adsorption isostere
The function relating the equilibrium pressure to the temperature at a constant value of the amount,or excess amount, of substance adsorbed by a given amount of solid.



adsorptive
The material that is present in one or other (or both) of the bulk phases and capable of being adsorbed.

advancement
See: extent of reaction









aerobic
Requiring molecular oxygen.See also: anaerobic

aerobic conditions
Conditions for growth or metabolism in which the organism is sufficiently supplied with oxygen.

aerogel
Gel comprised of a microporous solid in which the dispersed phase is a gas.Note:Microporous silica, microporous glass and zeolites are common examples of aerogels.





aerosol
Sol in which the dispersed phase is a solid, a liquid or a mixture of both and the continuous phaseis a gas (usually air).Notes:1. Owing to their size, the particles of the dispersed phase have a comparatively small settlingvelocity and hence exhibit some degree of stability in the earth s gravitational field.2. An aerosol can be characterized by its chemical composition, its radioactivity (if any), the particlesize distribution, the electrical charge and the optical properties.3. Modified from previous definition, within which particles with equivalent diameters usuallybetweenandare specified. This extends beyond the size range specified for acolloidal system. To avoid confusion the definition proposed here is recommended.

aerosol hydrolysis
Hydrolysis of the dispersed component of an aerosol.

affine chain behaviour
Behaviour of a polymer network in which the junction points deform uniformly with the macroscopicdeformation of the network.Note:In reality, affine chain behaviour can apply only at small deformations.

affinity chromatography
An expression characterizing the particular variant of chromatography in which the unique biologicalspecificity of the analyte and ligand interaction is utilized for the separation.





















aglycon (aglycone)
The non-sugar compound remaining after replacement of the glycosyl group from a glycoside by ahydrogen atom.

agonist
Substance which binds to cell receptors normally responding to naturally occurring substances andwhich produces a response of its own.See also: antagonist

agostic
The term designates structures in which a hydrogen atom is bonded to both a carbon atom and a metalatom. The term is also used to characterize the interaction between a CH bond and an unsaturated metalcentre, and to describe similar bonding of a transition metal with Si–H compounds. The expression'µ-hydrido-bridged' is also used to describe the bridging hydrogen.

agostic interaction
The manner of interaction (termed according to the Greek 'to hold or clasp to oneself as a shield')of a coordinatively unsaturated metal atom with a ligand, when the metal atom draws the ligandtowards itself. An important type of agostic interaction is the C–H–Metal coordination providing forthe activation of the C–H bond in transition metal complexes.

agranular carbon
A monogranular or monolithic carbon material with homogeneous microstructure which does notexhibit any structural components distinguishable by optical microscopy.Note:The above definition of a homogeneous microstructure does not pertain to pores and structuralcomponents which may be visible by contrast differences in optical microscopy with polarized light.As a consequence, glass-like carbon with visible pores is still an agranular carbon. The same is true,for instance, for pyrolytic carbon with preferred orientation, such as conical or lamellar structures,visible in optical microscopy with polarized light. Use of the term agranular carbon is not restrictedto bulk materials of a minimum size. Only particulate carbon should be excluded even if the isolatedparticles exhibit a homogeneous microstructure.







air pollutant
A substance, gaseous material or aerosol which has been introduced into the air (either by humanactivity or by natural processes) in sufficient concentration to produce a measurable effect on humans,animals, vegetation or materials (monuments, etc.): SO2, NO2, H2S, CO, hydrocarbons, etc.

air pollution
Usually the presence of substances in the atmosphere, resulting either from human activity or naturalprocesses, present in sufficient concentration, for a sufficient time and under circumstances such asto interfere with comfort, health or welfare of persons or the environment.











air-lift bioreactor
A bioreactor in which the reaction medium is kept mixed and gassed by introduction of air or anothergas (mixture) at the base of a column-like reactor equipped either with a draught tube or anotherdevice (e.g. external tube) by which the reactor volume is separated into a gassed and an ungassedregion thus generating a vertically circulating flow.

Aitken particles
Aerosol particles belowin diameter. These generally are the most numerous among allparticles in the air. Their concentrations can be determined with the Aitken counter which measurestotal particle number density. Owing to their small size, Aitken particles contribute little to the totalmass concentration of all aerosol particles; this is determined primarily by particles of diameter.

albedo
The fraction of the energy of electromagnetic radiation reflected from a body (or surface) relativeto the energy incident upon it. The reflection of light from a surface is, of course, dependent on thewavelength of the light, the nature of the surface and its angle of incidence with the surface. Theterm albedo usually connotes a broad wavelength band (visible, ultraviolet or infrared), whereas theterms reflectivity and spectral albedo are used to describe the reflection of monochromatic (singlewavelength or small band of wavelengths) radiation.

albumin
A type of protein, especially a protein of blood plasma which transports various substances, includingmetal ions, drugs and xenobiotics.

alcogel
Gel in which the swelling agent consists predominantly of an alcohol or a mixture of alcohols.

alcoholates
Synonymous with alkoxides. Alcoholate should not be used for solvates derived from an alcohol suchas CaCl2·nROH, for the ending -ate often occurs in names for anions.

alcohols
Compounds in which a hydroxy group, –OH, is attached to a saturated carbon atom R3COH. The term'hydroxyl' refers to the radical species, HO..See also: enols, phenols

aldaric acids
Polyhydroxy dicarboxylic acids having the general formula HOC(=O)[CH(OH)]nC(=O)OH ,formally derived from an aldose by oxidation of both terminal carbon atoms to carboxyl groups.

aldazines
Azines of aldehydes RCH=NN=CHR .

aldehydes
Compounds RC(=O)H , in which a carbonyl group is bonded to one hydrogen atom and to one Rgroup.

aldimines
Imines derived from aldehydes RCH=NR . E.g. EtCH=NH , PhCH=NMe .

alditols
Acyclic polyols having the general formula HOCH2[CH(OH)]nCH2OH (formally derivable from analdose by reduction of the carbonyl group).

aldoketoses
A now less preferred synonym for ketoaldoses.

aldonic acids
Polyhydroxy acids having the general formula HOCH2[CH(OH)]nC(=O)OH and therefore derivedfrom an aldose by oxidation of the aldehyde function, e.g. D-gluconic acid.

aldoses
Aldehydic parent sugars (polyhydroxyaldehydes H[CH(OH)]nC(=O)H, n ≥ 2) and theirintramolecular hemiacetals.See also: monosaccharides

aldoximes
Oximes of aldehydes RCH=NOH .



alicyclic compounds
Aliphatic compounds having a carbocyclic ring structure which may be saturated or unsaturated, butmay not be a benzenoid or other aromatic system.

aliphatic compounds
Acyclic or cyclic, saturated or unsaturated carbon compounds, excluding aromatic compounds.





alkalosis
Pathological condition in which the hydrogen ion substance concentration of body fluids is belownormal and hence the pH of blood rises above the reference interval.See also: acidosis

alkanes
Acyclic branched or unbranched hydrocarbons having the general formula CnH2n+2 , and thereforeconsisting entirely of hydrogen atoms and saturated carbon atoms.See also: cycloalkanes

alkanium ions
Carbocations derived from alkanes by C-hydronation containing at least one pentacoordinate carbonatom, E.g. +CH5 methanium, [C2H7]+ ethanium.See also: carbonium ions

alkene photocycloaddition
Photochemical process leading to formation of a cyclobutane upon addition of an electronicallyexcited alkene to another ground-state alkene or of an electronically excited α,β-unsaturated carbonylcompound to a ground-state alkene. The latter is called a de Mayo reaction.Note:A special case of photocycloaddition is a photodimerization.

alkene photodimerization
Photochemical process leading to the formation of a cyclobutane from two identical alkenes, i.e.,from the photocycloaddition of an electronically excited alkene to a ground-state alkene.



alkene photorearrangement
Photochemical process leading to the skeletal rearrangement of an alkene.See also: aza-di-π-methane rearrangement, di-π-methane rearrangement, di-π-silane rearrangement,oxa-di-π-methane rearrangement

alkenes
Acyclic branched or unbranched hydrocarbons having one carbon–carbon double bond and the generalformula CnH2n . Acyclic branched or unbranched hydrocarbons having more than one double bondare alkadienes, alkatrienes, etc.See also: olefins

alkoxides
Compounds, ROM, derivatives of alcohols, ROH, in which R is saturated at the site of its attachmentto oxygen and M is a metal or other cationic species.See: alcoholates

alkoxyamines
O-Alkyl hydroxylamines (with or without substitution on N) R'ONR2 (R' ≠ H).

alkyl groups
Univalent groups derived from alkanes by removal of a hydrogen atom from any carbon atom –CnH2n+1. The groups derived by removal of a hydrogen atom from a terminal carbon atom ofunbranched alkanes form a subclass of normal alkyl (n-alkyl) groups H(CH2)n. The groups RCH2,R2CH (R ≠ H), and R3C (R ≠ H) are primary, secondary and tertiary alkyl groups, respectively.See also: cycloalkyl groups, hydrocarbyl groups

alkyl radicals
Carbon-centered radicals derived formally by removal of one hydrogen atom from an alkane, e.g.CH3CH2C.H2 propyl.

alkylenes
1.2.An old term, which is not recommended, for alkenes, especially those of low molecular weight.An old term for alkanediyl groups commonly but not necessarily having the free valencies onadjacent carbon atoms, e.g. –CH(CH3)CH2– propylene (systematically called propane-1,2-diyl).

alkylidene groups
The divalent groups formed from alkanes by removal of two hydrogen atoms from the same carbonatom, the free valencies of which are part of a double bond, e.g. (CH3)2C= propan-2-ylidene.

alkylideneaminoxyl radicals
Radicals having the structure R2C=N–O. . Synonymous with iminoxyl radicals.

alkylideneaminyl radicals
Radicals having the structure R2C=N. . Synonymous with iminyl radicals

alkylidenes
Carbenes R2C: formed by mono or dialkyl substitution of methylene, H2C:, e.g. CH3CH2CH:propylidene.



alkynes
Acyclic branched or unbranched hydrocarbons having a carbon-carbon triple bond and the generalformula CnH2n-2, RC≡CR. Acyclic branched or unbranched hydrocarbons having more than one triplebond are known as alkadiynes, alkatriynes, etc.See also: acetylenes

allele
One of several alternate forms of a gene which occur at the same locus on homologous chromosomesand which become separated during meiosis and can be recombined following fusion of gametes.

allenes
Hydrocarbons (and by extension, derivatives formed by substitution) having two double bonds fromone carbon atom to two others R2C=C=CR2. (The simplest member, propadiene, is known as allene).See also: cumulenes, dienes





allosteric enzymes
Enzymes which contain regions to which small, regulatory molecules (cf. effector) may bind inaddition to and separate from substrate binding sites. On binding the effector, the catalytic activityof the enzyme towards the substrate may be enhanced, in which case the effector is an activator, orreduced, in which case it is an inhibitor.

allostery
A phenomenon whereby the conformation of an enzyme or other protein is altered by combination,at a site other than the substrate-binding site, with a small molecule, referred to as an effector, whichresults in either increased or decreased activity by the enzyme.

allotropes
Different structural modifications of an element.

allotropic transition
Synonym: allotriomorphic transitionA transition of a pure element, at a defined temperature and pressure, from one crystal structure toanother which contains the same atoms but which has different properties. Examples: The transitionof graphite to diamond, that of body-centred-cubic iron to face-centred-cubic iron, and the transitionof orthorhombic sulfur to monoclinic sulfur. Synonymous with allotriomorphic transition.

allylic groups
The group CH2=CHCH2 (allyl) and derivatives formed by substitution. The term 'allylic position' or'allylic site' refers to the saturated carbon atom. A group, such as –OH, attached at an allylic site issometimes described as 'allylic'.

allylic intermediates
Carbanions, carbenium ions or radicals, formally derived by detachment of one hydron, hydride orhydrogen from the CH3 group of propene or derivatives thereof. E.g. H2C=CHCH2+ allyl cation.

allylic substitution reaction
A substitution reaction occurring at position 1/ of an allylic system, the double bond being betweenpositions 2/ and 3/. The incoming group may be attached to the same atom 1/ as the leaving group, orthe incoming group becomes attached at the relative position 3/, with movement of the double bondfrom 2/3 to 1/2. For example:(written as a transformation ).

alternancy symmetry
A topological property of the molecular graphs of alternant hydrocarbons which allows the carbonatoms to be divided into two subsets in such a way that no two atoms of the same subset are adjacent.A consequence of this property is the symmetrical arrangement of the energy levels of bonding andantibonding Hückel MOs relative to the level of a nonbonding orbital (energy level of the p AO ofa carbon atom).

alternant
A conjugated system of π-electrons is termed alternant if its atoms can be divided into two sets so thatno atom of one set is directly linked to any other atom of the same set.

alternating copolymer
A copolymer consisting of macromolecules comprising two species of monomeric units in alternatingsequence.Note:An alternating copolymer may be considered as a homopolymer derived from an implicit orhypothetical monomer.See also: homopolymer (1)

alternating copolymerization
A copolymerization in which an alternating copolymer is formed.

alternating current
Current with sinusoidal wave forms; all other wave forms should be termed 'periodic'.See also: amplitude of alternating current

alternating voltage
This term should be applied only to sinusoidal phenomena; the term periodic voltage should be usedfor other wave forms.See also: amplitude of alternating voltage





AM 0 sunlight
Solar irradiance in space just above the atmosphere of the earth on a plane perpendicular to thedirection of the sun (air mass, AM, zero). Also called extraterrestrial irradiance.See also: AM 1 sunlight

AM 1 sunlight
Solar irradiance at sea level, i.e., traversing the atmosphere, when the direction of the sun isperpendicular to the surface of the earth. Also called terrestrial global irradiance.See also: AM 0 sunlight

amalgam lamp
Intense source of ultraviolet (and) radiation produced by an electrical discharge in alamp with the inner side covered by an amalgam of mercury with another element such as indium orgallium to control the vapour pressure of the mercury. These lamps have 2-3 times the UV output forthe same wavelength as the standard low-pressure mercury lamp.

ambident
Also contains definitions of: multident, polydentA description applied to a chemical species whose molecular entities each possess two alternativeand strongly interacting distinguishable reactive centres, to either of which a bond may be made in areaction: the centres must be connected in such a way that reaction at either site stops or greatly retardssubsequent attack at the second site. The term is most commonly applied to conjugated nucleophiles,for example the enolate ion:(which may react with electrophiles either at the β-carbon atom or at oxygen) or γ-pyridones,and also to the vicinally ambident cyanide ion, cyanate ion, thiocyanate ion, sulfinate ion, nitriteion and unsymmetrical hydrazines. Ambident electrophiles are exemplified by carboxylic estersRC(=O)OCR3 which react with nucleophiles either at the carbonyl carbon or the alkoxy carbon.Molecular entities, such as dianions of dicarboxylic acids, containing two non-interacting (or feeblyinteracting) reactive centres, are not generally considered to be ambident and are better described as'bifunctional'. The Latin root of the word implies two reactive centres, but the term has in the past alsoincorrectly been applied to chemical species with more than two reactive centres. For such speciesthe existing term 'polydent' (or, better, 'multident') is more appropriate.See also: chelation





ambo
A prefix used to indicate that a molecule with two (or more) chiral elements is present as a mixtureof the two racemic diastereoisomers in unspecified proportions. For example, the dipeptide formedfrom L-alanine and DL-leucine is L-alanyl-ambo-leucine.

Ames/salmonella test
A screening test employed in predicting the mutagenic and the potential carcinogenic activities ofchemicals in the environment. It employs Ames test strains of salmonella bacteria (his-) which lackthe ability to produce histidine. The compound to be tested, the bacteria and a small amount ofhistidine (insufficient to permit colony growth but enough to allow sufficient growth for expressionof mutations) are added to agar. The bacteria are allowed to incubate for aboutat. Ifa significant increase in colonies above background is observed in the sample containing the testcompound, then it is concluded that the chemical tested is a direct mutagen for the particular Amesstrain of bacteria. This is taken as a qualitative indication of the possible carcinogenic activity of thischemical in other biological systems. This procedure seems to be of qualitative value in a preliminaryscreening of potential carcinogens.

amic acids
Carbamoyl carboxylic acids, i.e. compounds containing a carboxy and a carboxamide group, e.g. 5carbamoylnicotinic acid.Note:In systematic nomenclature replacement of the '-ic' suffix of a dicarboxylic acid by '-amic' is limitedto dicarboxylic acids that have a trivial name. e.g. HOC(=O)CH2C(=O)NH2 malonamic acid (2carbamoylacetic acid).

amide oximes
Compounds having the structure RC(NH2)=NOH and derivatives formed by substitution; formallythe oximes of carboxamides

amides
1.Derivatives of oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) in which an acidic hydroxy group has beenreplaced by an amino or substituted amino group. Chalcogen replacement analogues are calledthio-, seleno- and telluro-amides. Compounds having one, two or three acyl groups on a givennitrogen are generically included and may be designated as primary, secondary and tertiaryamides, respectively, e.g.benzamide,N,N-dimethylmethanesulfonamide,secondary amides (see imides ),tertiary amides,2.phenylphosphonamidic acid.Notes:1. Amides with NH2, NHR and NR2 groups should not be distinguished by means of the termsprimary, secondary and tertiary.2. Derivatives of certain acidic compounds RnE(OH)m, where E is not carbon (e.g. sulfenicacids, RSOH, phosphinous acids, R2POH) having the structure RnE(NR2)m may benamed as amides but do not belong to the class amides proper, e.g. CH3CH2SNH2ethanesulfenamide or ethylsulfanylamine.The term applies also to metal derivatives of ammonia and amines, in which a cation replaces ahydrogen atom on nitrogen. Such compounds are also called azanides, e.g.lithium diisopropylamide, synonym lithium diisopropylazanide.See also: carboxamides, lactams, peptides, phosphoramides, sulfonamides

amidines
Derivatives of oxoacids RnE(=O)OH in which the hydroxy group is replaced by an amino groupand the oxo group is replaced by =NR . Amidines include carboxamidines, sulfinamidines andphosphinamidines, R2P(=NR)NR2 . In organic chemistry an unspecified amidine is commonly acarboxamidine.See also: carboxamidines, sulfinamidines

amidium ions
Cations formally derived by the addition of one hydron to the N or O atom of an amide andN-hydrocarbyl derivatives thereof. In organic chemistry an unspecified amidium ion is commonly acarboxamidium ionorThe term does not imply knowledge concerning the position of the cationic centre, e.g.PhC(=O)N+Me3 N,N,N-trimethylbenzamidium.

amidrazones
Also contains definitions of: amide hydrazones, hydrazide imidesCompounds having the structure RC(=NH)NHNH2 or RC(NH2)=NNH2 , formally derived fromcarboxylic acids. These tautomers are named hydrazide imides and amide hydrazones, respectively.Also included are N-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

aminals
Compounds having two amino groups bonded to the same carbon, R2C(NR2)2 . Also called geminaldiamines. [The term aminal has also been used, with consequent ambiguity, for α-amino ethers(hemiaminal ethers); such use is discouraged.]See also: hemiaminals

amine imides
Compounds formally derived from the attachment of an amine R3N to a nitrene RN:. The structureR3N+–N−R expresses the 1,2-dipolar character of amine imides. They may be named systematicallyas substituted diazan-2-ium-1-ides, e.g. Me3N+–N−Me, 1,2,2,2-tetramethyldiazan-2-ium-1-ide ortrimethylamine N-methylimide.See also: ylides

amine imines [obsolete]
An undesirable synonym for amine imidesSee: imides (2), ylides

amine oxides
Compounds derived from tertiary amines by the attachment of one oxygen atom to the nitrogenatom R3N+–O− . By extension the term includes the analogous derivatives of primary and secondaryamines.

amine ylides
Synonymous with ammonium ylides

amines
Compounds formally derived from ammonia by replacing one, two or three hydrogen atoms byhydrocarbyl groups, and having the general structures RNH2 (primary amines), R2NH (secondaryamines), R3N (tertiary amines).

aminimides [obsolete]
An undesirable synonym for amine imides.See: ylides

aminium ions
Cations HR3N+ formed by hydronation of an amine R3N . 'Non-quaternary ammonium ions' is asynonymous term, e.g. prolinium, PhN+HMe2 , N,N-dimethylanilinium.Note:If a class X can be hydronated to Xium ions the class Xium ions commonly includes the derivativesformed by the replacement of the added hydron with a hydrocarbyl group. Aminium ions form anexception, made possible by the availability of the class name ammonium ions.See also: onium compounds

aminiumyl radical ions
Radicals cations, R3N.+ derivable from aminium ions, R3NH+ , by removal of a hydrogen atom.Aminiumyl radical ions are, except for H3N.+ , synonymous with the ammoniumyl radical ions. Asthe term ammonium is well known, ammoniumyl radical ions is the more desirable class name.See: ammoniumyl radical ions

amino radicals [obsolete]
A non-IUPAC term for aminyl radicals

amino sugars
Monosaccharides having one alcoholic hydroxy group (commonly but not necessarily in position2) replaced by an amino group; systematically known as x-amino-x-deoxymonosaccharides.(Glycosylamines are excluded.)E.g. D-glucosamine or 2-amino-2-deoxy-D-glucopyranose.





aminooxyl radicals
See: aminoxyl radicals

aminoxides
The anion H2N–O−, aminoxide and its N hydrocarbyl derivatives R2N–O−; formally derived fromhydroxylamines, R2N–OH, by removing a hydron from the hydroxy group, e.g. (CH3)2N–O−dimethylaminoxide.

aminoxyl radicals
Compounds having the structure R2N–O.R2N.+–O−; they are radicals derived fromhydroxylamines by removal of the hydrogen atom from the hydroxy group, and are in many casesisolable. The synonymous terms 'nitroxyl radicals' and 'nitroxides' erroneously suggest the presenceof a nitro group; their use is not desirable. E.g. (ClCH2)2N–O. bis(chloromethyl)aminoxyl.

aminyl oxides [obsolete]
Obsolete term for aminoxyl radicals.



ammonium compounds
See: onium compounds.

ammonium imines [obsolete]
An undesirable synonym for amine imidesSee: ylides

ammonium ylides
1,2-Dipolar compounds of general structure R3N+–C−R2.See also: ylides

ammoniumyl radical ions
H3N.+ and its hydrocarbyl derivatives, e.g. (CH3)3N.+ trimethylammoniumyl, PhN.+H2phenylammoniumyl or benzenaminiumyl.

amorphous carbon
A carbon material without long-range crystalline order. Short-range order exists, but with deviationsof the interatomic distances and/or interbonding angles with respect to the graphite lattice as well asto the diamond lattice.Note:The term amorphous carbon is restricted to the description of carbon materials with localized πelectrons as described by P.W.Anderson (Phys. Rev., 1958, 109, 1492). Deviations in the C–Cdistances greater than 5% (i.e., whereis the inter-atomic distance in the crystal latticefor theas well as for theconfiguration) occur in such materials, as well as deviations in thebond angles because of the presence of 'dangling bonds'. The above description of amorphous carbonis not applicable to carbon materials with two-dimensional structural elements present in all pyrolysisresidues of carbon compounds as polyaromatic layers with a nearly ideal interatomic distance ofand an extension greater than.See also: diamond-like carbon films















amphipathic
The property of surface activity is usually due to the fact that the molecules of the substanceare amphipathic or amphiphilic, meaning that each contains both a hydrophilic and a hydrophobic(lipophilic) group. This assumes that one of the two phases is aqueous, and the other non-aqueous. Ifboth are non-aqueous (e.g. oil/air), molecules containing organophilic and organophobic groups maybe amphipathic and surface active.

amphiphilic
A term used to describe a compound containing a large organic cation or anion which possesses along unbranched hydrocarbon chain, e.g.CH3(CH2)nCO2−M+CH3(CH2)nN+(CH3)3X− (n > 7 )CH3(CH2)nSO3−M+.The existence of distinct polar (hydrophilic) and nonpolar (hydrophobic) regions in the moleculepromotes the formation of micelles in dilute aqueous solution.See also: amphipathic

amphiprotic (solvent)
Self-ionizing solvent possessing both characteristics of Brønsted acids and bases, for example H2Oand CH3OH, in contrast to aprotic solvent.

ampholytes
See: zwitterionic compounds

ampholytic polymer
Synonym: polyampholytePolyelectrolyte composed of macromolecules containing both cationic and anionic groups, orcorresponding ionizable groups.Note:An ampholytic polymer in which ionic groups of opposite sign are incorporated into the same pendantgroups is called, depending on the structure of the pendant groups, a zwitterionic polymer, polymericinner salt, or polybetaine.

amphoteric
A chemical species that behaves both as an acid and as a base is called amphoteric. This propertydepends upon the medium in which the species is investigated: H2SO4 is an acid when studied inwater, but becomes amphoteric in superacids.

amplification reaction
A reaction which replaces the conventional reaction used in a particular determination so that a morefavourable measurement can be made. The sequence can be repeated to provide a further favourableincrease in measurement.







anaerobe
An organism that does not need free-form oxygen for growth. Many anaerobes are even sensitive tofree oxygen. Obligate (strict) anaerobes grow only in the absence of oxygen. Facultative anaerobescan grow either in the presence or in the absence of molecular oxygen.

anaerobic
Not requiring molecular oxygen.See also: aerobic

anaesthetic
Substance which produces loss of feeling or sensation: general anaesthetic produces loss ofconsciousness; local or regional anaesthetic renders a specific area insensible to pain.

analgesic
Substance which relieves pain, without causing loss of consciousness.

analogue metabolism
Process by which a normally non-biodegradable compound is biodegraded in the presence of astructurally similar compound which can induce the necessary enzymes.





analytical function
A function which relates the measured valueinterferants,to the instrument reading,, with the value of all, remaining constant. This function is expressed by the following regression of thecalibration results.The analytical function is taken as equal to the inverse of the calibration function.

analytical instrument
A device or a combination of devices used to carry out an analytical process. The analytical process isall or part of the analytical procedure that encompasses all steps from the introduction of the sampleor the test portion to the production of the result. An analytical instrument may carry out single ormultiple analytical procedures. In the latter case it may be selective, i.e. designed to carry out anyrequested combination of procedures within the set, on each specimen.

analytical intercomparison
A procedure which gives insight to the accuracy of results of analytical procedures by comparingthe results obtained in the analyses of identical samples at different laboratories and preferably withdifferent analytical methods.

analytical pyrolysis
The characterization, in an inert atmosphere, of a material or a chemical process by a chemicaldegradation reaction(s) induced by thermal energy.

analytical quality control
Procedures which give insight into the precision and accuracy of analysis results.

analytical radiochemistry
Synonym: radioanalytical chemistryThat part of analytical chemistry in which the application of radioactivity is an essential step in theanalytical procedures. Synonymous with radioanalytical chemistry.

analytical sample
See: sample in analytical chemistry, test sample

analytical unit (analyser)
An assembly of subunits comprising: suitable apparatus permitting the introduction and removal ofthe gas, liquid or solid to be analysed and/or calibration materials; a measuring cell or other apparatuswhich, from the physical or chemical properties of the components of the material to be analysed, givessignals allowing their identification and/or measurement; signal processing devices (amplification,recording) or, if need be, data processing devices.

anation
Replacement of the ligand water by an anion in a coordination entity.

aneroid barometer
An instrument for monitoring the atmospheric pressure in which no liquid is employed, but ratherchanges in pressure between the atmosphere and a closed vessel bend a diaphram which moves apointer on a scale.

Anger camera
A camera in which a large diameter scintillator is coupled to an array of photomultiplier tubes byfibre optics. X-ray imaging may also be achieved in multi-crystal cameras where many small crystalsindividually scintillate.

angle
The angle between two half-lines terminating at the same point is the ratio of the length of the includedarc of the circle (with its centre at that point) to the radius of the circle. Symbols: , , ... This is aquantity of dimension one with the SI unit radian (), but very often degrees of arc are used.



angle strain
Synonym: Baeyer strainStrain due to a departure in bond angle from 'normal' values. The term is often used in the context ofnon-aromatic cyclic compounds in which the internal angles differ from the regular tetrahedral angleof; in this sense angle strain is also known as Baeyer strain.



angular distribution
With reference to the center of mass, the products of a bimolecular reaction are scattered withrespect to the initial velocity vector, and the distribution of scattering angles is known as the angulardistribution.











anilides
1.2.Compounds derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by replacing an OH group by theNHPh group or derivative formed by ring substitution; N-phenyl amides, e.g. CH3C(=O)NHPhacetanilide.See: amidesSalts formed by replacement of a nitrogen-bound hydron of aniline by a metal or other cation,e.g. NaNHPh sodium anilide.

anils
A term for the subclass of Schiff bases R2C=NR', where R' = phenyl or substituted phenyl group.Thus, N-phenyl imines.

anion
A monoatomic or polyatomic species having one or more elementary charges of the electron.

anion exchange
The process of exchanging anions between a solution and an anion exchanger.

anion exchanger
Ion exchanger with anions as counter-ions. The term anion-exchange resin may be used in the case ofsolid organic polymers. The base form of an anion exchanger is the ionic form in which the counterions are hydroxide groups (OH– form) or the ionogenic groups form an uncharged base, e.g. –NH .

anion-exchange polymer
See also: ion-exchange polymer.

anionic polymer
Polymer composed of negatively charged macromolecules and an equivalent amount of countercations.Notes:1. If a substantial fraction of constitutional units carries negative charges, then an anionic polymeris a polyelectrolyte.2. The term anionic polymer should not be used to denote a polymer prepared by anionicpolymerization.

anionic polymerization
An ionic polymerization in which the kinetic-chain carriers are anions.



anisotropy
The property of molecules and materials to exhibit variations in physical properties along differentmolecular axes of the substance.

annelation
Alternative, but less desirable term for annulation. The term is widely used in the German and Frenchlanguages.

annihilation
Also contains definition of: energy pooling1.2.(in radiochemistry) An interaction between a particle and its antiparticle in which they bothdisappear.



annulation
A transformation involving fusion of a new ring to a molecule via two new bonds. Some authors usethe term 'annelation' for the fusion of an additional ring to an already existing one, and 'annulation'for the formation of a ring from one or several acyclic precursors, but this distinction is not madegenerally.See also: cyclization

annulenes
Mancude monocyclic hydrocarbons without side chains of the general formula CnHn (n is an evennumber) or CnHn+1 (n is an odd number). In systematic nomenclature an annulene with seven or morecarbon atoms may be named [n]annulene, where n is the number of carbon atoms, e.g. [9]annulenefor cyclonona-1,3,5,7-tetraene.

annulenylidenes
Carbenes, derived by formal insertion of a divalent carbon atom into an even-membered annulene,e.g. cycloheptatrienylidene:

anode
Electrode at which oxidation takes place.

anodic transfer coefficient
Defined by analogy with cathodic transfer coefficient.

anomeric effect
Originally the thermodynamic preference for polar groups bonded to C-1 (the anomeric carbon of aglycopyranosyl derivative) to take up an axial position.This effect is now considered to be a special case of a general preference (the generalized anomericeffect) for synclinal (gauche) conformations about the bond C–Y in the system X–C–Y–C whereX and Y are heteroatoms having nonbonding electron pairs, commonly at least one of which isnitrogen, oxygen or fluorine. For example in chloro(methoxy)methane the anomeric effect stabilizesthe synclinal conformation.In alkyl glycopyranosides the anomeric effect operates at two sites (i) along the endocyclic C-1 oxygenbond (endo-anomeric effect) and (ii) along the exocyclic C-1 oxygen bond (exo-anomeric effect). Theopposite preference is claimed for some systems e.g. glycopyranosyltrialkylammonium salts, and hasbeen referred to as the reverse anomeric effect.

anomers
Diastereoisomers of glycosides, hemiacetals or related cyclic forms of sugars, or related moleculesdiffering in configuration only at C-1 of an aldose, C-2 of a 2-ketose, etc.

ansa compounds
Benzene derivatives having para positions (or meta) bridged by a chain (commonly 10 to 12 atomslong) (Latin ansa, handle). By extension, any arene bridged by a chain constrained to lie over oneof the two faces of the arene.See: cyclophanes

antagonism
Combined effect of two or more factors which is smaller than the solitary effect of any one of thosefactors. In bioassays, the term may be used when a specified response is produced by exposure toeither of two factors but not by exposure to both together.See also: synergism

antagonist
1.2.Substance that reverses or reduces the effect induced by an agonist.Substance that attaches to and blocks cell receptors that normally bind naturally occurringsubstances.See also: agonist

antarafacial
Also contains definition of: suprafacialWhen a part of a molecule ('molecular fragment') undergoes two changes in bonding (bond-making orbond-breaking), either to a common centre or to two related centres, external to itself, these bondingchanges may be related in one of two spatially different ways. These are designated as 'antarafacial' ifopposite faces of the molecular fragment are involved, and 'suprafacial' if both changes occur at thesame face. The concept of 'face' is clear from the diagrams in the cases of planar (or approximatelyplanar) frameworks with isolated or interacting p-orbitals [diagrams (a) and (b)].The terms antarafacial and suprafacial are, however, also employed in cases in which the essentialpart of the molecular fragment undergoing changes in bonding comprises two atoms linked onlyby a σ-bond. In these cases it is customary to refer to the phases of the local σ-bonding orbital:occurrence of the two bonding changes at sites of like orbital phase is regarded as suprafacial, whereasthat at two sites of opposite phase is antarafacial. The possibilities are shown for C–C and C–H σbonds in diagrams (c) and (d). There may be two distinct and alternative stereochemical outcomesof a suprafacial process involving a σ-bond between saturated carbon atoms, i.e. either retention orinversion at both centres. The antarafacial process results in inversion at one centre and retention atthe second. For examples of the use of these terms, see cycloaddition, sigmatropic rearrangement.See also: anti, sigma, pi

anthelmint(h)ic
Synonym: antihelminthSubstance intended to kill parasitic intestinal worms, such as helminths. Synonymous withantihelminth.

anthocyanidins
Also contains definition of: flavylium saltsAglycons of anthocyanins ; they are oxygenated derivatives of flavylium (2-phenylchromenylium)salts.See: flavonoids

anthocyanins
Plant pigments of the flavonoid class; they are glycosides that on hydrolysis yield coloured aglyconscalled anthocyanidins

anti
In the representation of stereochemical relationships 'anti' means 'on opposite sides' of a referenceplane, in contrast to 'syn' which means 'on the same side', as in the following examples.1. Two substituents attached to atoms joined by a single bond are anti if the torsion angle (dihedralangle) between the bonds to the substituents is greater than 90°, or syn if it is less than 90°. (Afurther distinction is made between antiperiplanar, synperiplanar, anticlinal and synclinal.)2.3.In the older literature the terms anti and syn were used to designate stereoisomers of oximesand related compounds. That usage was superseded by the terms 'trans' and 'cis' or E and Z,respectively.When the terms are used in the context of chemical reactions or transformations, they designatethe relative orientation of substituents in the substrate or product:1. Addition to a carbon-carbon double bond:2.Alkene-forming elimination:In the examples described under (1) and (2) anti processes are always antarafacial, and synprocesses are suprafacial.See also: endo, exo, syn, anti







anti-thixotropy
Opposite of thixotropy.See also: work hardening

antiaromatic compounds
Compounds that contain() π-electrons in a cyclic planar, or nearly planar, system ofalternating single and double bonds, e.g. cyclobuta-1,3-diene.See also: aromatic compounds



antibiotic
Substance produced by, and obtained from, certain living cells (especially bacteria, yeasts andmoulds), or an equivalent synthetic substance, which is biostatic or biocidal at low concentrations tosome other form of life, especially pathogenic or noxious organisms.

antibody
A protein (immunoglobulin) produced by the immune system of an organism in response to exposureto a foreign molecule (antigen) and characterized by its specific binding to a site of that molecule(antigenic determinant or epitope).













antiferromagnetic transition
See: ferroic transition, magnetic transition

antigen
A substance that stimulates the immune system to produce a set of specific antibodies and thatcombines with the antibody through a specific binding site or epitope.

antimetabolite
Substance, structurally similar to a metabolite, which competes with it or replaces it, and so preventsor reduces its normal utilization.

antimony–xenon lamp (arc)
An intense source of ultraviolet, visible, and near infra-red radiation produced by an electricaldischarge in a mixture of antimony vapour and xenon under high pressure. Its output in the ultravioletregion is higher than that of the mercury–xenon arc.See: lamp

antimycotic
Synonym: fungicideSubstance used to kill a fungus or to inhibit its growth. Synonymous with fungicide.

antiparticle
Of a given particle, a particle with the same rest mass, where the two can annihilate.

antipodes [obsolete]
Obsolete synonym for enantiomers. (Usage strongly discouraged).



antiresistant
Substance used as an additive to a pesticide formulation in order to reduce the resistance of insectsto the pesticide.

antiserum
Serum containing antibodies to a particular antigen either because of immunization or after aninfectious disease.

antisymmetry principle
The postulate that electrons must be described by wavefunctions which are antisymmetric with respectto interchange of the coordinates (including spin) of a pair of electrons. A corollary of the principleis the Pauli exclusion principle. All particles with half-integral spin (fermions) are described byantisymmetric wavefunctions, and all particles with zero or integral spin (bosons) are described bysymmetric wavefunctions.

ap
See: torsion angle

apex current
Also contains definitions of: apex, apex potentialIn measurement of non-faradaic admittance (or tensammetry), a plot of alternating current againstapplied potential shows a minimum or maximum when a non-electroactive substance undergoesadsorption or desorption at the surface of the indicator electrode. Such a maximum or minimum maybe called an apex to emphasize its non-faradaic origin and distinguish it from a 'summit', which wouldresult from a charge-transfer process. The highest value of the current on such an apex may be calledan apex current, and the corresponding applied potential may be called an apex potential.

aphicide
Substance intended to kill aphids.

apical (basal, equatorial)
In trigonal bipyramidal structures (e.g. a five-coordinate trigonal bipyramid with phosphorus ascentral atom) the term apical refers to the two positions that are collinear with the central atom orto the bonds linking these positions to the central atom. The three equivalent bonds (or positions) ina plane passing through the central atom and perpendicular to the direction of the apical bonds aredescribed as equatorial. (See axial, equatorial for alternative use). The term apical is also used for thebond pointing from the atom at or near the centre of the base to the apex of a pyramidal structure. Thepositions at or near the base of the pyramid, or the bonds linking those positions to the central atomof the base are described as basal. The apical bonds have also been called axial.

apicophilicity
In trigonal bipyramidal structures with a five-coordinate central atom, the stabilization achievedthrough a ligand changing its position from equatorial to apical (axial). The apicophilicity of an atomor a group is evaluated by either the energy difference between the stereoisomers (permutationalisomers) containing the ligand in apical and equatorial positions or the energy barrier to permutationalisomerization (see also Berry pseudorotation). In general, the greater the electronegativity and thestronger the π-electron-withdrawing properties of a ligand (as for Cl, F, CN), the higher is itsapicophilicity. The notion of apicophilicity has been extended to four-coordinate bisphenoidal andthree-coordinate T-shaped structures, which can be viewed as trigonal bipyramidal species where,respectively, one or two vertices are occupied by phantom ligands (lone electron pairs).





apoprotein
A protein without its characteristic prosthetic group or metal.

apoptosis
Active process of programmed cell death requiring metabolic energy, often characterised byfragmentation of DNA, and without associated inflammation.

apparent lifetime
See: lifetime

apparent (quantity)
A term, indicated by a superscript ', which means that a process is not well known or that its valuecarries uncertainties which are not known, e.g.is the apparent standard Gibbs energy change.In the context of partial molar quantities the word is used in a different sense; as a symbol for 'apparent'in this connection the use of subscript , as in, is recommended. Other notations employed forthis property includeand.





appearance potential [obsolete]
See: appearance energy



applied potential
The difference of potential measured between identical metallic leads to two electrodes of a cell. Theapplied potential is divided into two electrode potentials, each of which is the difference of potentialexisting between the bulk of the solution and the interior of the conducting material of the electrode,anor ohmic potential drop through the solution, and another ohmic potential drop through eachelectrode. In the electroanalytical literature this quantity has often been denoted by the term voltage,whose continued use is not recommended.

aprotic (solvent)
Non-protogenic (in a given situation). (With extremely strong Brønsted acids or bases, solvents thatare normally aprotic may accept or lose a proton. For example, acetonitrile is in most instances anaprotic solvent, but it is protophilic in the presence of concentrated sulfuric acid and protogenic in thepresence of potassium tert-butoxide. Similar considerations apply to benzene, trichloromethane, etc.)See also: dipolar aprotic solvent

aquagel
Hydrogel in which the network component is a colloidal network.

aquation
The incorporation of one or more integral molecules of water into another species with or withoutdisplacement of one or more other atoms or groups. For example, the incorporation of water into theinner ligand sphere of an inorganic complex is an aquation reaction.See also: hydration



Archibald's method
A sedimentation method based on the fact that at the meniscus and at the bottom of the centrifugecell there is never a flux of the solute across a plane perpendicular to the radial direction and theequations characterizing the sedimentation equilibrium always apply there, even though the systemas a whole may be far from equilibrium. The use of the term 'approach to sedimentation equilibrium'for Archibald's method is discouraged, since it has a more general meaning.



area of interface
In all measurements it is desirable that quantities like the charge and the capacity be related to unit,true, surface area of the interface. While this is relatively simple for a liquid-liquid interface, thereare great difficulties when one phase is solid. In any report of these quantities it is essential to givea clear statement as to whether they refer to the true or the apparent (geometric) area and, especiallyif the former is used, precisely how it was measured.

areic
Attribute to a physical quantity obtained by division by area. Areic charge is the charge on a surfacedivided by the surface area.

arene epoxides
Epoxides derived from arenes by 1,2-addition of an oxygen atom to a formal double bond, e.g. 5,6epoxycyclohexa-1,3-diene.(Common usage has extended the term to include examples with the epoxy group bridgingnonadjacent atoms.)

arene oxides
See: arene epoxides

arenes
Monoyclic and polycyclic aromatic hydrocarbons.See: aromatic compounds

arenium ions
Cations derived formally by the addition of a hydron or other cationic species to any position of anarene, e.g. C6H7+ , benzenium. The term includes:1. Arenium σ-adducts (Wheland intermediates) (which are considered to be intermediates inelectrophilic aromatic substitution reactions) and other cyclohexadienyl cations.2.Arenium π-adducts, such as:[σ-adduct (sigma-adduct), π-adduct (pi-adduct)].See: aryl cations

arenols
Synonymous with phenols (but rarely used).

arenonium ions [obsolete]
An obsolescent name for arenium ions.

argon ion laser
A CW or pulsed laser emitting lines fromemissions are atand.See: gas laserstofrom singly ionized argon. Principal

arithmetic mean (average)
The sum of a series of observations divided by the number of observations. Symbol: . It can becalculated by the formula:Note:All summations are taken from 1 to . Note that the arithmetic mean is an unbiased estimate of thepopulation mean, i.e. is the limiting value for , as.

aromatic
1.2.3.In the traditional sense, 'having a chemistry typified by benzene'.A cyclically conjugated molecular entity with a stability (due to delocalization ) significantlygreater than that of a hypothetical localized structure (e.g. Kekulé structure ) is said to possessaromatic character. If the structure is of higher energy (less stable) than such a hypotheticalclassical structure, the molecular entity is 'antiaromatic'. The most widely used method fordetermining aromaticity is the observation of diatropicity in the 1H NMR spectrum.See also: Hückel (4n + 2) rule, Möbius aromaticityThe terms aromatic and antiaromatic have been extended to describe the stabilization ordestabilization of transition states of pericyclic reactions The hypothetical reference structureis here less clearly defined, and use of the term is based on application of the Hückel (4n + 2)rule and on consideration of the topology of orbital overlap in the transition state. Reactions ofmolecules in the ground state involving antiaromatic transition states proceed, if at all, much lesseasily than those involving aromatic transition states.

aromatic photocycloaddition
Inter- and intramolecular photochemical processes involving the addition of a C–C double (or triple)bond to (i) to the 1,2-positions of an arene in which case it is called an ortho photocycloaddition, withformation of a benzocyclobutene (or a benzocyclobutadiene) derivative, (ii) to the 1,3-positions of anarene in which case it is called a meta photocycloaddition, with formation of tricyclo[3.3.0.02,8]oct-3ene (or octa-3,6-dien) derivatives, or (iii) to the 1,4-positions of an arene in which case it is called apara photocycloaddition, with formation of bicyclo[2,2,2]oct-2-ene (or octa-2,5-dien) derivatives.

aromaticity
The concept of spatial and electronic structure of cyclic molecular systems displaying the effectsof cyclic electron delocalization which provide for their enhanced thermodynamic stability (relativeto acyclic structural analogues) and tendency to retain the structural type in the course of chemicaltransformations. A quantitative assessment of the degree of aromaticity is given by the value of theresonance energy. It may also be evaluated by the energies of relevant isodesmic and homodesmoticreactions. Along with energetic criteria of aromaticity, important and complementary are also astructural criterion (the lesser the alternation of bond lengths in the rings, the greater is the aromaticityof the molecule) and a magnetic criterion (existence of the diamagnetic ring current inducedin a conjugated cyclic molecule by an external magnetic field and manifested by an exaltationand anisotropy of magnetic susceptibility). Although originally introduced for characterization ofpeculiar properties of cyclic conjugated hydrocarbons and their ions, the concept of aromaticity hasbeen extended to their homoderivatives (see homoaromaticity), conjugated heterocyclic compounds(heteroaromaticity), saturated cyclic compounds (σ-aromaticity) as well as to three-dimensionalorganic and organometallic compounds (three-dimensional aromaticity). A common feature of theelectronic structure inherent in all aromatic molecules is the close nature of their valence electronshells, i.e., double electron occupation of all bonding MOs with all antibonding and delocalizednonbonding MOs unfilled. The notion of aromaticity is applied also to transition states.





arsanes
The saturated hydrides of tervalent arsenic, having the general formula AsnHn+2 . Individual membershaving an unbranched arsenic chain are named arsane, diarsane, triarsane, etc. The name of a saturatedhydride of arsenic where one or more arsenic atoms have bonding number 5 is formed by prefixinglocants andsymbols to the name of the corresponding arsane, e.g. H2AsAsHAsH2 triarsane,H4AsAsH3AsH4 1,2,3 -triarsane. Hydrocarbyl derivatives of AsH3 belong to the class arsines.

arsanylidenes
Synonym: arsinidenesRecommended name for carbene analogues having the structure R–As: (former IUPAC name isarsinediyls). A common non-IUPAC synonym is arsinidenes.

arsanylium ions
The arsanyl cation, H2As+, and derivatives by substitution. The name arsinylium (systematicallyderived from arsine) is not applied as it already designates H2As(=O)+, the acylium ion derived fromarsinic acid.

arsenides
Compounds obtained from arsines AsR3 by replacing one or more hydrogen atoms by a metal, e.g.CaAsPh calcium phenylarsenide.

arsine oxides
H3As=O and its hydrocarbyl derivatives. (analogously arsine imides and arsine sulfides), e.g.(CH3)3As=O trimethylarsine oxide or trimethylarsane oxide.See: imides (2).

arsines
AsH3 and compounds derived from it by substituting one, two or three hydrogen atoms by hydrocarbylgroups: R3As, RAsH2, R2AsH, R3As (R ≠ H) are called primary, secondary and tertiary arsines,respectively. A specific arsine is preferably named as a substituted arsane, e.g. CH3CH2AsH2ethylarsane.See: arsanes

arsinic acids
H2As(=O)OH and its As-hydrocarbyl derivatives, e.g. Me2As(=O)OH, dimethylarsinic acid.

arsinous acids
H2AsOH and its As-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

arsonic acids
HAs(=O)(OH)2 and its As-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

arsonium compounds
Salts (including hydroxides) [R4As]+X− containing tetracoordinate arsonium ion and the associatedanion.See also: onium compounds

arsonous acids
HAs(OH)2 and its As-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

arsoranes
The mononuclear hydride AsH5, systematically namedextension the term also applies to arsonium ylides.See: ylides, arsanes-arsane, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives. By



artificial neural networks
Artificial neural networks (ANN) are algorithms simulating the functioning of human neuronsand may be used for pattern recognition problems, e.g., to establish quantitative structure-activityrelationships.

artificial radioactivity
Synonymous with induced radioactivity.

aryl cations
Carbocations formally derived by removal of a hydride ion from a ring carbon atom of an arene.See: arenium ions, e.g. phenyl cation or phenylium:

aryl groups
Groups derived from arenes by removal of a hydrogen atom from a ring carbon atom. Groups similarlyderived from heteroarenes are sometimes subsumed in this definition. E.g. o-tolyl:See: heteroaryl groups

arylene groups
Bivalent groups derived from arenes by removal of a hydrogen atom from two ring carbon atoms. Asynonym is arenediyl groups. E.g. o-phenylene or benzene-1,2-diyl:

aryne
A hydrocarbon derived from an arene by abstraction of two hydrogen atoms from adjacent carbonatoms; thus 1,2-didehydroarene. Arynes are commonly represented with a formal triple bond. Theanalogous heterocyclic compounds are called heteroarynes or hetarynes. For example, benzyne:Arynes are usually transient species.See also: benzynes, dehydroarenes, heteroarynes







aspirator
Any apparatus that produces a movement of a fluid by suction (e.g. a squeeze bulb, pump, Venturi,etc.)

assay
A set of operations having the object of determining the value of a quantity. In analytical chemistry,this term is synonymous with measurement.

assay kit
A set of components (reagents and other necessary materials) and procedural instructions packagedtogether and designed for the estimation in vitro of a value of a specified quantity, when used accordingto the instructions.

association
The assembling of separate molecular entities into any aggregate, especially of oppositely chargedfree ions into ion pairs or larger and not necessarily well-defined clusters of ions held together byelectrostatic attraction. The term signifies the reverse of dissociation, but is not commonly used forthe formation of definite adducts by colligation or coordination.







asymmetric
Lacking all symmetry elements (other than the trivial one of a one-fold axis of symmetry), i.e.belonging to the symmetry point group. The term has been used loosely (and incorrectly) todescribe the absence of a rotation–reflection axis (alternating axis) in a molecule, i.e. as meaningchiral, and this usage persists in the traditional terms asymmetric carbon atom, asymmetric synthesis,asymmetric induction, etc.

asymmetric carbon atom
The traditional name (van't Hoff) for a carbon atom that is attached to four different entities (atomsor groups), e.g. Cabcd.See also: chirality centre

asymmetric centre
See: chirality centre

asymmetric destruction
See: kinetic resolution

asymmetric film
A film bounded by two different bulk phases. When the bulk phases are identical the film is describedas symmetric.

asymmetric induction
The traditional term describing the preferential formation in a chemical reaction of one enantiomer ordiastereoisomer over the other as a result of the influence of a chiral feature present in the substrate,reagent, catalyst or environment.

asymmetric membrane
Membrane constituted of two or more structural planes of non-identical morphologies.

asymmetric photochemistry
Photochemical process leading to a chiral substance from an achiral precursor such that oneenantiomer predominates over the other.Note:Asymmetric induction may be achieved by the use of chiral reagents, a chiral environment, orcircularly polarized light.

asymmetric synthesis
A traditional term used for stereoselective synthesis of chiral compounds.

asymmetric transformation
Also contains definition of: deracemizationThe conversion of a racemate into a pure enantiomer or into a mixture in which one enantiomer ispresent in excess, or of a diastereoisomeric mixture into a single diastereoisomer or into a mixturein which one diastereoisomer predominates. This is sometimes called deracemization. If the twoenantiomers of a chiral substrate A are freely interconvertible and if an equal amount or excess of anon-racemizing second enantiomerically pure chemical species, say (R)-B, is added to a solution ofracemic A, then the resulting equilibrium mixture of adducts A · B will, in general, contain unequalamounts of the diastereoisomers (R)-A · (R)-B and (S)-A · (R)-B. The result of this equilibration iscalled asymmetric transformation of the first kind. If, in such a system, the two diastereoisomericadducts differ considerably in solubility so that only one of them, say (R)-A · (R)-B, crystallizes fromthe solution, then the equilibration of diastereoisomers in solution and concurrent crystallization willcontinue so that all (or most) of the substrate A can be isolated as the crystalline diastereoisomer(R)-A · (R)-B. Such a 'crystallization-induced asymmetric transformation' is called an asymmetrictransformation of the second kind.See also: stereoconvergence

asymmetry
Denoting absence of any symmetry.



atactic macromolecule
A regular macromolecule in which the configurational (base) units are not all identical.

atactic polymer
A polymer composed of atactic macromolecules.

atmosphere
Non-SI unit of pressure,.

atmosphere
of the earthThe entire mass of air surrounding the earth which is composed largely of nitrogen, oxygen, watervapour, clouds (liquid or solid water), carbon dioxide, together with trace gases and aerosols.See: composition of pure air



atom
Smallest particle still characterizing a chemical element. It consists of a nucleus of a positive charge( is the proton number and the elementary charge) carrying almost all its mass (more than 99.9%)and electrons determining its size.

atom-atom polarizability
A quantity used in perturbation HMO theory as a measure of the change in electron density, , ofatom caused by a change in the electronegativity (or Coulomb integral) of atom :

atom-bond polarizability
A quantity used in perturbation HMO theory as a measure of the change in electron density, , ofatom caused by a change in the resonance integral, , of bond :

atomic charge
The charge attributed to an atomatomic number ofandwithin a molecule defined asis the electron density assigned to, whereis the. The method of calculation ofdepends on the choice of the scheme of partitioning electron density. In the framework of the Mullikenpopulation analysisis associated with the so-called gross atomic population:, whereis a gross population for an orbitalwhereandin the basis set employed defined according toare the elements of density matrix and overlap matrix, respectively (see overlapintegral). In the Hückel molecular orbital theory (where),, whereis thenumber of electrons in the MO .

atomic fluorescence
A combined process of photon absorption by an atom followed by spontaneous photon emission.

atomic laser
A gas laser which is pumped using energy transfer from other atoms or molecules. Examples are thehelium-neon ( He Ne ) the copper vapour laser.

atomic mass constant
One twelfth of the mass of a carbon-12 atom in its nuclear and electronic ground state,. It is equal to the unified atomic mass unit



atomic mass unit
See: unified atomic mass unit





atomic spectral lines
Also contains definition of: ionic spectral linesAtomic and ionic spectral lines originate from specified electronic transitions between energy levelsof atoms and ions, respectively. In the past it has been common useage to denote atomic lines as arclines and ionic lines as spark lines. This usage is now considered to be incorrect. The correct way toindicate that lines are due to atomic or ionic transitions is: Element symbol I wavelength e.g. Cu I; and Element symbol II wavelength e.g. Cu II. Similarly for higher states ofionization, the type of line is represented by III, IV, etc.See also: ionic spectral lines

atomic symbol
One, two or three letters used to represent the atom in chemical formulae.

atomic units
The units designed to simplify the form of the fundamental equations of quantum mechanicsby eliminating from them fundamental constants. The atomic unit of length is the Bohr radius,(where). Energy is measured in hartrees,. Masses are specified in terms of atomic mass unit,and of the electron mass unit,. Theadvantage of atomic units is that if all calculations are directly expressed in such units, the results donot vary with any revision of the numerical values of the fundamental constants.

atomic weight
See: relative atomic mass











atropisomers
A subclass of conformers which can be isolated as separate chemical species and which arise fromrestricted rotation about a single bond, e.g. ortho-substituted biphenyl, 1,1,2,2-tetra-tert-butylethane.See: rotational barrier

attachment
A transformation by which one molecular entity (the substrate ) is converted into another by theformation of one (and only one) two-centre bond between the substrate and another molecular entityand which involves no other changes in connectivity in the substrate. For example, the formation ofan acyl cation by attachment of carbon monoxide to a carbenium ion (R+):The product of an attachment may also be the adduct of the two reactants, but not all adducts can berepresented as the products of an attachment. (For example, the Diels–Alder cycloaddition:results in an adduct of buta-1,3-diene and ethene, but the reaction cannot be described as an attachmentsince bonds are formed between more than two centres.)See also: colligation, electron attachment



attenuance filter
Synonym: neutral-density filterAn optical device (filter) which reduces the radiant power of a light beam by a constant factor overall wavelengths within its operating range. Sometimes called attenuator or neutral density filter.

attenuation
The reduction of a radiation quantity upon passage of radiation through matter resulting frominteractions of the radiation with the matter it traverses.

attenuation coefficient
Analogous to absorption coefficient but taking into account also the effects due to scattering andluminescence. It was formerly called extinction coefficient.

atto
SI prefix for(symbol: ).





attributable risk
Part of a risk that is identified as due to exposure to a defined substance.

aufbau principle
A rule for building up the electronic configuration of atoms and molecules. It states that a maximum oftwo electrons are put into orbitals in the order of increasing orbital energy: the lowest-energy orbitalsare filled before electrons are placed in higher-energy orbitals.

Auger effect
The emission of an electron from an atom accompanying the filling of a vacancy in an inner electronshell.

Auger electron
Electron originating in the Auger effect.

Auger electron spectroscopy
Any technique in which a specimen is bombarded with-energy electrons or X-rays, and theenergy distribution of the electrons produced through radiationless de-excitation of the atoms in thesample (Auger electrons) is recorded. The derivative curve may also be recorded.

Auger electron yield
The fraction of the atoms having a vacancy in an inner orbital which relax by emission of an Augerelectron.

Auger yield
For a given excited state of a specified atom the probability that the de-excitation occurs by the Augereffect.

autacoid
A biological substance secreted by various cells whose physiological activity is restricted to thevicinity of its release; it is often referred to as a local hormone.



autocatalytic reaction
A chemical reaction in which a product (or a reaction intermediate ) also functions as a catalyst. Insuch a reaction the observed rate of reaction is often found to increase with time from its initial value.See: order of reaction



automerization
Synonymous with degenerate rearrangement.

autophobicity
If adsorption equilibrium and mutual saturation of the phases is not achieved instantly, it is possibleto distinguish the initial spreading tension,equilibrium has been reached. In the case in which, from the final spreading tension,is positive, while, whenis negative, the systemis said to exhibit autophobicity.

autoprotolysis
A proton (hydron) transfer reaction between two identical molecules (usually a solvent), one actingas a Brønsted acid and the other as a Brønsted base. For example:

autoprotolysis constant
The product of the activities (or, more approximately, concentrations) of the species produced as theresult of autoprotolysis. For solvents in which no other ionization processes are significant the term issynonymous with 'ionic product'. The autoprotolysis constant for water,, is equal to the productof activities:at.

autoradiograph
A radiograph of an object containing radioactive substance, produced by placing the object adjacentto a photographic plate or film or a fluorescent screen.

autoradiolysis
Radiolysis of a radioactive material resulting directly or indirectly from its radioactive decay.

auxiliary electrode
Three-electrode cells comprise (1) an indicator (or test) electrode or a working electrode, at the surfaceof which processes that are of interest may occur, (2) a reference electrode and (3) a third electrode,the auxiliary or counter electrode, which serves merely to carry the current flowing through the cell,and at the surface of which no processes of interest occur. If processes of interest occur at both theanode and the cathode of a cell (as in differential amperometry or controlled current potentiometrictitration with two indicator electrodes), the cell should be said to comprise two indicator (or test)working electrodes.

auxochrome [obsolete]
An atom or group which, when added to or introduced into a chromophore, causes a bathochromicshift and/or a hyperchromic effect in a given band of the chromophore, usually in that of lowestfrequency. This term is obsolete.

auxotrophy
The inability of a organism to synthesize a particular organic compound required for its growth.

average current density
Also contains definition of: local current densityThe average current density, , is defined bywhereis the electrode area,is the local current density andis an infinitesimal surface element.







Avogadro constant
Fundamental physical constant (symbols:,) representing the molar number of entities:.



Avrami equation
An equation, describing crystallization kinetics, of the form:whereis the crystalline volume fraction developed at time and constant temperature,andare suitable parameters. is temperature dependent. According to the original theory, should bean integer from 1 to 4, the value of which should depend only on the type of the statistical model;however, it has become customary to regard it as an adjustable parameter that may be non-integral.

axial chirality
Term used to refer to stereoisomerism resulting from the non-planar arrangement of four groups inpairs about a chirality axis. It is exemplified by allenes abC=C=Ccd (or abC=C=Cab) and by theatropisomerism of ortho-substituted biphenyls. The configuration in molecular entities possessingaxial chirality is specified by the stereodescriptors Ra and Sa (or by P or M).

axial (equatorial)
Also contains definitions of: pseudo-axial, pseudo-equatorial, quasi-axial, quasi-equatorialIn the chair form of cyclohexane ring bonds to ring atoms (and molecular entities attached to suchbonds) are termed axial or equatorial according to whether the bonds make a relatively large or smallangle, respectively, with the plane containing or passing closest to a majority of the ring atoms. Thusthe axial bonds are approximately parallel to the C3 axis and the equatorial bonds approximatelyparallel to two of the ring bonds. These terms are also used for the chair form of other saturated sixmembered rings. The corresponding bonds occurring at the allylic positions in mono-unsaturated sixmembered rings are termed pseudo-axial (or quasi-axial) and pseudo-equatorial (or quasi-equatorial).The terms axial and equatorial have similarly been used in relation to the puckered conformation ofcyclobutane, crown conformer of cyclooctane, etc. and the terms pseudo-axial and pseudo-equatorialin the context of the non-planar structures of cyclopentane and cycloheptane.See apical (basal, equatorial) for an alternative use of axial and equatorial with bipyramidal structures.



axis of helicity
See: helicity







azenes [obsolete]
See: nitrenes

azides
1.2.Compounds bearing the group N3, viz. –N=N+=N−; usually attached to carbon, e.g. PhN3 phenylazide or azidobenzene.Salts of hydrazoic acid, HN3, e.g. NaN3 sodium azide.

azimines [obsolete]
A commonly used but undesirable term for azo imides (Should not be confused with 'azimino', thename for the bridging group, –N=N–NH–).

azines
Condensation products, R2C=NN=CR2, of two moles of a carbonyl compound with one mole ofhydrazine (This term should not be confused with the ending -azine appearing in Hantzsch-Widmannames for some heterocycles).See also: aldazines, ketazines

azinic acids
Also contains definition of: nitronic acidsDerivatives of the parent structure H2N+(O−)OH, of which the alkylidene derivatives,R2C=N+(O−)OH (tautomers of nitroalkanes), are the most commonly encountered. Thealkylideneazinic acids are known as nitronic acids or, synonymously as aci-nitro compounds, e.g.CH2=N+(O−)OH methylideneazinic acid.

azlactones
Oxazol-5(4H)-ones I, compounds derived by cyclization of N-acyl α-amino carboxylicacids, RC(=O)NHCR2C(=O)OH, through formal loss of the elements of water. 4Hydrocarbylideneazlactones II are often referred to as 'unsaturated azlactones'.

azo compounds
Derivatives of diazene (diimide), HN=NH, wherein both hydrogens are substituted by hydrocarbylgroups, e.g. PhN=NPh azobenzene or diphenyldiazene.

azo imides
N-Imides of azo compounds, analogous to azoxy compounds, having a delocalized structurecommonly but undesirably referred to as azimines.See: dipolar compounds, imides (2), ylides

azomethine imides
Synonym: azo ylidesThe 1,3-dipolar N-imides of azomethines having the structureThe term azo ylides, derived from the second resonance form, has also been used.See: imides (2), ylides

azomethine oxides
Synonymous with nitrones.

azomethine ylides
1,3-Dipolar compounds having the structureSee also: ylides

azomethines
Compounds having the structure RN=CR2 (R ≠ H). Many consider the term to include the compoundsRN=CRH (R ≠ H), thus making azomethines synonymous with Schiff bases.See: imines

azonic acids
N-Hydrocarbyl derivatives of the parent structure HN+(O−)(OH)2. Cf. phosphonic acids.

azoxy compounds
N-Oxides of azo compounds of structure RN=N+(O−)R, e.g. PhN=N+(O−)Ph azoxybenzene ordiphenyldiazene oxide.See: dipolar compounds

azylenes [obsolete]
See: nitrenes





β-particle
Electron ejected from a radioactive nucleus.

back donation
Also contains definition of: Chatt–Dewar–Duncanson modelA description of the bonding of π-conjugated ligands to a transition metal which involves a synergicprocess with donation of electrons from the filled π-orbital or lone electron pair orbital of the ligandinto an empty orbital of the metal (donor–acceptor bond), together with release (back donation) ofelectrons from an nd orbital of the metal (which is of π-symmetry with respect to the metal–ligandaxis) into the empty π*-antibonding orbital of the ligand.

back electron transfer
A term often used to indicate thermal reversal of excited state electron transfer restoring the donorand acceptor in their original oxidation level. In using this term one should also specify the resultingelectronic state of the donor and acceptor.

back extraction
Synonymous with stripping (by extraction).





back washing [obsolete]
Often used as a synonym for stripping ; the term is not recommended.

backbone
See: main chain

backflush
Temporary reversal of the direction of the permeable flow.



background mass spectrum
The mass spectrum observed when no sample is intentionally introduced into the mass spectrometeror spectrograph.



background radiation
1.Radiation from any source other than the one it is desired to detect or measure.2.



backscatter
Also contains definition of: forward scatteringScattering of radiation in a generally backward direction. In the assay of radioactivity, it applies tothe scattering of radiation into the radiation detector from any material except the sample and thedetector. In light scattering, it is said to occur when the scattering angle, , is. Conversely,forward scattering occurs when is.











Baldwin's rules
A set of empirical rules for certain formations of 3- to 7-membered rings. The predicted pathwaysare those in which the length and nature of the linking chain enables the terminal atoms to achievethe proper geometries for reaction. The disfavoured cases are subject to severe distortions of bondangles and bond distances.

band spectra
The combination of many different spectral lines resulting from vibrational, rotational and electronictransitions. Unresolved band spectra may appear as a spectral continuum.



bandpass filter
An optical device which permits the transmission of radiation within a specified wavelength rangeand does not permit transmission of radiation at higher or lower wavelengths. It can be an interferencefilter.See also: cut-off filter

bar
Non-SI unit of pressure,.

barbiturates
1.Pyrimidine-2,4,6(1H,3H,5H)-trione (trivial name barbituric acid) and derivatives:2.(keto tautomeric form)Salts of barbituric acid and its derivatives.

barn
Non-SI unit of area,, used to express cross sections in nuclear reactions.

Barton reaction
Photolysis of a nitrite to form a δ-nitroso alcohol. The mechanism is believed to involve a homolyticRO–NO cleavage, followed by δ-hydrogen abstraction and radical coupling.

base
A chemical species or molecular entity having an available pair of electrons capable of forming acovalent bond with a hydron (proton) (see Brønsted base) or with the vacant orbital of some otherspecies (see Lewis base).See also: hard base, superbase

base electrolyte
Synonymous with supporting electrolyte.

base kind of quantity
A kind of quantity considered dimensionally independent of other kinds of quantities, i.e. it is notdefined by an equation containing other kinds of quantities, e.g. length, mass, amount of substance.

base pairing
The specific association between two complementary strands of nucleic acids that results from theformation of hydrogen bonds between the base components of the nucleotides of each strand: A=Tand G=C in DNA, A=U and G=C (and sometimes G=U) in RNA (the lines indicate the numberof hydrogen bonds). Single-stranded nucleic acid molecules can adopt a partially double-strandedstructure through intrastrand base pairing.











basicity
For Brønsted bases, the tendency of a compound to act as hydron (proton) acceptor. The basicity of achemical species is normally expressed by the acidity of the conjugate acid (see conjugate acid–basepair). For Lewis bases it relates to the association constants of Lewis adducts and π-adducts.

basis function
A one-electron function used in the expansion of the molecular orbital function. Basis functionsare commonly represented by atomic orbitals (see also Slater-type orbital or Gaussian-type orbital)centered on each atom of the molecule.

basis set
A set of basis functions employed for the representation of molecular orbitals. One may distinguishthe minimal basis set (includes one basis function for each SCF occupied atomic orbital with distinctprincipal and angular momentum quantum numbers); split valence basis set (includes two or moresizes of basis function for each valence orbital); double zeta (DZ) basis set (a split valence basisset that includes exactly twice as many functions as the minimal basis set); extended basis set (theset larger than the double zeta basis set); polarized basis set (incorporates basis functions of higherangular quantum number beyond what is required by the atom in its electronic ground state; allowsorbitals to change not only a size, but also a shape); basis set with diffuse functions and others.





batch reactor
In a batch reactor the reactants and the catalyst are placed in the reactor which is then closed totransport of matter and the reaction is allowed to proceed for a given time whereupon the mixture ofunreacted material together with the products is withdrawn. Provision for mixing may be required.





bead-rod model
A model simulating the hydrodynamic properties of a chain macromolecule consisting of a sequenceof beads, each of which offers hydrodynamic resistance to the flow of the surrounding medium and isconnected to the next bead by a rigid rod which does not. The mutual orientation of the rods is random.

bead-spring model
A model simulating the hydrodynamic properties of a chain macromolecule consisting of a sequenceof beads, each of which offers hydrodynamic resistance to the flow of the surrounding medium andis connected to the next bead by a spring which does not contribute to the frictional interaction butwhich is responsible for the elastic and deformational properties of the chain. The mutual orientationof the springs is random.





becquerel
SI derived unit of radioactivity equal to one disintegration per second; admitted for reasons ofsafeguarding human health, symbol:.











bending of energy bands
Also contains definition of: flat bandsThe distribution of potential in the space charge region of a semiconductor results in a change in theelectron energy levels with distance from the interface. This is usually described as 'bending of theenergy bands'. Thus the bands are bent, upwards ifand downwards if, where is the freecharge density. Whenthe condition of flat bands is met, provided no surface states are present.

Bent's rule
In a molecule, smaller bond angles are formed between electronegative ligands since the central atom,to which the ligands are attached, tends to direct bonding hybrid orbitals of greater p character towardsits more electronegative substituents.

benzenium ions
Arenium ions, derived from benzene or substituted derivatives.

benzenonium ions [obsolete]
Obsolescent name for benzenium ions.

benzylic groups
Arylmethyl groups and derivatives formed by substitution: ArCR2–, Benzyl, C6H5CH2–, is theprototype. The term 'benzylic position' or 'benzylic site' refers to the saturated carbon atom. A group,such as –OH, attached at a benzylic site is sometimes referred to as 'benzylic'.

benzylic intermediates
Carbanions, carbenium ions or radicals, derived formally by detachment of one hydron, hydrideor hydrogen, respectively, from the CH3 group of toluene or substitution derivatives thereof, e.g.C6H5CH2., benzyl radical.

benzynes
1,2-Didehydrobenzene (the aryne derived from benzene) and its derivatives formed by substitution;see arynes, dehydroarenes. The terms m- and p-benzyne are occasionally, but erroneously, used for1,3- and 1,4-didehydrobenzene, respectively.

betaines
Originally, the compound betaine, (CH3)3N+–CH2C(=O)O− N,N,N-trimethylammonioacetate, andsimilar zwitterionic compounds derived from other amino acids. By extension, neutral moleculeshaving charge-separated forms with an onium atom which bears no hydrogen atoms and that is notadjacent to the anionic atom. Betaines cannot be represented without formal charges. E.g.See also: dipolar compounds, mesoionic compounds, ylides, zwitterionic compounds

betweenanenes
Bicyclic alkenes having a double bond between the bridgehead atoms and a trans attachment of eachbranch to the double bond. Thus trans-bicyclo[m.n.0]alk-1 (m+2)-enes.

bias error
See: measurement result

biased linear pulse amplifier
A pulse amplifier which, within the limits of its normal operating characteristics, has a constant gainfor that portion of an input pulse that exceeds the threshold value and that produces no output forpulses whose amplitude is below the threshold.

bicycle rearrangement
Photochemical rearrangement of unsaturated substrates by group migration over a π perimeterfollowing the movement of a bicycle pedal.An example is:See also: photoisomerization





bilayer
See: multilayer, monolayer

bimodal distribution
The occurrence of two maxima in a frequency distribution.

bimodal network
Also contains definition of: bimodal polymer networkPolymer network comprising polymer chains having two significantly different molar-massdistributions between adjacent junction points.

binder
Usually a coal tar pitch or petroleum pitch (but may include thermosetting resins or mesophase pitchpowders) which, when mixed with a binder coke or a filler, constitutes a carbon mix. This is used inpreparation of the formation of shaped green bodies and subsequently carbon artifacts.

binder coke
A constituent of a carbon (or ceramic) artifact resulting from carbonization of the binder duringbaking.Note:Pitches are mainly used as binders, i.e. as precursors for binder cokes, but the term binder shouldinclude any carbonaceous binder material, for example thermosetting resins such as poly(furfurylalcohol) or phenolics and similar compounds which may form a char during carbonization.

binder
in chromatographyAn additive used to hold the solid stationary phase to the inactive plate or sheet in thin-layerchromatography.

binding energy
The difference between the total energy of a molecular system and the sum of the energies of itsisolated π- and σ-bonds. The value of binding energy depends upon the geometrical arrangement ofthe isolated subunits (molecules). According to another definition, the term to be subtracted from thetotal energy is the sum of the energies of the separate atoms in the corresponding valence states, whichcompose the molecule.

binding site
A specific region (or atom) in a molecular entity that is capable of entering into a stabilizing interactionwith another molecular entity. An example of such an interaction is that of an active site in an enzymewith its substrate. Typical forms of interaction are by hydrogen bonding, coordination and ion pairformation. Two binding sites in different molecular entities are said to be complementary if theirinteraction is stabilizing.

Bingham flow
Many colloidal dispersions show Bingham flow which is characterized by a σ-D diagram as shown.At rates of shear greater than that at point A, the following relation applies:whererate, and(or) is called the Bingham yield stress,is the differential viscosity,is the shearis the average of three normal stress components if the deformation is purely dilatational.

bioassay
A procedure for determining the concentration or biological activity of a substance (e.g. vitamin,hormone, plant growth factor, antibiotic) by measuring its effect on an organism or tissue comparedto a standard preparation.









biochip
An integrated circuit whose electrical and logical functions are performed by protein moleculesappropriately manipulated.

bioconjugate
A molecular species produced by living systems of biological origin when it is composed of two partsof different origins, e.g. a conjugate of a xenobiotic with some groups, e.g. glutathione, sulfate orglucuronic acid, to make it soluble in water or compartmentalized within the cell.

biodegradable polymer
Polymer susceptible to degradation by biological activity, with the degradation accompanied by alowering of its molar mass.Notes:1. See also Note 2 to polymer degradation.2. In the case of a polymer, its biodegradation proceeds not only by catalytic activity of enzymes,but also by a wide variety of biological activities.

biodegradation
Breakdown of a substance catalysed by enzymes in vitro or in vivo. This may be characterized forpurposes of hazard assessment as:1. Primary. Alteration of the chemical structure of a substance resulting in loss of a specific propertyof that substance.2. Environmentally acceptable. Biodegradation to such an extent as to remove undesirableproperties of the compound. This often corresponds to primary biodegradation but it depends onthe circumstances under which the products are discharged into the environment.3. Ultimate. Complete breakdown of a compound to either fully oxidized or reduced simplemolecules (such as carbon dioxide/methane, nitrate/ammonium and water. It should be notedthat the products of biodegradation can be more harmful than the substance degraded.

bioelectronics
The application of biomolecular principles to microelectronics such as in biosensors and biochips

bioisostere
A compound resulting from the exchange of an atom or group of atoms with another, broadly similar,atom or group of atoms.

biological effect monitoring
Continuous or repeated measurement of early biological effects of exposure to a substance toevaluate ambient exposure and health risk by comparison with appropriate reference values based onknowledge of the probable relationship between ambient exposure and biological effects.





biological monitoring
Continuous or repeated measurement of potentially toxic substances or their metabolites in tissues,secreta, excreta, expired air, or any combination of these to evaluate occupational or environmentalexposure and health risk by comparison with appropriate reference values based on knowledge of theprobable relationship between ambient exposure and resultant health effects. Sometimes also called'biomonitoring'.





biomarker
A parameter that can be used to identify a toxic effect in an individual organism and can be usedin extrapolation between species, or as an indicator signalling an event or condition in a biologicalsystem or sample and giving a measure of exposure, effect, or susceptibility. The term 'biomarker' isgenerally used in scientific publications. In occupational hygiene and health, 'biological monitoring'and 'biological effect monitoring' are used with the meaning 'monitoring biomarkers'.

biomass
Material produced by the growth of microorganisms, plants or animals.

biomimetic
Refers to a laboratory procedure designed to imitate a natural chemical process. Also refers to acompound that mimics a biological material in its structure or function.

biopolymers
Macromolecules (including proteins, nucleic acids and polysaccharides) formed by living organisms.

bioreactor
An apparatus used to carry out any kind of bioprocess; examples include fermenter or enzyme reactor.

biosensor
A device that uses specific biochemical reactions mediated by isolated enzymes, immunosystems,tissues, organelles or whole cells to detect chemical compounds usually by electrical, thermal oroptical signals.





biotechnology
The integration of natural sciences and engineering sciences in order to achieve the application oforganisms, cells, parts thereof and molecular analogues for products and services.

biotransformation
Synonym: bioconversionAny chemical conversion of substances that is mediated by living organisms or enzyme preparationsderived therefrom.

biphotonic excitation
Simultaneous (coherent) absorption of two photons (either same or different wavelength), the energyof excitation being the sum of the energies of the two photons. Also called two-photon excitation.Note:This term is sometimes also used for a two-step absorption.

biphotonic process
Resulting from biphotonic excitation.See: multiphoton process

bipolarons
Bound pairs of polarons mutually attracted by the lattice distortion in a solid.See also: self-localized excitations.

biradical
An even-electron molecular entity with two (possibly delocalized) radical centres which act nearlyindependently of each other, e.g.Species in which the two radical centres interact significantly are often referred to as 'biradicaloids'.If the two radical centres are located on the same atom, the species are more properly referred to bytheir generic names: carbenes, nitrenes, etc. The lowest-energy triplet state of a biradical lies below orat most only a little above its lowest singlet state (usually judged relative to, the product of theBoltzmann constant
and the absolute temperature ). The states of those biradicals whose radicalcentres interact particularly weakly are most easily understood in terms of a pair of local doublets.Theoretical descriptions of low-energy states of biradicals display the presence of two unsaturatedvalences (biradicals contain one fewer bond than permitted by the rules of valence): the dominantvalence bond structures have two dots, the low energy molecular orbital configurations have onlytwo electrons in two approximately nonbonding molecular orbitals, two of the natural orbitals haveoccupancies close to one, etc. Although this term has been recommended in the past for diradicals,specialists working in the field prefer the latter term.See also: carbenes, nitrenes



bismuthanes
The saturated hydrides of tervalent bismuth, having the general formula BinHn+2 . Hydrocarbylderivatives of BiH3 belong to the class bismuthines.

bismuthines
BiH3 and compounds derived from it by substituting one, two or three hydrogen atoms by hydrocarbylgroups: R3Bi, RBiH2, R2BiH ( R ≠ H ) are called primary, secondary and tertiary bismuthines,respectively. A specific bismuthine is preferably named as a substituted bismuthane, e.g. (CH3)3Bitrimethylbismuthane.See: bismuthanes

bisphenols
By usage, the methylenediphenols, HOC6H4CH2C6H4OH, commonly p,p-methylenediphenol, andtheir substitution products (generally derived from condensation of two equivalent amounts of aphenol with an aldehyde or ketone).











block
A portion of a macromolecule, comprising many constitutional units that has at least one feature whichis not present in the adjacent portions. Where appropriate, definitions relating to 'macromolecule' mayalso be applied to 'block'.

block copolymer
A copolymer that is a block polymer. In the constituent macromolecules of a block copolymer,adjacent blocks are constitutionally different, i.e. adjacent blocks comprise constitutional units derivedfrom different species of monomer or from the same species of monomer but with a differentcomposition or sequence distribution of constitutional units.

block macromolecule
A macromolecule which is composed of blocks in linear sequence.

block polymer
A polymer composed of block macromolecules.







boat
See: chair, boat, twist, half-chair



body burden
Total amount of substance of a chemical present in an organism at a given time.

bohr
Atomic unit of length,.

Bohr magneton
Electromagnetic fundamental physical constant:where is the elementary charge,the Planck constant divided byandthe electron rest mass.andthe electron rest mass.

Bohr radius
Atomic fundamental physical constant used as atomic unit of length:wherethe elementary charge,the Planck constant divided by

bolometer
A detector constructed from a material having a large temperature coefficient of resistance. Absorptionof radiation gives rise to a change in resistance. A bolometer is named according to its activecomponent, e.g. thermistor bolometer, semiconductor bolometer, superconductor bolometer.

Boltzmann constant
Fundamental physical constant:constant and, whereis the gasthe Avogadro constant.



bond
There is a chemical bond between two atoms or groups of atoms in the case that the forces actingbetween them are such as to lead to the formation of an aggregate with sufficient stability to make itconvenient for the chemist to consider it as an independent 'molecular species'.See also: agostic, coordination, hydrogen bond, multi-centre bond

bond dissociation
See: heterolysis, homolysis(In ordinary usage the term refers to homolysis only.)







bond number
The number of electron-pair bonds between two nuclei in any given Lewis formula. For example,in ethene the bond number between the carbon atoms is two, and between the carbon and hydrogenatoms it is one.

bond orbital
A localized molecular orbital related to a certain σ-, π-, or δ-bond.

bond order
The electron population in the region between atoms A and B of a molecular entity at the expenseof electron density in the immediate vicinity of the individual atomic centers. Different schemes ofpartitioning electron density give rise to different definitions of bond orders. In the framework of theMulliken population analysis, bond order is associated with the total overlap populationwhereandare respectively the elements of the density matrix and overlap matrix (see overlapintegral). A large positive value of bond order signifies strong bonding between the atoms of themolecular entity, whereas negative values ofimply that electrons are displaced away from theinter-atomic region and point to an anti-bonding interaction. In valence bond theory, bond order isgiven by a weighted average of the formal bond orders (i.e. by the number of electron pairs in a givenLewis structure) between the atoms in the resonance structures (see resonance hybrid).

bond order
Theoretical index of the degree of bonding between two atoms relative to that of a single bond, i.e. thebond provided by one localized electron pair. In molecular orbital theory it is the sum of the products ofthe corresponding atomic orbital coefficients (weights) over all the occupied molecular spin-orbitals.











bonding number
The bonding number of a skeletal atom is the sum of the total number of bonding equivalents(valence bonds) of that skeletal atom to adjacent skeletal atoms in a parent hydride, if any, and thenumber of attached hydrogen atoms, if any. Examples: SH2: for S,; SH6: for S,.

boranes
The molecular hydrides of boron, e.g. B5H9 pentaborane(9).

boranylidenes
The species RB: containing an electrically neutral univalent boron atom with two formally nonbonding electrons.See: carbene analogues

borderline mechanism
A mechanism intermediate between two extremes, for example a nucleophilic substitutionintermediate betweenand, or intermediate between electron transfer and.

borenes
A traditional term for boranylidenes.

borinic acids
Compounds having the structure R2BOH.



boronic acids
Compounds having the structure RB(OH)2.

borylenes
A traditional term for boranylidenes.

boson
Particle of integer spin quantum number following Bose–Einstein statistics.





bowsprit (flagpole)
In the boat form of cyclohexane and related structures there are two ring atoms lying out of the planeof the other four; exocyclic bonds to these two atoms pointing in a direction roughly parallel to thatplane are called bowsprit, the other two are called flagpole.













branching decay
Nuclear decay which can proceed in two or more different ways.

branching fraction
In branching decay the fraction of nuclei which decay in a specified way.



branching plane
At a conical intersection point, the plane spanned by the gradient difference vector (gradient of the interstate coupling vector (whereand) and the):are the configuration interaction eigenvectors (i.e., the excited and ground-stateadiabatic wavefunctions) in a conical intersection problem, is the conical intersection Hamiltonian,represents the nuclear configuration vector of the system, and thus is a unit vector in the directionof vector .andare the energies of the lower and upper states, respectively.Note:The branching plane is also referred to as the g-h plane. Inspection ofandprovides informationon the geometrical deformation imposed on an excited state molecular entity immediately after decayat a conical intersection. Consequently, these vectors provide information on the ground-state speciesthat will be formed after the decay.

branching ratio
The ratio of alternative products formed in a reaction (e.g. the HF / DF ratio in the reaction betweenF and HD).





Bredt's rule
A double bond cannot be placed with one terminus at the bridgehead of a bridged ring system unlessthe rings are large enough to accommodate the double bond without excessive strain. For example,while bicyclo[2.2.1]hept-1-ene is only capable of existence as a transient, its higher homologueshaving a double bond at the bridgehead position have been isolated: e.g.









bridge
Also contains definition of: bridgeheadA valence bond or an atom or an unbranched chain of atoms connecting two different parts of amolecule. The two tertiary carbon atoms connected through the bridge are termed bridgeheads.

bridge index
In a coordination entity, the number of central atoms linked by a particular bridging ligand.

measurement
Solution of high concentration of inert salt, preferably comprising cations and anions of equalmobility, optionally interposed between the reference electrode filling and both the test and standardsolution, when the test solution and filling solution are chemically incompatible. This procedureintroduces into the operational cell a second liquid junction formed usually in a similar way to thefirst. (This definition refers to a bridge solution of a double junction reference electrode.)



bridging ligand
A ligand attached to two or more, usually metallic, central atoms.

brightness
Obsolete term. This term is reserved for non-quantitative reference to physiological perception of lightand is not recommended as a quantitative measure of the radiance of an emitting device, e.g., a lamp.

brightness
of a laser dyeProduct of the fluorescence quantum yield (at the excitation wavelength,, i.e.,) of a dye and the molar decadic absorption coefficient.

bromohydrins
See: halohydrins

Brooks and Taylor structure
The structure of the anisotropic spheres which precipitate from isotropic pitch during pyrolysis.The structure of the spheres consists of a lamellar arrangement of aromatic molecules in parallellayers which are perpendicular to the polar axis of the sphere and which are perpendicular to themesophase-isotropic phase interface.Note:The term Brooks and Taylor structure is recommended to describe the particular lamellar morphologyof the spherules most commonly precipitated from pyrolysed pitch. The term honours the workers whofirst recognized the significance of carbonaceous mesophase to carbon science and technology andwho first defined this spherical morphology. The term Brooks and Taylor structure does not cover allstructures found in the spherical mesophase, because other lamellar arrangements have been observed.

Brownian motion
The movement of particles in a colloidal system such as an aerosol caused by collision with themolecules in the fluid in which the particles are imbedded.

Brønsted acid
A molecular entity capable of donating a hydron (proton) to a base, (i.e. a 'hydron donor') or thecorresponding chemical species. For example: H2O, H3O+, CH3CO2H, H2SO4, HSO4−, HCl, CH3OH,NH3 .See also: conjugate acid–base pair

Brønsted base
A molecular entity capable of accepting a hydron (proton) from an acid (i.e. a 'hydron acceptor') orthe corresponding chemical species. For example: OH−, H2O, CH3CO2−, HSO4−, SO42−, Cl− .See also: conjugate acid-base pair

Brønsted relation
Also contains definition of: catalysis lawThe term applies to either of the equations:(or their logarithmic forms) where , and are constants for a given reaction series ( and arecalled 'Brønsted exponents'),andare catalytic coefficients (or rate coefficients) of reactionswhose rates depend on the concentrations of HA and/or of A− .of the acid HA,is the acid dissociation constantis the number of equivalent acidic protons in the acid HA, and−is the numberof equivalent basic sites in its conjugate base A . The chosen values of and should always bespecified. (The charge designations of H and A are only illustrative.) The Brønsted relation is oftentermed the 'Brønsted catalysis law' (or the 'Catalysis Law'). Although justifiable on historical grounds,this name is not recommended, since Brønsted relations are known to apply to many uncatalysedand pseudo-catalysed reactions (such as simple proton (hydron) transfer reactions). The term 'pseudoBrønsted relation' is sometimes used for reactions which involve nucleophilic catalysis instead ofacid–base catalysis. Various types of Brønsted parameters have been proposed such as,,for leaving group, nucleophile and equilibrium constants, respectively.See also: linear free–energy relation

bubble column
A bioreactor, in the shape of a column, in which the reaction medium is kept mixed and aerated byintroduction of air into the bottom (cf. air lift bioreactor ).







bulk mesophase
A continuous anisotropic phase formed by coalescence of mesophase spheres. Bulk mesophase retainsfluidity and is deformable in the temperature range up to about, and transforms into green cokeby further loss of hydrogen or low-molecular-weight species. This bulk mesophase can sometimes beformed directly from the isotropic pitch without observation of intermediate spheres.

bulk rheology
Also contains definition of: surface rheologyRheology may be conveniently divided into bulk rheology, in which effects due to the surface ofthe system can be neglected, and surface rheology, in which such effects are predominant. It shouldbe noted that in surface rheology the neglect of bulk behaviour is permissible only in exceptionalcircumstances, such as for very thin films surrounded by a gas.

bulk sample
The sample resulting from the planned aggregation or combination of sample units.

Bunnett–Olsen equations
The equations for the relation betweenaqueous mineral acid solution, whererepresents the activity functionandfor base S inis Hammett's acidity function andfor the nitroaniline reference bases to build.See also: Cox–Yates equation

Bunsen burner
Also contains definitions of: Meker burner, slot burnerPremix burners are distinguished as Bunsen-, Meker-, or slot-burners according to whether they haveone large hole, a number of small holes, or a slot as outlet port(s) for the gas mixture, respectively.When several parallel slots are present, they are identified as multislot burners (e.g. a three-slotburner).

Bunte salts [obsolete]
Salts (usually sodium salts) of S-alkylthiosulfuric acid, of general structure RSS(=O)2O−M+. Use ofthis term is discouraged.

burn-up
Induced nuclear transformation of atoms during reactor operation.

burn-up fraction
The fraction of an initial quantity of a given nuclide that has undergone burn-up.







χ-parameter
A numerical parameter, χ, employed in the Flory–Huggins theory, which accounts in the main for thecontribution of the non-combinatorial entropy of mixing and for the enthalpy of mixing.





cage
An aggregate of molecules, generally in the condensed phase, that surrounds the fragments formed,for example, by thermal or photochemical dissociation. Because the cage hinders the separation ofthe fragments by diffusion, they may preferentially react with one another (' cage effect ') but notnecessarily to reform the precursor species. For example:See: geminate recombination

cage compound
A polycyclic compound having the shape of a cage. The term is also used for inclusion compounds.

cage effect
When in a condensed phase, or in a dense gas, reactant molecules come together, or species are formedin proximity to one another, and are caged in by surrounding molecules, they may undergo a set ofcollisions known as an encounter; the term 'cage effect' is then applied.The cage effect is also known as the Franck–Rabinowitch effect.See also: cage.

Cahn–Ingold–Prelog system
See: CIP priority

calcination
Heating to high temperatures in air or oxygen.Notes:1. The term is most likely to be applied to a step in the preparation of a catalyst.2. In sol-gel processing the term applies to the heating of a polymer network containing metalcompounds to convert it into an oxide network.3. Modified from previous definition. The definition proposed here is more explicit about theelevated temperatures that are required.

calcined coke
A petroleum coke or coal-derived pitch coke obtained by heat treatment of green coke to about. It will normally have a hydrogen content of less than.Note:Calcined coke is the main raw material for the manufacture of polygranular carbon and polygranulargraphite products (e.g. carbon and graphite electrodes).

calibration component
A component of a calibration mixture, present in the gaseous or vapour state, quantitatively andqualitatively defined, and used directly for testing and for calibration.















calorie
Non-SI unit of energy. There are three differently defined calories: thermochemicalcalorie (), international steam table calorie (),calorie
(), however only the symbolis usually used.

calorimetric titration
A titration performed in a calorimeter which produces a plot of heat change versus volume oftitrant. This is the preferred term for experiments in which the main goal is the measurement ofthermodynamic parameters. Because such experiments may be performed in any of a variety of typesof calorimeters with varying degrees of calorimetric accuracy, it is important that the reporting ofsuch results include an assessment of accuracy and precision. The term stands in contrast to the mainemphasis in enthalpimetric analysis.

calorimetry
A general term describing any experiment in which heat is measured as some chemical reaction orphysical process occurs.

candela
SI base unit for luminous intensity (symbol:). Theis the luminous intensity, in a givendirection, of a source that emits monochromatic radiation of frequencyhas a radiant intensity in that direction of ()perand that.

canonical rate constant
The rate constant for a system in which the reactants are in thermal equilibrium at a giventemperature. In statistical mechanics the expression 'canonical ensemble' is used to refer to a closedsystem in thermal equilibrium, the species being present in a statistical distribution. By contrast, amicrocanonical ensemble is composed of systems all having the same energy: a canonical ensembletherefore consists of a statistical distribution of microcanonical ensembles. The canonical or thermalrate constant can be obtained from the microcanonical rate constant by summing over the energy,taking into account the statistical distribution.



capacitance hygrometer
Hygrometer using the capacitance variations of a capacitor whose dielectric medium consists of thegas or of a material in contact with this gas.







captodative effect
Effect on the stability of a carbon-centred radical determined by the combined action of a captor(electron withdrawing) and a dative (electron releasing) substituent, both attached to the radical centre.The term is also used for certain unsaturated compounds.

capture
A process in which an atomic or nuclear system acquires an additional particle. In general, aspecification is added of the type of the captured particle or its energy.

capture cross-section
The cross-section for capture.

capture γ-radiation
The γ-radiation emitted in radiative capture.

carbaboranes
A class of boron compound of general formula [(CH)a(BH)mHb]c where c can be positive, negativeor zero. The CH groups occupy polyhedron vertices, and other hydrogen atoms are either bridgingor terminal.Note:The contraction 'carboranes' is also well established as the generic name for this class of compound.

carbamates
Salts or esters of carbamic acid, H2NC(=O)OH, or of N-substituted carbamic acids R2NC(=O)OR',(R' = hydrocarbyl or a cation). The esters are often called urethanes or urethans, a usage that is strictlycorrect only for the ethyl esters.

carbanion
Generic name for anions containing an even number of electrons and having an unshared pair ofelectrons on a tervalent carbon atom (e.g. Cl3C− or HC≡C− ) or — if the ion is mesomeric (seemesomerism) — having at least one significant contributing structure with an unshared pair ofelectrons on a tervalent carbon atom, for example:See also: radical ion

carbena [obsolete]
This prefix is now rejected. It has been used in the past, especially in cyclic systems, to name carbenes,e.g. 'carbenacycloheptane', now cycloheptylidene.

carbene analogues
The electrically neutral mononuclear hydrides of group 14 having two non-bonding electrons, theelectrically neutral mononuclear hydrides of group 15 having four non-bonding electrons, and alsothe compound HB:. The names of a number of these are shown below.RB:boranylidenes
RAs:arsanylidenes
R2Sn:RN:nitrenes
stannylidenes
R2Si:silylenesRSb:stibanylidenes
R2Pb:RP:phosphanylidenes
plumbylidenes
R2Ge:germylidenes
Note that if R = H, these compounds are parent hydrides; derivatives formed by substitution are namedaccordingly. However, if the substituent's first atom, bearing the free valence, is of the same elementas the atom of the carbene analogue, other parent compounds may be required (see carbenes ), e.g.HN: nitrene; CH3N: methylnitrene; H2NN: diazanylidene (synonym isodiazene, not aminonitrene ).

carbene radical anions
Species R2C…−, having three non-bonding electrons, formally derived by addition of an electron toa carbene.

carbene radical cations
Species R2C.+ having one non-bonding electron, formally derived by subtraction of an electron froma carbene, e.g. H2C.+ methyliumyl.

carbenes
The electrically neutral species H2C: and its derivatives, in which the carbon is covalently bonded totwo univalent groups of any kind or a divalent group and bears two nonbonding electrons, which maybe spin-paired (singlet state) or spin-non-paired (triplet state). In systematic name formation, carbeneis the name of the parent hydride :CH2 hence, the name dichlorocarbene for :CCl2. However, namesfor acyclic and cyclic hydrocarbons containing one or more divalent carbon atoms are derived fromthe name of the corresponding all- -hydrocarbon using the suffix -ylidene. E.g. prop-2-en-1-ylidene,H2C=CHCH: ethenylidene, H2C=C:; cyclohexylidene,Subclassesofcarbenes
includeacylcarbenes
,imidoylcarbenes,and vinyl carbenes.

carbenium centre
The three-coordinate carbon atom in a carbenium ion to which the excess positive charge of the ion(other than that located on heteroatoms) may be formally considered to be largely attributed, i.e. whichhas one vacant p-orbital. (N.B. It is not always possible to uniquely identify such an atom.) This formalattribution of charge often does not express the real charge distribution.

carbenium ion
A generic name for carbocations, real or hypothetical, that have at least one important contributingstructure containing a tervalent carbon atom with a vacant p-orbital. (The name implies a protonatedcarbene or a substitution derivative thereof.) The term was proposed (and rejected) as a replacementfor the traditional usage of the name carbonium ion. To avoid ambiguity, the name should not be usedas the root for the systematic nomenclature of carbocations. The corresponding difficulty confusedcarbonium ion nomenclature for many years. For example, the term 'ethylcarbonium ion' has at timesbeen used to refer either to CH3CH2+ (ethyl cation) or (correctly) to CH3CH2CH2+ (propyl cation).

carbenoids
Complexed carbene-like entities that display the reactivity characteristics of carbenes, either directlyor by acting as sources of carbenes.

carbinolamines [obsolete]
An obsolete term for hemiaminals.

carbinols [obsolete]
An obsolete term for substituted methanols, in which the name carbinol is synonymous with methanol.

carbinyl cations [obsolete]
An obsolete term, derived from carbinol, once used for carbenium ions.

carbo-reduction
Process in which a metal oxide is reduced in the presence of carbon or a carbon-containing compound.

carbocation
A cation containing an even number of electrons with a significant portion of the excess positivecharge located on one or more carbon atoms. This is a general term embracing carbenium ions, alltypes of carbonium ions vinyl cations, etc. Carbocations may be named by adding the word 'cation'to the name of the corresponding radical. Such names do not imply structure (e.g. whether threecoordinated or five-coordinated carbon atoms are present).See also: bridged carbocation, radical ion

carbocyclic compounds
Cyclic compounds in which all of the ring members are carbon atoms, e.g. 1,2-dihydronaphthalene.See also: homocyclic compounds

carbodiimides
Carbodiimide, HN=C=NH, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.

carbohydrates
Originally, compounds such as aldoses and ketoses having the stoichiometric formulaCn(H2O)n, hence 'hydrates of carbon'. The generic term carbohydrate includes monosaccharides,oligosaccharides and polysaccharides as well as substances derived from monosaccharides byreduction of the carbonyl group (alditols), by oxidation of one or more terminal groups to carboxylicacids, or by replacement of one or more hydroxy group(s) by a hydrogen atom, an amino group, thiolgroup or similar groups. It also includes derivatives of these compounds.

carbon
Element number 6 of the periodic table of elements (electronic ground state). For adescription of the various types of carbon as a solid the term carbon should be used only in combinationwith an additional noun or a clarifying adjective.See also: amorphous carbon, carbon fibres, carbon material, glass-like carbon, graphitic carbon, nongraphitic carbon, pyrolytic carbon

carbon artifact
An 'artificially produced' solid body which consists mainly of carbonaceous material in a distinctshape.Note:Sometimes this term is also used for artificially (in the sense of technically) produced non-shapedcarbon materials such as coke, blacks, etc. This application of the term carbon artifact is notrecommended. Synonyms to the term carbon artifact are: 'artificial carbon article' or 'artificial carbonbody'.

carbon black
An industrially manufactured colloidal carbon material in the form of spheres and of their fusedaggregates with sizes below.Note:Carbon black is a commercial product manufactured by thermal decomposition, including detonation,or by incomplete combustion of carbon hydrogen compounds and has a well-defined morphologywith a minimum content of tars or other extraneous materials. For historical reasons, however, carbonblack is popularly but incorrectly regarded as a form of soot. In fact, in many languages, the sameword is used to designate both materials. Carbon black is manufactured under controlled conditions,whereas soot is randomly formed. They can be distinguished on the basis of tar, ash content andimpurities. Attempts in the literature to create a general term, 'aciniform carbon', which would coverboth carbon black and soot, are not yet generally accepted.

carbon cenospheres
Porous or hollow carbonaceous sphere-like particles (frequently in the size range of a few to severalhundreds of µ m diameter) formed during pyrolysis, also in the course of combustion, of carbonaceousliquid droplets (e.g. heavy fuel) or solid particles (e.g. coal).

carbon cloth
A textile material consisting of carbon fibres oriented at least in two directions. Carbon cloth is notnecessarily woven.





carbon felt
A textile material consisting of, in approximation, randomly oriented and intertwined carbon fibres.Note:Carbon felts are usually fabricated by carbonization of organic felts but they can also be producedfrom short carbon fibres.

carbon fibre
Fibres (filaments, tows, yarns, rovings) consisting of at least 92% (mass fraction) carbon, usually inthe non-graphitic state.Note:Carbon fibres are fabricated by pyrolysis of organic precursor fibres or by growth from gaseoushydrocarbons. The use of the term graphite fibres instead of carbon fibres as often observed inthe literature is incorrect and should be avoided. The term graphite fibres is justified only if threedimensional crystalline order is confirmed, e.g. by X-ray diffraction measurements.





carbon fibres type HT
Carbon fibres type HT are carbon fibres with values of Young's modulus betweenandto. The term HT, referring to high tensile strength, was early applied because fibres of thistype display the highest tensile strengths.Note:The disposition of boundaries between the fibre types is somewhat arbitrary. For carbon fibres typeHT, the values of the strength-to-stiffness ratio are typically larger than. The tensilestrength of carbon fibres is flaw-controlled, however, and therefore the measured values increasestrongly as the diameter of the filaments is decreased.

carbon fibres type IM
Carbon fibres type IM (intermediate modulus) are related to carbon fibres type HT because of thecomparable values of tensile strength, but are characterized by greater stiffness (Young's modulus upto approximately 35% of the theoreticalvalue).Note:The tensile modulus (Young's modulus) varies between ca.and, but the dispositionof the boundaries is somewhat arbitrary. The relatively high ratio of tensile strength to tensilemodulus, typically above, in carbon fibres type IM, in spite of an increase of Young'smodulus, requires a further increase of strength, which is achievable by a significant reduction of themonofilament diameter down to about. Such small filament diameters are typical of carbonfibres type IM.

carbon fibres type LM
Carbon fibres type LM (low modulus) are carbon fibres with isotropic structure, tensile modulusvalues as low as 10% of thevalues of the graphite single crystal, and low strength values.Note:The term carbon fibres type LM is sometimes used for various types of isotropic carbon fibres knownas pitch-based or rayon-based carbon fibres that have not been subjected to hot-stretching. Such fibresare not used for reinforcement purposes in high-performance composites.

carbon fibres type UHM
Carbon fibres type UHM (ultra-high modulus) designates a class of carbon fibres having very highvalues of Young's modulus larger than(i.e. greater than 55% of the theoreticalvalueof graphite).





carbon mix
A mixture of filler coke, e.g. grains and/or powders of solid carbon materials and a carbonaceousbinder and selected additives, prepared in heated mixers at temperatures in the range of–as a preliminary step for the formation of shaped green bodies.

carbonaceous mesophase
A liquid-crystalline state of pitch which shows the optical birefringence of disc-like (discotic) nematicliquid crystals. It can be formed as an intermediate phase during thermolysis (pyrolysis) of an isotropicmolten pitch or by precipitation from pitch fractions prepared by selective extraction. Generally, thespherical mesophase precipitated from a pyrolysing pitch has the Brooks and Taylor structure. Withcontinuous heat treatment the carbonaceous mesophase coalesces to a state of bulk mesophase beforesolidification to green coke with further loss of hydrogen or low-molecular-weight compounds.Note:In the formation of carbonaceous mesophase by thermolysis (pyrolysis) of isotropic molten pitch, thedevelopment of a liquid-crystalline phase is accompanied by simultaneous aromatic polymerizationreactions. The reactivity of pitch with increasing heat treatment temperature and its thermosettingnature are responsible for the lack of a true reversible thermotropic phase transition for the bulkmesophase in most pitches. Due to its glass-like nature most of the liquid-crystalline characteristicsare retained in the super-cooled solid state.

carbonitriles
In systematic nomenclature, the suffix -carbonitrile is used to name compounds RC≡N where thesuffix includes the carbon atom of the –CN. However, carbonitrile is not a class name for nitriles.

carbonium ion
The term should be used with great care since several incompatible meanings are currently in use. Itis not acceptable as the root for systematic nomenclature for carbocations.1.2.3.In most of the existing literature the term is used in its traditional sense for what is here definedas carbenium ion.A carbocation, real or hypothetical, that contains at least one five-coordinate carbon atom.A carbocation, real or hypothetical, whose structure cannot adequately be described by twoelectron two-centre bonds only. (The structure may involve carbon atoms with a coordinationnumber greater than five.)

carbonization
A process by which solid residues with increasing content of the element carbon are formed fromorganic material usually by pyrolysis in an inert atmosphere.Note:As with all pyrolytic reactions, carbonization is a complex process in which many reactions take placeconcurrently such as dehydrogenation, condensation, hydrogen transfer and isomerization. It differsfrom coalification in that its reaction rate is faster by many orders of magnitude. The final pyrolysistemperature applied controls the degree of carbonization and the residual content of foreign elements,e.g. atthe carbon content of the residue exceeds a mass fraction of 90 wt.%, whereasatmore than 99 wt.% carbon is found.

carbonyl compounds
1.2.Compounds containing the carbonyl group, C=O. The term is commonly used in the restrictedsense of aldehydes and ketones, although it actually includes carboxylic acids and derivatives.See also: oxo compoundsMetal carbonyls, in which carbon monoxide is a formal ligand.

carbonyl imides
1,3-Dipolar compounds having the structure:See also: oxonium ylides (2)

carbonyl imines [obsolete]
An undesirable synonym for carbonyl imides.See: ylides

carbonyl oxides
Synonym: peroxo compounds1,3 Dipolar compounds having the structure. Also called peroxo compounds.See also: oxonium ylides (2)

carbonyl ylides
1,3-Dipolar compounds having the structure.See also: oxonium ylides (2)

carbon–carbon composite
A carbon fibre-reinforced carbon matrix material. The carbon matrix phase is typically formed bysolid, liquid or gaseous pyrolysis of an organic precursor material. The matrix is either a graphitizablecarbon or non-graphitizable carbon, and the carbonaceous reinforcement is fibrous in form. Thecomposite may also contain other components in particulate or fibrous forms.

carboranes
See: carbaboranes

carboxamides
Amides of carboxylic acids, having the structure RC(=O)NR2. The term is used as a suffix insystematic name formation to denote the –C(=O)NH2 group including its carbon atom.

carboxamidines
Compounds having the structure RC(=NR)NR2. The term is used as a suffix in systematicnomenclature to denote the –C(=NH)NH2 group including its carbon atom, e.g. acetamidine,CH3C(=NH)NH2; 2-butyl-4,5-dihydroimidazole:

carboxylic acids
Oxoacids having the structure RC(=O)OH. The term is used as a suffix in systematic name formationto denote the –C(=O)OH group including its carbon atom.

carbylamines [obsolete]
An obsolete term, which should not be used, for isocyanides.

carbynes
The neutral species HC… and its derivatives formed by substitution in which a univalent carbon atomis covalently bonded to one group and also bears three nonbonding electrons. (This term carries noimplication about spin-pairing).

carbynium ions
The cationic species H2C.+ or substitution derivatives thereof, formally derived by adding a hydronto a carbyne or subtracting an electron from a carbene.

carotenes
Hydrocarbon carotenoids (a subclass of tetraterpenes).See also: terpenes

carotenoids
Tetraterpenoids ( C40), formally derived from the acyclic parent, Ψ,Ψ-carotene I by hydrogenation,dehydrogenation, cyclization, oxidation, or combination of these processes. This class includescarotenes, xanthophylls and certain compounds that arise from rearrangement of the skeleton of I orby loss of part of this structure. Retinoids are excluded.See also: retro

carrier
A substance in appreciable amount which, when associated with a trace of a specified substance, willcarry the trace with it through a chemical or physical process.See also: support of a catalyst



carrier gas
A gas introduced in order to transport a sample for analytical purposes. In gas chromatography it isthe gas which is passed continuously through the column and whose passage promotes the elution ofthe components of the sample. The carrier gas together with the portions of the sample present in thisphase constitutes the mobile phase.

carrier
in radioanalytical chemistryA substance in appreciable amount which, when associated with a tracer of a specified substance, willcarry the tracer with it through a chemical or physical process, or prevent the tracer from undergoingnonspecific processes due to its low concentration.



carrier-free [obsolete]
See: no carrier added, which term should be preferred

carry-over
Also contains definition of: carry-over effectA process by which materials are carried into a reaction mixture to which they do not belong. Thesematerials can be either parts of a specimen, or reagents including the diluent or wash solution. Insuch cases, carry-over means the transfer of material (specimen or reagents) from one container, orfrom one reaction mixture, to another one. It can be either unidirectional or bidirectional in a seriesof specimens or assays. The term carry-over effect is used for carry-over from specimen to specimen.

cascade impactor
An instrument used for the classification of aerosols according to size and for possible subsequentchemical analysis. Air is drawn through a series of orifices of decreasing size; the air flow is normalto collecting surfaces on which aerosols are collected by inertial impaction. The particles, separatedstepwise by their momentum differences into a number of size ranges, are collected simultaneously.

catabolism
1.Reactions involving the oxidation of organic substrates to provide chemically available energy(e.g. ATP) and to generate metabolic intermediates.2. Generally, the process of breakdown of complex molecules into simpler ones, often providingbiologically available energy.See also: anabolism

catabolite repression
A decrease in the activity of certain auxiliary catabolic enzymes when a surplus of an (easilymetabolizable) substrate is available. Commonly this effect is caused by glucose (glucose repression)or by metabolites produced from glucose.

catalase
A hemeprotein which catalyses the disproportionation of dihydrogen peroxide to O2, and water; italso catalyses the oxidation of other compounds , such as ethanol, by dihydrogen peroxide. Note.A non-hemeprotein containing a dinuclear managanese cluster with catalase activity is often calledpseudocatalase.

catalymetric titration
A titration process, which involves a catalyst, where the end-point is detected by the sudden increaseor decrease of the rate of a reaction.





catalyst
Also contains definitions of: heterogeneous catalysis, homogeneous catalysisA substance that increases the rate of a reaction without modifying the overall standard Gibbs energychange in the reaction; the process is called catalysis. The catalyst is both a reactant and product of thereaction. The words catalyst and catalysis should not be used when the added substance reduces therate of reaction (see inhibitor ). Catalysis can be classified as homogeneous catalysis, in which onlyone phase is involved, and heterogeneous catalysis, in which the reaction occurs at or near an interfacebetween phases. Catalysis brought about by one of the products of a reaction is called autocatalysis.Catalysis brought about by a group on a reactant molecule itself is called intramolecular catalysis.The term catalysis is also often used when the substance is consumed in the reaction (for example:base-catalysed hydrolysis of esters). Strictly, such a substance should be called an activator.See also: autocatalytic reaction, bifunctional catalysis, catalytic coefficient, electron-transfercatalysis, general acid catalysis, general base catalysis, intramolecular catalysis, micellar catalysis,Michaelis-Menten kinetics, phase-transfer catalysis, pseudo-catalysis, rate of reaction, specificcatalysis

catalyst ageing
Catalyst deactivation resulting from changes in the structure or in the texture of the catalyst. Changesof this kind are usually irreversible and the catalyst cannot be regenerated.

catalyst decay
Synonym: catalyst deactivationThe conversion in a catalytic reaction performed under constant conditions of reaction often decreaseswith time of run or time on stream. This phenomenon is called catalyst deactivation or catalyst decay.

catalyst
in solvent extractionA substance included in the solvent to increase the rate of transfer without affecting the position ofequilibrium. The term accelerator may also be used but kinetic synergist is not recommended.











catalytic cracking
See: cracking

catalytic current
The faradaic current that is obtained with a solution containing two substances B and A may exceedthe sum of the faradaic currents that would be obtained with B and A separately, but at the sameconcentrations and under the same experimental conditions. In either of the two following situationsthe increase is termed a catalytic current. B is reduced or oxidized at the electrode-solution interfaceto give a product B' that then reduces or oxidizes A chemically. The reaction of B with A may yieldeither B or an intermediate in the overall half-reaction by which B' was obtained from B. In thissituation the increase of current that results from the addition of A to a solution of B may be termed aregeneration current. The presence at the electrode-solution interface of one substance, which may beeither A or the product A' of its reduction or oxidation, decreases the over-potential for the reductionor oxidation of B. In either case the magnitude of the catalytic current depends on the applied potential.If the current observed with a mixture of A and B is smaller than the sum of the separate currents,the term non-additive current should be used.

catalytic dehydrocyclization
A reaction in which an alkane is converted into an aromatic hydrocarbon and hydrogen. For example,





catalytic hydrocracking
A process similar to catalytic cracking in its industrial purpose but effected under hydrogen pressureand on a catalyst containing an ingredient with a hydrogenating function.





catalytic methanation
A process for removing carbon monoxide from gas streams or for producing methane by the reaction

catalytic reforming
A process for increasing the octane number of naphthas. It involves isomerization of alkanes,dehydrogenation of cyclohexanes to aromatic hydrocarbons, isomerization and dehydrogenation ofalkylcyclopentanes, and dehydrocyclization of alkanes.



cataphoresis [obsolete]
See: electrophoresis

catecholamines
4-(2-Aminoethyl)pyrocatechol [4-(2-aminoethyl)benzene-1,2-diol] and derivatives formed bysubstitution.











cation exchange
The process of exchanging cations between a solution and a cation exchanger.

cation exchanger
Ion exchanger with cations as counter-ions. The term cation-exchange resin may be used in the case ofsolid organic polymers. The acid form of a cation exchanger is the ionic form of a cation exchanger inwhich counter-ions are hydrogen ions (H-form) or the ionogenic groups have added a proton formingan undissociated acid.

cation-exchange polymer
See also: ion-exchange polymer

cationic polymer
Polymer composed of positively charged macromolecules and an equivalent amount of counteranions.Notes:1. If a substantial fraction of constitutional units carries positive charges, then a cationic polymeris a polyelectrolyte.2. The positive charges may be fixed on groups located in main chains as in an ionene or in pendantgroups.3. The term cationic polymer should not be used to denote a polymer prepared by cationicpolymerization.

cationic polymerization
An ionic polymerization in which the kinetic-chain carriers are cations.

cationotropic rearrangement
See: tautomerism

cationotropy
See: tautomerism

cavitands
Compounds constrained by structure to having or accommodating a cavity large enough to host othermolecules.See: inclusion compounds











cell line
Defined unique population of cells obtained by culture from a primary source through numerousgenerations.



centi
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

central atom
The atom in a coordination entity which binds other atoms or groups of atoms (ligands) to itself,thereby occupying a central position in the coordination entity.











cephalins (kephalins) [obsolete]
Compounds derived from glycerol in which a primary and the secondary hydroxy groups are esterifiedwith long-chain fatty acids, and the remaining primary one with the mono(2-aminoethyl) ester ofphosphoric acid, or with the monoserine ester of phosphoric acid. The term is not recommended. Thesecompounds are preferably designated as (3-phosphatidyl)ethanolamines and (3-phosphatidyl)serinesrespectively.See also: phosphatidic acids

cephalosporins
Cephems having the basic structure shown.See also: cephams, cephems, penams, penems, penicillins

cephams
Natural and synthetic antibiotics containing the 5-thia-1-azabicyclo[4.2.0]octan-8-one nucleus;generally assumed to have the 6R configuration, unless otherwise specified. The numbering useddiffers from that of the von Baeyer named bicyclic system. Where they differ, the von Baeyernumbering is shown in parentheses.

cephems
2,3-Didehydrocephams: 5-thia-1-azabicyclo[4.2.0]oct-2-en-8-ones.See: cephalosporins, cephams

ceramer
Chemically bonded hybrid material which is a crosslinked organic–inorganic polymer.Note:Ceramers are usually prepared by sol-gel processing of oligomers or polymers with reactive silyloxysubstituents.



ceramic filter
A component of a stack sampling system which is suitable for high temperature use; also known asa ceramic thimble.

ceramic precursor
Also contains definitions of: pre-ceramic, pre-ceramic materialMaterial that is converted to a ceramic through pyrolysis.Note:Examples include poly(dimethylsilanediyl), poly(carbasilane)s, poly(silazane)s, etc.

ceramic yield
Mass of ceramic expressed as a percentage of the mass of the ceramic precursor used in theceramization process.

ceramic-reinforced polymer
Polymer composite consisting of a polymer continuous phase and disperse phase domains ofmicroscopic ceramic particles.

ceramization
Process in which a ceramic precursor is converted into a ceramic.

Cerenkov detector
A charged particle detector based on the Cerenkov effect.

Cerenkov effect
Emission of radiation in the visible and ultraviolet spectrum arising when a charged particle crossesa medium with a velocity greater than that of light in the same medium.

Cerenkov radiation
Radiation resulting from the Cerenkov effect.



chain branching
When in a chain reaction there is a net increase in the number of chain carriers there is said to be chainbranching. A simple example of a chain-propagating reaction leading to chain branching is:in which there is one chain carrier (an oxygen atom) on the left and two chain carriers (a hydrogenatom and a hydroxyl radical) on the right.See also: degenerate chain branching

chain carrier
A species, such as an atom or free radical, which is involved in chain-propagating reactions is knownas a chain carrier.



chain entanglement
Interlocking of polymer chains in a polymer material forming a transient or permanent networkjunction over the time-scale of the measurement.

chain fission yield
The fraction of fissions giving rise to nuclei of a particular mass number.







chain initiation
The process in a chain reaction that is responsible for the formation of a chain carrier.



chain polymerization
Also contains definition of: condensative chain polymerizationA chain reaction in which the growth of a polymer chain proceeds exclusively by reaction(s) betweenmonomer(s) and reactive site(s) on the polymer chain with regeneration of the reactive site(s) at theend of each growth step.Notes:1. A chain polymerization consists of initiation and propagation reactions, and may also includetermination and chain transfer reactions.2. The adjective 'chain' in 'chain polymerization' denotes a 'chain reaction' rather than a 'polymerchain'.3. Propagation in chain polymerization usually occurs without the formation of small molecules.However, cases exist where a low-molar-mass by-product is formed, as in the polymerizationof oxazolidine-2,5-diones derived from amino acids (commonly termed amino-acid N-carboxyanhydrides). When a low-molar-mass by-product is formed, the adjective 'condensative' isrecommended to give the term condensative chain polymerization4. The growth steps are expressed by:5.wheredenotes the growing chain of degree of polymerization ,a monomer and a lowmolar-mass by-product formed in the case of condensative chain polymerization.The term 'chain polymerization' may be qualified further, if necessary, to specify the type ofchemical reactions involved in the growth step, e.g. ring-opening chain polymerization, cationicchain polymerization.6.There exist, exceptionally, some polymerizations that proceed via chain reactions that, accordingto the definition, are not chain polymerizations. For example, the polymerization:proceeds via a radical chain reaction with intermolecular transfer of the radical centre. Thegrowth step, however, involves reactions between molecules of all degrees of polymerizationand, hence, the polymerization is classified as a polyaddition. If required, the classification canbe made more precise and the polymerization described as a chain-reaction polyaddition.

chain reaction
A reaction in which one or more reactive reaction intermediates (frequently radicals) are continuouslyregenerated, usually through a repetitive cycle of elementary steps (the 'propagation step'). Forexample, in the chlorination of methane by a radical mechanism, Cl. is continuously regenerated inthe chain propagation steps:In chain polymerization reactions, reactive intermediates of the same types, generated in successivesteps or cycles of steps, differ in relative molecular mass, as in:See also: chain branching, chain transfer, degenerate chain branching, initiation, termination



chain transfer
The abstraction, by the radical end of a growing chain-polymer, of an atom from another molecule.The growth of the polymer chain is thereby terminated but a new radical, capable of chain propagationand polymerization, is simultaneously created. For the example of alkene polymerization cited for achain reaction, the reaction:represents a chain transfer, the radical Cl3C. inducing further polymerization:The phenomenon occurs also in other chain reactions such as cationic polymerization.See also: telomerization

chain-ending step
See: initiation



chain-propagating reaction
Synonym: propagating reactionA chain-propagating reaction, or more simply a propagating reaction, is an elementary step in a chainreaction in which one chain carrier is converted into another. The conversion can be a unimolecularreaction or a bimolecular reaction with a reactant molecule.

chain-termination reaction
See: termination

chair, boat, twist
Also contains definition of: twist formIf carbon atoms 1, 2, 4 and 5 of cyclohexane occupy coplanar positions and when carbon atoms 3 and 6are on opposite sides of the plane the conformation (of symmetry group D3d) is called a chair form. Thesame term is applied to similar conformations of analogous saturated six-membered ring structurescontaining hetero-atoms and/or bearing substituent groups, but these conformations may be distortedfrom the exact D3d symmetry. For cyclohexane and most such analogues, the chair form is the moststable conformation. If the cyclohexane conformation has no centre of symmetry but possesses twoplanes of symmetry, one of them bisecting the bonds between atoms 1 and 2 and between 4 and 5and the other plane passing through atoms 3 and 6 (which lie out of the plane and on the same sideof the plane containing 1, 2, 4 and 5), that conformation (of symmetry group C2v ) is called a boatform and it is generally not a stable form. Again, this term is also applied to structural analogues. Theconformation of D2 symmetry passed through in the interconversion of two boat forms of cyclohexaneis called the twist form (also known as skew boat, skew form and stretched form).See also: half-chairIn a five-membered ring a conformation in which two adjacent atoms are maximally displaced, inopposite directions, relative to the plane containing the other three carbon atoms has been called ahalf-chair but is better called a twist conformation.See also: envelope conformationIn carbohydrate chemistry the term twist refers to a five-membered ring and the D2 symmetry sixmembered ring is referred to as skew.

chair–chair interconversion
See: ring reversal

chalcones
1,3-Diphenylpropenone (benzylideneacetophenone), ArCH=CH(=O)Ar, and its derivatives formedby substitution.



change of a quantity
The increment of the value of a quantitywith time. The change may be expressed eitherinfinitesimally at time by the differentialor, or in practice it may be expressed by a finiteincrement over the time interval, i.e., which may be writtenorExamples are: mass change,concentration change,.; amount of substance change,; volume change,; substance

change ratio of a quantity
A term which may be expressed infinitesimally at time by a ratio of differentialswhere thekind of quantities are the same but for different components in the same system. In practice, the ratiofor a finite interval is:Examples are: mass change ratio,; amount of substance change ratio,.

channel
1.Regions of potential-energy surfaces where there are valleys are sometimes referred to asarrangement channels. The reactant channel or entrance channel is that corresponding toconfigurations similar to those of the reactants; the product channel or exit channel relates toconfigurations similar to those of the products. In collision theory, the specification of a completeset of quantum numbers in a given arrangement channel is called a channel.See also: entrance channel, exit channel2.



chaperon
A species that facilitates a combination reaction between atoms or radicals, or the reverse process, isknown as a chaperon. It is a special case of a third body.

char
A solid decompostion product of a natural or synthetic organic material.Note:If the precursor has not passed through a fluid stage, char will retain the characteristic shape of theprecursor (although becoming of smaller size). For such materials the term 'pseudomorphous' hasbeen used. Some simple organic compounds, e.g. sugar, melt at an early stage of decomposition andthen polymerize during carbonization to produce chars.













characteristic potential
An applied potential that is characteristic of a charge-transfer process and the experimental conditions(such as the composition of the solvent and supporting electrolyte and the temperature) underwhich it is investigated, and whose nature depends on the technique that is employed. Sometypical characteristic potentials are the half-wave potential in polarography, the quarter-transitiontime potential in chronopotentiometry, the peak potential and the half-peak potential in linear-sweepvoltammetry, and the summit potential in ac polarography.







charge
See: electric charge, elementary charge



charge hopping
Electron or hole transfer between equivalent sites.







charge population
The net electric charge on a specified atom in a molecular entity, as determined by some prescribeddefinition.See also: electron density

charge recombination
Reverse of charge separation. In using this term it is important to specify the resulting electronic stateof the donor and acceptor.

charge separation
A process in which, under the influence of a suitable driving force (e.g. provided by photoexcitation),electronic charge moves in a direction that increases the difference in local charges between donorand acceptor sites. Electron transfer between neutral species is one of the most important examples.

charge shift
A process in which under the influence of a suitable driving force (e.g. provided by photoexcitation)electronic charge moves without changing the difference in local charges between donor and acceptorsites. Electron transfer reversing the charges in a system composed of a neutral donor and a cationicacceptor or of a neutral acceptor and an anionic donor provide prominent examples.





charge-exchange reaction
Synonymous with charge-transfer reaction.





charge-stripping reaction
An ion/neutral species reaction wherein the charge on the reactant ion is made more positive.

charge-transfer adsorption
Oxidative or reductive chemisorption where 'reductive' and 'oxidative' refer to electron gain or losson species in the solid. In simple cases it is non-dissociative, i.e. there is a mere transfer of chargebetween adsorptive and adsorbent in forming the adsorbate.

charge-transfer complex
An electron-donor–electron-acceptor complex, characterized by electronic transition(s) to an excitedstate in which there is a partial transfer of electronic charge from the donor to the acceptor moiety.

charge-transfer (CT) state
A state related to the ground state by a charge-transfer transition.









charring
Pyrolysis of samples containing organic matter. In the presence of oxygen this is referred to as ashing.

chelate
See: chelation

chelating polymer
Polymer containing ligand groups capable of forming bonds (or other attractive interactions) betweentwo or more separate binding sites within the same ligand group and a single atom.Notes:1. Chelating polymers mostly act as ion-exchange polymers specific to ions that form chelates withchelating ligands of the polymer.2. See also: chelation.

chelation
The formation or presence of bonds (or other attractive interactions) between two or more separatebinding sites within the same ligand and a single central atom. A molecular entity in which thereis chelation (and the corresponding chemical species ) is called a 'chelate'. The terms bidentate (ordidentate), tridentate, tetradentate, ... multidentate are used to indicate the number of potential bindingsites of the ligand, at least two of which must be used by the ligand in forming a 'chelate'. Forexample, the bidentate ethylenediamine forms a chelate with CuI in which both nitrogen atoms ofethylenediamine are bonded to copper. (The use of the term is often restricted to metallic centralatoms.) The phrase 'separate binding sites' is intended to exclude cases such as [PtCl3(CH2=CH2)]−,ferrocene and (benzene)tricarbonylchromium in which ethene, the cyclopentadienyl group andbenzene, respectively, are considered to present single binding sites to the respective metal atom, andwhich are not normally thought of as chelates.See also: cryptand, η (eta or hapto)

cheletropic reaction
A form of cycloaddition across the terminal atoms of a fully conjugated system with formation of twonew σ-bonds to a single atom of the ('monocentric') reagent. There is formal loss of one π-bond in thesubstrate and an increase in coordination number of the relevant atom of the reagent. An example isthe addition of sulfur dioxide to butadiene:The reverse of this type of reaction is designated 'cheletropic elimination'.

chelotropic reaction
Alternative (and etymologically more correct) name for cheletropic reaction.



chemical actinometer
A detector in which the amount of a chemical formed is proportional to the numbers of photonsabsorbed.See also: actinometer

chemical activation
When some of the energy required for a reaction is provided by a preceding exothermic chemicalreaction there is said to be chemical activation. For example, in the scheme:some or all of the energy required for X to decompose is provided by the first reaction.

chemical amount
See: amount of substance

chemical amplification
Process consisting of a chemical reaction that generates a species that catalyzes another reaction andalso the succeeding catalyzed reaction.Notes:1. Chemical amplification can lead to a change in structure and by consequence to a change in thephysical properties of a polymeric material.2. The term 'chemical amplification' is commonly used in photo-resist lithography employing aphoto-acid generator or photo-base generator.3. An example of chemical amplification is the transformation of [(tert-butoxycarbonyl)oxy]phenylgroups in polymer chains to hydroxyphenyl groups catalyzed by a photo-generated acid.

chemical bond
When forces acting between two atoms or groups of atoms lead to the formation of a stableindependent molecular entity, a chemical bond is considered to exist between these atoms or groups.The principal characteristic of a bond in a molecule is the existence of a region between the nucleiof constant potential contours that allows the potential energy to improve substantially by atomiccontraction at the expense of only a small increase in kinetic energy. Not only directed covalent bondscharacteristic of organic compounds, but also bonds such as those existing between sodium cationsand chloride anions in a crystal of sodium chloride or the bonds binding aluminium to six moleculesof water in its environment, and even weak bonds that link two molecules of O2 into O4, are to beattributed to chemical bonds.

chemical decomposition
The breakdown of a single entity (normal molecule, reaction intermediate, etc.) into two or morefragments.

chemical diffusion
Diffusion under the influence of a gradient in chemical composition. In concentrated solid solutions,e.g. A1-xBx, or in diffusion couples, the motion of one constituent causes a counterflow of the otherconstituents(s) or vacancies. In this case one can define a diffusion coefficient for the intermixing,which is called the chemical diffusion coefficient or interdiffusion coefficient.

chemical dosimeter
A dosimeter in which the dose is measured by observing the extent, under specified conditions, of achemical reaction caused by the ionizing radiation to be measured.

chemical element
1.2.A species of atoms; all atoms with the same number of protons in the atomic nucleus.A pure chemical substance composed of atoms with the same number of protons in the atomicnucleus. Sometimes this concept is called the elementary substance as distinct from the chemicalelement as defined under 1, but mostly the term chemical element is used for both concepts.

chemical equilibrium
Reversible processes [processes which may be made to proceed in the forward or reverse direction bythe (infinitesimal) change of one variable], ultimately reach a point where the rates in both directionsare identical, so that the system gives the appearance of having a static composition at which the Gibbsenergy, , is a minimum. At equilibrium the sum of the chemical potentials of the reactants equalsthat of the products, so that:The equilibrium constant,, is given by the mass-law effect.



chemical functionality
Ability of functional groups present within a polymer or polymer network to participate in chemicalreactions.Note:The chemical functionality of a network formed by a sol-gel process from a precursor such as (RO)3Si–CH=CH2 is that of the vinyl group.





chemical isotope exchange
Exchange of isotopes between different types of molecules or ions in the course of a chemical reaction.

chemical laser
A continuous wave or pulsed laser in which the excitation and population inversion of the emittingspecies result from a chemical reaction. Typical examples are HF and DF lasers emitting many linesin the IR region.



chemical modification
Process by which at least one feature of the chemical constitution of a polymer is changed by chemicalreaction(s).Note:A configurational change (e.g., cis–trans isomerization) is not usually referred to as a chemicalmodification.





chemical reaction
A process that results in the interconversion of chemical species. Chemical reactions may beelementary reactions or stepwise reactions (It should be noted that this definition includesexperimentally observable interconversions of conformers.) Detectable chemical reactions normallyinvolve sets of molecular entities as indicated by this definition, but it is often conceptually convenientto use the term also for changes involving single molecular entities (i.e. 'microscopic chemicalevents').See also: identity reaction

chemical reaction equation
Symbolic representation of a chemical reaction where the reactant entities are given on the left handside and the product entities on the right hand side. The coefficients next to the symbols and formulaeof entities are the absolute values of the stoichiometric numbers. Different symbols are used to connectthe reactants and products with the following meanings: for a stoichiometric relation;for a netforward reaction;for a reaction in both directions;for equilibrium.

chemical relaxation
Also contains definition of: T-jumpIf the equilibrium mixture of a chemical reaction is disturbed by a sudden change, especially of someexternal parameter (such as temperature, pressure or electrical field strength), the system will readjustitself to a new position of the chemical equilibrium or return to the original position, if the perturbationis temporary. The readjustment is known as chemical relaxation. In many cases, and in particularwhen the displacement from equilibrium is slight, the progress of the system towards equilibrium canbe expressed as a first-order law:whereandare the equilibrium concentrations of one of the chemical species involvedin the reaction before and after the change in the external parameter, andis its concentration at time. The time parameter , named relaxation time, is related to the rate constants of the chemical reactioninvolved. Measurements of the relaxation times by relaxation methods [involving a temperature jump(T-jump), pressure jump, electric field jump or a periodic disturbance of an external parameter, as inultrasonic techniques] are commonly used to follow the kinetics of very fast reactions.





chemical species
An ensemble of chemically identical molecular entities that can explore the same set of molecularenergy levels on the time scale of the experiment. The term is applied equally to a set of chemicallyidentical atomic or molecular structural units in a solid array. For example, two conformationalisomers may be interconverted sufficiently slowly to be detectable by separate NMR spectra and henceto be considered to be separate chemical species on a time scale governed by the radiofrequency ofthe spectrometer used. On the other hand, in a slow chemical reaction the same mixture of conformersmay behave as a single chemical species, i.e. there is virtually complete equilibrium population ofthe total set of molecular energy levels belonging to the two conformers. Except where the contextrequires otherwise, the term is taken to refer to a set of molecular entities containing isotopes in theirnatural abundance. The wording of the definition given in the first paragraph is intended to embraceboth cases such as graphite, sodium chloride or a surface oxide, where the basic structural units maynot be capable of isolated existence, as well as those cases where they are. In common chemical usagegeneric and specific chemical names (such as radical or hydroxide ion) or chemical formulae refereither to a chemical species or to a molecular entity.See also: chemical species (of an element)

chemical species
of an elementSpecific form of an element defined as to isotopic composition, electronic or oxidation state, and/orcomplex or molecular structure.See also: chemical species





chemical yield
The fraction of the amount of an element or chemical compound following a specified chemicalreaction or separation.









chemiflux
See: chemical flux

chemiluminescence
Emission of radiation resulting from a chemical reaction. The emitting species may be a reactionproduct or a species excited by energy transfer from an excited reaction product. The excitation may beelectronic, vibrational or rotational; if the luminescence occurs in the infrared the expression infraredchemiluminescence is used.

chemiluminescence analyser
An instrument consisting of a reaction chamber with separate inlets for the sample and reagent gas,an optical filter, a photomultiplier and a signal processing device. The reactive gas is introduced inexcess. The quantity of light produced is proportional to the sample flow rate and the concentration ofthe measured substance in the sample under specified temperature and pressure conditions. The filterlimits the wavelength to the region of interest and helps to eliminate interferences.





chemometrics
Chemometrics is the application of statistics to the analysis of chemical data (from organic, analyticalor medicinal chemistry) and design of chemical experiments and simulations.





chemostat
A bioreactor in which constant growth conditions for microorganisms are maintained over prolongedperiods of time by supplying the reactor with a continuous input of nutrients and continuous removalof medium.



chiral
Having the property of chirality. As applied to a molecule the term has been used differently bydifferent workers. Some apply it exclusively to the whole molecule, whereas others apply it to parts ofa molecule. For example, according to the latter view, a meso-compound is considered to be composedof two chiral parts of opposite chirality sense; this usage is to be discouraged.See: enantiomorphIn its application to an assembly of molecules, some restrict the term to an assembly in which allof the molecules have the same chirality sense, which is better called enantiopure. Others extend itto a racemic assembly, which is better just called a racemate. Use of the term to describe molecularassemblies should be avoided.

chiral mobile phase
A mobile phase containing a chiral selector.

chiral selector
The chiral component of the separation system capable of interacting enantioselectively with theenantiomers to be separated.



chirality
The geometric property of a rigid object (or spatial arrangement of points or atoms) of being nonsuperposable on its mirror image; such an object has no symmetry elements of the second kind (amirror plane,, a centre of inversion,, a rotation-reflection axis,). If the object issuperposable on its mirror image the object is described as being achiral.See also: handedness, superposability

chirality axis
Synonym: axis of chiralityAn axis about which a set of ligands is held so that it results in a spatial arrangement which is notsuperposable on its mirror image. For example with an allene abC=C=Ccd the chiral axis is definedby the C=C=C bonds; and with an ortho-substituted biphenyl the atoms C-1, C-1', C-4 and C-4' lieon the chiral axis.

chirality centre
Synonym: centre of chiralityAn atom holding a set of ligands in a spatial arrangement which is not superposable on its mirrorimage. A chirality centre is thus a generalized extension of the concept of the asymmetric carbon atomto central atoms of any element, for example N+abcd, Pabc as well as Cabcd.

chirality element
Synonym: element of chiralityGeneral name for a chirality axis, chirality centre or chirality plane. Also referred to as an elementof chirality.

chirality plane
A planar unit connected to an adjacent part of the structure by a bond which results in restrictedtorsion so that the plane cannot lie in a symmetry plane. For example with (E)-cyclooctene the chiralplane includes the double bond carbon atoms and all four atoms attached to the double bond; with amonosubstituted paracyclophane the chiral plane includes the monosubstituted benzene ring with itsthree hydrogen atoms and the three other atoms linked to the ring (i.e. from the substituent and thetwo chains linking the two benzene rings).



chiroptic/chiroptical
A term referring to the optical techniques (using refraction, absorption or emission of anisotropicradiation) for investigating chiral substances [e.g. measurements of optical rotation at a fixedwavelength, optical rotatory dispersion (ORD), circular dichroism (CD), and circular polarization ofluminescence (CPL)].

chirotopic
Also contains definition of: achirotopicThe description of an atom (or point, group, face, etc. in a molecular model) that resides within achiral environment. One that resides within an achiral environment has been called achirotopic.

chloramines
Amines substituted at nitrogen with one or two chlorine atoms (a contracted form of N-chloroamines).

chlorocarbons
Compounds consisting wholly of chlorine and carbon.

chlorohydrins
See: halohydrins

chromatogram
A graphical or other presentation of detector response, concentration of analyte in the effluent orother quantity used as a measure of effluent concentration versus effluent volume or time. In planarchromatography 'chromatogram' may refer to the paper or layer with the separated zones.

chromatograph (noun)
The assembly of apparatus for carrying out chromatographic separation.

chromatograph (verb)
To separate by chromatography.

chromatographic detector
A device that measures the change of composition of the effluent.

chromatography
A physical method of separation in which the components to be separated are distributed betweentwo phases, one of which is stationary (stationary phase) while the other (the mobile phase) movesin a definite direction.See also:adsorption chromatography, affinity chromatography, column chromatography,displacement chromatography, elution chromatography, exclusion chromatography, frontalchromatography, gas chromatography, ion-exchange chromatography, isothermal chromatography,liquid chromatography, normal-phase chromatography, partition chromatography, planarchromatography, programmed-flow chromatography (flow programming), programmedpressure chromatography (pressure programming), programmed-temperature chromatography(temperature programming), pyrolysis-gas chromatography, reaction chromatography, reversedphase chromatography, supercritical fluid chromatography, two-dimensional chromatography

chromophore
The part (atom or group of atoms) of a molecular entity in which the electronic transition responsiblefor a given spectral band is approximately localized. The term arose in the dyestuff industry, referringoriginally to the groupings in the molecule that are responsible for the dye's colour.

chromosome
A self-replicating structure consisting of DNA complexed with various proteins and involved inthe storage and transmission of genetic information; the physical structure that contains genes (cf.plasmid). Eukaryotic cells have a characteristic number of chromosomes per cell (cf. ploidy) andcontain DNA as linear duplexes. The chromosomes of bacteria consist of double-standed, circularDNA molecules.

chronic toxicity
1.Adverse effects following chronic exposure.2.Effects which persist over a long period of time whether or not they occur immediately uponexposure or are delayed.









CIP priority
In the CIP rules the conventional order of ligands established for the purpose of unambiguousdesignation of stereoisomers. It is deduced by application of sequence rules, the authoritativestatement of which appears in R.S. Cahn, C.K. Ingold and V. Prelog, Angew. Chem. 78, 413-447(1966), Angew. Chem. Internat. Ed. Eng. 5, 385-415, 511 (1966); and V. Prelog and G. Helmchen,Angew. Chem. 94, 614-631 (1982), Angew. Chem. Internat. Ed. Eng. 21, 567-583 (1982).

circular dichroism (CD)
A spectroscopic method which measures the difference in absorbance of left- and right-handedcircularly polarised light by a material, as a function of the wavelength. Most biological molecules,including proteins and nucleic acids, are chiral and show circular dichroism in their ultravioletabsorption bands, which may be used as an indication of secondary structure. Metal centres that arebound to such molecules, even if they have no inherent chirality, usually exhibit CD in absorptionbands associated with ligand-based or ligand-metal charge-transfer transitions. CD is frequently usedin combination with absorption and MCD studies to assign electronic transitions.

cis, trans
Descriptors which show the relationship between two ligands attached to separate atoms that areconnected by a double bond or are contained in a ring. The two ligands are said to be located cis toeach other if they lie on the same side of a plane. If they are on opposite sides, their relative positionis described as trans. The appropriate reference plane of a double bond is perpendicular to that of therelevant σ-bonds and passes through the double bond. For a ring (the ring being in a conformation, realor assumed, without re-entrant angles at the two substituted atoms) it is the mean plane of the ring(s).For alkenes the terms cis and trans may be ambiguous and have therefore largely been replaced bythe E,Z convention for the nomenclature of organic compounds. If there are more than two entitiesattached to the ring the use of cis and trans requires the definition of a reference substituent.







cis-trans isomers
Stereoisomeric olefins or cycloalkanes (or hetero-analogues) which differ in the positions of atoms(or groups) relative to a reference plane: in the cis-isomer the atoms are on the same side, in thetrans-isomer they are on opposite sides.

cisoid conformation [obsolete]
(Usage strongly discouraged).See: s-cis, s-transThe terms cisoid and transoid are also used to describe the stereochemistry of fused ring systems.

cistactic polymer
A tactic polymer in which the main-chain double bonds of the configurational base units are entirelyin the cis arrangement.

class (a) metal ion
A metal ion that combines preferentially with ligands containing ligating atoms that are the lightestof their Periodic Group.See also: class (b) metal ion, hard acid

class (b) metal ion
A metal ion that combines preferentially with ligands containing ligating atoms other than the lightestof their Periodic Group.See also: class (a) metal ion, hard acid



clathrates
Inclusion compounds in which the guest molecule is in a cage formed by the host molecule or by alattice of host molecules.

clausius
Non-SI unit of entropy,.

clay hybrid
Also contains definitions of: polymer-clay composite, polymer-clay hybridOrganic–inorganic composite material in which one of the components is a clay, the particles of whichare dispersed in a polymer.

clean surface
An experimental surface having no surface contamination observable by means of the used method.







clearing point
The temperature at which the transition between the mesophase with the highest temperature rangeand the isotropic phase occurs.

CLOGP values
CLOGP values are calculated 1-octanol/water partition coefficients, frequently used in structureproperty correlation or quantitative structure-activity relationship (SPC/QSAR) studies.

clone
1.2.A population of genetically identical cells produced from a common ancestor.Sometimes, 'clone' is also used for a number of recombinant DNA molecules all carrying thesame inserted sequence.











cluster analysis
Cluster analysis is the clustering, or grouping, of large data sets (e.g., chemical and/or pharmacologicaldata sets) on the basis of similarity criteria for appropriately scaled variables that represent the data ofinterest. Similarity criteria (distance based, associative, correlative, probabilistic) among the severalclusters facilitate the recognition of patterns and reveal otherwise hidden structures.







co-oligomer
An oligomer derived from more than one species of monomer.

co-oligomerization
Oligomerization in which a co-oligomer is formed.



coacervation
Also contains definition of: equilibrium solutionThe separation into two liquid phases in colloidal systems. The phase more concentrated in colloidcomponent is the coacervate, and the other phase is the equilibrium solution.



coal tar pitch
A residue produced by distillation or heat treatment of coal tar. It is a solid at room temperature,consists of a complex mixture of numerous predominantly aromatic hydrocarbons and heterocyclics,and exhibits a broad softening range instead of a defined melting temperature.Note:The hydrogen aromaticity in coal tar pitch (ratio of aromatic to total content of hydrogen atoms) variesfrom 0.7 to 0.9.

coal-derived pitch coke
The primary industrial solid carbonization product obtained from coal tar pitch mainly produced inchamber or delayed coking processes.Note:Coal-derived pitch coke, although it exhibits a pregraphitic microstructure, has often a lowergraphitizability than petroleum coke. Fractions of coal tar pitches (obtained by extraction or filtration)may form cokes with needle-like structures and have an improved graphitizability. The usually lowergraphitizability compared to petroleum coke is due to an inhibition of mesophase growth because ofchemical and physical differences of the cokes.





codon
The sequence of three consecutive nucleotides that occurs in mRNA which directs the incorporationof a specific amino acid into a protein and includes also the starting or termination signals of proteinsynthesis.

coefficient
Proportionality constant between two quantities of different dimension.



coenzyme
The dissociable, low-relative-molecular-mass active group of an enzyme which transfers chemicalgroups, hydrogen or electrons. A coenzyme binds with its associated protein (apoenzyme) to formthe active enzyme (holoenzyme).

coextraction
Formation of mixed-species aggregates in a low-polarity organic phase.

cofactors
Organic molecules (cf. coenzymes) or ions (usually metal ions) that are required by an enzyme of itsactivity. They may be attached either loosely or tightly prosthetic group) to the enzyme. A cofactorbinds with its associated protein (apoenzymes), which is functionally inactive, to form the activeenzyme (holoenzyme).





coherent radiation
Radiation emitted by a source when all the elementary waves emitted have a phase difference constantin space and time.

coherent scattering
Also contains definition of: incoherent scatteringScattering is coherent whenever the phases of the signals arising from different scattering centres arecorrelated and incoherent whenever these phases are uncorrelated.







coincidence circuit
An electronic circuit which produces a usable output pulse only when each of its inputs receives apulse within a specified time interval.

coincidence resolving time
The greatest time interval that can elapse between the occurrence of two or more consecutive signalpulses, in order that the measuring device processes them as a coincidence.

coke
A solid high in content of the element carbon and structurally in the non-graphitic state. It is producedby pyrolysis of organic material which has passed, at least in part, through a liquid or liquid-crystallinestate during the carbonization process. Coke can contain mineral matter.Note:As some parts, at least, of the carbonization product have passed through a liquid or liquid-crystallinestate, the resulting non-graphitic carbon is of the graphitizable variety. From a structural viewpoint,the term coke characterizes the state of graphitizable carbon before the beginning of graphitization.

coke breeze
A by-product of coke manufacture; it is the residue from the screening of heat-treated coke. Theparticle size is less than. Generally, coke breeze has a volatile matter content of.

coking
Many reactions involving hydrocarbons and particularly those run at higher temperatures lead tothe deposition on the catalyst of high molecular weight compounds of carbon and hydrogen whichdeactivate the catalyst. This phenomenon is called coking or fouling. Catalysts so deactivated canoften be regenerated.

col (saddle point)
A mountain-pass in a potential-energy surface is known as a col or saddle point. It is a point at whichthe gradient is zero along all coordinates, and the curvature is positive along all but one coordinate,which is the reaction coordinate, along which the curvature is negative.

cold neutrons
Neutrons with a neutron temperature considerably lower than normal room temperature.

collection
The planned removal from solution of a micro- or macro-component by the intentional formation of acontaminated host precipitate, or by the adsorption or entrapment of the component by an added solid.









colligation
The formation of a covalent bond by the combination or recombination of two radicals (the reverseof unimolecular homolysis). For example:

collimation
The limiting of a beam of radiation to the required dimensions and angular spread.

collimator
An arrangement of absorbers used for collimation.

collinear reaction
This is a reaction assumed to occur via an activated complex in which all of the atoms directly involvedin the process lie along a straight line.

collision complex
An ensemble formed by two reaction partners for which the distance is the sum of their van der Waalsradii. As such it constitutes a subclass of the species indicated as encounter complex.







process
andis the corresponding rate constant for a reference moleculeevery collision; that is, the reference moleculethat de-energizesonundergoes strong collisions, and by definition hasa collision efficiencyof unity. The speciesis usually in a vibrationally-excited state, andhas energy less than that required for reaction to occur.





collision theory
Various collision theories, dealing with the frequency of collision between reactant molecules, havebeen put forward. In the earliest theories reactant molecules were regarded as hard spheres, and acollision was considered to occur when the distance between the centres of two molecules was equalto the sum of their radii. For a gas containing only one type of molecule, A, the collision density isgiven by simple collision theory as:Hereis the number density of molecules andtheory to be, whereis the mean molecular speed, given by kineticis the molecular mass, andThe corresponding expression for the collision densitymasseswhereand. Thus:for two unlike molecules A and B, ofis:is the reduced mass, and. For the collision frequency factor theseformulations lead to the following expression:where is the Avogadro constant. More advanced collision theories, not involving the assumptionthat molecules behave as hard spheres, are known as generalized kinetic theories.









colloid
A short synonym for colloidal system.



colloidal
The term refers to a state of subdivision, implying that the molecules or polymolecular particlesdispersed in a medium have at least in one direction a dimension roughly betweenand,or that in a system discontinuities are found at distances of that order.

colloidal carbon
A particulate carbon with particle sizes below ca.in at least one dimension.Note:Colloidal carbon exists in several morphologically distinct forms.

colloidal dispersion
A system in which particles of colloidal size of any nature (e.g. solid, liquid or gas) are dispersed ina continuous phase of a different composition (or state). The name dispersed phase for the particlesshould be used only if they have essentially the properties of a bulk phase of the same composition.

colloidal electrolyte
An electrolyte which gives ions of which at least one is of colloidal size. This term therefore includeshydrophobic sols, ionic association colloids, and polyelectrolytes.

colloidal gel
Gel in which the network component comprises particles of colloidal dimensions.

colloidal network
Network comprising particles of colloidal dimensions.

colloidal processing
Sol-gel processing in which a network of precipitated colloidal particles is treated by a conventionalprocessing technique, such as cold pressing, hot pressing or sintering, in order to produce a ceramicarticle.

colloidal suspension
A suspension in which the size of the particles lies in the colloidal range.

colloidally stable
Particles which do not aggregate at a significant rate: the precise connotation depends on the type ofaggregation under consideration. For example, a concentrated paint is called stable by some peoplebecause oil and pigment do not separate out at a measurable rate, and unstable by others because thepigment particles aggregate into a continuous network.

color scale
Series of ordered numbers that represents observable gradations of a given attribute or gradations ofa combination of attributes of color perception.

colorimeter
An instrument used for colour measurement based on optical comparison with standard colours.

colour indicator
Also contains definitions of: one-colour indicator, two-colour indicatorAn indicator which is classified as one- or two-colour, depending on whether it is colourless on oneside of the transition interval or possesses a different colour on each side of this range.

colourability
Ability of a colourless or slightly coloured photochromic material to develop colour.

column chromatography
A separation technique in which the stationary bed is within a tube. The particles of the solid stationaryphase or support coated with a liquid stationary phase may fill the whole inside volume of the tube(packed column) or be concentrated on or along the inside tube wall leaving an open, unrestrictedpath for the mobile phase in the middle part of the tube (open-tubular column).





comb macromolecule
Also contains definitions of: brush macromolecule, regular comb macromoleculeA macromolecule comprising a main chain with multiple trifunctional branch points from each ofwhich a linear side-chain emanates.Notes:1. If the subchains between the branch points of the main chain and the terminal subchains of themain chain are identical with respect to constitution and degree of polymerization, and the sidechains are identical with respect to constitution and degree of polymerization the macromoleculeis termed a regular comb macromolecule.2. If at least some of the branch points are of functionality greater than three, the macromoleculemay be termed a brush macromolecule.

comb polymer
A polymer composed of comb macromolecules.See also: regular polymer

combination electrode
An ion-selective electrode and an external reference electrode combined in a single unit, therebyavoiding the need for a separate external reference electrode.

combined sample
A sample obtained by removing specific fractions by separation or selection techniques (e.g.heavy liquid, magnetic, sieving, etc.), analysing the fractions separately, and combining the resultsmathematically. When not combined, the sample is a modified sample. This term should not beconfused with composite sample.

combustion gas
A gas or vapour produced in furnaces, combustion chambers or in open burning.



common-ion effect (on rates)
A reduction in the rate of certain reactions of a substrate RX in solution [by a path that involves a preequilibrium with formation of R+ (or R− ) ions as reaction intermediates] caused by the addition to thereaction mixture of an electrolyte solute containing the 'common ion' X− (or X+). For example, the rateof solvolysis of diphenylmethyl chloride in acetone- water is reduced by the addition of salts of thecommon ion Cl- which causes a decrease in the quasi-equilibrium concentration of the diphenylmethylcation in the scheme:This phenomenon is a direct consequence of the mass-law effect on ionization equilibria in electrolyticsolution. More generally, the common-ion effect is the influence of the 'common ion' on the reactivitydue to the shift of the dissociation equilibrium. It may also lead to an enhancement of the rate ofreaction.







compartmental analysis
Mathematical process leading to a model of transport of a substance in terms of compartments andrate constants, usually taking the formwhere each exponential term represents one experiment. is the substance concentration;are proportionality constants; , ,… are rate constants; and is time.,,…

compatible polymer blend
Immiscible polymer blend that exhibits macroscopically uniform physical properties.Note:The macroscopically uniform properties are usually caused by sufficiently strong interactions betweenthe component polymers.

compensation effect
In a considerable number of cases plots ofvs., for a series of reactions, e.g. for a reactionin a range of different solvents, are straight lines of approximately unit slope. Therefore, the termsandin the expression partially compensate, andoften is a much simpler function of solvent (or other) variation thanSee also: isokinetic relationshiporseparately.







competitive binding assay
An assay based on the competition between a labelled and an unlabelled ligand in the reaction witha receptor binding agent (e.g. antibody, receptor, transport protein).











complex
A molecular entity formed by loose association involving two or more component molecular entities(ionic or uncharged), or the corresponding chemical species. The bonding between the componentsis normally weaker than in a covalent bond. The term has also been used with a variety of shadesof meaning in different contexts: it is therefore best avoided when a more explicit alternative isapplicable. In inorganic chemistry the term 'coordination entity' is recommended instead of 'complex'.See also: activated complex, adduct, charge transfer complex, electron-donor-acceptor complex,encounter complex, inclusion complex, σ-adduct, π-adduct, transition state

complex coacervation
Coacervation caused by the interaction of two oppositely charged colloids.

complex mechanism
This term is sometimes applied to an elementary reaction which proceeds via an intermediate specieshaving a lifetime longer than a few rotational periods, in contrast to a direct reaction. However, inview of the danger of confusion with a reaction occurring in more than one step (a composite reaction) this usage is not to be recommended; it is better to use the terms complex-mode mechanism orcomplex-mode reaction.

complex reaction
See: composite mechanism

complex-mode reaction
An elementary reaction which proceeds via an intermediate species having a lifetime longer than afew rotational periods is known as a complex-mode reaction, or as an indirect reaction.See also: direct reaction

component
Constituent of a mixture the amount or concentration of which can be varied independently. Thenumber of components in a given system is the minimum number of independent species necessaryto define the composition in all the phases of a system. It may vary with external conditions sinceadditional chemical equilibria reduce the number of components. The term component is also oftenused in the more general sense as defined here under constituent.

composite
Multicomponent material comprising multiple, different (non-gaseous) phase domains in which atleast one type of phase domain is a continuous phase.Note:A foamed substance, which is a multiphase material that consists of a gas dispersed in a liquid orsolid, is not normally considered to be a composite.

composite mechanism
Also contains definition of: negative feedbackA reaction that involves more than one elementary reaction is said to occur by a composite mechanism.The terms complex mechanism, indirect mechanism, and step-wise mechanism are also commonlyused. There are two main kinds of evidence for a composite mechanism:1. The kinetic equation for the reaction does not correspond to its stoichiometry.2. There is experimental evidence, direct or indirect, for intermediates of such a nature that it isnecessary to conclude that more than one elementary reaction is involved.There are many types of composite mechanisms, for example:1. Reactions occurring in parallel, such as:are called parallel reactions or simultaneous reactions. When there are simultaneous reactionsthere is sometimes competition, as in the scheme:2.where B and C compete with one another for A.Reactions occurring in forward and reverse directions are called opposing reactions:3.Reactions occurring in sequence, such as4.are known as consecutive reactions.Reactions are said to exhibit feedback if a substance formed in one step affects the rate of aprevious step. For example, in the scheme:5.The intermediate Y may catalyse the reactioninhibit it (negative feedback).Chain reactions(positive feedback) or it may

composite membrane
Membrane having chemically or structurally distinct layers.

composite reaction
A chemical reaction for which the expression for the rate of disappearance of a reactant (or rate ofappearance of a product) involves rate constants of more than a single elementary reaction. Examplesare 'opposing reactions' (where rate constants of two opposed chemical reactions are involved),'parallel reactions' (for which the rate of disappearance of any reactant is governed by the rate constantsrelating to several simultaneous reactions to form different respective products from a single set ofreactants), and stepwise reactions.

composite sample
Often prepared as a representative mixture of several different (usually bulk) samples, and from whichthe laboratory sample is taken.





compressibility factor
See: compression factor



comproportionation
The reverse of disproportionation. The term 'symproportionation' is also used.

Compton effect
Synonym: Compton scatteringThe elastic scattering of a photon by an electron which afterwards occurs as a free electron. Part ofthe energy and momentum of the incident photon is transferred to the electron and the remaining partis carried away by the scattered photon. Synonymous with Compton scattering

Compton electron
The energetic electron resulting from the Compton effect.

computational chemistry
Computational chemistry is a discipline using mathematical methods for the calculation of molecularproperties or for the simulation of molecular behaviour. It also includes, e.g., synthesis planning,database searching, combinatorial library manipulation.











concentration
1.2.Group of four quantities characterizing the composition of a mixture with respect to the volumeof the mixture (mass, amount, volume and number concentration).Short form for amount (of substance) concentration (substance concentration in clinicalchemistry).

concentration depolarization
Loss of emission anisotropy due to transfer of electronic excitation from photo-selected molecules toother molecules with different orientations.













concentration-cell corrosion
The local variation of the corrosion rate due to the action of a corrosion cell resulting frominhomogeneous composition of the environment.



concerted process
Two or more primitive changes are said to be concerted (or to constitute a concerted process) ifthey occur within the same elementary reaction. Such changes will normally (though perhaps notinevitably) be 'energetically coupled'. (In the present context the term 'energetically coupled' meansthat the simultaneous progress of the primitive changes involves a transition state of lower energy thanthat for their successive occurrence.) In a concerted process the primitive changes may be synchronousor asynchronous.See also: bifunctional catalysis, potential-energy (reaction) surface









condensation reaction
A (usually stepwise) reaction in which two or more reactants (or remote reactive sites within thesame molecular entity ) yield a single main product with accompanying formation of water or ofsome other small molecule, e.g. ammonia, ethanol, acetic acid, hydrogen sulfide. The mechanismof many condensation reactions has been shown to comprise consecutive addition and eliminationreactions, as in the base-catalysed formation of (E)-but-2-enal (crotonaldehyde) from acetaldehyde,via 3-hydroxybutanal (aldol). The overall reaction in this example is known as the aldol condensation.The term is sometimes also applied to cases where the formation of water or another simple moleculedoes not occur, as in 'benzoin condensation'.







conducting polymer
Polymeric material that exhibits bulk electric conductivity.Notes:1. See also: conductivity.2. The electric conductivity of a conjugated polymer is markedly increased by doping it with anelectron donor or acceptor, as in the case of polyacetylene doped with iodine.3. A polymer showing a substantial increase in electric conductivity upon irradiation withultraviolet or visible light is called a photoconductive polymer; an example is poly(Nvinylcarbazole) (See also: photoconductivity).4. A polymer that shows electric conductivity due to the transport of ionic species is called an ionconducting polymer; an example is sulfonated polyaniline. When the transported ionic speciesis a proton as, e.g., in the case of fuel cells, it is called a proton-conducting polymer.5. A polymer that shows electric semiconductivity is called a semiconducting polymer (See also:semiconductor).6. Electric conductance of a non-conducting polymer can be achieved by dispersing conductingparticles (e.g., metal, carbon black) in the polymer. The resulting materials are referred to asconducting polymer composites or solid polymer-electrolyte composites.







confidence level
The probability of covering the expected value of an estimated parameter with an interval estimatedfor the parameter (symbol). The confidence level can be expressed as a number between 0 and1, or in percent. The complementary quantity is known as the significance level.Note:In some cases the confidence level is dictated by the needs of the situation. In all other instances, useofis recommended.

confidence level
and degrees of freedom . The symbolrepresents the percentile (orpercentage point) of the -distribution. For 1-sided intervals,; for 2-sided intervals,. In each case, the confidence level is. The confidence interval is given as.Note:If the population standard deviation is known, confidence limits about a single result may becalculated with the formula:The coefficient, is the limiting value of the -distribution function for. This is identical toat confidence level, the th percentage point of the standard normal variate.





















conformational analysis
The assessment of the relative energies (or thermodynamic stabilities), reactivities, and physicalproperties of alternative conformations of a molecular entity, usually by the application of qualitativeor semi-quantitative rules or by semi-empirical calculations.

conformational analysis
in drug designConformational analysis consists of the exploration of energetically favourable spatial arrangements(shapes) of a molecule (conformations) using molecular mechanics, molecular dynamics, quantumchemical calculations or analysis of experimentally-determined structural data, e.g., NMR or crystalstructures.Molecular mechanics and quantum chemical methods are employed to compute conformationalenergies, whereas systematic and random searches, Monte Carlo, molecular dynamics, and distancegeometry are methods (often combined with energy minimization procedures) used to explore theconformational space.



conformer
One of a set of stereoisomers, each of which is characterized by a conformation corresponding to adistinct potential energy minimum.See also: rotamer

congener
One of two or more substances related to each other by origin, structure, or function.

conglomerate
See: racemic conglomerate

congruent transition
A transition in which the two-phase equilibrium of melting, vaporization or allotropism of a compoundinvolves phases of the same composition.

conical intersection
Point of crossing between two electronic states of the same spin multiplicity (most commonly singletsor triplets).Notes:1. In a polyatomic molecule two potential energy surfaces are allowed to cross along a (3N − 8)dimensional subspace of the (3N − 6)-dimensional nuclear coordinate space (the intersectionspace) even if they have the same spatial/spin symmetry (N is the number of nuclei). Each pointof the intersection space corresponds to a conical intersection. If the energy is plotted against twospecial internal geometrical coordinates, x1 and x2, which define the so-called branching plane,the potential energy surface would have the form of a double cone in the region surrounding thedegeneracy. In the remaining (3N − 8) directions, the energies of the ground and excited stateremain degenerate; movement in the branching plane lifts the degeneracy.2. From a mechanistic point of view, conical intersections often provide the channel mediatingradiationless deactivation and photochemical reaction.



conjugate acid–base pair
The Brønsted acid BH+ formed on protonation of a base B is called the conjugate acid of B, and B isthe conjugate base of BH+. (The conjugate acid always carries one unit of positive charge more thanthe base, but the absolute charges of the species are immaterial to the definition.) For example: theBrønsted acid HCl and its conjugate base Cl− constitute a conjugate acid–base pair.

conjugate solutions
Two solutions that co-exist in equilibrium at a given temperature and pressure and, at constant pressure(temperature), change their compositions and relative proportions with a variation of temperature(pressure). The term usually refers to two immiscible liquids, but it is also applicable to two immisciblesolid solutions.







conjugative mechanism
See: electronic effect

conjunctive name
A name for assemblies of functionalized acyclic parent hydrides and cyclic systems implying the lossof an appropriate number of hydrogen atoms from each.













constituent
Chemical species present in a system; often called a component, although the term component has amore restricted meaning in physical chemistry.

constitution
The description of the identity and connectivity (and corresponding bond multiplicities) of the atomsin a molecular entity (omitting any distinction arising from their spatial arrangement).



constitutional homosequence
A constitutional sequence which contains constitutional units of only one species and in one sequentialarrangement.

constitutional isomerism
Isomerism between structures differing in constitution and described by different line formulae e.g.CH3OCH3 and CH3CH2OH.







constitutive enzymes
Enzymes which are produced constitutively by the cell under all physiological conditions. Therefore,they are not controlled by induction or repression.

contact angle
When a liquid does not spread on a substrate (usually a solid), a contact angle ( ) is formed which isdefined as the angle between two of the interfaces at the three-phase line of contact. It must always bestated which interfaces are used to define . It is often necessary to distinguish between the 'advancingcontact angle' ( ), the 'receding contact angle' ( ) and the 'equilibrium contact angle' ( ). Whenthe system is said to exhibit contact angle hysteresis

contact corrosion
The enhancement of the corrosion rate of the material with the more negative corrosion cell resultingfrom the contact between different electron-conducting phases.



contamination
Carry-over from a preceding sample probe into a following specimen cup, which will influence notjust one result, but all assays on that specimen, or with that reagent.

content
See: substance content



continuous analyser
An analyser in which subassemblies operate continuously.



continuous flow
See: transport











continuous wave (CW) laser
CW operation of a laser means that the laser is continuously pumped and continuously emitselectromagnetic radiation. The emission can occur in a single cavity mode or on multiple modes.Note:Some lasers are called CW mode-locked. This indicates that the pulse average power is constant, i.e.,there is no Q-switched mode locking.















convenience sample
A sample chosen on the basis of accessibility, expediency, cost, efficiency or other reason not directlyconcerned with sampling parameters.





conversion cross-section
Product of the quantum yield by the absorption cross-section,in. SI unit is; commonly expressed.



conversion spectrum
A plot of a quantity related to the absorption (absorbance, cross section, etc.) multiplied by thequantum yield for the considered process against a suitable measure of photon energy, such asfrequency, , wavenumber, , or wavelength, , e.g. the conversion cross section,, has the SIunit.See also: action spectrum, efficiency spectrum, spectral effectiveness





cooperativity
Interaction between the substrate binding sites of an allosteric enzyme. Binding of a substratemolecule to one binding site changes the affinity of the binding sites on the other subunits (cf.allosteric enzymes) to the substrate by induction of a conformation change at the other binding sites.Cooperative enzymes typically display a sigmoid (S-shaped) plot of the reaction rate against substrateconcentration.

coordinate covalence [obsolete]
See: coordination

coordinate link [obsolete]
See: coordination

coordination
The formation of a covalent bond, the two shared electrons of which have come from only one ofthe two parts of the molecular entity linked by it, as in the reaction of a Lewis acid and a Lewisbase to form a Lewis adduct; alternatively, the bonding formed in this way. In the former sense, it isthe reverse of unimolecular heterolysis. 'Coordinate covalence' and 'coordinate link' are synonymous(obsolescent) terms. The synonym 'dative bond' is obsolete. (The origin of the bonding electrons hasby itself no bearing on the character of the bond formed. Thus, the formation of methyl chloride froma methyl cation and a chloride ion involves coordination; the resultant bond obviously differs in noway from the C–Cl bond in methyl chloride formed by any other path, e.g. by colligation of a methylradical and a chlorine atom.) The term is also used to describe the number of ligands around a centralatom without necessarily implying two-electron bonds.See also: dipolar bond, π-adduct

coordination entity
An assembly consisting of a central atom (usually metallic) to which is attached a surrounding arrayof other groups of atoms (ligands).

coordination number
1.2.The coordination number of a specified atom in a chemical species is the number of other atomsdirectly linked to that specified atom. For example, the coordination number of carbon in methaneis four, and it is five in protonated methane, CH5+. (The term is used in a different sense in thecrystallographic description of ionic crystals.)











copolymer micelle
A micelle formed by one or more block or graft copolymer molecules in a selective solvent.

copolymerization
Polymerization in which a copolymer is formed.

copper vapour laser
A pulsed source of coherent radiation emitting atatoms.See: gas lasers, laserandfrom excited copper

coprecipitation
The simultaneous precipitation of a normally soluble component with a macro-component from thesame solution by the formation of mixed crystals, by adsorption, occlusion or mechanical entrapment.





coronands (coronates)
See: crown

corrected emission spectrum
Obtained after correcting for instrumental and sample effects and usually represented by a graph ofagainst wavelength, whereis the spectral (radiant) energy flux.





correlation analysis
The use of empirical correlations relating one body of experimental data to another, with the objectiveof finding quantitative estimates of the factors underlying the phenomena involved. Correlationanalysis in organic chemistry often uses linear free-energy relations for rates or equilibria of reactions,but the term also embraces similar analysis of physical (most commonly spectroscopic) propertiesand of biological activity.See also: quantitative structure-activity relationships (QSAR)

correlation coefficient
A measure of the degree of interrelationship which exists between two measured quantities,the correlation coefficient ( ) is defined by the following relation:whereandare the measured values in the th experiment ofthe arithmetic means ofandtotal experiments,and ;andare:(similar expression for ). The linear correlation coefficient indicates the degree to which twoquantities are linearly related. Ifis followed then, and departures from this relationshipdecrease ; if interpretations of data based on the linear correlation coefficient are to be made, oneshould consult a book on statistics.

correlation diagram
A diagram which shows the relative energies of orbitals, configurations, valence bond structures, orstates of reactants and products of a reaction, as a function of the molecular geometry, or anothersuitable parameter. An example involves the interpolation between the energies obtained for the unitedatoms and the values for the separated atoms limits.

correlation energy
The difference between the Hartree–Fock energy calculated for a system and the exact non-relativisticenergy of that system. The correlation energy arises from the approximate representation of theelectron-electron repulsions in the Hartree–Fock method.





corrosion cell
A galvanic cell resulting from inhomogeneities in the material or in its environment.



corrosion rate
Also contains definition of: corrosion currentThe amount of substance transferred per unit time at a specified surface. Using Faraday's law, thecorrosion rate,, can be formally expressed as an electric current which at the corrosion potentialis called the corrosion current,withinandelectrode reaction andin, e.g. for the anodic dissolution of one component of a materialone obtains,being the charge number of thethe Faraday constant.

cotectic
The conditions of pressure, temperature and composition under which two or more solid phasescrystallize at the same time from a single liquid over a finite range of decreasing temperature.

coulomb
SI derived unit of electric charge,.



Coulomb repulsion
The potential energy component corresponding to the electrostatic interaction between each pair ofcharged particles:whereis the permittivity of a vacuum,is the distance between the two particles, andandare the charges on particles and . In molecular orbital theory, the electrostatic repulsion betweenthe two electrons occupying the orbitalsand . In the Hartree–Fock method, the mean Coulombrepulsion is determined by the value of the Coulomb integralSee also: exchange repulsion



coumarins
2H-Chromen-2-one (older name 1,2-benzopyrone), trivially named coumarin, and its derivativesformed by substitution.See: isocoumarins

count
1.2.Information corresponding to a pulse processed for counting.Number of pulses recorded during a measurement.

counter tube
Radiation detector consisting of a gas-filled tube or valve whose gas amplification is much greaterthan one, and in which the individual ionizing events give rise to discrete electrical pulses. Often anexpression is added indicating the geometry (e.g. end window), composition of the gas (e.g. helium)or the physical process for its operation (e.g. proton recoil, fission).

counter-current flow
Flow through a membrane module in which the fluids on the upstream and downstream sides of themembrane move parallel to the membrane surface but in opposite directions.

counter-ions
1.2.(in an ion exchanger) the mobile exchangeable ions.



counting efficiency
Synonym: efficiencyof a counterThe ratio between the number of particles or photons counted with a radiation counter and the numberof particles or photons of the same type and energy emitted by the radiation source.

counting loss
A reduction of the counting rate resulting from phenomena such as the resolving time or the dead time.

counting rate
The number of counts occuring in unit time.

coupled cluster (CC) method
A method employed in ab initio quantum mechanical calculations providing for a higher-leveltreatment of electron correlation beyond MP4.









Cox–Yates equation
A modification of the Bunnett–Olsen equation of the form:is the activity functionfor an arbitrary reference base. The function is called the excess acidity because it gives a measure ofthe difference between the acidity of a solution and that of an ideal solution of the same concentration.In practiceand.

cracking
Also contains definition of: hydrocarbon crackingThe thermal or catalytic decomposition of a compound such as a hydrocarbon into chemical speciesof smaller molecular weight.

crazing
Formation of cavities, when a polymer is stressed, which contain load-bearing fibrils spanning thegap between the surfaces of each cavity.

cream
A highly concentrated emulsion formed by creaming of a dilute emulsion.

cream volume
The volume of cream formed in an emulsion.

creaming
The macroscopic separation of a dilute emulsion into a highly concentrated emulsion, in whichinterglobular contact is important, and a continuous phase under the action of gravity or a centrifugalfield. This separation usually occurs upward, but the term may still be applied if the relative densitiesof the dispersed and continuous phases are such that the concentrated emulsion settles downward.

creep
Time-dependent change of the dimensions of a material under a constant load.

cresols
The monomethylphenols and their derivatives formed by substitution on the ring with substituentsother than –OH.







critical micelle concentration
Acronym: cmcThere is a relatively small range of concentrations separating the limit below which virtually nomicelles are detected and the limit above which virtually all additional surfactant molecules formmicelles. Many properties of surfactant solutions, if plotted against the concentration, appear to changeat a different rate above and below this range. By extrapolating the loci of such a property aboveand below this range until they intersect, a value may be obtained known as the critical micellizationconcentration (critical micelle concentration), symbol, abbreviation cmc (or c.m.c.). As valuesobtained using different properties are not quite identical, the method by which the cmc is determinedshould be clearly stated.See also: inverted micelle

critical point
The temperature and pressure at which the liquid and vapour intensive properties (density, heatcapacity, etc.) become equal. It is the highest temperature (critical temperature) and pressure (criticalpressure) at which both a gaseous and a liquid phase of a given compound can coexist.



critical solution composition
See: critical solution point

critical solution point
Synonym: consolute pointThe point, with coordinates critical solution temperature and critical composition, on a temperaturecomposition phase diagram at which the distinction between co-existent phases vanishes. In solidsolid, solid-liquid and liquid-liquid systems both upper and lower critical solution temperatures andcorresponding critical solution compositions can occur. Synonymous with consolute point.

critical solution temperature
See: critical solution point

critical study
Investigation yielding the no observed adverse effect level that is used by the USEPA as the basisof the reference dose.





cross reaction
The ability of substances other than the analyte to bind to the binding reagent and the ability ofsubstances other than the binding reagent to bind the analyte in competitive binding assays.

cross-conjugation
In a system XC6H4GY this is conjugation involving the substituent X, the benzene ring and the sidechain connective-plus-reaction site GY, i.e. either X is a +R group and GY is a -R group, or X isa -R group and GY is a +R group. In Hammett correlations this situation can lead to the need toapply exalted substituent constantsor , respectively, as in electrophilic or nucleophilic aromaticsubstitution, respectively. The term 'through resonance' is synonymous. Cross conjugation has alsobeen used to describe the interactions occurring in 2-phenylallyl and similar systems.











crosslink density
Number of crosslinks per unit volume in a polymer network.See also: junction-point density

crosslinking
Reaction involving sites or groups on existing macromolecules or an interaction between existingmacromolecules that results in the formation of a small region in a macromolecule from which atleast four chains emanate.Notes:1. The small region may be an atom, a group of atoms, or a number of branch points connected bybonds, groups of atoms, or oligomeric chains.2. A reaction of a reactive chain end of a linear macromolecule with an internal reactive site ofanother linear macromolecule results in the formation of a branch point, but is not regarded asa crosslinking reaction.See also: crosslink

crosslinking site
Site on a macromolecule or region in a polymer material that takes part in the formation of chemicalor physical crosslinks.





crown conformation
A conformation of a saturated cyclic molecular entity, containing an even number (≥8) of atoms inthe ring, in which these atoms lie alternately in each of two parallel planes and are symmetricallyequivalent (for cyclooctane,for cyclodecane etc). It is analogous to the chair conformationof cyclohexane.See also: tub conformation



cryogenic
Low temperature processes, apparatus, etc.; usually applied to systems operated at the temperature ofliquid nitrogen, helium or other condensed gas which boils at a very low temperature (at atmosphericpressure).See: cryogenic sampling

cryogenic sampling
The collection of trace compounds from gaseous media by cocondensation with a major constituent(e.g. water vapour, CO2, N2, Ar) of the matrix.

cryptand
Also contains definition of: cryptateA molecular entity comprising a cyclic or polycyclic assembly of binding sites that contains three ormore binding sites held together by covalent bonds, and which defines a molecular cavity in such away as to bind (and thus 'hide' in the cavity) another molecular entity, the guest (a cation, an anionor a neutral species), more strongly than do the separate parts of the assembly (at the same totalconcentration of binding sites). The adduct thus formed is called a 'cryptate'. The term is usuallyrestricted to bicyclic or oligocyclic molecular entities. Example:Corresponding monocyclic ligand assemblies crowns are sometimes included in this group, if theycan be considered to define a cavity in which a guest can hide. The terms 'podand' and 'spherand' areused for certain specific ligand assemblies. Coplanar cyclic polydentate ligands, such as porphyrins,are not normally regarded as cryptands.See also: host





crystal field splitting
The removal of a degeneracy of the energy levels of molecular entities or ions due to the lowersite symmetry created by a crystalline environment. This term is sometimes incorrectly usedsynonymously with the term ligand field splitting.

crystal laser
A solid state laser in which the active medium is composed of ionic species supported in a crystallinehost. The first laser used a ruby crystal in which chromium ions as the active medium were supportedin an aluminium oxide (sapphire) crystal. One of the most common crystal lasers involves neodymiumatoms in a yttrium aluminium garnet host crystal (the YAG:Nd laser).

crystal photochemistry
Photochemical process in the crystal lattice of a photoactive compound or of a chromophore in thecrystal lattice of host molecules. Often asymmetric photochemistry takes place.



crystalline polymer
A polymer showing crystallinity. One or two-dimensional order leads to mesophase structure. Therange of order may be as small as aboutin one (or more) crystallographic direction(s) and isusually belowin at least one direction.

crystallinity
The presence of three-dimensional order on the level of atomic dimensions. Crystallinity may bedetected by diffraction techniques, heat-of-fusion measurements, etc. The amount of disorder withinthe crystalline region is not incompatible with this concept.

crystallization
The formation of a crystalline solid from a solution, melt vapour or a different solid phase, generallyby the lowering of the temperature or by evaporation of a solvent.

CT
Abbreviation for charge-transfer.

cumulative double bonds
Those present in a chain in which at least three contiguous carbon atoms are joined by double bonds;non-cumulative double bonds comprise every other arrangement of two or more double bonds ina single structure. The generic name 'cumulene' is given to compounds containing three or morecumulative double bonds.

cumulative fission yield
The fraction of fissions which have resulted in the production of a nuclide either directly or indirectly,up to a specified time. If no time is specified, the yield is considered to be the asymptotic value.

cumulative sample
A sample collected over an extended period of time.

cumulenes
Hydrocarbons (and by extension, derivatives formed by substitution) having three or more cumulativedouble bonds, e.g. R2C=C=C=CR2.See also: allenes, heterocumulenes





cupola
A vertical shaft furnace used for melting metals; the melting of ores is accomplished in a blast furnace.

curie
Non-SI unit of radioactivity,.

curing
Chemical process of converting a prepolymer or a polymer into a polymer of higher molar mass andthen into a network.Notes:1. Curing is achieved by the induction of chemical reactions which might or might not requiremixing with a chemical curing agent.2. Physical aging, crystallization, physical crosslinking and post-polymerization reactions aresometimes referred to as 'curing'. Use of the term 'curing' to describe such processes is deprecated.See also: vulcanization

current density
The current densityof a species B in a given point of the solution is obtained by multiplying theflux density of that species at the given point by the Faraday constantof the species:and by the charge numberis a vector which indicates the direction in which the charges transported by the species Bwhereflow and which gives the number of these charges going through a plane oriented perpendicular to thevector, divided by time and by area, andis the flux density of a minor constituent of the solutionwith respect to a fixed frame of reference.See also: electric current density

current distribution
Also contains definitions of: current density (relative local), primary current distribution,relative local current density, secondary current distribution, tertiary current distribution,throwing power, Wagner numberThe ratio of current density at a point X on an interface to the average current density ( ) is called therelative local current density. The current distribution is described by the functiongenerally,whereor(or moreare the coordinates of the points of the electrode-solution interface. The primary current distribution is that which establishes itself when the influenceof overpotential is negligible. The secondary current distribution is that which establishes itself whenthe influence of the overpotential cannot be neglected but concentration overpotential is negligible.The secondary distribution is often described in terms of dimensionless numbers of the formwhereis the conductivity of the solution,the slope of the overpotential-current curve under theabove conditions and a characteristic length of the system, for instance the radius of a disc electrode.is the Wagner number. It is a quantity which determines the throwing power and characterizesthe equalizing influence of overpotential on the current distribution. In electroplating the throwingpower is qualitatively defined as 'the ability of a solution to deposit metal uniformly upon a cathodeof irregular shape'. The tertiary current distribution is that which establishes itself when the influenceof the overpotential (including concentration overpotential) cannot be neglected.

current efficiency
Also contains definition of: metal distributionIf several reactions take place simultaneously at the electrode a partial electrode current density (c.d.)can be assigned to each reaction. It is given by the stoichiometry of the reaction and by the amountof substance of B reacting (per unit time and per unit electrode area) in the reaction considered. Thecurrent efficiency of reaction , is defined as the ratio of to the total c.d.:Note thatmay be larger than one if cathodic and anodic reactions take place simultaneously at thesame electrode. However,still gives correctly the product yield, which is the quantity of industrialinterest. The product yield is the amount of substance of B produced per unit charge and is equal to(in the absence of a chemical reaction which is consecutive to the electrode reaction and whichconsumes or produces species B).is the charge number of electrode reaction . Note that in thecase of simultaneous electrode reactions the distribution of the partial c.d.that of the total c.d., i.e. the functionmay be different fromthe term 'metal distribution' is sometimes used to designate the distributionmay be different from. In electroplatingof the partial c.d.for metal deposition.

current migration
See: migration current

current yield
See: photocurrent yield

Curtin–Hammett principle
In a chemical reaction that yields one product (X) from one conformational isomer (A') and adifferent product (Y) from another conformational isomer (A'') (and provided these two isomers arerapidly interconvertible relative to the rate of product formation, whereas the products do not undergointerconversion) the product composition is not in direct proportion to the relative concentrations ofthe conformational isomers in the substrate ; it is controlled only by the difference in standard freeenergies () of the respective transition states.It is also true that the product composition is formally related to the relative concentrations of theconformational isomers A' and A'' (i.e. the conformational equilibrium constant) and the respectiverate constants of their reactions; these parameters are generally — though not invariably — unknown.The diagram below represents the energetic situation for transformation of interconverting isomersA and A' into products X and Y.

curve-crossing model
Model of organic reactivity that generates a reaction profile from curves that describe the energiesof reactant, product, and intermediate electronic configurations (or, alternatively, reactant, productand intermediate electronic states) as a function of the reaction coordinate. The crossing reflects theelectronic reorganization that accompanies the transformation of reactants and products.



cut-off filter
An optical device which only permits the transmission of radiation of wavelengths that are longer thanor shorter than a specified wavelength. Usually, the term refers to devices which transmit radiationof wavelengths longer than the specified wavelength.See: filter

cut-on filter
Optical device that only permits the transmission of radiation of wavelengths shorter than a specifiedwavelength.Note:Although more rare than the cut-off filters, there are a few cut-on filters on the market.

CW
Abbreviation for continuous wave, i.e. non-pulsed source of electromagnetic radiation.

cyanates
Salts and esters of cyanic acid, HOC≡N, e.g. KOCN potassium cyanate, PhOCN phenyl cyanate.See: isocyanates

cyanides
Salts and C-organyl derivatives of hydrogen cyanide, HC≡N, e.g. CH3C≡N methyl cyanide(acetonitrile), NaCN sodium cyanide, PhC(=O)CN benzoyl cyanide.See also: isocyanides, nitriles, carbonitriles

cyanine dyes
Synthetic dyes with the general formula R2N[CH=CH]nCH=N+R2R2N+=CH[CH=CH]nNR2 (nis a small number) in which the nitrogen and part of the conjugated chain usually form part of aheterocyclic system, such as imidazole, pyridine, pyrrole, quinoline and thiazole, e.g.

cyanogenic
Compounds able to produce cyanide; examples are the cyanogenic glycosides such as amygdalin inpeach and apricot stones.

cyanohydrins
Alcohols substituted by a cyano group, most commonly, but not limited to, examples having a cyanoand a hydroxy group attached to the same carbon atom, formally derived from aldehydes or ketonesby the addition of hydrogen cyanide. An individual cyanohydrin can systematically be named as ahydroxy nitrile, e.g. (CH3)2C(OH)C≡N 'acetone cyanohydrin' (2-hydroxy-2-methylpropanenitrile),HOCH2CH2C≡N 'ethylene cyanohydrin' (3-hydroxypropanenitrile).See: halohydrins

cybotactic region
Also contains definition of: cosphereThat part of a solution in the vicinity of a solute molecule in which the ordering of the solventmolecules is modified by the presence of the solute molecule. The term solvent 'cosphere' of the solutehas also been used.See also: solvation

cycles per second
See: hertz



cyclitols
Hydroxylated cycloalkanes containing at least three hydroxy groups, each attached to a different ringcarbon atom.

cyclization
Formation of a ring compound from a chain by formation of a new bond.See also: annulation





cycloaddition
Also contains definition of: dipolar cycloadditionA reaction in which two or more unsaturated molecules (or parts of the same molecule) combinewith the formation of a cyclic adduct in which there is a net reduction of the bond multiplicity.The following two systems of notations have been used for the more detailed specification ofcycloadditions, of which the second, more recent system [described under (2)] is preferred:1.A(i + j + ...) cycloaddition is a reaction in which two or more molecules (or parts of the samemolecule), respectively, provide units of i, j, ... linearly connected atoms: these units becomejoined at their respective termini by new σ-bonds so as to form a cycle containing (i + j + ...)atoms. In this notation, (a) a Diels–Alder reaction is a (4+2) cycloaddition, (b) the initial reactionof ozone with an alkene is a (3+2) cycloaddition, and (c) the reaction shown below is a (2+2+2)cycloaddition. (N.B.: parentheses (...) are used in the description based on numbers of atoms.)2.The symbolism [i + j + ...] for a cycloaddition identifies the numbers i, j, ... of electrons in theinteracting units that participate in the transformation of reactants to products. In this notation thereaction (a) and (b) of the preceding paragraph would both be described as [2+4] cycloadditions,and (c) as a [2+2+2] cycloaddition. The symbol a or s (a = antarafacial, s = suprafacial) is oftenadded (usually as a subscript after the number to designate the stereochemistry of addition to eachfragment. A subscript specifying the orbitals, viz. σ, π (sigma, pi) with their usual significance)or n (for an orbital associated with a single atom only), may be added as a subscript beforethe number. Thus the normal Diels–Alder reaction is aorcycloaddition,whilst the reaction:would be aorcycloaddition. (N.B. Square brackets [...] are used inthe descriptions based on numbers of electrons.) Cycloadditions may be pericyclic reactions or(non-concerted stepwise reactions . The term 'dipolar cycloaddition' is used for cycloadditionsof 1,3-dipolar compounds.See also: cheletropic reactions

cycloalkanes
Saturated monocyclic hydrocarbons (with or without side chains), e.g. cyclobutane. Unsaturatedmonocyclic hydrocarbons having one endocyclic double or one triple bond are called cycloalkenesand cycloalkynes, respectively. Those having more than one such multiple bond are cycloalkadienes,cycloalkatrienes, etc. The inclusive terms for any cyclic hydrocarbons having any number of suchmultiple bonds are cyclic olefins or cyclic acetylenes.See: alicyclic compounds

cycloalkyl groups
Univalent groups derived from cycloalkanes by removal of a hydrogen atom from a ring carbon atom,e.g. 2-methylcyclopropyl.

cyclodextrins
Cyclic oligoglucosides containing 5 to ca. 10 glucose residues in which an enclosed tubular spaceallows reception of a guest molecule to form a clathrate. The synonymous term Schardinger dextrins isnot recommended. (α-Cyclodextrin has 6 glucose residues; β-cyclodextrin has 7.) Semi-systematicallyα-cyclodextrin is called cyclomaltohexaose.See also: dextrins

cycloelimination
Synonym: cycloreversionThe reverse of cycloaddition. The term is preferred to the synonyms 'cycloreversion', 'retro-addition'and 'retrocycloaddition'.

cyclohexadienyl cations
A subclass of arenium ions.



cyclophanes
The term originally applied to compounds having two p-phenylene groups held face to face by –[CH2]n– bridges. It now designates compounds having (i) mancude-ring systems, or assemblies ofmancude-ring systems, and (ii) atoms and/or saturated or unsaturated chains as alternate componentsof a large ring. E.g. [2.2](1,4)(1,4)cyclophane [or 1(1,4),4(1,4)-dibenzenacyclohexaphane].Many chemists include in this class any bridged aromatic system, irrespective of the attachmentpositions of the bridge.

cyclopolymerization
A polymerization in which the number of cyclic structures in the constitutional units of the resultingmacromolecules is larger than in the monomer molecules.

cyclosilazanes
Compounds having rings of alternating silicon and nitrogen atoms:

cyclosiloxanes
Compounds having rings of alternating silicon and oxygen atoms, e.g. 2,2-dimethylcyclotrisiloxane.

cyclotron
A particle accelerator in which the particles travel in a succession of semicircular orbits of increasingradii under the influence of a magnetic field and are accelerated at the beginning of each such orbitby traversing an electric field produced by a high-frequency generator.

cytochrome P450
Member of a superfamily of heme-containing monooxygenases involved in xenobiotic metabolism,cholesterol biosynthesis, and steroidogenesis, in eukaryotic organisms found mainly in theendoplasmic reticulum and inner mitochondrial membrane of cells. ‘P450’ refers to a feature in thecarbon monoxide absorption difference spectrum atcaused by the presence of a thiolate inthe axial position of the heme opposite to the carbon monoxide ligand.

cytochromes
Conjugated proteins containing haem as the prosthetic group and associated with electron transportand with redox processes. The terminal electron transport chain of oxidative respiration contains atleast five different cytochromes.

Δ (delta), Λ (lambda)
Designations of stereoisomers of tris(didentate) metal complexes and other octahedral complexes.See: helicity

D, L, DL
See: Fischer–Rosanoff convention

d, l, dl [obsolete]
Obsolete (usage strongly discouraged) alternatives for, respectively, the prefixes (+)- and (−)- [usedto designate the sign of optical rotation of enantiomers under specified condition (and hence todistinguish the enantiomers)] and (±)- for a racemate.



dalton
Non-SI unit of mass (symbol), equal to the unified atomic mass unit (atomic mass constant). It isoften used in biochemistry and molecular biology although it was never approved by the ConférenceGénéral des Poids et Mesures.







data reduction
The process of transforming the initial representation of a spectrometer output into a form which isamenable to interpretation; for example, a bar graph or a table of ion currents.



Dauben–Salem–Turro rules
Set of rules proposed in 1975 to classify photochemical reactions based on correlation diagrams andunder the assumption that all photochemical processes are controlled by the generation of primaryproducts with characteristics of diradicals, i.e., considering the physical fact that the initial singleexcitation separates two electrons of a pair into two distinct orbitals. The reactions are classifiedaccording to their topicity, i.e., the total number and nature of available radical sites generated in theprimary photochemical product.







day
Non-SI unit of time,. The day is not exactly defined in terms of the second since socalled leap seconds are added or subtracted from the day semiannually in order to keep the annualaverage occurrence of midnight at 24:00 on the clock.

de Mayo reaction
Photochemical process leading to the formation of cyclobutanols by cycloaddition of an alkene to a1,3-dicarbonyl-enol. The enol originates in most cases from the tautomerization of a 1,3-dicarbonylcompound. The products of the de Mayo reaction are susceptible to undergo a retro-aldol ring openingresulting in the formation of 1,5-dicarbonyl compounds.

de-electronation [obsolete]
See: oxidation (1)

deactivation
Any loss of energy by an excited molecular entity.See: emission, energy transfer, internal conversion, radiationless deactivation (decay), radiationlesstransition, radiative transition









debye
Non-SI unit of electric dipole moment. It is equal to the electric dipole moment for two charges ofseparated by,.

Debye–Hückel equation
The chemical potential or activity of ions cannot be determined on a purely thermodynamic basis. Thisis due to the fact that the effects of an ion cannot be separated from the effects of the accompanyingcounter-ion, or in other terms, the electrochemical potential of the ion cannot be separated intothe chemical and the electrical component. Such a separation must necessarily be based on a nonthermodynamic convention. The present convention is based on the assumption that the molal activitycoefficient of the chloride ion in dilute aqueous solutions (means of the Debye–Hückel equation:) can be estimated bywhere is ionic strength, is the charge number of the ion, is ion size parameter and and aretemperature-dependent constants. According to the Bates–Guggenheim conventionis taken to beSee also: pHat all temperatures and for all compositions of the solutions.

deca
SI prefix for 10 (symbol:).



decay chain
Synonyms: radioactive chain, radioactive seriesA series of nuclides in which each member transforms into the next through nuclear decay until astable nuclide has been formed. Synonymous with radioactive chain and radioactive series.

decay constant
Proportionality constant relating the activity of a radioactive substance, A, to the number of decayingparticles B,,. Probability of a nuclear decay within a time interval divided by that timeinterval. Synonymous with disintegration constant.

decay curve
A graph showing the relative amount of radioactive substance remaining after any time interval.

concentration
, at the given time ( ):.





deci
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

decibel
Non-SI unit for expressing power levels,.

decomposition
The breakdown of a single phase into two or more phases. The term applies also to other chemicalentities such as a normal molecule and a reaction intermediate.



definitive method
A method of exceptional scientific status which is sufficiently accurate to stand alone in thedetermination of a given property for the certification of a reference material. Such a method musthave a firm theoretical foundation so that systematic error is negligible relative to the intended use.Analyte masses (amounts) or concentrations must be measured directly in terms of the base units ofmeasurements, or indirectly related through sound theoretical equations. Definitive methods, togetherwith certified reference materials, are primary means for transferring accuracy, i.e. establishingtraceability.





degeneracy
Synonym: statistical weightNumber of states having the same energy. Symbols: , ,,, . Also called statistical weight.

degenerate chain branching
Sometimes chain branching is brought about by an intermediate which has a long lifetime comparedwith an ordinary free radical. If this intermediate can break down in different ways, only one of whichleads to branching, there may be a relatively slow increase in the number of radicals, and there is saidto be degenerate chain branching.

degenerate orbitals
Orbitals whose energy levels are equal in the absence of external fields. Any linear combination of thefunctions corresponding to a given set of degenerate orbitals serves as an equivalent representationof this set of orbitals.

degenerate rearrangement
A molecular rearrangement in which the principal product is indistinguishable (in the absence ofisotopic labelling) from the principal reactant. The term includes both 'degenerate intramolecularrearrangements' and reactions that involve intermolecular transfer of atoms or groups ('degenerateintermolecular rearrangements'): both are degenerate isomerizations. The occurrence of degeneraterearrangements may be detectable by isotopic labelling or by dynamic NMR techniques. For example:the [3,3]sigmatropic rearrangement of hexa-1,5-diene (Cope rearrangement):Synonymous but less preferable terms are 'automerization', 'permutational isomerism', 'isodynamictransformation', 'topomerization'.See also: fluxional, molecular rearrangement, valence isomer

degree Celsius
SI derived unit of Celsius temperature equal to the kelvin (symbol:).

degree Fahrenheit
Non-SI unit of Fahrenheit temperature,Celsius temperature by. The Fahrenheit temperature is related to the.









degree of ionization
Degree of reaction for an ionization reaction.

degree of polymerization
The number of monomeric units in a macromolecule or oligomer molecule, a block or a chain.











dehydrobenzenes
A subclass of dehydroarenes.See: benzynes

delayed coincidence
The occurrence of two or more events separated by a short but measurable time interval.

delayed coke
A commonly used term for a primary carbonization product (green or raw coke) from high-boilinghydrocarbon fractions (heavy residues of petroleum or coal processing) produced by the delayedcoking process.Note:Delayed coke has, with only a few exceptions, a better graphitizability than cokes produced by othercoking processes even if the same feedstock is used. Delayed coke contains a mass fraction of volatilematter between 4 and 15 wt% which can be released during heat treatment.

delayed coking process
A thermal process which increases the molecular aggregation or association in petroleum-basedresidues or coal tar pitches leading to extended mesophase domains. This is achieved by holding themat an elevated temperature (usually) over a period of time ( to). It is performedin a coking drum and is designed to ultimately produce delayed coke The feed is rapidly pre-heatedin a tubular furnace to about.Note:Needle coke is the premium product of the delayed coking process. It is generally produced fromhighly aromatic residues from, for instance, the steam cracking of gas oil. Its appearance and preferredorientation of the graphene layers is a consequence of the evolved gaseous products percolatingthrough the mesophase which must not have too high a viscosity. A close control of temperature, timeand feedstock is essential. Lower grades, for instance isotropic cokes, are used for carbon electrodesapplied, for example, in the production of aluminium.

delayed fluorescence
Also contains definition of: recombination fluorescenceThree types of delayed fluorescence are known:1. E-type delayed fluorescence: The process in which the first excited singlet state becomespopulated by a thermally activated radiationless transition from the first excited triplet state.Since in this case the populations of the singlet and triplet states are in thermal equilibrium, thelifetimes of delayed fluorescence and the concomitant phosphorescence are equal.2. P-type delayed fluorescence: The process in which the first excited singlet state is populatedby interaction of two molecules in the triplet state (triplet-triplet annihilation ) thus producingone molecule in the excited singlet state. In this biphotonic process the lifetime of delayedfluorescence is half the value of the concomitant phosphorescence.3. Recombination fluorescence: The first excited singlet state becomes populated by recombinationof radical ions with electrons or by recombination of radical ions of opposite charge.See also: delayed luminescence

delayed luminescence
Luminescence decaying more slowly than that expected from the rate of decay of the emitting state.The following mechanisms of luminescence provide examples:1. triplet-triplet or singlet-singlet annihilation to form one molecular entity in its excited singletstate and another molecular entity in its electronic ground state (sometime referred to as P type),2. thermally activated delayed fluorescence involving reversible intersystem crossing (sometimesreferred to as E type), and3. combination of oppositely charged ions or of an electron and a cation. For emission to be referredto in this case as delayed luminescence at least one of the two reaction partners must be generatedin a photochemical process.See also: delayed fluorescence

delayed neutrons
Neutrons emitted by fission products formed by nuclear decay (the observed delay is due to thepreceding nuclear decay or decays).

deliquescence
The process that occurs when the vapour pressure of the saturated aqueous solution of a substance isless than the vapour pressure of water in the ambient air. When water vapour is collected by the puresolid compound, a mixture of the solid and liquid or an aqueous solution of the compound forms untilthe substance is dissolved and is in equilibrium with its environment; at this time the vapour pressureof water over the aqueous solution will equal the partial pressure of water in the atmosphere in contactwith it. A crystalline salt aerosol particle will deliquesce in the atmosphere when the relative humiditysurpasses a characteristic value, the so-called deliquescence point.

delocalization
A quantum mechanical concept most usually applied in organic chemistry to describe the π-bondingin a conjugated system. This bonding is not localized between two atoms: instead, each link has a'fractional double bond character' or bond order. There is a corresponding 'delocalization energy',identifiable with the stabilization of the system compared with a hypothetical alternative in whichformal (localized) single and double bonds are present. Some degree of delocalization is alwayspresent and can be estimated by quantum mechanical calculations. The effects are particularly evidentin aromatic systems and in symmetrical molecular entities in which a lone pair of electrons or a vacantp-orbital is conjugated with a double bond (e.g. carboxylate ions, nitro compounds, enamines, theallyl cation). Delocalization in such species may be represented by partial bonds or as resonance (heresymbolized by a two-headed arrow) between contributing structures.These examples also illustrate the concomitant delocalization of charge in ionic conjugated systems.Analogously, delocalization of the spin of an unpaired electron occurs in conjugated radicals.See also: mesomerism

delocalization energy (DE)
The difference between the actual π-electron energy of a molecular entity and the π-electron energyof a hypothetical species with a localized form of the π-electron system. These energies are normallyevaluated within Hückel molecular orbital theory.

delocalization
in theoretical organic chemistryRedistribution of the valence-shell electron density throughout a molecular entity as compared withsome localized models (individual atoms in their valence states, separated bonds or fragments).Different topological modes of the electron delocalization include:1. ribbon delocalization of either π- or σ-electrons (i.e., electrons occupying respectively π- andσ-orbitals)2. surface delocalization of σ-electrons occurring through an overlap of radially oriented σ-orbitalsof a cyclic molecule, as is the case of cyclopropane; and3. volume delocalization of σ-electrons through an overlap of σ-orbitals directed inside a molecularpolyhedron, as is the case in tetrahedrane.

demister
Apparatus made of wire mesh or glass fibre which is used to help remove acid mist as in themanufacture of sulfuric acid. Demisters are also components of wet arrestment plants.





dendrite
A crystalline morphology produced by skeletal growth, leading to a 'tree-like' appearance.

denitrification
The reduction of nitrates to nitrites, dinitrogen oxide (nitrous oxide) or dinitrogen catalysed bymicrooganisms, e.g. facultative aerobic soil bacteria under anaerobic conditions.

densification
Removal of impurities and the elimination of pores from a xerogel to give a material of as near bulkdensity as possible.







denticity
In a coordination entity the number of donor groups from a given ligand attached to the same centralatom.See: chelation











depolymerization
Also contains definition of: unzippingThe process of converting a polymer into a monomer or a mixture of monomers.Note:Unzipping is depolymerization occurring by a sequence of reactions, progressing along amacromolecule and yielding products, usually monomer molecules at each reaction step, from whichmacromolecules similar to the original can be regenerated.





depsides
Intermolecular esters formed from two or more molecules of the same or different phenolic benzoicacids. Depending on the number of the component units, di-, tri-, etc. depsides may result, e.g. 4-Ogalloylgallic acid:

depsipeptides
Also contains definition of: cyclodepsipeptidesNatural or synthetic compounds having sequences of amino and hydroxy carboxylic acid residues(usually α-amino and α-hydroxy acids), commonly but not necessarily regularly alternating. Incyclodepsipeptides, the residues are connected in a ring.See: carboxylic acids



depth profile
Dependence of concentration on depth perpendicular to the surface in a solid sample. It can be obtainedby a simultaneous or sequential process of erosion and surface analysis or by measurement of theenergy loss of primary backscattered particles produced by nuclear reactions.







derived coherent unit
A unit constructed exclusively from base units, e.g.,.

derived kind of quantity
A kind of quantity characterized by an equation between base kinds of quantities, e.g..

derived non-coherent unit
A unit constructed from base units and numerical factors, which may be named and symbolized, e.g.,.

derived quantity
Quantity defined, in a system of quantities, as a function of base quantities of that system.See: quantity, base quantity





desiccant
1.2.Drying agent.In agriculture, a substance used for drying up plants and facilitating their mechanical harvesting.





desorption (by displacement)
The process in which expulsion of a previously adsorbed component from the interfacial layer iseffected by subsequent stronger adsorption of another component.

desulfurization
The process by which sulfur is removed from a material such as coal or oil. It may involve one of manytechniques including elutriation, froth flotation, laundering, magnetic separation, chemical treatment,etc.

desymmetrization
The modification of an object which results in the loss of one or more symmetry elements, such asthose which preclude chirality (mirror plane, centre of inversion, rotation-reflection axis), as in theconversion of a prochiral molecular entity into a chiral one.

desymmetrization step
The removal of the smallest possible number of symmetry elements from a molecule with or withoutthe restriction to pointwise substitution.

detachment
The reverse of an attachment.See also: electron attachment





detection limit
See: relative detection limit

detection limit
in analysisThe minimum single result which, with a stated probability, can be distinguished from a suitable blankvalue. The limit defines the point at which the analysis becomes possible and this may be differentfrom the lower limit of the determinable analytical range.See also: limit of detection, relative detection limit

detergent
A surfactant (or a mixture containing one or more surfactants) having cleaning properties in dilutesolutions (soaps are surfactants and detergents).

detoxification
1.2.Process, or processes, of chemical modification which make a toxic molecule less toxic.Treatment of patients suffering from poisoning in such a way as to promote physiologicalprocesses which reduce the probability or severity of harmful effects.

deuteriation
A term used to represent replacement of protium by deuterium. The use of the word deuteration isalso acceptable.

deuterium
Also contains definitions of: deuteride, deuterioA specific name for the atom 2H. The cation 2H+ is a deuteron the species 2H− is a deuteride anionand 2H is the deuterio group.

deuteron
Nucleus of the 2H (deuterium) atom.



devolatilizer
Material added to a sample to decrease its volatilization or that of some component of it.







dextrans
Branched poly-α-D-glucosides of microbial origin having glycosidic bonds predominantly C-1 → C-6.See: glycosides

dextrins
Poly-α-D-glucosides of intermediate chain length derived from starch components (amylopectins) bythe action of amylases (starch hydrolysing enzymes).See also: cyclodextrins, dextrans

di-π-methane rearrangement
Photochemical reaction of a molecular entity comprising two π-systems, separated by a saturatedcarbon atom (a 1,4-diene or an allyl-substituted aromatic analogue), to form an ene- (or aryl-)substituted cyclopropane.Note:The rearrangement formally amounts to a 1,2 shift of one ene group (in the diene) or the aryl group (inthe allyl-aromatic analogue) and 'bond formation' between the lateral carbons of the non-migratingmoiety.See also:aza-di-π-methane rearrangement, di-π-silane rearrangement, oxa-di-π-methanerearrangement


di-π-silane rearrangement
Silicon version of the di-π-methane rearrangement with a Si atom at position 3 of the basic 1,4-dienechromophore.

diabatic coupling
Energy coupling between two potential-energy surfaces is sometimes known as diabatic coupling.

diabatic electron transfer
Electron transfer process in which the reacting system has to cross over between differentelectronic surfaces in passing from reactants to products. For diabatic electron transfer the electronictransmission factor is ≪ 1 (see Marcus equation). The term non-adiabatic electron transfer has alsobeen used and is in fact more widespread, but should be discouraged because it contains a doublenegation.See also: adiabatic electron transfer

diabatic photoreaction
Within the Born–Oppenheimer approximation, a reaction beginning on one excited state 'potentialenergy surface' and ending, as a result of radiationless transition, on another surface, usually that ofthe ground state. Also called non-adiabatic.See also: adiabatic photoreaction

diacylamines
Compounds having two acyl groups substituted on ammonia or a primary amine acyl-NR-acyl. Theyare also known as secondary amides and, especially the cyclic examples derived from diacids, asimides, e.g. [RC(=O)]2NR, RS(=O)2NHC(=O)R.







dialysis
The process of separating a colloidal sol from a colloid-free solution by a membrane permeable to allcomponents of the system except the colloidal ones, and allowing the exchange of the components ofsmall molar mass to proceed for a certain time.

dialysis residue
See: dialysate

diamagnetic
Substances having a negative magnetic susceptibility are diamagnetic. They are repelled out of amagnetic field.See also: paramagnetic

diamidides
Analogues of acyclic carboxylic acid anhydrides in which =O has been replaced by =NR and –O– by–NR–: RC(=NR)NRC(=NR)R, N-imidoyl amidines. The name 1,3,5-triazapentadienes is sometimesapplied as a class name to diamidides.See: imidines

diamond
An allotropic form of the element carbon with cubic structure (space group) whichis thermodynamically stable at pressures aboveat room temperature and metastable atatmospheric pressure. At low pressures diamond converts rapidly to graphite at temperatures abovein an inert atmosphere. The chemical bonding between the carbon atoms is covalent withhybridization.Note:There is also a hexagonal diamond-like structure of the element carbon (lonsdaleite).

diamond by CVD
Synonyms: CVD diamond, low-pressure diamondDiamond by CVD (chemical vapour deposition) is formed as crystals or as films from various gaseoushydrocarbons or other organic molecules in the presence of activated, atomic hydrogen. It consists of-hybridized carbon atoms with the three-dimensional crystalline structure of the diamond lattice.Note:'CVD diamond' or 'low-pressure diamond' are synonyms of the term diamond by CVD. Diamond byCVD can be prepared in a variety of ways. Deposition parameters are: total (low) pressure, partialhydrogen pressure, precursor molecules in the gas phase, temperature for activation of the hydrogenand that of the surface of the underlying substrate. The energy supply for the hydrogen activationmay be, for instance: heat, radio frequency, microwave excitation (plasma deposition) or acceleratedions (e.g. Ar+ ions). CVD diamond has also been obtained at atmospheric pressure from oxyacetylenetorches and by other flame-based methods. Often CVD carbon films consist of a mixture of- and-hybridized carbon atoms and do not have the three-dimensional structure of the diamond lattice.In this case they should be called hard amorphous carbon or diamond-like carbon films.



dianions
Molecular entities bearing two negative charges, which may be located on a single atom or on differentatoms or may be delocalized.







diastereoisomerization
The interconversion of diastereoisomers.

diastereomeric ratio
This is defined by analogy with enantiomeric ratio as the ratio of the percentage of one diastereoisomerin a mixture to that of the other.

diastereomorphism
The relationship between objects (or models) analogous to that between diastereoisomeric molecularentities.

diastereotopic
Constitutionally equivalent atoms or groups of a molecule which are not symmetry related.Replacement of one of two diastereotopic atoms or groups results in the formation of one of a pairof diastereoisomers. In the example below the two hydrogen atoms of the methylene group C-3 arediastereotopic.See also: prochirality, enantiotopic, heterotopic

diazanylidenes
An alternative term for isodiazenes.

diazenyl radicals
Radicals of structure RN=N..

diazo compounds
Compounds having the divalent diazo group, =N+=N−, attached to a carbon atom, e.g. CH2=N2diazomethane.See also: dipolar compounds

diazoamino compounds
Compounds having the structure RN=N–NR2 (not all R = H, and one R commonly aryl). In systematicnomenclature, diazoamino prefixed to the name of RH names the compound RN=NNHR' (R = R'),e.g. PhN=N–NPhMe N-methyldiazoaminobenzene.See also: triazenes

diazoates
Also contains definition of: diazotatesSalts RN=NO−M+ (R commonly aryl) of the compounds RN=NOH , (hydrocarbon)diazohydroxides,e.g. PhN=NO−K+ potassium benzenediazoate. In the IUPAC 'Blue Book' these compounds are namedas hydrocarbyldiazenolates and hydrocarbyldiazenols, respectively. E.g. PhN=NOH phenyldiazenol.RN=NO−M+ are also known by the non-IUPAC name diazotates.

diazonium salts
Compounds of structure RN2+Y−, in which R is generally but not necessarily aryl, and the cations ofwhich are usually formulated as RN+≡N, E.g. PhN+≡N benzenediazonium chloride. They may alsobe named, from the canonical form RN=N+, hydrocarbyldiazenylium salts.

diazooxides
Diazocyclohexadienones, which may also be considered as dipolar diazonio phenoxides, obtainedby diazotizing aromatic primary amines having a hydroxy group in an ortho or para position. Alsoknown as diazophenols.See also: diazo compounds, phenoxides, quinone diazides

dicarbenium ions
Species carrying two positive charges, formally located on tervalent carbon atoms, e.g. +CH2–+CH2ethane-1,2-diyl dication, +CH2CH2–+CH2 propane-1,3-bis(ylium).

dichotomous sampler
Device for dividing a polydispersed aerosol particle population into two size fractions duringsampling. The fractionation is based on the momentum differences of the particles which allow thelarger particles to pass through a zone of stagnant gas.

dichroic filter
Note:The name dichroic arises from the fact that the filter appears one colour under illumination withtransmitted light and another with reflected light.

dichroic mirror
A mirror used to reflect light selectively according to its wavelength.

dichroism
Dependence of absorbance of a sample on the type of polarization of the measuring beam. Thispolarization may be linear, corresponding to linear dichroism (LD) in which the difference inabsorption for two perpendicularly linearly polarized beams is measured,, orcircular dichroism (CD) in which the difference in absorption for left minus right circularly polarizedbeams is measured,.

dielectric constant [obsolete]
See: relative permittivity



dienes
Compounds that contain two fixed double bonds (usually assumed to be between carbon atoms).Dienes in which the two double-bond units are linked by one single bond are termed conjugated,e.g. CH2=CH–CH=CH2 buta-1,3-diene. Dienes in which the double bonds are adjacent are calledcumulative, e.g. CH3–CH=C=CH2 buta-1,2-diene. Those in which one or more of the unsaturatedcarbon atoms is replaced by a heteroatom may be called heterodienes.See: alkenes, olefins, diols, allenes, cumulenes

dienophile
The olefin component of a Diels–Alder reaction.See: cycloaddition

















diffraction
A modification which light (or electron, neutron beams, etc.) undergoes in passing by the edgesof opaque bodies or through narrow slits or in being reflected from ruled surfaces (or crystallinematerials). The light waves, owing to their wave-like nature appear to be deflected and produce fringesof parallel light and dark bands corresponding to regions of constructive reinforcement or destructiveinterference, respectively, of the waves.

diffraction analysis
The application of diffraction techniques (X-rays, electrons, neutrons) which are sometimes used toidentify the presence of certain solid aerosols and dust particles through the characteristic diffractionpatterns which result from each unique crystal structure.





diffuser
A porous plate or tube, commonly made of carborundum, alundum or silica sand, through which airis forced and divided into minute bubbles for diffusion in liquids.

diffusion
The spreading or scattering of a gaseous or liquid material. Eddy diffusion in the atmosphere isthe process of transport of gases due to turbulent mixing in the presence of a composition gradient.Molecular diffusion is the net transport of molecules which results from their molecular motions alonein the absence of turbulent mixing; it occurs when the concentration gradient of a particular gas ina mixture differs from its equilibrium value. Eddy diffusion is the most important mixing process inthe lower atmosphere, while molecular diffusion becomes significant at the lower pressures of theupper atmosphere.

diffusion battery
An aerosol sizing instrument for particles with diameters below. The fractionation is basedon different diffusivities of the small particles and their deposition on the walls of the long parallelor circular channels, formed by equally spaced plates, bundles of small bore parallel tubes or sets ofstainless wire screens.



diffusion control
See: microscopic diffusion control









diffusion potential
For an ideal dilute solution,is the integral of(given by the following equation) across theboundary between two regions of different concentrations.whereis the diffusion coefficient of species ,concentration of species ,Faraday constant.is the gas constant,is the charge number of species ,is theis the thermodynamic temperature, andis the

diffusion-controlled rate
See: encounter-controlled rate, macroscopic diffusion control, microscopic diffusion control

diffusional transition
A transition that requires the rearrangement of atoms, ions or molecules in a manner that cannotbe accomplished by a cooperative atomic displacement; it may require the movement of atoms,ions or molecules over distances significantly larger than a unit cell. Example: The transition ofgraphite (hexagonal sheets of three-coordinated carbon atoms) to diamond (infinite three-dimensionalframework of four-coordinated carbon atoms) at high temperature and pressure.

diffusionless transition
A transition that does not involve long-range diffusion of atomic species over distances significantlygreater than a typical interatomic distance.

dihedral angle
The angle between two intersecting planes on a third plane normal to the intersection of the two planes.See: torsion angle

diisotactic polymer
An isotactic polymer that contains two chiral or prochiral atoms with defined stereochemistry in themain chain of the configurational base unit.

dilatancy
An increase in volume of the system which usually accompanies shear thickening. This term hasformerly been used for the phenomenon of shear thickening.







dilute solution
Solution in which the sum of amount fractions of all the solutes is small compared to 1.

diluter
A device used to add a measured volume or amount of the sample to a measured volume of a diluent.





dimensionless quantities
Quantities of dimension one, or numerical quantities, are numbers which may be integers (orexceptionally half-integers) when obtained by counting (e.g. number of molecules, quantumnumbers, ...), rational numbers such as ratios, factors and fractions when obtained as ratios of twoquantities of the same kind or real numbers when obtained by taking logarithms (e.g. absorbance,power levels, ...).









diols
Compounds that contain two hydroxy groups, generally assumed to be, but not necessarily, alcoholic.Aliphatic diols are also called glycols.

diosphenols
Cyclic α-diketones, which exist predominantly in an enolic form.

dioxin
Colloquial (short) name of a toxic by-product (and sometimes contaminant) of herbicides; the fullname of this species is: 2,3,7,8-tetrachlorodibenzo[b,e][1,4]-dioxin.

dipolar aprotic solvent
A solvent with a comparatively high relative permittivity (or dielectric constant), greater than ca. 15,and a sizable permanent dipole moment, that cannot donate suitably labile hydrogen atoms to formstrong hydrogen bonds, e.g. dimethyl sulfoxide. The term (and its alternative 'polar aprotic solvent') isa misnomer and is therefore discouraged. Such solvents are usually not aprotic but protophilic (and atmost weakly protogenic). In describing a solvent it is better to be explicit about its essential properties,e.g. dipolar and non-protogenic.

dipolar bond
A bond formed (actually or conceptually) by coordination of two neutral moieties, the combinationof which results in charge-separated structures, e.g.The term is preferred to the obsolescent synonyms 'coordinate link', 'coordinate covalence', 'dativebond', 'semipolar bond'.

dipolar compounds
Electrically neutral molecules carrying a positive and a negative charge in one of their major canonicaldescriptions. In most dipolar compounds the charges are delocalized; however the term is also appliedto species where this is not the case. 1,2-Dipolar compounds have the opposite charges on adjacentatoms. The term 1,3-dipolar compounds is used for those in which a significant canonical resonanceform can be represented by a separation of charge over three atoms (in connection with 1,3-dipolarcycloadditions). Subclasses of 1,3-dipolar compounds include:1. Allyl type X=Y+–Z−X−–Y+=ZX+–Y–Z−X−=Y–Z+ (X, Z = C, N, or O; Y = Nor O)See: azo imides, azomethine imides, azomethine ylides, azoxy compounds, carbonyl imides,carbonyl oxides, carbonyl ylides, nitrones, nitro compounds2. Propargyl type X≡N+–Z−X−=N+=ZX−=N–Z+X–N=Z (X = C or O, Z = C, N,or O)See: nitrile imides, nitrile oxides, nitrile ylides, nitrilium betaines, azides, diazo compounds3. Carbene type X:–C=ZX+=C–Z− (X = C or N; Z = C, N, or O)See: acyl carbenes, imidoyl carbenes, vinyl carbenesSee: betaines



dipole length
Electric dipole moment divided by the elementary charge.

dipole moment
See: electric dipole moment

dipole moment per volume
See: dielectric polarization

dipole-induced dipole forces
See: van der Waals forces

dipole–dipole interaction
Intermolecular or intramolecular interaction between molecules or groups having a permanent electricdipole moment. The strength of the interaction depends on the distance and relative orientation ofthe dipoles. The term applies also to intramolecular interactions between bonds having permanentdipole moments.See also: van der Waals forces

dipyrrins
Compounds containing two pyrrole rings linked through a methine, –CH=, group.

dipyrromethenes
See: pyrromethenes

diradicaloid
Synonym: biradicaloidDiradical-like. Often used to refer to a species in which the two radical centres interact significantly.

diradicals
Molecular species having two unpaired electrons, in which at least two different electronic stateswith different multiplicities [electron-paired (singlet state) or electron-unpaired (triplet state)] can beidentified, e.g. H2C.–CH2–C.H2 propane-1,3-diyl (trimethylene).See also: biradical

direct amplification
A type of amplification reaction where the constituent to be determined is amplified directly and itis this constituent which is finally measured.

direct current
This term and its symbol,or, should be used (in preference to 'current' alone) only to denotethe steady (time-dependent) component of a current that also has a periodic component.

direct fission yield
The fraction of fissions giving rise to a particular nuclide before any nuclear decay has occurred.



direct reaction
Also contains definition of: impulsive reactionA chemical process in which the reactive complex has a lifetime that is shorter than its period ofrotation. In a molecular-beam experiment the reaction products of a direct reaction are scattered, withreference to the centre of mass of the system, in preferred directions rather than at random. Somedirect reactions are impulsive which means that there is an energy exchange that is very fast comparedto the vibrational time scale. A direct reaction is to be contrasted with an indirect reaction, also knownas a complex-mode reaction.

















discontinuous measuring cell
A measuring cell which operates intermittently and not necessarily at fixed time intervals.

discontinuous precipitation
A diffusional reaction in a multi-component system in which structural and compositional changesoccur in regions immediately adjacent to the advancing interface. The parent phase remains unchangeduntil swept over by the interface; the transition is complete in regions over which the interface haspassed. Synonymous with nucleation and growth.



discriminant analysis
Discriminant analysis is a statistical technique to find a set of descriptors which can be used to detectand rationalize separation between activity classes.

discriminator
A basic function unit comprising an electronic circuit which gives an output pulse for each input pulsewhose amplitude lies above a given threshold value.

disintegration constant
See: decay constant





dispenser
A device used to deliver a measured amount of material.See: sampler









disproportionation
Also contains definition of: radical disproportionationSynonym: dismutation1.Any chemical reaction of the typeand A'' are different chemical species. For example:, where A, A'The reverse of disproportionation is called comproportionation. A special case ofdisproportionation (or 'dismutation') is 'radical disproportionation', exemplified by:Reactions of the more general type:are also loosely described as radical disproportionations.2.



disruptor
A chemical group used to disrupt the linearity of the backbone of molecules MCPLCs.

dissociation
1.The separation of a molecular entity into two or more molecular entities (or any similarseparation within a polyatomic molecular entity). Examples include unimolecular heterolysisand homolysis, and the separation of the constituents of an ion pair into free ions.2. The separation of the constituents of any aggregate of molecular entities.In both senses dissociation is the reverse of association.







dissociative surface reaction
Also contains definition of: associative surface reactionDissociative surface reaction and its reverse, associative surface reaction, are defined by:where * represents a surface site.

dissolution
The mixing of two phases with the formation of one new homogeneous phase (i.e. the solution).



dissymmetry of scattering
The ratio of two Rayleigh ratios for different angles of observation, i.e.The angles must be specified; in light scattering it is customary to letfrequently,andand, most.

distonic radical cation
A radical cation in which charge and radical sites are separated.

distribuend
The substance that is distributed between two immiscible liquids or liquid phases.

distribution
The apportionment of a solute between two phases. The term partition or extraction may also be usedin this sense where appropriate.

distribution coefficient
See: distribution constant, distribution ratioThe term is not recommended as a synonym for the latter.

distribution constant
Synonymous with partition ratio.

distribution constant
in chromatographyThe concentration of a component in or on the stationary phase divided by the concentration of thecomponent in the mobile phase. Since in chromatography a component may be present in more thanone form (e.g. associated and dissociated forms), the analytical condition used here refers to the totalamount present without regard to the existence of various forms. These terms are also called thedistribution coefficients. However, the present term conforms more closely to the general usage inscience.







disyndiotactic polymer
A syndiotactic polymer that contains two chiral or prochiral atoms with defined stereochemistry inthe main chain of the configurational base unit.

ditactic polymer
A tactic polymer that contains two sites of defined stereoisomerism in the main chain of theconfigurational base unit.

diterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C20 skeleton.



dividing surface
A surface, usually taken to be a hyperplane, constructed at right angles to the minimum-energy path ona potential-energy surface. In conventional transition-state theory it passes through the highest pointon the minimum-energy path. In generalized versions of transition-state theory the dividing surfacecan be at other positions; in variational transition-state theory the position of the dividing surface isvaried so as to get a better estimate of the rate constant.

DM-interference
Interference in which the analytical signal is influenced by a different mechanism than the analytee.g. the formation of non-dissociating species in emission spectroscopy.

DNA probe
A short sequence of DNA labelled isotopically or chemically that is used for the detection of acomplementary nucleotide sequence.



docking studies
Docking studies are computational techniques for the exploration of the possible binding modes of asubstrate to a given receptor, enzyme or other binding site.



dolichols
A group of prenol derivatives in which in the general formula H–[CH2–C(CH3)=CH–CH2]n–OH is greater than 4 and in which the residue that carries the hydroxy group is saturated, i.e. 2,3dihydropolyprenols.Note:The collective term prenol should not be used without qualification to include dolichols since theseare derivatives of prenols.





Donnan exclusion
Reduction in concentration of mobile ions within an ion exchange membrane due to the presence offixed ions of the same sign as the mobile ions.

donor number (DN)
A quantitative measure of Lewis basicity.

dopant
Charge-transfer agent used to generate, by oxidation or reduction, positive or negative charges in anintrinsically conducting polymer.Note:Examples of dopants include AsF5 or I2 as oxidizing agents, generating cation radicals on the chainsof an intrinsically conducting polymer (so-called holes), or a solution of sodium naphthalenuidylin tetrahydrofuran as a reducing agent, generating anion radicals on the chains of an intrinsicallyconducting polymer.



















double escape peak
In a gamma-ray spectrum, the peak due to pair production in the detector and escape, from the sensitivepart of the detector, of two photons ofresulting from annihilation.

























downconversion
Process by which a photon with frequencyinteracts with a non-linear medium and splits into twosimultaneously emitted photons with frequenciesandso that the energy is conserved:Notes:1. Also known as a parametric downconversion.2. The efficiency of the conversion process depends on the parametric gain in the non-linearmaterial. This in turn depends on the power of the incident radiation, the photon frequencies,their indices of refraction in the material, and the non-linear 'hyper-susceptibility' of the material.

downfield
See: chemical shift





drift
A slow non-random change in signal with time.See also: noise











drug
Any substance which when absorbed into a living organism may modify one or more of its functions.The term is generally accepted for a substance taken for a therapeutic purpose, but is also commonlyused for abused substances. Synonymous with medicine, pharmaceutical.





drying agent
A substance which removes water (liquid or gaseous).































dyne
cgs unit of force,.

dyotropic rearrangement
An uncatalysed process in which two σ-bonds simultaneously migrate intramolecularly, e.g.

dypnones
1,3-Diphenylbut-2-en-1-one, PhC(=O)CH=C(CH3)Ph, and its ring-substituted derivatives.



E, Z
The approved stereodescriptors of stereoisomeric alkenes R1R2C=CR3R4 ( R1 ≠ R2 , R3 ≠ R4 );neither R1 nor R2 need be different from R3 or R4 ), cumulenes R1R2C(=C=C)n=CR3R4 and relatedsystems e.g. R1R2C=NOH , HON=C{[CH2]n}2C=NOH . The group of highest CIP priority attachedto one of the terminal doubly bonded atoms of the alkene, oxime, etc. or cumulene (i.e. R1 or R2 ) iscompared with the group of highest precedence attached to the other (i.e. R3 or R4 ). The stereoisomeris designated as Z (zusammen = together) if the groups lie on the same side of a reference planepassing through the double bond and perpendicular to the plane containing the bonds linking thegroups to the double-bonded atoms; the other stereoisomer is designated as E (entgegen = opposite).The descriptors may be applied to structures with a fractional bond order between one and two; andto double bonds involving elements other than carbon. They are not used to describe ring substitutionrelationships.See also: cis-trans isomers

E/Z photoisomerization
General designation of a photoinduced geometrical isomerization of a C–C double bond.Note:Geometrical isomerization of a C–C double bond is called a cis/trans isomerization in 1,2disubstituted alkenes.

mass spectrum
Processes of the charge-stripping type:occuring in a collision cell (containing a gas, X) located in a field-free region preceding a magneticand electric sector combination placed in either order, may be detected as follows. If the instrumentslits are wide and if the electric sector field is set to half the value required to transmit the mainion-beam, the only ions to be transmitted will be those with a kinetic energy/charge ratio half, oralmost exactly half, that of the main ion beam. The product ions of the charge-stripping process fulfilthis condition. If the magnetic field is scanned, a mass spectrum of such doubly-charged productions, and thus of their singly-charged precursors, is obtained. Such a spectrum is called anspectrum. Interference from product ions from processes of the type:where,, and (, can arise in) are the masses of,andmass, respectively, and wheremass spectra.

eclipsed (eclipsing)
Two atoms or groups attached to adjacent atoms are said to be eclipsed if the torsion angle betweenthe three bonds is zero (or approximately so).See: bisecting conformation, eclipsing strain

eclipsing strain
Synonyms: bond opposition strain, Pitzer strain, torsional strainIntramolecular strain present due to nonbonded interactions between two eclipsed atoms or groups. Itis, for example, one of the interactions responsible for the existence of a rotational barrier and hencerestricted rotation about the C–C bond in ethane. It has also been called Pitzer strain, torsional strainand bond opposition strain.

eddy
In turbulent fluid motion, a blob of the fluid that has some definitive character and moves in someway differently from the main flow.

eddy dispersion (diffusion)
The process by which substances are mixed in the atmosphere or in any fluid system due to eddymotion.

educt [obsolete]
Term used mainly in the German literature for starting material (reactant). It should be avoided inEnglish, because there it means 'something that comes out' and not 'something that goes in'. TheGerman use of the term is in fact also incorrect.



effective charge
Change in effective charge is a quantity obtained by comparison of the polar effect of substituentson the free energies of rate or equilibrium processes with that on a standard ionization equilibrium.Provided the effective charges on the states in the standard equilibrium are defined, then it is possibleto measure effective charges for states in the reaction or equilibrium under consideration.



effective half life
For a radioactive substance, the time required for the amount of that substance in a biological systemto be reduced to one half of its value by both radioactive decay and biological processes, when therate of removal is approximately exponential.









effectiveness
See: spectral (photon) effectiveness









efficiency spectrum
A plot of the efficiency of a step ( ) against wavelength or photon energy.See: action spectrum, conversion spectrumSee also: spectral effectiveness

efflorescence
The reverse of deliquescence: the drying of a salt solution when the vapour pressure of water in thesaturated solution of a substance is greater than the partial pressure of water in the ambient air. Alsorefers to the loss of water of crystallization from a solid salt such as Na2CO3·10H2O.

effluent
Any spent liquors or other waste materials which are emitted by a source (waste from plating shops,pickling tanks, sewage treatment plants, chemical manufacturing plants, etc.).

effluent
in chromatographyThe mobile phase leaving the column.

eighteen-electron rule
An electron-counting rule to which an overwhelming majority of stable diamagnetic transition metalcomplexes adhere. The number of nonbonded electrons at the metal plus the number of electronsin the metal-ligand bonds should be 18. The 18 electron rule in transition metal chemistry is a fullanalogue of the 'Lewis octet rule'.

einstein [obsolete]
One mole of photons. Although widely used, it is not an IUPAC sanctioned unit. It is sometimesdefined as the energy of one mole of photons. This use is discouraged.

Einstein equation
In its most general form, the Einstein equation relates the atomic mobilitydiffusion coefficient: i.e.,of a speciesto the.

El-Sayed rules
The rate of intersystem crossing is relatively large if the radiationless transition involves a changeof orbital type.Note:A typical case is the transition from the lowest singlet state to the triplet manifold, e.g., 1π,π* → 3n,π* is faster than 1π, π* → 3π, π* and 1n, π* → 3π, π* is faster than 1n, π* → 3n, π*.

elastic collision
Also contains definition of: inelastic collisionA particle (atom or molecule) can undergo a change in its state of excitation as a result of collisionswith other particles. In an elastic collision an exchange only of kinetic energy takes place betweenthe colliding species; in an inelastic collision there is an interchange between the kinetic energy andthe internal energy of the particle.









electric capacitance
See: capacitance





electric conductivity
See: conductivity





















electric resistivity
See: resistivity





electrical hygrometer
A hygrometer whose sensitive element has electrical properties which vary with the humidity of thegas which traverses the hygrometer.





electro-dialysis
Membrane-based separation process in which ions are driven through an ion-selective membraneunder the influence of an electric field.

electro-endosmosis
See: electro-osmosis

electro-osmosis
Process in which water is transported across the thickness of an anion- exchange or cation-exchangemembrane under an applied electric field.





electro-osmotic pressure
The pressure differenceacross the membrane, plug, etc., needed just to stop electro-osmoticvolume flow.is positive if the higher pressure is on the high potential side.

electro-osmotic velocity
See: electro-osmosis

electro-osmotic volume flow
The volume flow per unit time per unit field strength through the whole plug.See also: electro-osmosis

electroactive substance
In voltammetry and related techniques, a substance that undergoes a change of oxidation state, or thebreaking or formation of chemical bonds, in a charge-transfer step. If an electroactive substance B isformed, in the solution or electrode, by a chemical reaction from another substance C, the substanceC should be called the precursor of B. In potentiometry with ion-selective electrodes, a materialcontaining, or in ion-exchange equilibrium with, the sensed ion. The electroactive substance is oftenincorporated in an inert matrix such as poly(vinyl chloride) or silicone rubber.



electrocapillary equation
A form of the Gibbs adsorption equation which includes an expression of the phenomenon ofelectrocapillarity:where is the surface excess of entropy of unit area of interphase, is the temperature, is thethickness or excess volume of unit area of the interphase, is the external pressure, is the interfacialtension,is the free surface charge density on phase (areal amount of charge on the surface ofphase ), is the generalized potential,is the surface excess,is the chemical potential andis an electrically neutral component of one or other of the phases; the sum is over all the componentsbut one in each phase.





electrochemical potential
Of a substance in a specified phase, the partial molar Gibbs energy of the substance at the specifiedelectric potential.

electrocyclic reaction
Also contains definitions of: conrotatory, disrotatoryA molecular rearrangement that involves the formation of a σ-bond between the termini of a fullyconjugated linear π-electron system (or a linear fragment of a π-electron system) and a decrease byone in the number of π-bonds, or the reverse of that process. For example:The stereochemistry of such a process is termed 'conrotatory' or antarafacial if the substituents at theinteracting termini of the conjugated system both rotate in the same sense, e.g.or 'disrotatory' (or suprafacial ) if one terminus rotates in a clockwise and the other in a counterclockwise sense, e.g.See also: pericyclic reaction





electrode process
The totality of changes occurring at or near a single electrode during the passage of current.

electrode reaction
For an electrode process at a given potential the current is controlled by the kinetics of a number ofsteps which include the transport of reactants to and from the interface and the interfacial reactionitself. The latter, which is called the electrode reaction, must always include at least one elementarystep in which charge is transferred from one phase to the other, but may also involve purely chemicalsteps within the interfacial region.





electrodeposition
The deposition of dissolved or suspended material by an electric field on an electrode. (Includeselectro-crystallization).

electrofuge
A leaving group that does not carry away the bonding electron pair. For example, in the nitration ofbenzene by NO2+, H+ is the electrofuge. The adjective of electrofuge is electrofugal.See also: electrophile, nucleofuge



electrographite
A synthetic graphite made by electrical heating of graphitizable carbon.



electroluminescent polymer
Polymeric material that shows luminescence when an electric current passes through it such thatcharge carriers can combine at luminescent sites to give rise to electronically excited states ofluminescent groups or molecules.Notes:1. Electroluminescent polymers are often made by incorporating luminescent groups or dyes intoconducting polymers.2. Electrogenerated chemiluminescence directly connected with electrode reactions may also becalled electroluminescence.

electrolytic hygrometer
Hygrometer using a hygroscopic substance (for example, diphosphorus pentaoxide, P2O5) which istransformed into an electrolyte (phosphoric acid, H3PO4) in contact with the moisture in the gas. Theelectrolyte (phosphoric acid) is electrolysed continuously and the electrolysis current is measured.At a constant flow of the gas to be analysed, the electrolysis current is a linear function of the waterconcentration.

electromeric effect
A molecular polarizability effect occurring by an intramolecular electron displacement (sometimescalled the 'conjugative mechanism' and, previously, the 'tautomeric mechanism') characterized bythe substitution of one electron pair for another within the same atomic octet of electrons. It can beindicated by curved arrows symbolizing the displacement of electron pairs, as in:which represents the hypothetical electron shiftThe term has been deemed obsolescent or even obsolete (see mesomeric effect, resonance effect). Ithas long been custom to use phrases such as 'enhanced substituent resonance effect' which imply theoperation of the electromeric effect, without using the term, and various modern theoretical treatmentsparametrize the response of substituents to 'electronic demand', which amounts to considering theelectromeric effect together with the inductomeric effect.

electromigration
The transport of particles under the influence of an electric field.



electron
Elementary particle not affected by the strong force having a spin quantum number , a negativeelementary charge and a rest mass of.

electron acceptor
1.2.A substance to which an electron may be transferred; for example 1,4-dinitrobenzene or thedication 1,1'-dimethyl-4,4'-bipyridyldiium.[obsolete] A Lewis acid. This usage is discouraged.

process
(). The equivalent more common definition is the energy released) when an additional electron is attached to a neutral atom or molecule.

electron attachment
The transfer of an electron to a molecular entity, resulting in a molecular entity of (algebraically)increased negative charge. It is not an attachment.See also: oxidation (1), reduction

electron back-transfer
Thermal inversion of excited-state electron transfer restoring the donor and acceptor in their originaloxidation state. In using this term one should also specify the resulting electronic state of the donorand acceptor. This term is preferred to back electron-transfer.Notes:1. It is recommended to use this term only for the process restoring the original electronic state ofdonor and acceptor.2. Should the forward electron transfer lead to charge separation, electron back-transfer will resultin charge recombination.

electron beam curing
Also contains definition of: EB curingCuring induced by electron beam irradiation.

electron capture
A nuclear transformation in which the nucleus captures an orbital electron. Often the shell, from whichthe electron is captured, is indicated. (K-, L-, etc.).



electron charge
The negative electric charge which appears on the electron or univalent ions [coulombs orelectrostatic units ()].

electron correlation
The adjustment of electron motion to the instantaneous (as opposed to time-averaged) positions of allthe electrons in a molecular entity.See also: correlation energy

electron density
Ifis the probability of finding an electron in the volume elementatthe point of a molecular entity with coordinates, thenis the electron density at thispoint. For many purposes (e.g. X-ray scattering, forces on atoms) the system behaves exactly as ifthe electrons were spread out into a continuously distributed charge. The term has frequently beenwrongly applied to negative charge population.See also: charge density

electron density function
The electron probability distribution function, , defined aswhere is an electronic wave-function and integration is made over the coordinates of all but thefirst electron of . The physical interpretation of the electron density function is thatgives theprobability of finding an electron in a volume element , i.e., electron density in this volume.

electron detachment
The reverse of an electron attachment.

electron donor
1.2.A molecular entity that can transfer an electron to another molecular entity, or to thecorresponding chemical species.[obsolete] A Lewis base. This use is discouraged.









electron jump
The term can be applied to a reaction in which there is an electron transfer with the formation of anionic intermediate.

electron kinetic energy
The difference between the energy of the exciting photon and the ionization energy.

electron microscopy
See: transmission electron microscopy (TEM)







electron rest mass
Atomicfundamentalphysicalconstantusedasatomicunitofmass,.





electron transfer
The transfer of an electron from one molecular entity to another, or between two localized sites inthe same molecular entity.See also: inner sphere (electron transfer), outer sphere (electron transfer), Marcus equation





electron-counting rules
Rules establishing correspondence between the topology of a molecular structure and the number ofelectrons which may be placed into its bonding molecular orbitals. In the origin of various electroncounting rules lies a general assumption that the completeness of the valence electron shell of amolecular entity belonging to a certain structural type serves as the major criterion of structuralstability.

electron-deficient bond
A single bond between adjacent atoms that is formed by less than two electrons, as in B2H6:The B–H–B bonds are called a 'two-electron three-centre bonds'.





electron-pair acceptor
A synonym for Lewis acid.

electron-pair donor
A synonym for Lewis base.

electron-transfer catalysis
The term indicates a sequence of reactions such as shown in equations (1)–(3), leading from A to B :(1)(2)(3)An analogous sequence involving radical cations (A+., B+.) is also observed. The most notableexample of electron-transfer catalysis is the(or) reaction of aromatic halides.The term has its origin in a suggested analogy to acid-base catalysis, with the electron instead of theproton. However, there is a difference between the two catalytic mechanisms, since the electron is nota true catalyst, but rather behaves as the initiator of a chain reaction. 'Electron-transfer induced chainreaction' is a more appropriate term for the situation described by equations (1)–(3).

electronation
See: electron attachment, reduction

electronegativity
Concept introduced by L. Pauling as the power of an atom to attract electrons to itself. There areseveral definitions of this quantity. According to Mulliken it is the average of the ionization energyand electron affinity of an atom, but more frequently a relative scale due to Pauling is used wheredimensionless relative electronegativity differences are defined on the basis of bond dissociationenergies, , expressed in electronvolts:The scale is chosen so as to make the relative electronegativity of hydrogen. The sign ofthe square root was chosen intuitively by Pauling.

electroneutrality principle
The principle expresses the fact that all pure substances carry a net charge of zero.

electronic chemical potential
The quantity that measures the escaping tendency of electrons from a species in its ground state. Itis the negative of the absolute electronegativity.





electronic stability
Unavailability of another electronic structure (different electronic state) of lower energy with the samenumber of electrons.

electronic state
An arrangement allowed by the laws of quantum mechanics of electrons within an atom, molecule(or system of molecules).

electronically excited state
A state of an atom or molecular entity which has greater electronic energy than the ground state ofthe same entity.

electronvolt
Non-SI unit of energy,.

electrophile (electrophilic)
An electrophile (or electrophilic reagent) is a reagent that forms a bond to its reaction partner(the nucleophile ) by accepting both bonding electrons from that reaction partner. An 'electrophilicsubstitution reaction ' is a heterolytic reaction in which the reagent supplying the entering group actsas an electrophile. For example:Electrophilic reagents are Lewis acids. 'Electrophilic catalysis' is catalysis by Lewis acids. The term'electrophilic' is also used to designate the apparent polar character of certain radicals as inferred fromtheir higher relative reactivities with reaction sites of higher electron density.See also: electrophilicity

electrophilicity
1.2.The property of being electrophilic (see electrophile).The relative reactivity of an electrophilic reagent. (It is also sometimes referred to as 'electrophilicpower'.) Qualitatively, the concept is related to Lewis acidity. However, whereas Lewis acidity ismeasured by relative equilibrium constants, electrophilicity is measured by relative rate constantsfor reactions of different electrophilic reagents towards a common substrate (usually involvingattack at a carbon atom).See also: nucleophilicity

electrophoresis
The motion of colloidal particles in an electric field. The term cataphoresis should be abandoned.





electrophotography
Processes of photoimaging which are based on photo-induced changes of electric fields (photoconductive or photo-electrostatic effects).

electrosmosis [obsolete]
See: electro-osmosis

electrostatic filter
Filters for which an electrostatic charge is applied to the filter element. A fibrous filter material isoften pleated in between V-shaped supports consisting of electrostatically charged, metal rods whichare insulated from the supporting frame.

electrostatic precipitator
A device which separates particles from a gas stream by passing the carrier gas between pairs ofelectrodes across which a unidirectional, high-voltage potential is placed. The particles are chargedbefore passing through the field and migrate to an oppositely charged electrode. These devices are veryefficient collectors of small particles, and their use in removing particles from power plant plumesand in other industrial applications is widespread.

electrostriction
Contraction of a dielectric in an electric-field gradient.Notes:1. For example, the contraction taking place around the charged centres created as a consequenceof the sudden formation of separated positive and negative charges in the process of electrontransfer.2. The thermodynamic description of electrostriction was given by Drude and Nernst in 1894 toexplain the phenomenon of contraction of a continuum medium, such as an alkane, aroundcharges suddenly produced in that medium.



electroviscous effects
For dispersions of charged particles, these are those components of the viscosity connected with thecharge of the particles.

element
See: chemical element

element effect
The ratio of the rate constants of two reactions that differ only in the identity of the element of theatom in the leaving group, e.g.. As for isotope effects, a ratio of unity is regarded as a 'null effect'.

elementary charge
Also contains definition of: proton chargeElectromagnetic fundamental physical constant equal to the charge of a proton and used as atomicunit of chargeSee also: electric charge.

elementary entity
Any countable object or event, but usually a molecule, an ion or a specified group of atoms.



elementary reaction
A reaction for which no reaction intermediates have been detected or need to be postulated in orderto describe the chemical reaction on a molecular scale. An elementary reaction is assumed to occurin a single step and to pass through a single transition state.See also: stepwise reaction

elimination
The reverse of an addition reaction or transformation. In an elimination two groups (called eliminands)are lost most often from two different centres (1/2/elimination or 1/3/elimination, etc.) withconcomitant formation of an unsaturation in the molecule (double bond, triple bond) or formation ofa new ring. If the groups are lost from a single centre (α-elimination, 1/1/elimination) the resultingproduct is a carbene or a 'carbene analogue'.See also: α-elimination

eluate
The effluent from a chromatographic bed emerging when elution is carried out.

eluent
The liquid or gas entering a chromatographic bed and used to effect a separation by elution.

elute
To chromatograph by elution chromatography. This term is preferred to the term 'develop', which hasbeen used in paper chromatography and in thin-layer chromatography. The process of elution maycontinue until the components have left the chromatographic bed.

elution
See: selective elution, stepwise elution, gradient elution





elution curve
A chromatogram or part of a chromatogram recorded when elution techniques are used.

elutriation
The process of separating the lighter particles of a powder from the heavier ones by means of anupward directed stream of fluid (gas or liquid).

emanation thermal analysis
A thermoanalytical technique in which the release of radioactive emanation from a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) is measured as a function of temperature whilst the substance is subjectedto a controlled temperature programme.

embryo
Also contains definitions of: critical embryo, homogeneous nucleusAn aggregate of a small number of atoms, molecules or ions. An embryo of such a size that theGibbs energy at constant pressure and temperature is a maximum is called a critical embryo. Anembryo larger than a critical embryo is called a homogeneous nucleus. Colloidal sols may be formedby condensation methods. When a condensation method is applied, molecules (or ions) are depositedon nuclei which may be of the same chemical species as the colloid (homogeneous nucleation) ordifferent (heterogeneous nucleation).

emission
Radiative deactivation of an excited state; transfer of energy from a molecular entity to anelectromagnetic field.See also: fluorescence, luminescence, phosphorescence

emission anisotropy
Also contains definitions of: degree of (polarization) anisotropy, luminescence anisotropyAlso contains definition of: time-resolved anisotropy,Used to characterize luminescence (fluorescence, phosporescence) polarization resulting fromphotoselection. Defined as:whereandare the intensities measured with the linear polarizer for emission parallel andperpendicular, respectively, to the electric vector of linearly polarized incident electromagneticradiation (which is often vertical). The quantityis proportional to the total fluorescenceintensity .Notes:1. Fluorescence polarization may also be characterized by the polarization ratio, also called thedegree of polarization ,For parallel absorbing and emitting transition moments the (theoretical) values are; when the transition moments are perpendicular, the values are. In many cases, it is preferable to use emission anisotropy because it isadditive; the overall contribution of components , each contributing to the total fluorescenceintensity with a fraction, is given by:with2.3.On continuous illumination, the measured emission anisotropy is called steady-state emissionanisotropy ( ) and is related to the time-resolved anisotropy by:whereis the anisotropy andis the radiant intensity of the emission, both at timefollowing a δ-pulse excitation.Luminescence polarization spectroscopy, with linear polarizers placed in both beams, is usuallyperformed on isotropic samples, but it may also be performed on oriented anisotropic samples.In the case of an anisotropic, uniaxial sample, five linearly independent luminescence spectra,instead of the two available for an isotropic sample, may be recorded by varying the two polarizersettings relative to each other and to the sample axis.4.5.The term fundamental emission anisotropy describes a situation in which no depolarizing eventsoccur subsequent to the initial formation of the emitting state, such as those caused by rotationaldiffusion or energy transfer. It also assumes that there is no overlap between differently polarizedtransitions. The (theoretical) value of the fundamental emission anisotropy, , depends on theangle
between the absorption and emission transition moments in the following way:wheredenotes an average over the orientations of the photoselected molecules.cantake on values ranging fromfor(perpendicular transition moments) tofor(parallel transition moments). In spite of the severe assumptions, the expression isfrequently used to determine relative transition-moment angles.In time-resolved fluorescence with δ-pulse excitation, the theoretical value at time zero isidentified with the fundamental emission anisotropy.





emission
in atmospheric chemistryThe total rate at which a solid, liquid or gaseous pollutant is emitted into the atmosphere from a givensource; usually expressed as mass per unit time. Primary emissions are those substances which areemitted directly to the atmosphere (e.g. NO, SO2, etc.), while secondary emissions are formed fromthe primary emissions through thermal or photochemical reactions (e.g. ozone, aldehydes, ketones,sulfuric acid, nitric acid, etc.). The point or area from which the discharge takes place is called thesource; the area in which the emission or its transformed products (e.g. in the case of aerosols, acidicdeposition, etc.) may be deposited is called the receptor area or sink. Emission may be applied tonoise, heat, etc., as well as pollutants.





empirical formula
Formed by juxtaposition of the atomic symbols with their appropriate subscripts to give the simplestpossible formula expressing the composition of a compound.

emulsifier
A surfactant which when present in small amounts facilitates the formation of an emulsion, orenhances its colloidal stability by decreasing either or both of the rates of aggregation and coalescence.

emulsion
A fluid colloidal system in which liquid droplets and/or liquid crystals are dispersed in a liquid. Thedroplets often exceed the usual limits for colloids in size. An emulsion is denoted by the symbol O/Wif the continuous phase is an aqueous solution and by W/O if the continuous phase is an organic liquid(an 'oil'). More complicated emulsions such as O/W/O (i.e. oil droplets contained within aqueousdroplets dispersed in a continuous oil phase) are also possible. Photographic emulsions, althoughcolloidal systems, are not emulsions in the sense of this nomenclature.

enamines
Alkenylamines; by usage the term refers specifically to vinylic amines, which have the structureR2NCR=CR2.

enantiomer
One of a pair of molecular entities which are mirror images of each other and non-superposable.See also: enantiomorph



enantiomeric groups
Chiral groups that are mirror images of one another.

enantiomeric purity
See: enantiomer excess

enantiomeric ratio
The ratio of the percentage of one enantiomer in a mixture to that of the other e.g..









enantiomerization
The interconversion of enantiomers.See: racemization

enantiomorph
One of a pair of chiral objects or models that are non- superposable mirror images of each other. Theadjective enantiomorphic is also applied to mirror-image related groups within a molecular entity.

enantioselectivity
See: stereoselectivity

enantiotopic
Constitutionally identical atoms or groups in molecules which are related by symmetry elements ofthe second kind only (mirror plane, inversion centre or rotation–reflection axis). For example the twogroups c in a grouping Cabcc are enantiotopic. Replacement of one of a pair of enantiotopic groupsforms one of a pair of enantiomers. Analogously, if complexation or addition to one of the two facesdefined by a double bond or other molecular plane gives rise to a chiral species, the two faces arecalled enantiotopic.See also: prochiral, diastereotopic

enantiotropic mesophase
A mesophase that is thermodynamically stable over a definite temperature or pressure range.

enantiotropic transition
See: polymorphic transitionNote:In liquid crystal systems this term refers to a liquid crystal to liquid crystal transition that occurs abovethe melting point.



encounter
A set of collisions between reactant molecules in solids, liquids or dense gases, occurring in rapidsuccession as a result of the cage effect.

encounter complex
A complex of molecular entities produced at an encounter-controlled rate, and which occurs as anintermediate in a reaction mechanism. When the complex is formed from two molecular entities itis called an 'encounter pair'. A distinction between encounter pairs and (larger) encounter complexesmay be relevant in some cases, e.g. for mechanisms involving pre-association.

encounter pair
See: encounter complex

encounter-controlled rate
A rate of reaction corresponding to the rate of encounter of the reacting molecular entities. Thisis also known as 'diffusion-controlled rate' since rates of encounter are themselves controlled bydiffusion rates (which in turn depend on the viscosity of the medium and the dimensions of the reactantmolecular entities). For a bimolecular reaction between solutes in water atan encountercontrolled rate is calculated to have a second-order rate constant of aboutSee also: microscopic diffusion control.

end-group
A constitutional unit that is an extremity of a macromolecule or oligomer molecule. An end-group isattached to only one constitutional unit of a macromolecule or oligomer molecule.

end-point
See: titration









endocytosis
Uptake of material into a cell by invagination of the plasma membrane and its internalisation in amembrane-bounded vesicle.

endoenzymes
Enzymes that cut internal bonds of a polymer. Endonucleases are able to cleave phosphodiester bondswithin a nucleic acid chain by hydrolysis either randomly or at specific base sequences (cf. restrictionenzymes).

endothermic reaction
A reaction for which the overall standard enthalpy changeis positive.

ene reaction
Also contains definitions of: enophile, retro-ene reactionThe addition of a compound with a double bond having an allylic hydrogen (the 'ene') to a compoundwith a multiple bond (the 'enophile') with transfer of the allylic hydrogen and a concomitantreorganization of the bonding, as illustrated below for propene (the 'ene') and ethene (the 'enophile').The reverse is a 'retro-ene' reaction.









energy flux density
For mono-directional radiation, the energy traversing in a time interval over a small area perpendicularto the direction of the energy flow, divided by that time interval and by that area.See also: intensity

energy gradient
First derivatives of the total energy with respect to nuclear coordinates, i.e., negative values of forceson the nuclei. Evaluation of energy gradient plays a central role in searching potential energy surfacesfor stationary points. A widespread technique is based on the minimization of the gradient norm (thesquare of energy gradient).







energy of activation
See: activation energy

energy of activation
of an electrode reactionThis is defined by the equation:whereis the exchange current. At any overpotentialit is defined by the equation:whereis the current passing from the electrode into the electrolyte.

energy profile
See: Gibbs energy diagram, potential-energy profile



















enhancer
A fluorescent compound which accepts energy and thus enhances or promotes the emission from asample containing a chemically or enzymatically generated excited molecular entity.See also: dark photochemistry

enolates
Salts of enols (or of the tautomeric aldehydes or ketones ), in which the anionic charge is delocalizedover oxygen and carbon, or similar covalent metal derivatives in which the metal is bound to oxygen.

enols
Alkenols; the term refers specifically to vinylic alcohols, which have the structure HOCR'=CR2. Enolsare tautomeric with aldehydes (R' = H) or ketones (R' ≠ H).See also: phenols

enoses
Monosaccharides having a carbon–carbon double bond anywhere in the backbone chain. Glycals(term not recommended) designates the enoses that are generated by formal elimination of thehemiacetal hydroxy group and an adjacent hydrogen atom. Thus glycals are cyclic enol ethers.Unsaturated hexoses, for example, are called hexenoses, e.g. the hex-1-enopyranose derived from Dglucopyranose):



ent
A prefix used to indicate the enantiomer for natural products and related molecules where the trivialname only refers to one enantiomer, e.g. ent-kaurene is the enantiomer of kaurene.

entanglement network
Polymer network with junction points or zones formed by physically entangled chains.

entatic state
A state of an atom or group which, due to its binding in a protein, has its geometric or electroniccondition adapted for function.Note:It is derived from entasis (Greek), meaning tension.

entering group
An atom or group that forms a bond to what is considered to be the main part of the substrate during areaction. For example: the attacking nucleophile in a bimolecular nucleophilic substitution reaction.

enthalpimetric analysis
Synonym: analytical solution calorimetryThe generic designation for a family of analytical methods in which the enthalpy change of a chemicalreaction is measured, directly or indirectly, in order to perform a quantitative determination of areactant or catalyst. In general, at least one reactant is a liquid or solution. It is a subset of calorimetryin which the system is maintained at constant (usually atmospheric pressure), and the emphasis ison a quantitative determination in a reasonable length of time. Analytical solution calorimetry is asynonymous designation that may be used but is not preferred. Thermochemical analysis has beenused but is not recommended because of potential confusion and overlap with the methods of thermalanalysis. The adjective thermometric is also associated with the names of some of these methods, butis not recommended as a general designation.

enthalpimetry
See: enthalpimetric analysis

enthalpogram
A plot of temperature versus time or heat change versus time which is produced in direct-injectionenthalpimetry. Use of the term thermogram is not recommended because it is too general and overlapswith other fields.







enthalpy of wetting
Referred to unit of mass of the solid, the difference (at constant temperature) between the enthalpy ofa solid completely immersed in a wetting liquid, and that of the solid and the liquid taken separately. Itmust be specified whether the solid in the initial state is in contact with vacuum or with the vapour ofthe liquid at a given partial pressure. Measurements of the enthalpy of wetting of a solid equilibratedwith varying relative pressures of the vapour of a pure wetting liquid may be used to derive thedifferential enthalpy of adsorption of the vapour.

entitic
Modifier used to denote divided by number of entities.

entitic quantity
One which refers to a single entity (particle) of a system.











entropy unit
Non-SI unit of molar entropy,.

envelope conformation
The conformation (of symmetry group ) of a five-membered ring in which four atoms are coplanar,and one atom (the flap) projects out of the plane.











enzyme repression
The mode by which the synthesis of an enzyme is prevented by repressor molecules. In many cases,the end product of a synthesis chain (e.g. an amino acid) acts as a feed-back corepressor by combiningwith an intracellular aporepressor protein, so that this complex is able to block the function of anoperator. As a result, the whole operon is prevented from being transcribed into mRNA, and theexpression of all enzymes necessary for the synthesis of the end product amino acid is abolished.

enzyme substrate electrode
A sensor in which an ion-selective electrode is covered with a coating containing an enzyme whichcauses the reaction of an organic or inorganic substance (substrate) to produce a species to which theelectrode responds. Alternatively, the sensor could be covered with a layer of substrate which reactswith the enzyme, co-factor or inhibitor to be assayed.

enzyme thermistor [obsolete]
See: flow injection enthalpimetry

enzymes
Macromolecules, mostly of protein nature, that function as (bio)catalysts by increasing the reactionrates. In general, an enzyme catalyses only one reaction type (reaction specificity) and operates ononly one type of substrate (substrate specificity). Substrate molecules are attacked at the same site(regiospecificity) and only one or preferentially one of the enantiomers of chiral substrates or ofracemic mixtures is attacked (stereospecificity).

enzymic decomposition
Decomposition of organic materials (e.g. starch, sugars, proteins, etc.) can be achieved by enzymicdecomposition, in which the enzyme converts a high molecular mass compound into lower molecularmass species. The process can be regarded as an example of enzymic degradation.

epi-phase
The less dense phase in a distribution system. The term is often used when two non-aqueous phasesare present or when the solvent is an aqueous solution.See also: hypo-phase

epicadmium neutrons
Neutrons of kinetic energy greater than the effective cadmium cut-off energy.

epigenetic
Descriptive term for processes that change the phenotype without altering the genotype.

epihalohydrins
Compounds having the (halomethyl)oxirane skeleton:

epimerization
Interconversion of epimers.

epimers
Diastereoisomers that have the opposite configuration at only one of two or more tetrahedralstereogenic centres present in the respective molecular entities.

episulfonium ions
Ions derived from thiiranes, in which a trivalent sulfur atom bears a positive charge:

epithermal neutrons
Neutrons of kinetic energy greater than that of thermal agitation. The term is often restricted toenergies just above thermal.

epitope
Any part of a molecule that acts as an antigenic determinant. A macromolecule can contain manydifferent epitopes each capable of stimulating production of a different specific antibody.

epoxy compounds
Also contains definition of: epoxidesCompounds in which an oxygen atom is directly attached to two adjacent or non-adjacent carbonatoms of a carbon chain or ring system; thus cyclic ethers. The term epoxides represents a subclass ofepoxy compounds containing a saturated three-membered cyclic ether; thus oxirane derivatives, e.g.1,2-epoxypropane, or 2-methyloxirane (an epoxide); 9,10-epoxy-9,10-dihydroanthracene (an epoxycompound).



equatorial
1.2.For the use of this term in the context of cyclohexane see axial, equatorial.For the use of this term in the context of a bipyramidal structure see apical, basal, equatorial.

equilibration
The operation by which a system of two or more phases is brought to a condition where further changeswith time do not occur. This term is not synonymous with pre-equilibrium and should not be usedin that sense.

equilibrium constant
Quantity characterizing the equilibrium of a chemical reaction and defined by an expression ofthe type, whereis the stoichiometric number of a reactant (negative) or product(positive) for the reaction and stands for a quantity which can be the equilibrium value either ofpressure, fugacity, amount concentration, amount fraction, molality, relative activity or reciprocalabsolute activity defining the pressure based, fugacity based, concentration based, amount fractionbased, molality based, relative activity based or standard equilibrium constant (then denoted),respectively.

equilibrium dialysate
The colloid-free solution obtained at equilibrium in dialysis. Its composition approaches that of thedispersion medium (more precisely, the limit to which the composition of the dispersion mediumtends at large distances from the particles). In the dialysis equilibrium an osmotic pressure differenceexists between sol and equilibrium dialysate.





equilibrium geometry
Molecular geometry that corresponds to the true minimum on the respective potential energy surface.While information relating to the equilibrium geometry is provided by calculations within theadiabatic approximation (minimization of the total energy with respect to any independent geometricalparameter), various experiments yield some effective geometries for the molecule which are averagedover molecular vibrations.

equilibrium reaction
When the reactants in a chemical reaction are initially in a Boltzmann distribution the reaction isreferred to as an equilibrium reaction.See also: non-equilibrium reaction

equilibrium sedimentation
A method by which the distribution of the concentration of the solute or dispersed component in adilute solution or dispersion along the centrifuge cell is measured at sedimentation equilibrium andthe results are interpreted in terms of molar masses or their distribution, or both.





equivalent diameter
The diameter of a spherical particle which will give identical geometric, optical, electrical oraerodynamic behaviour to that of the particle (non-spherical) being examined; sometimes referred toas the Stokes diameter for particles in non-turbulent flows.

equivalent entity
Entity corresponding to the transfer of a H+ ion in a neutralization reaction, of an electron in a redoxreaction, or to a magnitude of charge number equal to 1 in ions. Examples:Fe3+.H2SO4,KMnO4,

erg
cgs unit of energy,.



erythro, threo
Descriptors of the diastereoisomers of an acyclic structure or partial structure having two stereogeniccentres. This notation is derived from carbohydrate nomenclature. The extension of this system hasgiven rise to conflicting interpretations of these prefixes. It is recommended that for such cases the,or,system should be used.





Esin and Markov coefficient
The left-hand side of one of the various cross-differential relationships that can be obtained from theGibbs adsorption equation when only one chemical potential ( ) is considered as variable, viz.where is the potential difference,and is the charge density.is the temperature,is the pressure,is the surface excess

esters
Compounds formally derived from an oxoacid RkE(=O)l(OH)m, (l ≠ 0) and an alcohol, phenol,heteroarenol, or enol by linking with formal loss of water from an acidic hydroxy group of the formerand a hydroxy group of the latter. By extension acyl derivatives of alcohols, etc. Acyl derivativesof chalcogen analogues of alcohols (thiols, selenols, tellurols) etc. are included. E.g. R'C(=O)(OR) ,R'C(=S)(OR) , R'C(=O)(SR) , R'S(=O)2(OR) , (HO)2P(=O)(OR) , (R'S)2C(=O) , ROCN (but not R–NCO ) (R ≠ H).Note:O-Alkyl derivatives of other acidic compounds [see amides (1)] may be named as esters but do notbelong to the class esters proper. E.g. (Ph)2POCH3 methyl diphenylphosphinite.See also: acylals, ortho esters, depsides, depsipeptides, glycerides, lactides, lactones, macrolides

-value
See: Dimroth–Reichardtparameter, Z-value



euatmotic reaction
An isothermal, reversible reaction between two (or more) solid phases during the heating of a systemas a result of which a single vapour phase is produced.

eupeptide bond
See: peptide

eutectic reaction
An isothermal, reversible reaction between two (or more) solid phases during the heating of a system,as a result of which a single liquid phase is produced.

evaluation function
The inverse of the calibration function.

evaporation
The physical process by which a liquid substance is converted to a gas or vapour. This may occur at orbelow the normal boiling point of the liquid (the temperature at which a liquid boils at 1 atmospherepressure) and the process is endothermic.

even-electron ion
An ion containing no unpaired electrons, for example CH3+ in its ground state.

evolved gas analysis (EGA)
A technique in which the nature and/or amount of volatile product(s) released by a substance subjectedto a controlled temperature program is (are) determined. The method of analysis should always beclearly stated.

evolved gas detection (EGD)
A technique in which the evolution of gas from a substance is detected as a function of temperaturewhile the substance is subjected to a controlled temperature program.





excess acidity
See: Bunnett–Olsen equations, Cox–Yates equation

excess Rayleigh ratio
The difference between the Rayleigh ratio for a dilute solution and for pure solvent. If the scatteringintensity is not reduced to the Rayleigh ratio, the difference between the scattering intensities for adilute solution and that for pure solvent is named 'excess scattering'.





exchange extraction
An extraction operation or process in which a metal from one phase is exchanged with the equivalentamount of a second metal from the other phase.Notes:1. This term may be used in connection with any step (e.g. loading, scrubbing or stripping in aprocess).2. This applies also to organic or molecular species.See also: crowding

exchange labelling
Labelling of a substance by isotope exchange.

exchange repulsion
Also contains definition of: exchange integralThe correction to the Coulomb repulsion between two electrons in orbitalsandfor the casewhen the electrons possess parallel spins. It is to be subtracted from the Coulomb repulsion to givethe total energy of the electron–electron interaction. In the Hartree–Fock theory the magnitude of theexchange repulsion is given by the exchange integralFor the case of electrons with opposite spinsvanishes.





excimer lamp
Non-coherent source of ultraviolet radiation capable of producing quasi-monochromatic radiationfrom the near UV () to the vacuum UV (). The operation of the excimerlamps relies on the radiative decomposition of excimers or exciplexes created by various types ofdischarges.Notes:1.2.Using noble gas, halogen, or noble gas / halogen mixtures with fill pressure, theradiative decomposition of the excimer or the exciplex produces nearly monochromatic radiation.Some of the commercially available wavelengths for the particular excimers or exciplexes arewith Ar2,with Kr2,with Xe2,with KrCl, andwithXeCl, obtained with efficiencies of 5 - 15 %. Pulsed Xe-excimer (Xe2) lamps may have up to40 % efficiency. Good efficiencies are also obtained with XeBr atand with XeI at. Other wavelengths produced with much less efficiency are(KrBr),(XeI),(Cl2), and(I2) (see Table 1).Table 1: Peak wavelengths ( ) obtained in dielectric-barrier discharges with mixtures of noblegas (Ng) and halogen (X2). Wavelengths of commercially available lamps are shown in boldfacetype. The molecular species indicated are excimers or exciplexes.X2NeArKrXeNg2126146172F157108193249354Cl259175222308Br291165207283I341190253Phosphors are used to transform the UV radiation into visible radiation. This is the basis ofmercury-free fluorescent lamps and of flat plasma-display panels with a large screen.

excimer laser
A source of pulsed coherent radiation obtained from an exciplex. The proper name is exciplex laser.Typical lasing species are noble gas halides (XeCl, KrF, etc.) emitting in the UV domain.See: gas lasers





exciplex
An electronically excited complex of definite stoichiometry, 'non-bonding' in the ground state. Forexample, a complex formed by the interaction of an excited molecular entity with a ground statecounterpart of a different structure.See also: excimer



excitation
Process causing the transition of a system from one state to another of higher energy.

excitation energy
The minimum energy required to bring a system to a specified higher energy level.

excitation energy
Synonym: initial energy in in situ microanalysisin in situ microanalysisSometimes called acceleration energy or initial energy. Kinetic energy of bombarding particles at thesurface of the solid.



excitation spectrum
A plot of the spectral radiant exitance or of the spectral photon exitance against the frequency (orwavenumber, or wavelength) of excitation. When corrected for wavelength dependent variations inthe excitation radiant power this is called a corrected excitation spectrum.See also: emission spectrum

excitation transfer
Synonymous with energy transfer.





exciton
In some applications it is useful to consider electronic excitation as if a quasi-particle, capable ofmigrating, were involved. This is termed an exciton. In organic materials two models are used:the band or wave model (low temperature, high crystalline order) and the hopping model (highertemperature, low crystalline order or amorphous state). Energy transfer in the hopping limit is identicalwith energy migration.See: electronic energy migration





exclusion chromatography
Chromatography in which separation is based mainly on exclusion effects, such as differencesin molecular size and/or shape or in charge. The term size-exclusion chromatography may alsobe used when separation is based on molecular size. The terms gel filtration and gel-permeationchromatography (GPC) were used earlier to describe this process when the stationary phase is aswollen gel. The term ion-exclusion chromatography is specifically used for the separation of ionsin an aqueous phase.





exfoliation
Process by which the layers of a multi-layered structure separate.

exit channel
This expression refers to the region of a potential-energy surface or hypersurface that corresponds tomolecular configurations that are closer to those of the products than to those of the reactants.

exitance
See: radiant exitance

exoenzymes
Enzymes that cleave monomers (sometimes also di- or oligomers) from one end of a polymer chain.Exonucleases are able to cleave nucleotides, one by one, from either the 5- or the 3- (or both) endsof nucleic acids.

exon
A section of DNA which carries the coding sequence for a protein or part of it. Exons are separated byintervening, non-coding sequences (cf. intron). In eukaryotes most genes consist of a number of exons.

exothermic reaction
A reaction for which the overall standard enthalpy changeis negative.

















extended Hammett equation
This term applies in a general way to any multiparametric extension of the Hammett equation. It issometimes used specifically for a form of dual substituent-parameter equation in which the actualvalue of the correlated property under the influence of the substituent X is used, rather than thevalue relative to that for X = H. An intercept term corresponding to the value of for X = H isintroduced, e.g.The equation may be applied to systems for which the inclusion of further terms to represent othereffects, e.g. steric, is appropriate.









extensive quantity
Physical quantity whose magnitude is additive for subsystems.





external compensation [obsolete]
The absence of optical activity in a racemate. (Usage strongly discouraged).

external heavy atom effect
See: heavy atom effect

external ion return
See: ion-pair return

external return
See: ion-pair return



external surface
When a porous solid consists of discrete particles it is inconvenient to describe the outer boundaryof the particles as the external surface.

exterplex [obsolete]
Termolecular analogue of an exciplex. Use of this term is discouraged.

extinction [obsolete]
This term, sometimes used as equivalent to absorbance, is no longer recommended.See: attenuance

extinction coefficient [obsolete]
See: attenuation coefficient



extract (noun)
The separated phase (often but not necessarily organic) that contains the material extracted from theother phase. Where appropriate the term 'loaded solvent' may be used, but is not recommended.

extract (verb)
To transfer a solute from a liquid phase to another immiscible or partially miscible liquid phase incontact with it. The term is also applied to the dissolution of material from a solid phase with a liquidin which it is not wholly soluble (i.e. leaching).See also: solvent extraction





extraction
Distribution and partition are often used as synonyms for the general phenomenon of extraction whereappropriate.See: liquid-liquid extraction

extraction coefficient [obsolete]
This term is not recommended as a synonym for distribution ratio.







extraction
in process liquid-liquid distributionIn connection with processes, this term often refers to the initial transfer step whereby the main solute,often together with impurities, is transferred from feed to solvent.Notes:1. Partition and distribution are not synonymous in this specific instance.2. The term extraction may be used in a more general sense.See also: loading

extraction isotherm
See: distribution isotherm



extremophiles
Organisms which require extreme physico-chemical conditions for their optimum growth andproliferation. Extremophilic microorganisms are e.g. thermophiles or psychrophiles, halophiles,alkalophiles or acidophiles, osmophiles and barophiles, based on their growth at extremes oftemperature, salt concentration, pH, osmolarity or pressure, respectively.

extrusion transformation
A transformation in which an atom or group Y connected to two other atoms or groups X and Z islost from a molecule, leading to a product in which X is bonded to Z, e.g.orThe reverse of an extrusion is called insertion.See: cheletropic reaction

f number
See: oscillator strength

f-functional branch point
Branch point from which f linear chains emanate.Notes:1. Examples are three-, four- and five-functional, branch points.2. Alternatively, the terms trifunctional, tetrafunctional, pentafunctional, etc. may be used.See also: functionality





fall time
See: response time







faradaic current
A current corresponding to the reduction or oxidation of some chemical substance. The net faradaiccurrent is the algebraic sum of all the faradaic currents flowing through an indicator or workingelectrode.

faradaic current density
Measures the rate of the interfacial reaction, the proportionality constant being the charge number ofthe reaction multiplied by the Faraday constant.





Faraday constant
Fundamentalphysicalconstantrepresentingmolar
elementarycharge:.





















femto
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

fenestranes
Compounds of the general formula shown above. They may be considered to be spiro compoundshaving bridges of carbon atoms connecting the α and α' positions.

Fenton reaction
Fe2+ + H2O2 Fe3+ + OH. + OH−. This is the iron-salt-dependent decomposition of dihydrogenperoxide, generating the highly reactive hydroxyl radical, possibly via an oxoiron(IV) intermediate.Addition of a reducing agent, such as ascorbate, leads to a cycle which increases the damage tobiological molecules.See also: Haber-Weiss reaction

fermentation
1.2.In metabolism, the dehydrogenating degradation of organic substance by organisms or cellsunder anaerobic conditions in which electrons are transferred to metabolites which accumulateand are excreted in reduced form. Fermentation is only possible if the organism is able to gainenergy by this process.In microbiology, the process in which cells (microorganisms, plant or animal cells) are culturedin a bioreactor in liquid or solid medium to convert organic substances into biomass (growth)or into products.

fermenter
A bioreactor which enables optimal fermentation conditions to be maintained, allowing addition ofnutrients, removal of products and insertion of measuring and/or control probes as well as othernecessary equipment (e.g. for heating, cooling, aeration, agitation, sterilization, etc.) under sterileconditions.

fermi
Non-SI unit of length,, used in nuclear physics.

Fermi energy
The total energy of an electron in an uncharged metal at the Fermi level.



fermion
Particle of half-integer spin quantum number following Fermi–Dirac statistics.

ferredoxin
A protein containing more than one iron and acid-labile sulfur, that displays electron-transfer activitybut not classical enzyme function.

ferrimagnetic transition
See: ferroic transition, magnetic transition

ferrocenophanes
Compounds in which the two ring components of ferrocene are linked by one or more bridging chains.See also: cyclophanes, metallocenes, sandwich compounds

ferroelastic transition
A transition in which a crystal switches from one stable orientation state into another that is equallystable by the application of a mechanical stress along an appropriate direction.See: ferroic transition



ferroelectric polymer
Polymer in which spontaneous polarization arises when dipoles become arranged parallel to eachother by electric fields.Notes:1. See also: ferroelectric transition.2. Poly(vinylidene fluoride) after being subjected to a corona discharge is an example of aferroelectric polymer.

ferroic transition
A general term for ferroelastic, ferroelectric, antiferroelectric, ferromagnetic, antiferromagnetic andferrimagnetic transitions in which a suitable driving force switches a ferroic crystal from oneorientation state, or domain state, to another.

ferromagnetic polymer
Polymer that exhibits magnetic properties because it has unpaired electron spins aligned parallel toeach other or electron spins that can easily be so aligned.

ferromagnetic transition
See: ferroic transition, magnetic transition





fibrous activated carbon
An activated carbon in the form of fibres, filaments, yarns or rovings and fabrics or felts. Such fibresdiffer from carbon fibres used for reinforcement purposes in composites by their high surface area,high porosity and low mechanical strength.Note:Sometimes fabrics of fibrous activated carbon are named charcoal cloths; a more precise term is'activated carbon cloth'.

fibrous carbon
See: filamentous carbon



fiducial group
See: helicity, torsion angle



field effect
Also contains definition of: direct effectAn experimentally observable effect symbolized by(on reaction rates, etc.) of intramolecularcoulombic interaction between the centre of interest and a remote unipole or dipole, by direct actionthrough space rather than through bonds. The magnitude of the field effect (or 'direct effect') dependson the unipolar charge/dipole moment, orientation of dipole, shortest distance between the centre ofinterest and the remote unipole or dipole, and on the effective dielectric constant.See also: electronic effect, inductive effect



field level
Logarithm of the ratio of two values of a field quantity, usually amplitude. Levels are expressed indifferent ways:, where, whereis the symbol for the unit neper coherent with the SI, oris the symbol for the unit decibel.

filamentous carbon
A carbonaceous deposit from gaseous carbon compounds, consisting of filaments grown by thecatalytic action of metal particles.Note:In general, such deposits are obtained at pressures of <in the temperature regionon metals such as iron, cobalt or nickel. Typical filaments consist of a duplex structure, a relativelyoxidation-resistant skin surrounding a more easily oxidizable core, with a metal particle located atthe growing end of the filament. They generally range fromtoin diameter and up toin length. In some systems, the metal particles are located in the middle of the filaments, andthere are also examples where several filaments originate from a single particle. The filaments maybe produced in different conformations, such as helical, twisted and straight.

filler
Also contains definition of: gristFiller (also called grist) is a petroleum- or coal-based coke fraction of a green, carbon mix orformulation. Coarse particles,, are sometimes referred to as tailings; fine particles,, are referred to as flour. Graphite flour is also used as a filler.

filler coke
The main constituent of a carbon artifact, introduced as solid component (predominantly in the formof particulate carbon ) into the 'carbon mix' from which polygranular carbon and graphite materialsare obtained by heat treatment.Note:Filler coke is not necessarily the only, but it is commonly the most important filler material used ina 'carbon mix' which consists of filler and binder.



film
A generic term referring to condensed matter restricted in one dimension.



film element
A small homogeneous part of a film including the two interfaces and any fluid between them.

film tension
The contractile force per unit length,, exerted by an equilibrium film in contact with the bulk phase.

filter
A porous material on which solid particles present in air or other fluid which flows through it arelargely caught and retained. Filters are made with a variety of materials: cellulose and derivatives,glass fibre, ceramic, synthetic plastics and fibres. Filters may be naturally porous or be made so bymechanical or other means. Membrane/ceramic filters are prepared with highly controlled pore size ina sheet of suitable material such as polyfluoroethylene, polycarbonate or cellulose esters. Nylon meshis sometimes used for reinforcement. The pores constitute 80–85% of the filter volume commonlyand several pore sizes are available for air sampling (–are commonly employed).

filter
of a radiationMaterial interposed in the path of radiation to modify the spectral distribution of the radiation.

filter spectrometer
A spectrometer which has one or more spectral filters for isolating one or more spectral bands.

filtration
The process of segregation of phases; e.g. the separation of suspended solids from a liquid or gas,usually by forcing a carrier gas or liquid through a porous medium.



first-order phase transition
Synonym: discontinuous phase transitionA transition in which the molar Gibbs energies or molar Helmholtz energies of the two phases (orchemical potentials of all components in the two phases) are equal at the transition temperature, buttheir first derivatives with respect to temperature and pressure (for example, specific enthalpy oftransition and specific volume) are discontinuous at the transition point, as for two dissimilar phasesthat coexist and that can be transformed into one another by a change in a field variable such aspressure, temperature, magnetic or electric field. Example: The transition on heating CsCl toat which it changes from the low-temperature, CsCl-type structure to the high-temperature NaCl-typestructure. Synonymous with discontinuous phase transition.

first-pass effect
Biotransformation and, in some cases, elimination of a substance in the liver after absorption fromthe intestine and before it reaches the systemic circulation.









fission fragments
Nuclei resulting from fission and possessing kinetic energy acquired from the fission process.

fission neutrons
Neutrons originating in the fission process which have retained their original energy.

fission products
Nuclides produced by fission and the daughter products of these nuclides.

fission yield
The fraction of fissions leading to fission products of a given type.

fissionable
Synonymous with fissile.

fixed ions
In an ion exchanger, the non-exchangeable ions which have a charge opposite to that of the counterions.















flame photometry
The use of emission spectroscopy in the ultraviolet and visible regions to identify and estimate theamounts of various elements which are excited in a flame, an arc or high voltage spark.



flammable limits
See: explosivity limits





flash photolysis
A technique of transient spectroscopy and transient kinetic studies in which a light pulse is used toproduce transient species. Commonly, an intense pulse of short duration is used to produce a sufficientconcentration of a transient species suitable for spectroscopic observation.

flash point
The lowest temperature at which a substance, e.g. fuel oil, will give off a vapour that will flash orburn momentarily when ignited.









flavoproteins
Flavins tightly bound or covalently attached to a protein chain, commonly through the 8-methyl carbonatom.

floc
When a sol is colloidally unstable the formation of aggregates is called coagulation or flocculation.Some authors distinguish between coagulation and flocculation, the latter implying the formation ofa loose or open network which may or may not separate macroscopically. The loose structure formedin this way is called a floc.

floccule
A small loosely aggregated mass of material suspended in or precipitated from a liquid; a cluster ofparticles.

Flory–Huggins theory
A thermodynamic theory of polymer solutions, first formulated independently by Flory and byHuggins, in which the thermodynamic quantities of the solution are derived from a simple concept ofcombinatorial entropy of mixing and a reduced Gibbs energy parameter, the 'χ parameter'.

flotation
The removal of matter by entrainment at an interface.

flow analysis
The generic name for all analytical methods that are based on the introduction and processing of testsamples in flowing media.

flow enthalpimetry [obsolete]
See: flow injection enthalpimetry

flow injection
The introduction of a sample or reagent into a continuous stream by use of a rapid delivery device.

flow injection enthalpimetry
Synonym: enthalpimetric flow injection analysisA term used to describe several related methods in which a transient temperature change in a flowingliquid stream, caused by a chemical reaction, is used to quantitatively determine an analyte. Theanalyte is introduced as a discrete liquid sample (i.e. test portion) into the flowing stream. Thisdefinition limits the scope to experiments with primarily an analytical emphasis, performed in a flowinjection calorimeter. This maintains a clear distinction from classical flow calorimetric methodswhere reagents are combined continuously in flowing streams, or where the heat effect is measuredvia the flowing of a fluid over a reaction vessel. An acceptable synonym is enthalpimetric flowinjection analysis. Other non-recommended terms which have been used in the literature include peakenthalpimetry and enzyme thermistor. Flow enthalpimetry has been used to describe the flow injectiontechnique, but its use for this purpose is discouraged.









flow reactor
A reactor through which the reactants pass while catalysis is in progress.













fluid coke
The carbonization product of high-boiling hydrocarbon fractions (heavy residues of petroleum or coalprocessing) produced by the fluid coking process.Note:Fluid coke consists of spherulitic grains with a spherical layer structure and is generally lessgraphitizable than delayed coke. Therefore, it is not suitable as filler coke for polygranular graphiteproducts and is also less suitable for polycrystalline carbon products. Because of its isotropy it is lesssuitable to produce an anisotropic synthetic graphite. All cokes contain a fraction of matter that canbe released as volatiles during heat treatment. This mass fraction, the so-called volatile matter, is inthe case of fluid coke about 6 wt.%.



fluidized bed
A catalyst bed in which the flow of gases is sufficient to cause the finely divided particles to behavelike a fluid.

fluoresceins
See: xanthene dyes

fluorescence
Luminescence which occurs essentially only during the irradiation of a substance by electromagneticradiation.



fluorescence lifetime
Parameter describing the time evolution of the decay of the fluorescent radiant intensity.



fluorescence yield
For a given transition from an excited state of a specified atom, the ratio of the number of excitedatoms which emit a photon to the total number of excited atoms.

fluorimeter
An instrument used to measure the intensity and the wavelength distribution of the light emitted asfluorescence from a molecule excited at a specific wavelength or wavelengths within the absorptionband of a particular compound. Characteristic fluorescence bands may be used to identify specificpollutants such as the polynuclear aromatic hydrocarbons. Excitation spectra of impurities can beobserved by scanning the wavelength of the excitation light which is incident on the sample overa range of wavelengths and observing the relative intensity of the fluorescence emitted at a givenwavelength. These spectra are also characteristic of the impurity.

fluorocarbons
Compounds consisting wholly of fluorine and carbon.

fluorogenic
Property of a material in which fluorescence is induced or enhanced by the addition of anothermolecular entity.Note:An example is a non-fluorescent compound consisting of a pyrene connected to a maleimide group(which quenches the pyrene fluorescence). A reaction in which the maleimide moiety is converted toa succinimide derivative results in the recovery of the pyrene fluorescence.

fluorohydrins
See: halohydrins

fluorophore
Molecular entity (often organic) that emits fluorescence.

flux depression
The lowering of the particle (or photon) flux density in the neighbourhood of an object due toabsorption of particles (or photons) in the object.



fluxional
A chemical species is said to be fluxional if it undergoes rapid degenerate rearrangements (generallydetectable by methods which allow the observation of the behaviour of individual nuclei in arearranged chemical species, e.g. NMR, X-ray). Example: bullvalene (1 209 600 interconvertiblearrangements of the ten CH groups).The term is also used to designate positional change among ligands of complex compounds andorganometallics. In these cases, the change is not necessarily degenerate.See also: valence tautomerization







foaming agent
A surfactant which when present in small amounts facilitates the formation of a foam, or enhances itscolloidal stability by inhibiting the coalescence of bubbles.

fog
A general term applied to a suspension of droplets in a gas. In meteorology, it refers to a suspensionof water droplets resulting in a visibility of less than.



folates
A group of heterocyclic compounds based on the pteroic acid skeleton (below) conjugated with oneor more L-glutamate units.

















force constants
The coefficients in an expansion of the intramolecular potential function in terms of a definite set ofcoordinates, the values of which define the deformation of the molecule away from its equilibriumconfiguration. In order to define force constants, one has to indicate both the definition of eachcoordinate and the expansion of the potential.

formamidine disulfides
The compound H2NC(=NH)SSC(=NH)NH2 and its derivatives formed by substitution at nitrogen.

formation constant
For a mononuclear binary complex, if a central atom (central group) M (the 'metal') and a ligand Lhave been defined, then in the following expressionsis the stepwise formation constant, andis the cumulative formation constant for the complex MLn. They can both be referred to as stabilityconstants (stepwise and cumulative).

formazans
The parent compound H2NN=CHN=NH and its derivatives formed by substitution at carbon and/or nitrogen.

Förster cycle
An indirect method of determination of excited state equilibria, such asvalues, based on groundstate thermodynamics and electronic transition energies. This cycle considers only the difference inmolar enthalpy change () of reaction of ground and excited states, neglecting the difference inmolar entropy change of reaction of those states ().





fossil fuel
A fuel such as coal, oil and natural gas which has formed over many years through the decompositionof deposited vegetation which was under extreme pressure of an overburden of earth.















fraction
In general, a ratio of two quantities of the same kind, the numerator quantity applying to oneconstituent (or part) of the system and the denominator to the sum of quantities for all constituents(parts) of the system. When applied to mixtures fractions represent a group of 3 quantities: massfraction, volume fraction, and amount fraction (or mole fraction equal to the number fraction).



















frame-shift mutation
A point mutation involving either the deletion or insertion of a nucleotide in a gene. By the frameshift mutation, the normal reading frame used when decoding the nucleotide triplets in the gene isaltered to another reading frame.

Franck–Condon principle
Also contains definitions of: Franck–Condon state, vertical transitionClassically, the Franck–Condon principle is the approximation that an electronic transition is mostlikely to occur without changes in the positions of the nuclei in the molecular entity and itsenvironment. The resulting state is called a Franck–Condon state, and the transition involved, avertical transition. The quantum mechanical formulation of this principle is that the intensity ofa vibronic transition is proportional to the square of the overlap integral between the vibrationalwavefunctions of the two states that are involved in the transition.







free energy
See: Gibbs energy (function)

free radical
See: radical



free-running laser
A term applied to a pulsed laser, meaning that the laser emission lasts as long as the pumping processis sufficient to sustain lasing conditions. Typical pulse durations are in the range, dependingon the pumping source. When the operation mode of a pulsed laser is not specified as mode-locked,Q-switched, or anything else, it must be considered as free-running.

freely draining
An adjective referring to a chain macromolecule the segments of which produce such small frictionaleffects when moving in a medium that the hydrodynamic field in the vicinity of a given segment is notaffected by the presence of other segments. Thus, the solvent can flow virtually undisturbed throughthe domain occupied by a freely draining macromolecule.















frequency doubling
See: harmonic frequency generation, non-linear optical effects













frontal chromatography
A procedure in which the sample (liquid or gas) is fed continuously into the chromatographic bed. Infrontal chromatography no additional mobile phase is used.

frontier orbitals
Also contains definition of: LUMOThe Highest-energy Occupied Molecular Orbital (HOMO) (filled or partly filled) and Lowestenergy Unoccupied Molecular Orbital (LUMO) (completely or partly vacant) of a molecular entity.Examination of the mixing of frontier molecular orbitals of reacting molecular entities affordsan approach to the interpretation of reaction behaviour; this constitutes a simplified perturbationmolecular orbital theory of chemical behaviour.See also: SOMO, subjacent orbital



frost point hygrometer
Instrument in which the sample is passed over a cooled surface. The temperature at which frost formson it is a function of the water content of the gas passing over the surface.

froth flotation
The removal of particulate matter by foaming.

Frumkin effect
Also contains definition of: 'true' rate constantIn an electrode reaction, when reactants or intermediates are adsorbed, the rate of reaction mayno longer be related to the concentration by a simple law. The deviation may be due to eitherentropic or energetic effects or both. The situation best understood is that where a reactant is nonspecifically adsorbed in the outer Helmholtz plane (inner boundary of the diffuse layer). The effectof such adsorption on electrode kinetics is usually termed the Frumkin effect. Rate constants, transfercoefficients etc. corrected for this effect are frequently called 'true' rate constants etc. It would bepreferable to describe them as 'corrected for the Frumkin effect', but in any case, if such a correctionis carried out, the basis on which it is made should be clearly described.

fucolipid
See: glycolipids

fuel cycle (nuclear)
The sequence of steps, such as utilization, reprocessing, and refabrication, through which nuclear fuelmay pass.

fuel element (nuclear)
The smallest structurally discrete part of a reactor which has fuel as its principal constituent.

fuel reprocessing (nuclear)
The processing of nuclear fuel, after its use in a reactor, to remove fission products and recover fissileand fertile material.





fulgides
Dialkylidenesuccinic anhydrides (generally photochromic).

full energy peak
Synonym: total absorption peakOf a spectrum of radiation, the part of the spectral response curve corresponding to the total absorptionin a detecting material of the energy of the detected radiation.

fullerenes
Compounds composed solely of an even number of carbon atoms, which form a cage-like fused-ringpolycyclic system with twelve five-membered rings and the rest six-membered rings. The archetypalexample is [60]fullerene, where the atoms and bonds delineate a truncated icosahedron. The term hasbeen broadened to include any closed cage structure consisting entirely of three-coordinate carbonatoms.

fulminates
1.2.Compounds having the structure RON=C:. So called because fulminic acid (actually HC≡N+–O− formonitrile oxide) was previously considered to be HON=C:.Salts of fulminic acid, e.g. Na+[–C≡N+O−].

fulvalenes
The hydrocarbon fulvalene and its derivatives formed by substitution (and by extension, analoguesformed by replacement of one or more carbon atoms of the fulvalene skeleton by a heteroatom).

fulvenes
The hydrocarbon fulvene and its derivatives formed by substitution (and by extension, analoguesformed by replacement of one or more carbon atoms of the fulvene skeleton by a heteroatom).







functional class name
A name that expresses the characteristic group as a class term written as a separate word followingthe name of a parent structure or a name derived from a parent structure. In the latter case, when thederived name is that for a substituent group (formerly called a 'radical'), the method has been called'radicofunctional nomenclature'.

functional group
Organic compounds are thought of as consisting of a relatively unreactive backbone, for example achain ofhybridized carbon atoms, and one or several functional groups. The functional groupis an atom, or a group of atoms that has similar chemical properties whenever it occurs in differentcompounds. It defines the characteristic physical and chemical properties of families of organiccompounds.

functional parent
A structure the name of which implies the presence of one or more characteristic groups and whichhas one or more hydrogen atoms attached to at least one of its skeletal atoms or one of its characteristicgroups, or in which at least one of its characteristic groups can form at least one kind of functionalmodification.Note:A parent hydride bearing a characteristic group denoted by a suffix, for example, cyclohexanol, is notconsidered to be a functional parent, but may be described as a 'functionalized parent hydride'.







furanoses
Cyclic hemiacetal forms of monosaccharides in which the ring is five-membered (i.e. atetrahydrofuran skeleton).

furnace black
A type of carbon that is produced industrially in a furnace by incomplete combustion in an adjustableand controllable process that yields a wide variety of properties within the product.Note:The most widely employed industrial process for carbon black production is the furnace process.See also: gas black



furocoumarins
Derivatives (mostly of natural origin) of the linear furocoumarin skeleton, psoralen, or its angularisomer, angelicin, variously substituted with hydroxy, methoxy, alkyl, or hydroxymethyl groups,among others.



fusion name
A composite name for a polycyclic parent structure having the maximum number of non-cumulativedouble bonds and at least one ortho fusion. Name formation involves the dissection of the structureinto contiguous components having recognized trivial or semisystematic names, one of which isselected as the 'base component'. Attachment of the other components is described by prefixes.



γ-cascade
Two or more different gamma rays emitted successively from one nucleus when it passes throughone or more energy levels.

γ-quantum
A photon of γ-radiation

γ-radiation
Electromagnetic radiation emitted in the process of nuclear transformation or particle annihilation

γ-ray spectrometer
A measuring assembly for determining the energy spectrum of γ-rays.





Galvani potential difference
An electric potential difference between points in the bulk of two phases. It is measurable only whenthe two phases have identical composition (e.g. two copper wires). It is the difference of inner electricpotentials in two phases. Symbol:.

galvanic corrosion
See: contact corrosion





gas chromatography (GC)
A separation technique in which the mobile phase is a gas. Gas chromatography is always carriedout in a column.

gas constant
Fundamental physical constant,.

gas laser
A laser in which the active medium is a gas containing a laser active species. It is typically composedof a plasma discharge tube containing a gas that can be excited with an electric discharge.

gas sensing electrode
A sensor composed of an indicator and a reference electrode in contact with a thin film of solutionwhich is separated from the bulk of the sample solution by a gas-permeable membrane or an air gap.This intermediate solution interacts with the gaseous species (penetrated through the membrane oran air gap) in such a way as to produce a change in a measured constituent (e.g. the H+ activity) ofthe intermediate solution. This change is then sensed by the ion-selective electrode and is related tothe partial pressure of the gaseous species in the sample. [Note: In electrochemical literature the termgas electrode is used for the classical, redox-equilibrium-based gas electrodes as well, such as thehydrogen or the chlorine gas electrodes (Pt (s)|H2 (g) | H+ (aq) or Pt (s) |Cl2 (g) | Cl− (aq)]. Theseelectrodes respond both to the partial pressure of the gas (H2 or Cl2 ) and to the ionic activities (H+or Cl−). The Clark oxygen electrode fits under this classification although, in contrast to other gassensors, it is an amperometric and not a potentiometric device.

gas-filled phototube
Similar in construction to a vacuum phototube except that it is filled with a noble gas (usually Ar) at apressure of about. Photoelectrons accelerated by the anode electric potential ionize gas atoms.The additional electrons provide a substantial intrinsic gain.

gas-filled X-ray detector
A cylindrical cathode with a window, an axial wire anode and an ionizable gas. The gas may becontinuously replenished giving a flow-through detector or the detector may be sealed. Following anoriginal ionizing event, electron multiplication occurs through a process of gas amplification in thehigh electric field surrounding the anode wire. The gain of this process is defined as the number ofelectrons collected on the anode wire for each primary electron produced. For X-rays having energieshigher than the excitation potential of the detector gas, the spectral responsivity function has a secondpeak in addition to the main peak that is called the escape peak. The escape peak has a mean pulseheight proportional to the difference between the photon energy of the incident X-rays and of thespectral characteristic line of the detector gas. A quenching gas, a molecular gas, is added to thedetector gas in order to neutralize the detector gas ions and to absorb secondary electrons as well asUV radiation resulting from neutralization of detector gas ions. According to the potential applied tothe anode, the detector can work as an ionization chamber, proportional counter, or Geiger counter.

gas-liquid chromatography
Comprises all gas-chromatographic methods in which the stationary phase is a liquid dispersed on asolid support. Separation is achieved by partition of the components of a sample between the phases.

gas-phase acidity
The negative of the Gibbs energy () change for the reaction:in the gas phase.

gas-phase basicity
The negative of the Gibbs energy () change associated with the reaction:in the gas phase. Also called absolute or intrinsic basicity.See also: proton affinity







gated photochromism
Special form of photochromism in which one or both forms of a photochromic system are transformedreversibly, either chemically or electrochemically, into a non-photochromic form.

gated photodetector
Where photodetectors are switched on (or off) usually in a repetitive manner employing electronicswitches, they are described as gated.

gauche
Synonymous with a synclinal alignment of groups attached to adjacent atoms.See: torsion angle





gauss
emu unit of magnetic flux density,.

Gaussian band shape
A band shape described by the Gaussian function:In this equation,is proportional to the width of the band, andis the frequency of the bandmaximum.See also: Lorentzian band shape

Geiger counter
A gas-filled X-ray detector in which gas amplification reaches saturation and proportionality no longerexists. The output signal does not depend on the incident energy. The time taken for the counter torecover from the saturation is called dead time.

Geiger–Muller counter tube
A counter tube operated under such conditions that the magnitude of each pulse is independent of theamount of energy deposited in it.

gel
Non-fluid colloidal network or polymer network that is expanded throughout its whole volume bya fluid.Notes:1. A gel has a finite, usually rather small, yield stress.2. A gel can contain:1. a covalent polymer network, e.g., a network formed by crosslinking polymer chains or bynon-linear polymerization;2. a polymer network formed through the physical aggregation of polymer chains, caused byhydrogen bonds, crystallization, helix formation, complexation, etc, that results in regionsof local order acting as the network junction points. The resulting swollen network may betermed a thermoreversible gel if the regions of local order are thermally reversible;3. a polymer network formed through glassy junction points, e.g., one based on blockcopolymers. If the junction points are thermally reversible glassy domains, the resultingswollen network may also be termed a thermoreversible gel;4. lamellar structures including mesophases, e.g., soap gels, phospholipids and clays;5. particulate disordered structures, e.g., a flocculent precipitate usually consisting of particleswith large geometrical anisotropy, such as in V2O5 gels and globular or fibrillar protein gels.3. Corrected from previous definition where the definition is via the property identified in Note 1(above) rather than of the structural characteristics that describe a gel.

gel aging
Time-dependent changes in the chemical or the physical structure and the properties of a gel.Note:The aging of a gel can involve polymerization, crystallization, aggregation, syneresis, phase changes,formation of branch points and junction points as well as scission and chemical changes toconstitutional units of network chains.

gel fraction
Mass fraction of the network material resulting from a network-forming polymerization orcrosslinking process.Note:The gel fraction comprises a single molecule spanning the entire volume of the material sample.

gel point
Also contains definition of: gelation pointPoint of incipient network formation in a process forming a chemical or physical polymer network.Notes:1. In both network-forming polymerization and the crosslinking of polymer chains, the gel point isexpressed as an extent of chemical reaction (c.f., gel time).2. At the gel point a solid (network) material spanning the entire system is formed.See also: gel fraction3. The gel point is often detected using rheological methods. Different methods can give differentgel points because viscosity is tending to infinity at the gel point and a unique value cannot bemeasured directly.

gel time
Also contains definition of: gelation timeTime interval from the start of a network-forming process to the gel point.

gelation
Process of passing through the gel point to form a gel or network.

gelation temperature
Also contains definition of: gel temperatureTemperature threshold for the formation of a thermoreversible gel.Notes:1. A thermoreversible gel is usually formed by cooling a polymer solution. In these cases, the geltemperature is a maximum temperature at which the presence of network is observed.2. Since gel temperatures depend on the method of determination, this should always be indicated.

geminate ion pair
Ion pair formed from a precursor that constitutes a single kinetic entity, i.e., by electron transfer or iontransfer in an encounter complex (cf. collision complex) or by ionic dissociation of a single molecularentity.

geminate pair
Pair of molecular entities in close proximity in solution within a solvent cage and resulting fromreaction (e.g. bond scission, electron transfer, group transfer) of a precursor that constitutes a singlekinetic entity.See also: ion pair, radical pair



gene amplification
An increase in the number of copies of a specific gene in an organism. This can lead to the productionof a corresponding protein at elevated levels.

gene (cistron)
Structurally, a basic unit of hereditary material; an ordered sequence of nucleotide bases that encodesone polypeptide chain (via mRNA). The gene includes, however, regions preceding and followingthe coding region (leader and trailer) as well as (in eukaryotes) intervening sequences (introns)between individual coding segments (exons). Functionally, the gene is defined by the cis-trans testthat determines whether independent mutations of the same phenotype occur within a single gene orin several genes involved in the same function.

gene library
A collection of cloned DNA fragments from a variety of species.

gene manipulation
The use of in vitro techniques to produce DNA molecules containing novel combinations of genes oraltered sequences, and the insertion of these into vectors that can be used for their incorporation intohost organisms or cells in which they are capable of continued propagation of the modified genes.

general acid catalysis
The catalysis of a chemical reaction by a series of Brønsted acids (which may include the solvatedhydrogen ion) so that the rate of the catalysed part of the reaction is given bymultipliedby some function of substrate concentrations. (The acids HA are unchanged by the overall reaction.)General catalysis by acids can be experimentally distinguished from specific catalysis by hydrogencations (hydrons) by observation of the rate of reaction as a function of buffer concentration.See also: catalytic coefficient, intramolecular catalysis, pseudo-catalysis

general acid–base catalysis
Catalysis by acids or bases in solution is said to be general when it is possible to detect catalysisbrought about by species other than the ions formed from the solvent itself (e.g. when water is thesolvent, by species other than H+ and OH− ions).See: general acid catalysis, general base catalysis

general base catalysis
The catalysis of a chemical reaction by a series of Brønsted bases (which may include the lyate ion) sothat the rate of the catalysed part of the reaction is given bymultiplied by some functionof substrate concentration.See also: general acid catalysis

general force field
Acronym: gffA force field expressed in terms ofwhere(orbasis coordinates:) are force constants and the basis coordinates(or sometimes ) may be internalsymmetry coordinates, local symmetry coordinates or any others suitable to the problem, but thenumber of the coordinates has to be reduced to(for linear molecules), being thenumber of atoms in the molecule.









genetic code
The set of rules which governs the relationship between the linear order of the nucleotides in an mRNAmolecule and the sequence of the amino acids in the protein which it encodes. The genetic code is atriplet code, nearly universal. It is not overlapping: a mutation which alters only a single nucleotidein a gene can change only one amino acid in the encoded protein. It is degenerate: it assigns each ofthe 20 amino acids to one or more of 61 of the 64 possible nucleotide triplets (cf. codon) that canbe constructed from four nucleotides. The remaining three triplets are used to signal the terminationof a genetic message.

genome
The complete set of chromosomal and extrachromosomal genes of an organism, a cell, an organelleor a virus; the complete DNA component of an organism.

genomics
1.2.Science of using DNA- and RNA-based technologies to demonstrate alterations in geneexpression.(in toxicology) Method providing information on the consequences for gene expression ofinteractions of the organism with environmental stress, xenobiotics, etc..

genotype
The genetic constitution of an organism as revealed by genetic or molecular analysis, i.e. the completeset of genes, both dominant and recessive, possessed by a particular cell or organism.

geometric attenuation
The reduction of a radiation quantity due to the effect only of the distance between the point of interestand the source, excluding the effect of any matter present.

geometric isomerism [obsolete]
Obsolete synonym for cis-trans isomerism. (Usage strongly discouraged).









germylenes [obsolete]
See: germylidenes

germylidenes
Carbene analogues having the structure R2Ge:. The older synonym germylenes is no longerrecommended.

Gibbs adsorption
The surface excess amount or Gibbs adsorption of component ,, which may be positive or negative,is defined as the excess of the amount of this component actually present in the system over that presentin a reference system of the same volume as the real system and in which the bulk concentrations inthe two phases remain uniform up to the Gibbs dividing surface. That iswhereis the total amount of the component in the system,the two bulk phasessurface.and , andandandare the concentrations inare the volumes of the two phases defined by the Gibbs

Gibbs energy diagram
A diagram showing the relative standard Gibbs energies of reactants, transition states, reactionintermediates and products, in the same sequence as they occur in a chemical reaction. These pointsare often connected by a smooth curve (a 'Gibbs energy profile', commonly still referred to as a 'freeenergy profile') but experimental observation can provide information on relative standard Gibbsenergies only at the maxima and minima and not at the configurations between them. The abscissaexpresses the sequence of reactants, products, reaction intermediates and transition states and isusually undefined or only vaguely defined by the reaction coordinate (extent of bond breaking or bondmaking). In some adaptations the abscissas are however explicitly defined as bond orders, Brønstedexponents, etc. Contrary to statements in many text books, the highest point on a Gibbs energy diagramdoes not necessarily correspond to the transition state of the rate-limiting step. For example, in astepwise reaction consisting of two reaction steps:one of the transition states of the two reaction steps must (in general) have a higher standardGibbs energy than the other, whatever the concentration of D in the system. However, the valueof that concentration will determine which of the reaction steps is rate-limiting. If the particularconcentrations of interest, which may vary, are chosen as the standard state, then the rate-limiting stepis the one of highest Gibbs energy.See also: potential energy profile, potential energy (reaction) surface







Gibbs energy of repulsion
Indicated byorif the repulsion is due to electric effects (of two flat and parallel surfaces).(ororis taken for unit area of each) is defined as

Gibbs energy profile
See: Gibbs energy diagram, transition-state theory

Gibbs film elasticity
Pertains to a film element of a soap film changing in area at constant mass and is the differentialchange of its surface tension with relative change in area ,whereis the thermodynamic temperature,is the pressure, andis the amount of substance ofthe species .

Gibbs surface
Synonym: Gibbs dividing surfaceA geometrical surface chosen parallel to the interface and used to define the volumes of the bulkphases in the calculation of the extent of adsorption, and of other surface excess properties. Alsoreferred to as Gibbs dividing surface.

giga
SI prefix for(symbol:).

glass electrode error
Deviation of a glass electrode from the hydrogen-ion response function. An example oftenencountered is the error due to sodium ions at alkalinevalues, which by convention is regardedas positive.

glass laser
A solid state laser in which the active medium is a glass host that supports the active species. Theneodymium-doped phosphate glass laser is one example.

glass transition
A second-order transition in which a supercooled melt yields, on cooling, a glassy structure. Below theglass-transition temperature the physical properties vary in a manner similar to those of the crystallinephase. Example: Lithium disilicate crystals melt at; the melt can be supercooled to the glasstransition temperature at approximatelybelow which the viscous liquid freezes to a rigidamorphous glass.

glass-like carbon
An agranular non-graphitizable carbon with a very high isotropy of its structural and physicalproperties and with a very low permeability for liquids and gases. The original surfaces and the fracturesurfaces have a pseudo-glassy appearance.Note:The often used synonyms 'glassy carbon' and 'vitreous carbon' have been introduced as trademarks andshould not be used as terms. From a scientific viewpoint, all synonymous terms suggest a similiaritywith the structure of silicate glasses which does not exist in glass-like carbon, except for the pseudoglassy appearance of the surface. Glass-like carbon cannot be described as amorphous carbon becauseit consists of two-dimensional structural elements and does not exhibit 'dangling' bonds.See: agranular carbon

glass-transition temperature
The temperature at which the viscosity of the glass is.

global analysis
Method for kinetic analysis of time-resolved emission or absorption data.Note:Typical for the analysis of emission (or transient absorption) data. Upon excitation with a particularwavelength, radiant intensity of the emission (or transient absorbance difference) decays are observedas a function of a variable parameter, e.g., the observation wavelength, but otherwise under the samecondition. All decays are then analysed together (globally) under the constraint that the lifetimes ofthe transient species do not vary with the variable parameter, e.g., the observation wavelength in thegiven example. Lifetime-associated spectra (LAS), also called decay-associated spectra (DAS), arethus obtained. In the case of transient absorption data, the resulting spectra are often called lifetimeassociated difference spectra (LADS).





glycals
See: enoses

glycans
Synonymous with polysaccharides. Glycans composed of a single type of monosaccharide residue(homopolysaccharide, synonym homoglycan) are named by replacing the ending '-ose' of the sugarby '-an', e.g. mannans, fructans, xylans, arabinans. Dextrans and dextrins belong to the class glucans.

glycaric acids [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for aldaric acids.

glycerides
Esters of glycerol (propane-1,2,3-triol) with fatty acids, widely distributed in nature. They are by longestablished custom subdivided into triglycerides, 1,2- or 1,3-diglycerides, and 1- or 2-monoglycerides,according to the number and position of acyl groups (not, as one might suppose, the number ofglycerol residues). The recommended method for naming individual glycerides is mono-, di- or tri-Oacylglycerol, as appropriate.



glycitols [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for alditols.

glyco-amino-acid
Also contains definition of: glycosyl-amino-acidA saccharide attached to a single amino acid by any kind of covalent bond. A glycosyl-amino-acid is acompound consisting of saccharide linked through a glycosyl linkage (O-, N-, or S-) to an amino acid.Note:The hyphens are needed to avoid implying that the carbohydrate is necessarily linked to the aminogroup.

glycoconjugate
A type of compound consisting of carbohydrate units covalently linked with other types of chemicalconstituent.

glycoglycerolipid
See: glycolipids

glycolipids
Naturally occurring 1,2-di-O-acylglycerols joined at oxygen 3 by a glycosidic linkage to acarbohydrate part (usually a mono-, di- or tri-saccharide). Some substances classified as bacterialglycolipids have the sugar part acylated by one or more fatty acids and the glycerol part may be absent.See also: glycosides, lipids, lipopolysaccharides

glycols
Dihydric alcohols, also known as diols, in which the two hydroxy groups are on different carbonatoms, usually but not necessarily adjacent. E.g. HOCH2CH2OH 'ethylene glycol' (ethane-1,2-diol),HO[CH2]4OH butane-1,4-diol.

glyconic acids [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for aldonic acids.





glycosaminoglycan
The carbohydrate units in proteoglycans are polysaccharides that contain amino sugars; thesepolysaccharides are known as glycosaminoglycans.

glycoses
A less frequently used term for monosaccharides.

glycosides
Originally mixed acetals resulting from the attachment of a glycosyl group to a non-acyl group RO–(which itself may be derived from a saccharide and chalcogen replacements thereof (RS–, RSe–).The bond between the glycosyl group and the OR group is called a glycosidic bond. By extension, theterms N-glycosides and C-glycosides are used as class names for glycosylamines and for compoundshaving a glycosyl group attached to a hydrocarbyl group respectively.These terms are misnomers and should not be used. The preferred terms are glycosylamines and Cglycosyl compounds, respectively.

glycosphingolipid
See: glycolipids

glycosyl group
The structure obtained by removing the hydroxy group from the hemiacetal function of amonosaccharide and, by extension, of a lower oligosaccharide.

glycosylamines
Compounds having a glycosyl group attached to an amino group, NR2; less elegantly calledN-glycosides, e.g. N,N-dimethyl-β-D-glucopyranosylamine.See: glycosides

glycuronic acids [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for uronic acids.

grab sampling
The taking of a sample (often in an evacuated bulb) in a very short time; preferred terms areinstantaneous sampling or spot sampling.

gradient
A differential ratio; the change in a quantity such as the mixing ratio of an impurity in air, thetemperature of the air, etc., with height or distance.











graft copolymer
A copolymer that is a graft polymer.Note:In the constituent macromolecules of a graft copolymer, adjacent blocks in the main chain or sidechains, or both, are constitutionally different, i.e. adjacent blocks comprise constitutional units derivedfrom different species of monomer or from the same species of monomer but with a differentcomposition or sequence distribution of constitutional units.

graft copolymerization
Polymerization in which a graft copolymer is formed.

graft macromolecule
A macromolecule with one or more species of block connected to the main chain as side chains, theseside chains having constitutional or configurational features that differ from those in the main chain.

graft polymer
A polymer composed of graft macromolecules.







Gram stain
A set of two stains that are used to stain (crystal violet and iodine) and counterstain (fuchsin) bacteria.Gram-negative bacteria are completely decolorized after treating the stained bacteria with ethanolor acetone and can be visualized by the counterstain. They have a complex cell wall in which thepeptidoglycan layer is covered by lipopolysaccharides in an outer membrane structure. Gram-positivebacteria resist decolorization by ethanol or acetone, they retain the initial Gram stain. They have acell wall consisting predominantly of peptidoglycan not overlayed by an outer membrane.

granular carbon
The term granular carbon is equivalent to coarse particulate carbon. This is a carbon materialconsisting of separate particles or grains which are monolithic, on the average larger than aboutin diameter, but smaller than about.Note:Although limits of size cannot be exactly defined, coke grains obtained by grinding belong to coarseparticulate carbon for grain sizes above ca., or to fine particulate carbon for grain sizesbelow ca.. Colloidal graphite obtained by grinding of natural graphite is a typical extra fineparticulate carbon. Industrial carbon materials (such as electrodes) are made with fillers composedof coarse particulate carbon (coke grains) and fine particulate carbon (flour), and sometimes evencolloidal carbon, carbon blacks or soot). They are therefore polygranular materials.

graphene layer
A single carbon layer of the graphite structure, describing its nature by analogy to a polycyclicaromatic hydrocarbon of quasi infinite size.Note:Previously, descriptions such as graphite layers, carbon layers or carbon sheets have been used forthe term graphene. Because graphite designates that modification of the chemical element carbon,in which planar sheets of carbon atoms, each atom bound to three neighbours in a honeycomb-likestructure, are stacked in a three-dimensional regular order, it is not correct to use for a single layer aterm which includes the term graphite, which would imply a three-dimensional structure. The termgraphene should be used only when the reactions, structural relations or other properties of individuallayers are discussed.

graphite
An allotropic form of the element carbon consisting of layers of hexagonally arranged carbon atomsin a planar condensed ring system graphene layers The layers are stacked parallel to each other in athree-dimensional crystalline long-range order. There are two allotropic forms with different stackingarrangements, hexagonal and rhombohedral. The chemical bonds within the layers are covalent withhybridization and with a C–C distance of. The weak bonds between the layers aremetallic with a strength comparable to van der Waals bonding only.Note:The term graphite is also used often but incorrectly to describe graphite materials, i.e. materialsconsisting of graphitic carbon made from carbon materials by processing to temperatures greater than, even though no perfect graphite structure is present.

graphite fibres
Carbon fibres consisting mostly of synthetic graphite for which three-dimensional crystalline orderis confirmed by X-ray diffraction.Note:Graphite fibres can be obtained by graphitization heat treatment of carbon fibres if these consist mostlyof graphitizable carbon. If the h,k,l diffraction lines are difficult to recognize because they are of minorintensity, the mean interlayer spacingcan be used as indication for the presence of a graphiticstructure. Thevalue ofis generally considered as an upper limit for synthetic graphite.

graphite material
A material consisting essentially of graphitic carbon.Note:The use of the term graphite as a short term for material consisting of graphitic carbon is incorrect. Theterm graphite can only be used in combination with other nouns or clarifying adjectives for specialtypes of graphite materials (graphite electrodes, natural graphite and others). The use of the termgraphite without a noun or clarifying adjective should be restricted to the allotropic form of the elementcarbon.

graphite whiskers
Also contains definition of: carbon whiskersThin, approximately cylindrical filaments in which graphene layers are arranged in a scroll-likemanner. There is, at least in part, a regular stacking of the layers as in the graphite lattice, giving riseto h,k,l, X-ray reflections. The physical properties of graphite whiskers approach, along the cylinderaxis, those of graphite.Note:If there is, due to misalignment of the layers caused by their bending, no three-dimensional stackingorder as in graphite, the term carbon whiskers should be used. Graphite whiskers and carbon whiskersshould be distinguished from more disordered filamentous carbon.

graphitic carbon
All varieties of substances consisting of the element carbon in the allotropic form of graphiteirrespective of the presence of structural defects.Note:The use of the term graphitic carbon is justified if three-dimensional hexagonal crystalline long-rangeorder can be detected in the material by diffraction methods, independent of the volume fraction andthe homogeneity of distribution of such crystalline domains. Otherwise, the term non-graphitic carbonshould be used.

graphitizable carbon
A non-graphitic carbon which upon graphitization heat treatment converts into graphitic carbon.Note:If it is preferred to define the characterizable state of material instead of its behaviour duringsubsequent treatment, the term 'pregraphitic carbon' could be considered.

graphitization
A solid-state transformation of thermodynamically unstable non-graphitic carbon into graphite bymeans of heat treatment.Note:Graphitization is also used for the transformation of metastable diamond into graphite by heattreatment, as well as in metallurgy for the formation of graphite from thermodynamically unstablecarbides by thermal decomposition at high temperatures. Such uses of the term graphitization are inline with the above definition. The use of the term graphitization to indicate a process of thermaltreatment of carbon materials atregardless of any resultant crystallinity is incorrect.

graphitization heat treatment
A process of heat treatment of a non-graphitic carbon industrially performed at temperatures in therange betweenand, to achieve transformation into graphitic carbon.Note:The term graphitization heat treatment does not include information as to the crystallinity achievedby the heat treatment, that is the extent of transformation into graphitic carbon or the degree ofgraphitization. Only for such a transformation into graphitic carbon should the term graphitization beused. Consequently: the common use of the term graphitization for the heat treatment process only,regardless of the resultant crystallinity, is incorrect and should be avoided.

graphitized carbon
A graphitic carbon with more or less perfect three-dimensional hexagonal crystalline order preparedfrom non-graphitic carbon by graphitization heat treatment.Note:Non-graphitizable carbons do not transform into graphitic carbon on heat treatment at temperaturesaboveand therefore are not graphitized carbons.

gravimetric method
A determination by weight; e.g. in the older method of Cl− ion determination, a weighed amount ofsample is dissolved in water, AgNO3 solution added, AgCl is precipitated, dried and weighed. Fromthe known mass fraction of silver in AgCl, the weights of the initial sample and that of the AgClprecipitated, the percentage of chlorine in the sample can be calculated readily.

gravitational constant
UniversalfundamentalphysicalconstantinNewton'slawofgravitation,.

gray
SI derived unit of energy imparted to an element of matter by ionizing radiation divided by the massof that element (absorbed dose of radiation) equal to one joule per kilogram and admitted for reasonsof safeguarding human health,.

green body
Object formed from a preceramic material prior to pyrolysis.

green coke
Green coke raw coke) is the primary solid carbonization product from high boiling hydrocarbonfractions obtained at temperatures below. It contains a fraction of matter that can be releasedas volatiles during subsequent heat treatment at temperatures up to approximately. This massfraction, the so-called volatile matter, is in the case of green coke between 4 and 15 wt.%, but itdepends also on the heating rate.Note:Raw coke is an equivalent term to green coke although it is now less frequently used. The so-calledvolatile matter of green coke depends on temperature and time of coking, but also on the method forits determination.



Grignard reagents
Organomagnesium halides, RMgX, having a carbon–magnesium bond (or their equilibrium mixturesin solution with R2Mg + MgX2).







ground state
The state of lowest Gibbs energy of a system.See also: excited state

group
A defined linked collection of atoms or a single atom within a molecular entity. This use of the term inphysical organic and general chemistry is less restrictive than the definition adopted for the purposeof nomenclature of organic compounds.See also: characteristic group in organic nomenclature, principal group in organic nomenclature,substituent

group electronegativity
Synonymous with substituent electronegativity.See: electronegativity











Guinier plot
A diagrammatic representation of data on scattering from large particles, obtained at different anglesbut at the same concentration, constructed by plottingorversusorand (usually) used for the evaluation of the radius of gyration.is the excess Rayleigh ratio,the particle scattering function, the scattering angle and the length of the scattering vector.





haem
An alternative spelling for heme.

halato-telechelic polymer
Also contains definition of: halatopolymerPolymer composed of linear macromolecules having ionic or ionizable end-groups.Notes:1. The term halato-telechelic polymer is used to denote a polymer composed of macromoleculeshaving stable (long-lived) ionic or ionizable groups, such as carboxylate or quaternaryammonium groups, as chain ends. It should not be used to describe a polymer composed ofmacromolecules having chain ends that are transient intermediates in ionic polymerizationsinitiated by difunctional initiators.2. The term halatopolymer is used for a linear polymer formed by the coupling of halato-telechelicpolymer molecules, for example, for the linear polymer formed by the coupling of carboxylateend-groups with divalent metal cations.













half-peak potential
In linear-sweep voltammetry, triangular-wave voltammetry, cyclic triangular-wave voltammetry, andsimilar techniques, the potential of the indicator electrode at which the difference between the totalcurrent and the residual current is equal to one-half of the peak current. This potential is attained in theinterval in which the rate of the charge-transfer process, and hence the (absolute value of the) current,increase monotonically with time.

half-wave potential
The potential of a polarographic or voltammetric indicator electrode at the point, on the rising part ofa polarographic or voltammetric wave, where the difference between the total current and the residualcurrent is equal to one-half of the limiting current. The quarter-wave potential, the three-quarter-wavepotential, etc., may be similarly defined.



halirenium ions
Cyclic cations having the structure:

halochromism
The colour change which occurs on addition of acid (or base, or a salt) to a solution of a compound.A chemical reaction (e.g. ion formation) transforms a colourless compound into a coloured one.

haloforms
Trihalomethanes CHX3.

halohydrins
A traditional term for alcohols substituted by a halogen atom at a saturated carbonatom otherwise bearing only hydrogen or hydrocarbyl groups (usually used to mean βhalo alcohols). E.g. BrCH2CH2OH 'ethylene bromohydrin' (2-bromoethanol), ClCH2CH2CH2OH'trimethylene chlorohydrin' (3-chloro-propan-1-ol), PhCH(OH)CH2Cl 'styrene chlorohydrin' (2chloro-1-phenylethanol).

halonium ions
Also contains definitions of: bromonium ions, chloronium ions, iodonium ionsIons of the form R2X+, where X is any halogen (X = Br+ , bromonium ions; X = Cl+, chloroniumions; X = F+, fluoronium ions; X = I+, iodonium ions). They may be open-chain or cyclic.

halophiles
Organisms which require a minimum concentration of sodium chloride in their environment (cf.extremophiles).







Hammond–Herkstroeter plot
See: energy transfer plot

handedness
This term has been used in two ways, either chirality or chirality sense

Hansch analysis
Hansch analysis is the investigation of the quantitative relationship between the biological activityof a series of compounds and their physicochemical substituent or global parameters representinghydrophobic, electronic, steric and other effects using multiple regression correlation methodology.

Hansch constant
A measure of the capability of a solute for hydrophobic lipophilic interaction based on the partitioncoefficient for distribution of the solute between octan-1-ol and water. The most general way ofapplying in correlation analysis, QSAR, etc. is as log , but the behaviour of substituted benzenederivatives may be quantified by a substituent constant scale, , which is defined in a way analogousto the Hammett σ scale. There are various scales, depending on the substrate series used as reference.

Hantzsch–Widman name
A name for a heteromonocyclic parent hydride having no more than ten ring members formed bythe citation of 'a' prefixes denoting the heteroatoms followed by an ending (the 'stem') defining thesize of the ring.

hapten
A low-molecular weight molecule which contains an antigenic determinant but which is not itselfantigenic unless complexed with an anitgenic carrier. Examples of haptens are dinitrophenols,phosphorylcholine and dextran.

hapto
See: η or haptohard acid
Also contains definition of: soft acidA Lewis acid with an acceptor centre of low polarizability. Other things being approximately equal,complexes of hard acids and bases or soft acids and bases have an added stabilization (sometimescalled 'HSAB' rule). For example the hard O- (or N-) bases are preferred to their S- (or P-) analogues byhard acids. Conversely a soft acid possesses an acceptor centre of high polarizability and exhibits thereverse preference for coordination of a soft base. These preferences are not defined in a quantitativesense.See also: class (a) metal ion





hard-segment phase domain
Phase domain of microscopic or smaller size, usually in a block, graft, or segmented copolymer,comprising essentially those segments of the polymer that are rigid and capable of forming strongintermolecular interactions.Note:Hard-segment phase domains are typically of –linear size.









harpoon mechanism
Reaction sequence (thermal or photoinduced) between neutral molecular or atomic entities in whichlong-range electron transfer is followed by a considerable reduction of the distance between donorand acceptor sites as a result of the electrostatic attraction in the ion pair created.

hartree
Atomic unit of energy,.

Hartree energy
Atomicfundamentalphysicalconstant, whereelectron rest mass andusedasatomicunitofis the Planck constant divided byenergy:,thethe Bohr radius.

Haworth representation
The Haworth representation of the cyclic forms of monosaccharides can be derived from the Fischerprojection, as follows. The monosaccharide is depicted with the carbon-chain horizontal and in theplane of the paper, the potential carbonyl group being to the right. The oxygen bridge is then depictedas being formed behind the plane of the paper. The heterocyclic ring is therefore located in a planeapproximately perpendicular to the plane of the paper and the groups attached to the carbon atoms ofthat ring are above and below the ring. The carbon atoms of the ring are not shown. Groups that appearto the right of the vertical chain in the Fischer projection (structures A, D) then appear below the planeof the ring in the Haworth representation (structures B, C, E). However, at the asymmetric carbonatom (C-5 in A; C-4 in D) involved via oxygen in ring formation with the carbon atom of the carbonylgroup a formal double inversion must be envisaged to obtain the correct Haworth representation. Inthe pyranose forms of D-aldohexoses C-6 will always be above the plane, In the furanose forms ofD-aldohexoses the position of C-6 will depend on the configuration at C-4; it will, for example, beabove the plane in D-glucofuranoses (e.g. C) but below the plane in D-galactofuranoses (e.g. E).

hazard
Set of inherent properties of a substance, mixture of substances, or a process involving substancesthat, under production, usage, or disposal conditions, make it capable of causing adverse effects toorganisms or the environment, depending on the degree of exposure; in other words, it is a sourceof danger.















heavy atom effect
The enhancement of the rate of a spin-forbidden process by the presence of an atom of high atomicnumber, which is either part of, or external to, the excited molecular entity. Mechanistically, itresponds to a spin-orbit coupling enhancement produced by a heavy atom.

heavy atom isotope effect
An isotope effect due to isotopes other than those of hydrogen.

heavy water
Water containing a significant fraction (up to 100 per cent) of deuterium in the form of D2O or HDO.

hecto
SI prefix for(symbol: ).







helicity
Also contains definitions of: M, P, MThe chirality of a helical, propeller or screw-shaped molecular entity. A right-handed helix is describedas P (or plus), a left-handed one as M (or minus).The application of this system to the description of conformations considers the torsion angle betweentwo specified (fiducial) groups that are attached to the atoms linked by that bond. The sign of thesmaller torsion angle between the fiducial groups defines the chirality sense of the helix. Rules for theselection of fiducial groups according to priority are given by R.S. Cahn, C.K. Ingold and V. Prelog,Angew. Chem. 78, 413-447 (1966), Angew. Chem. Internat. Ed. Eng. 5, 385-415, 511 (1966).See also: axial chirality, Δ (delta), Λ (lambda)

heliochromism
Applied to photochromic compounds possessing a high efficiency for colouring with near-ultravioletradiation and a low efficiency for bleaching with visible radiation, but a moderate efficiency forthermal fading at ambient temperature. These compounds are activated by unfiltered sunlight anddeactivated under diffuse daylight conditions, therefore being suitable for sun-lens applications.

helion
Nucleus of the 3He atom.





helium–cadmium laser
Synonym: cadmium–helium laserA continuous wave laser emitting mainly atSee: gas lasersandfrom singly ionized cadmium.

helium–neon laser
A continuous wave laser emitting mainly atneutral Ne atoms.See: gas lasers,, andfrom excited

helix
The molecular conformation of a spiral nature, generated by regularly repeating rotations around thebackbone bonds of a macromolecule.



helix sense
The right-handed sense of a helix traces out a clockwise rotation moving away from the observer; theleft-handed sense of a helix traces out a counterclockwise rotation moving away from the observer,e.g. the ...... helix of isotactic poly(propylene) is left-handed.





hemiacetals
Compounds having the general formula R2C(OH)OR' ( R' ≠ H ).See also: lactols, hemiketals

hemiaminals
α-Amino alcohols, improperly called carbinolamines (the adducts of ammonia, or of primary orsecondary amines to the carbonyl group of aldehydes and ketones) R2C(OH)NR2. Compounds ofstructure R2C(OR')NR2 ( R ≠ H ) are hemiaminal ethers, or α-amino ethers.See: alcohols, aminals, ethers

hemiketals
Hemiacetals having the structure R2C(OH)OR ( R ≠ H ), derived from ketones by formal additionof an alcohol to the carbonyl group. This term, once abandoned, has been reinstated as a subclassof hemiacetals.

hemileptic [obsolete]
See: homoleptic

hemins
Chloro(porphyrinato)iron(III) complexes.See also: hemes (heme derivatives)

hemochromes
Iron–porphyrin complexes, having one or two basic ligands (e.g. piperidine, amines).See also: hemes (heme derivatives)

hemodialysis
Dialysis process in which undesired metabolites and toxic by-products, such as urea and creatine, areremoved from blood.

hemoglobins
Heme derivatives having a protein chain as axial ligand.







Herkstroeter plot
See: energy transfer plot

hertz
SI derived unit of frequency equal to one cycle per second,.

Herz compounds
1,2λ4,3-Benzodithiazolium chlorides (formed in the reaction of aniline and derivatives thereof withdisulfur dichloride).

hetarenes
Synonymous with heteroarenes.

hetaryl groups
Synonymous with heteroaryl groups.

hetarynes
Synonymous with heteroarynes.

heteroalkenes
Analogues of alkenes in which a doubly bonded carbon atom is replaced by a heteroatom, e.g.H2Si=CH2 methylidenesilane (silene less preferred), MeN=CH2 N-methylmethanimine.

heteroarenes
Heterocyclic compounds formally derived from arenes by replacement of one or more methine (–C=)and/or vinylene (–CH=CH–) groups by trivalent or divalent heteroatoms, respectively, in such a wayas to maintain the continuous π-electron system characteristic of aromatic systems and a number ofout-of-plane π-electrons corresponding to the Hückel rule (); an alternative term is hetarenes.

heteroaryl groups
The class of heterocyclyl groups derived from heteroarenes by removal of a hydrogen atom from anyring atom; an alternative term is hetaryl. E.g.

heteroarynes
Compounds derived from heteroarenes by replacement of a formal carbon-carbon double bond bya formal triple bond (with loss of two hydrogen atoms). Also known as hetarynes and as 1,2didehydroheteroarenes. E.g.See: arynes

heterobimetallic complex
A metal complex having two different metal atoms.

heterochain polymer
A class of polymer in which the main chain is constructed from atoms of two or more elements.Heterochain polymers are named by placing the names or symbols of all the elements in the mainchain, immediately before the expresssion '-chain polymer', e.g. (oxygen, carbon)-chain polymer or(O, C)-chain polymer; (oxygen, nitrogen, carbon)-chain polymer or (O, N, C)-chain polymer.

heteroconjugation
1.2.Association between a base and the conjugate acid of a different base through a hydrogenbond (B' ... HB+ or A'H ... A−). The term has its origin in the conjugate acid–base pair and is inno way related to conjugation of orbitals Heteroassociation is a more appropriate term.[obsolete] Some authors refer to conjugated systems containing a heteroatom, e.g. pyridine, as'heteroconjugated systems'. This usage is discouraged since it inappropriately suggests ananalogy to homoconjugation, and conflicts with the currently accepted definition of that term.[obsolete]

heterocumulenes
Cumulenes in which one or more carbon atoms of the cumulative bond system have been replaced byheteroatoms. E.g. O=C=C=C=O, but not CH2=C=O, ketene, nor O=C=O, carbon dioxide, whichare heteroallenes.

heterocyclic compounds
Cyclic compounds having as ring members atoms of at least two different elements, e.g. quinoline,1,2-thiazole, bicyclo[3.3.1]tetrasiloxane.See: homocyclic compounds, carbocyclic compounds

heterocyclyl groups
Univalent groups formed by removing a hydrogen atom from any ring atom of a heterocycliccompound. E.g.See: organyl

heterodetic cyclic peptide
A peptide consisting only of amino-acid residues, but in which the linkages forming the ring are notsolely eupeptide bonds; one or more is an isopeptide, disulfide, ester, or other bond.

heterodisperse
Describes a colloidal system in which all the particles are of different sizes.

heteroexcimer
Synonymous with exciplex.



heterogeneous nucleation
See: embryo, nucleation

heteroleptic
Transition metal or Main Group compounds having more than one type of ligand.See also: homoleptic

heterolysis (heterolytic)
The cleavage of a covalent bond so that both bonding electrons remain with one of the two fragmentsbetween which the bond is broken, e.g.Heterolytic bond fission is a feature of many bimolecular reactions in solution (e.g. electrophilicsubstitution, nucleophilic substitution).See also: homolysis, heterolytic bond-dissociation energy













heterotrophic (organisms)
Descriptive of organisms which are not able to synthesize cell components from carbon dioxide as solecarbon source. Heterotrophic organisms use preformed oxidizable organic substrates such as glucoseas carbon and energy sources.

hexagonal graphite
The thermodynamically stable form of graphite with an ABAB stacking sequence of the graphenelayers. The exact crystallographic description of this allotropic form is given by the space group(unit cell constants:,). Hexagonal graphite isthermodynamically stable below approximatelyand.Note:The use of the term graphite instead of the more exact term hexagonal graphite may be tolerated inview of the minor importance of rhombohedral graphite, the other allotropic form.







high-pressure graphitization
A term which refers to the solid-state transformation of non-graphitic carbon into graphite by heattreatment under elevated pressure (e.g.to) so that a definitely higher degree ofgraphitization is achieved at lower temperature and/or for a shorter heat treatment time than in heattreatment of the same non-graphitic material at atmospheric pressure.









hipping
Also contains definition of: hot isostatic pressingIsostatic pressing process carried out at elevated temperatures.Notes:1. The pressurizing fluid used in this process is usually a gas.2. The temperature is usually in excess of.

histones
A class of basic proteins associated with DNA in the chromosomes of eukaryotic cells forming thenucleosome as the basic subunit of chromatin. They contain an unusually large proportion of the basicamino acids arginine and lysine.

Hofmann rule
"The principal olefin formed in the decomposition of quaternary ammonium hydroxides that containdifferent primary alkyl groups is always ethylene, if an ethyl group is present." Originally given in thislimited form by A. W. Hofmann, the rule has since been extended and modified as follows: "Whentwo or more alkenes can be produced in a β-elimination reaction, the alkene having the smallestnumber of alkyl groups attached to the double bond carbon atoms will be the predominant product."This orientation described by the Hofmann rule is observed in elimination reactions of quaternaryammonium salts and tertiary sulfonium salts, and in certain other cases.See also: Zaitsev rule

hold-back carrier
A carrier used to prevent a particular species from following other species in a chemical or physicaloperation.







hole transfer
Charge migration process in which the majority carriers are positively charged.

holoenzyme
An active enzyme consisting of the apoenzyme and coenzyme.



homo
1.2.3.An acronym for Highest Occupied Molecular Orbital (HOMO).See: frontier orbitalsA prefix (consisting of lower case letters, homo), used to indicate a higher homologue of acompound.



homoaromatic
Whereas in an aromatic molecule there is continuous overlap of p-orbitals over a cyclic array of atoms,in a homoaromatic molecule there is a formal discontinuity in this overlap resulting from the presenceof a singlehybridized atom at one or several positions within the ring; p-orbital overlap apparentlybridges thesecentres, and features associated with aromaticity are manifest in the properties ofthe compound. Pronounced homoaromaticity is not normally associated with neutral molecules, butmainly with species bearing an electrical charge, e.g. the 'homotropylium' cation, (C8H9+):In bis, tris, (etc.) homoaromatic species, two, three, (etc.) singleπ-electron system.See also: homoconjugation (2)centres separately interrupt the

homochain polymer
A class of polymer in which the main chain is constructed from atoms of a single element. Homochainpolymers are named by placing the name or symbol of the element in the main chain immediatelybefore the expression '-chain polymer', e.g. carbon-chain polymer or C-chain polymer; sulfur-chainpolymer or S-chain polymer.

homochiral
See: enantiomerically pure (enantiopure)

homoconjugation
1.2.Association between a base and its conjugate acid through a hydrogen bond (B ... HB+ orAH ... A−). Homoassociation is a more appropriate term for this phenomenon.The orbital overlap of two π-systems separated by a non-conjugating group, such as CH2.See also: conjugate acid–base pair, conjugated system, homoaromatic[obsolete]

homocyclic compounds
Cyclic compounds having as ring members atoms of the same element only, e.g. benzene, pentazole,cyclohexasilane.

homodesmotic reaction
A subclass of isodesmic reactions in which reactants and products contain equal numbers of carbonatoms in corresponding states of hybridization; moreover, there is matching of the carbon-hydrogenbonds in terms of the number of hydrogen atoms joined to the individual carbon atoms. To achieveall this matching, one should significantly extend the number and types of reference molecules. In thealiphatic series of hydrocarbons these are propane, isobutane and neopentanes as well as propene andisobutene; for aromatics—buta-1,3-diene, 2-vinylbutadiene (3-methylidenehexa-1,5-diene) and 2,3divinylbutadiene (3,4-bismethylidenehexa-1,5-diene). Thus to assess strain energy of cyclopropaneand aromatic stabilization of benzene the following homodesmotic reactions are to be respectivelyanalysed.c-(CH2)3 + 3 CH3–CH3 3 CH3CH2CH3C6H6 + 3 CH2=CH2()3 CH2=CH–CH=CH2(trans)()Due to closer matching of the hybridization states of the atoms of reactants and products as comparedto isodesmic reactions, the homodesmotic reactions give more accurate estimates of the intrinsic strainand the cyclic delocalization. The definition may be extended to molecules with heteroatoms.

homodetic cyclic peptide
A cyclic peptide in which the ring consists solely of amino-acid residues in eupeptide linkage.





homogeneous polymer blend
Also contains definition of: miscible polymer blendPolymer blend that is a single-phase structure.Notes:1. Modified from previous definition. The definition proposed here is preferred because itemphasizes the requirement for homogeneity over miscibility.2. For a polymer blend to be miscible it must obey the thermodynamic criteria of miscibility.3. Miscibility is sometimes assigned erroneously on the basis that a blend exhibits a singleoris optically clear.4. The miscible system can be thermodynamically stable or metastable.5. For components of chain structures that would be expected to be miscible, miscibility may notoccur if molecular architecture is changed, e.g., by crosslinking.

homoleptic
Transition metal or Main Group compounds having only one type of ligand are said to be homoleptic,e.g. TaMe5.See also: heteroleptic

homologous polymer blend
Mixture of two or more fractions of the same polymer, each of which has a different molar-massdistribution.

homolysis (homolytic)
The cleavage of a bond ('homolytic cleavage' or 'homolytic fission') so that each of the molecularfragments between which the bond is broken retains one of the bonding electrons. A unimolecularreaction involving homolysis of a bond (not forming part of a cyclic structure) in a molecular entitycontaining an even number of (paired) electrons results in the formation of two radicals:It is the reverse of colligation. Homolysis is also commonly a feature of bimolecular substitutionreactions (and of other reactions) involving radicals and molecules.See also: bond-dissociation energy, heterolysis





homopolymer
A polymer derived from one species of (real, implicit or hypothetical) monomer.Notes:1. Many polymers are made by the mutual reaction of complementary monomers. These monomerscan readily be visualized as reacting to give an 'implicit monomer', the homopolymerizationof which would give the actual product, which can be regarded as a homopolymer. Commonexamples are poly(ethylene terephthalate) and poly(hexamethylene adipamide).2. Some polymers are obtained by the chemical modification of other polymers such that thestructure of the macromolecules that constitute the resulting polymer can be thought of as havingbeen formed by the homopolymerization of a hypothetical monomer. These polymers can beregarded as homopolymers. Example: poly(vinyl alcohol).

homopolymerization
Polymerization in which a homopolymer is formed.







host
1.2.A molecular entity that forms complexes with organic or inorganic guests, or a chemicalspecies that can accommodate guests within cavities of its crystal structure. Examples includecryptands and crowns (where there are ion-dipole attractions between heteroatoms and positiveions), hydrogen-bonded molecules that form 'clathrates' (e.g. hydroquinone and water), and hostmolecules of inclusion compounds (e.g. urea or thiourea). van der Waals forces and hydrophobicinteractions bind the guest to the host molecule in clathrates and inclusion compounds.



host-vector system
A compatible combination of host (e.g. bacteria) and vector (e.g. plasmid ) that allows propagationof DNA.

hot atom
An atom in an excited energy state or having kinetic energy above the ambient thermal level, usuallyas a result of nuclear processes.

hot cell
A heavily shielded enclosure for highly radioactive materials. It may be used for their handling orprocessing by remote means or for their storage.

hot ground state reaction
A hot state reaction of the ground electronic state.

hot quartz lamp [obsolete]
A term sometimes used to describe a high-pressure mercury lamp. The use of this term is notrecommended.

hot state reaction
A reaction proceeding from an ensemble of molecular entities possessing a higher average vibrational,rotational or translational energy than they would at thermal equilibrium with the surroundingmedium.

hour
Non-SI unit of time,.

Hückel (4n + 2) rule
Monocyclic planar (or almost planar) systems of trigonally (or sometimes digonally) hybridized atomsthat contain (4n + 2) π-electrons (where n is a non-negative integer) will exhibit aromatic character.The rule is generally limited to n = 0–5. This rule is derived from the Hückel MO calculation onplanar monocyclic conjugated hydrocarbons (CH)m where m is an integer equal to or greater than 3according to which (4n + 2) π-electrons are contained in a closed-shell system. Examples of systemsthat obey the Hückel rule include:Systems containing 4n π-electrons (such as cyclobutadiene and the cyclopentadienyl cation) are'antiaromatic'.See also: conjugation, Möbius aromaticity





Huggins equation
The equation describing the dependence of the reduced viscosity, , on the mass concentration of apolymer, , for dilute polymer solutions of the form:whereis the Huggins coefficient andis the intrinsic viscosity.

hula-twist (HT) mechanism
Volume-conserving mechanism of photoisomerization of a double bond in a conjugated systeminvolving simultaneous configurational and conformational isomerization, e.g., the photoinitiatedconcerted rotation of two adjacent double and single bonds.Note:Under unconstrained conditions, the conventional one-bond-flip (OBF) process is the dominantprocess with the hula-twist (HT) being an undetectable higher energy process. It has been proposedthat under confined conditions (e.g., a conjugated double bond chromophore in a protein cavity or ina solid matrix), the additional viscosity-dependent barriers makes the OBF a less favourable process,allowing the volume-conserving HT to be the dominant process for photoisomerization.





Hush model
See: Marcus–Hush relationship



hybrid material
Material composed of an intimate mixture of inorganic components, organic components, or bothtypes of component.Note:The components usually interpenetrate on scales of less than.

hybrid orbital
An atomic orbital derived through hybridization of atomic orbitals with different angular momentumquantum numbers located at a given atom.

hybrid polymer
Polymer or polymer network comprised of inorganic and organic components.Note:Examples include inorganic–organic polymers and organic–inorganic polymers.

hybridization
1.Linear combination of atomic orbitals on an atom. Hybrid orbitals are often used in organicchemistry to describe the bonding molecules containing tetrahedral (digonal ( ) atoms.2.3.), trigonal () and



hybridoma
A hybrid cell line resulting from the fusion of a specific antibody -producing spleen cell (lymphocyte)with a myeloma cell, which has the growth characteristics of the myeloma component and theantibody-secreting characteristics of the lymphocyte, and will multiply to become a source of puremonoclonal antibody.

hydration
Addition of water or of the elements of water (i.e. H and OH) to a molecular entity. For example,hydration of ethene:The term is also used in a more restricted sense for the process:cf. the use of the term in inorganic/physical chemistry to describe the state of the ions of an electrolytein aqueous solution.See also: aquation, solvation

hydrazides
Compounds derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠0) by replacing –OH by –NRNR2 (R groupsare commonly H), as in carbohydrazides, RC(=O)NHNH2, sulfonohydrazides, RS(=O)2NHNH2, andphosphonic dihydrazides, RP(=O)(NHNH2)2.



hydrazines
Hydrazine (diazane), H2NNH2, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives. When one or more substituents areacyl groups, the compound is a hydrazide. N-Alkylidene derivatives are hydrazones.See: azines, hydrazo compounds

hydrazinylidenes
Synonymous with isodiazenes.

hydrazo compounds
Compounds containing the divalent hydrazo group, –NHNH–, such as hydrazoarenes (1,2diarylhydrazines or 1,2-diaryldiazanes, usually with both aryl groups the same) and their N-substitutedderivatives ArNRNRAr.See also: hydrazines

hydrazones
Compounds having the structure R2C=NNR2, formally derived from aldehydes or ketones byreplacing =O by =NNH2 (or substituted analogues).

hydrazonic acids
Compounds derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by replacing a double-bonded oxygenatom by =NNR2, as in carbohydrazonic acids, RC(OH)=NNH2 and sulfonohydrazonic acids, RS(=O)(=NNH2)OH.

hydrocarbons
Compounds consisting of carbon and hydrogen only.

hydrocarbyl groups
Univalent groups formed by removing a hydrogen atom from a hydrocarbon, e.g. ethyl, phenyl.See: heterocyclyl, organoheteryl, organyl groups

hydrocarbylene groups
Divalent groups formed by removing two hydrogen atoms from a hydrocarbon, the free valenciesof which are not engaged in a double bond, e.g. 1,3-phenylene, –CH2CH2CH2– propane-1,3-diyl, –CH2– methylene.

hydrocarbylidene groups
Divalent groups, R2C=, formed by removing two hydrogen atoms from the same carbon atom of ahydrocarbon, the free valencies of which are engaged in a double bond.

hydrocarbylidyne groups
Trivalent groups, RC≡, formed by removing three hydrogen atoms from the same carbon atom of ahydrocarbon, the free valencies of which are engaged in a triple bond.

hydrocarbylsulfanyl nitrenes
Synonym: sulfenyl nitrenesNitrenessubstitutedwithhydrocarbylsulfanylgroups,. Sulfenyl nitrenes is a oldersynonymous term. E.g. MeSN methylsulfanylnitrene or methylthionitrene. The synonymous termthiazynes (from the third canonical form; confusable with the hetarynes derivable from 1,2- and 1,4thiazine) is best avoided.

hydrocracking unit
Used in the thermal decomposition of heavy (high molecular weight) hydrocarbons to smaller (lowmolecular weight) hydrocarbons; high pressures of hydrogen and a special catalyst are employed.Sulfur compounds in the fuel are reduced to H2S, and the final hydrocarbon product can be obtainedrelatively sulfur-free.





hydrogel
Gel in which the swelling agent is water.Notes:1. The network component of a hydrogel is usually a polymer network.2. A hydrogel in which the network component is a colloidal network may be referred to as anaquagel.

hydrogen
The general name for the atom H, without regard for its nuclear mass, either for hydrogen in its naturalabundance or where it is not desired to distinguish between the isotopes. The systematic name foratomic hydrogen is monohydrogen.See also: hydron

hydrogen bond
A form of association between an electronegative atom and a hydrogen atom attached to a second,relatively electronegative atom. It is best considered as an electrostatic interaction, heightened bythe small size of hydrogen, which permits proximity of the interacting dipoles or charges. Bothelectronegative atoms are usually (but not necessarily) from the first row of the Periodic Table, i.e.N, O or F. Hydrogen bonds may be inter-molecular or intramolecular. With a few exceptions, usuallyinvolving fluorine, the associated energies are less than-(-).

hydrogen bond
in theoretical organic chemistryA particular type of multicenter (three center - four electron) X–H ...Y in which the central hydrogenatom covalently linked to an electronegative atom X (C, N, O, S..) forms an additional weaker bondwith atom Y (N, O, S..) in the direction of its lone electron pair orbital. The energy of hydrogenbonds, which is usually in the range of –( –), results from the electrostaticinteraction and also from the orbital interaction of the antibonding σ*(XH)MO of the molecule actingas the hydrogen donor and the non-bonding lone electron pair MOnY of the hydrogen acceptormolecule.

hydrogen gas electrode
A thin foil of platinum electrolytically coated with a finely divided deposit of platinum or palladiummetal, which catalyses the electrode reaction:in solutions saturated with hydrogen gas.

hydrolases
Enzymes that catalyse the cleavage of C–O, C–N, C–C and other bonds by reactions involving theaddition or removal of water.

hydrolysis
Solvolysis by water.





hydron
Also contains definitions of: hydride, hydroThe general name for the cation H+; the species H− is the hydride anion and H is the hydro group.These are general names to be used without regard to the nuclear mass of the hydrogen entity, eitherfor hydrogen in its natural abundance or where it is not desired to distinguish between the isotopes.

hydroperoxides
Monosubstitution products of hydrogen peroxide (dioxidane), HOOH, having the skeleton ROOH, inwhich R is any organyl group. Compounds in which R is acyl are known as peroxy acids.

hydrophilic
'Water loving'. The capacity of a molecular entity or of a substituent to interact with polar solvents,in particular with water, or with other polar groups.

hydrophilicity
Hydrophilicity is the tendency of a molecule to be solvated by water.

hydrophobic interaction
The tendency of hydrocarbons (or of lipophilic hydrocarbon-like groups in solutes) to formintermolecular aggregates in an aqueous medium, and analogous intramolecular interactions. Thename arises from the attribution of the phenomenon to the apparent repulsion between water andhydrocarbons. However, the phenomenon ought to be attributed to the effect of the hydrocarbonlike groups on the water-water interaction. The misleading alternative term 'hydrophobic bond' isdiscouraged.

hydrophobicity
Hydrophobicity is the association of non-polar groups or molecules in an aqueous environment whicharises from the tendency of water to exclude non-polar molecules.

hydropolysulfides
Compounds having the structures RS2H, RS3H ... RSnH, in which Sn is a chain of sulfur atoms, andR is hydrocarbyl. Some people exclude hydrodisulfides from the class hydropolysulfides.



hydrosulfides
Term used in radicofunctional nomenclature of thiols. Hydrosulfides is not commonly used as a classname for thiols.

hydroxamic acids
Compounds, RC(=O)NHOH, derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by replacing –OH by –NHOH, and hydrocarbyl derivatives thereof. Specific examples are preferably named as N-hydroxyamides.

hydroximic acids
Compounds derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by replacing =O by =NOH (=NOR), asin carbohydroximic acids, RC(OH)=NOH, and sulfonohydroximic acids, RS(=O)(=NOH)OH.

hydroxylamines
Hydroxylamine, H2N–OH, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.See also: hydroxamic acids, oximes

hygrometer
Instrument used to measure the water vapour content of the atmosphere.See: capacitance hygrometer, dew point hygrometer, electrical hygrometer, electrolytic hygrometer,frost point hygrometer, mechanical hygrometer, psychrometric hygrometer





hyperconjugation
Also contains definitions of: heterovalent hyperconjugation, isovalent hyperconjugation,sacrificial hyperconjugationIn the formalism that separates bonds into σ and π types, hyperconjugation is the interaction of σ-bonds(e.g. C–H, C–C, etc.) with a π network. This interaction is customarily illustrated by contributingstructures, e.g. for toluene (below), sometimes said to be an example of 'heterovalent' or 'sacrificialhyperconjugation', so named because the contributing structure contains one two-electron bond lessthan the normal Lewis formula for toluene:At present, there is no evidence for sacrificial hyperconjugation in neutral hydrocarbons. The conceptof hyperconjugation is also applied to carbenium ions and radicals, where the interaction is nowbetween σ-bonds and an unfilled or partially filled π- or p-orbital. A contributing structure illustratingthis for the tert-butyl cation is:This latter example is sometimes called an example of 'isovalent hyper-conjugation' (the contributingstructure containing the same number of two-electron bonds as the normal Lewis formula). Bothstructures shown on the right hand side are also examples of 'double bond-no-bond resonance'. Theinteraction between filled π- or p- orbitals and adjacent antibonding σ* orbitals is referred to as'negative hyperconjugation', as for example in the fluoroethyl anion:See also: sigma, pi, n-σ*, delocalization

hypercoordination
A property of main-group atoms in molecular entities to acquire coordination numbers greater thanfour (which would comply with the Lewis octet rule). Hypercoordination may be associated withhypervalency, but usually is referred to peculiar atomic centres in the electron-deficient species withmulticentre σ-bonding, in which the bonding power of a pair of electrons is spread over more than twoatoms. An example of a hypercoordinated atom is the five-coordinate carbon atom in the methaniumcation, where three C–H bonds may be regarded as normal two center - two electron bonds and thebonding in the remaining CH2 fragment is governed by the three-centre, two-electron bond.A particular case of a hypercoordinated atom is the hydrogen atom included into a hydrogen bond.

hyperfine coupling
The interaction between the spin magnetic moment of an unpaired electron and the nuclear spinmagnetic moments resulting in the splitting of the α (spin up) and β (spin down) energy levels in anexternal magnetic field and, thus, in the multiplet pattern of the ESR spectra of radical-like species andtransition metal compounds. Two main contributions to the hyperfine coupling are usually considered,Fermi contact and dipolar interactions. The contact interaction is isotropic and related to the unpairedspin density at the nucleus,. The dipolar interaction is anisotropic, and related to, whereis the distance between the atom holding the unpaired electron and the nucleus with non-zero spin.

hyperfine (interaction)
Interaction between the electron spin S and the nuclear spin I.







hypo-phase
The denser phase in an extraction system. This term is often used when two non-aqueous phases arepresent or when the solvent is an aqueous phase.See also: epi-phase

hypochromic effect
The opposite of hyperchromic effect (i.e. a decrease in intensity).

hypsochromic shift
Shift of a spectral band to higher frequency or shorter wavelength upon substitution or change inmedium. It is informally referred to as blue shift.See also: bathochromic shift

hysteresis
Also contains definition of: electrode memory1.2.Regarding a material quantity or instrument's reading; the dependence of a value on the directionof change from a previous characteristic value. It may be quantified by the difference betweenthe upscale and downscale variation starting from fixed lower and upper measurement points(inversion).





IC
Frequently used acronym for internal conversion.



icosanoids
Synonym: eicosanoidsUnsaturated C20 fatty acids and skeletally related compounds. The spelling icosanoids is preferredover the spelling eicosanoids for consistency with icosanoic acid. Specialists working in this fieldcommonly use eicosanoids, however.See: prostanoids, leukotrienes

ICT
Acronym for intramolecular charge transfer.See also: planar intramolecular charge transfer, , twisted intramolecular charge transfer.

ICT emission
Electronic emission from an ICT state.See also: intramolecular charge transfer.





ideal chromatography
Chromatographic process, where no peak-broadening effects (such as diffusion, slow mass transfer,etc.) operate.Note:This is a hypothetical case, implying that the plate number is infinite.

ideal dilute solution
Dilute solution in which the solute may be regarded as obeying Henry's law, so that all the soluteactivity coefficients may be approximated to 1.

ideal gas
Gas which obeys the equation of state(the ideal gas law; is the pressure,thevolume, the amount of molecules, the gas constant and the thermodynamic temperature). For anideal gas the fugacity, , of each constituent B is equal to its partial pressure, ,,whereis the amount fraction of B.

ideal mixture
A mixture of substances B, C, ... is called an ideal mixture whenwhereand,, ... or,are the relative activity and the activity coefficient, respectively, of asubstance B in a liquid or solid mixture.





identity reaction
Synonym: degenerate chemical reactionA chemical reaction whose products are chemically identical with the reactants, for example thebimolecular self exchange reaction of CH3I with I−.See also: degenerate rearrangement



image converter tube
An electron tube that produces on its fluorescent screen an image of the irradiation pattern of itsphotosensitive input surface. An image converter which produces an image with enhanced radianceis sometimes called an image intensifier.

image dissection tube
A two-dimensional radiation detector in which the electron image produced by a photo-emittingsurface, usually a photocathode, is focused in the plane of a defining aperture. Magnetic or electricfields scan this image across the defining aperture.

imaging (photoimaging)
The use of a photosensitive system for the capture, recording and retrieval of information associatedwith an object using electromagnetic energy.

imbalance
The situation in which reaction parameters that characterize different bond forming or bond breakingprocesses in the same reaction have developed to different extents as the transition state is approachedalong some arbitrarily defined reaction coordinate. For example, in the nitroalkane anomaly, theBrønsted exponent for proton removal is smaller than the Brønsted for the nitroalkane, becauseof imbalance between the amount of bond breaking and resonance delocalization in the transitionstate. Imbalance is common in reactions such as elimination, addition and other complex reactionsthat involve proton (hydron) transfer.See also: synchronous, synchronization (principle of nonperfect synchronization)





imides
1.Diacyl derivatives of ammonia or primary amines, especially those cyclic compounds derivedfrom diacids, e.g.2.In additive nomenclature, in which imide is analogous to oxide, the term is used to namecompounds of the type R3Y+–N−R (Y = N, P) and R2Z+–N−R (Z = O, S, Se, Te), which arethe products of formal attachment of an RN= group to N, P, O, S, Se, Te. E.g. amine imides,azomethine imides.Salts having the anion RN2−.3.

imidic acids
Compounds derived from oxoacids RkE(=O)l(OH)m (l ≠ 0) by replacing =O by =NR; thus tautomersof amides. In organic chemistry an unspecified imidic acid is generally a carboximidic acid, RC(=NR)(OH) . E.g. RS(=NH)2(OH) a sulfonodiimidic acid.See: imino acids

imidines
Analogues of cyclic acid anhydrides in which =O has been replaced by =NR and –O– by –NR–.See: diamidides

imidogens [obsolete]
A non-IUPAC term for nitrenes used in the Chemical Abstracts Service index nomenclature.

imidonium ions [obsolete]
A term, which is not recommended, for nitrenium ions.

imidoyl carbenes
Carbenes having the structure RC(=NR)C:–R. Imidoyl is a shortened but imprecise term forcarboximidoyl, RC(=NH)– .

imidoyl nitrenes
Nitrenes having the structure.See: imidoyl carbenes

imin [obsolete]
See: nitrenes

imine radical [obsolete]
See: nitrenes

imines
1.2.Compounds having the structure RN=CR2 (R = H, hydrocarbyl). Thus analogues of aldehydes orketones, having NR doubly bonded to carbon; aldimines have the structure RCH=NR, ketimineshave the structure R'2C=NR (R' ≠ H). Imines include azomethines and Schiff bases. Imine is usedas a suffix in systematic nomenclature to denote the C=NH group excluding the carbon atom.[obsolete] An obsolete term for azacycloalkanes.

iminium compounds
Salts in which the cation has the structure R2C=N+R2. Thus N-hydronated imines and their Nsubstituted derivatives. The synonymous terms imonium compounds and immonium compounds areirregularly formed and should not be used.See: quaternary ammonium compounds

imino acids
1.2.3.An obsolete term, which should not be used, for imidic acids.Any carboxylic acid having an imino substituent, HN=, replacing two hydrogens. A shortenedform of imino carboxylic acid.Obsolescent term for azaalkanoic acids and azacycloalkane-2-carboxylic acids, e.g. proline:

imino carbenes
This term systematically means carbenes bearing an imino or N-substituted imino group, RN=,somewhere in the molecule. E.g. R–C:–CH2C(=NR)R. It is listed here in order to warn against itsmisuse for alkylideneamino carbenes.See: carbenes, nitrile ylides





iminyl carbenes
See: nitrile ylides

iminyl radicals
Radicals having the structure R2C=N.. A contraction of alkaniminyl radicals, e.g. CH3–CH=N.ethaniminyl. A synonymous term is alkylideneaminyl radicals.See: aminyl radicals

iminylium ions
Cations having the structure R2C=N+. A contraction of alkaniminylium ions. Alkylideneaminyliumions is a synonymous term. A subclass of nitrenium ions.

immersional wetting
A process in which a solid or liquid, β, is covered with a liquid, α, both of which were initially incontact with a gas or liquid, δ, without changing the area of the αδ-interface.

immiscibility
Inability of a mixture to form a single phase.Notes:1. Immiscibility may be limited to certain ranges of temperature, pressure, and composition.2. Immiscibility depends on the chemical structures, molar-mass distributions, and moleculararchitectures of the components.

immiscible polymer blend
Also contains definition of: heterogeneous polymer blendPolymer blend that exhibits immiscibility.









immobile adsorption
A situation in which the freedom of molecules of adsorbate to move about the surface is limited.Adsorption is immobile whenis small compared to, the energy barrier separating adjacentsites. The adsorbate has little chance of migrating to neighbouring sites and such adsorption isnecessarily localized.







immune response
Selective reaction of the body to substances that are foreign to it, or that the immune system identifiesas foreign, shown by the production of antibodies and antibody-bearing cells or by a cell-mediatedhypersensitivity reaction.See also: antibody

immunization
The administration of an antigen to an animal in order to stimulate the production of antibodies by thatorganism. Also, the administration of antigens, antibodies or lymphocytes to an animal to generatethe corresponding active, passive or adaptive immunity.

immunoassay
A ligand-binding assay that uses a specific antigen or antibody, capable of binding to the analyte, toidentify and quantify substances. The antibody can be linked to a radiosotope (radioimmunoassay,RIA), or to an enzyme which catalyses an easily monitored reaction (enzyme-linked immunosorbentassay, ELISA), or to a highly fluorescent compound by which the location of an antigen can bevisualized (immunofluorescene).

immunochemistry
Study of biochemical and molecular aspects of immunology, especially the nature of antibodies,antigens and their interactions.

immunogen
A substance that elicits a cellular immune response and/or antibody production (cf. antigen ).

immunoglobulin (Ig)
A protein of the globulin-type found in serum or other body fluids that possesses antibody activity.An individual Ig molecule is built up from two light (L) and two heavy (H) polypeptide chainslinked together by disulfide bonds. Igs are divided into five classes based on antigenic and structuraldifferences in the H chains.

immunoradiometric assay
An assay based on the reversible and non-covalent binding of an antigen by a specific antibodylabelled with a radioactive nuclide as a tracer.

immunosuppression
Reduction in the functional capacity of the immune response; may be due to:1. Inhibition of the normal response of the immune system to an antigen.2. Prevention, by chemical or biological means, of the production of an antibody to an antigen byinhibition of the processes of transcription, translation or formation of tertiary structure.



impact-modified polymer
Polymeric material whose impact resistance and toughness have been increased by the incorporationof phase microdomains of a rubbery material.Note:An example is the incorporation of soft polybutadiene domains into glassy polystyrene to producehigh-impact polystyrene.

impaction
A forcible contact of particles of matter with a surface.



impingement
Equivalent to impaction; often refers to impaction on a liquid surface.

impinger
A sampling instrument employing impingement for the collection of particulate matter. Commontypes are:1. the midget impinger employing impingement inwater,2. the standard impinger employing impingement inwater and3. dry impingers.Impingers are also suitable for sampling certain gases and vapours.











in situ microanalysis
Term used for direct analytical investigation of the microstructural domains of a solid by focusedbeams of particles and radiation. Analytical characterization includes obtaining information abouttype, quantity and distribution of the elements, their state of chemical bonding, morphology andcrystalline (geometric) and electronic structure of the individual phases. The combination of thisinformation serves as a basis for the property-relevant characterization of solids.

in vitro
In glass, referring to a study in the laboratory usually involving isolated organ, tissue, cell, orbiochemical systems.See also: in vivo

in vivo
In the living body, referring to a study performed on a living organism.See also: in vitro



in-out isomerism
Isomerism found in bicyclic systems having long enough bridges to allow the bridgehead exocyclicbond or lone pair of electrons to point either inside the structure or outside.

in-situ composite formation
Process for preparing a polymer composite by1. forming the filler or reinforcement in an existing polymer or2. polymerizing monomers in the presence of dispersed filler.



inch
Non-SI unit of length,.







incoherent radiation
Not having the properties of coherent radiation.



indicated hydrogen
Also contains definition of: added hydrogenUnder certain circumstances it is necessary to indicate in the name of a ring, or ring system, containingthe maximum number of non-cumulative double bonds, one or more positions where no multiple bondis attached. This is done by specifying the presence of an 'extra' hydrogen atom at such positions bycitation of the appropriate numbered locant followed by an italicized capital H. Example:A second type of indicated hydrogen (sometimes referred to as 'added hydrogen') describes hydrogenatoms added to a specific structure as a consequence of the addition of a suffix or a prefix describinga structural modification. This type of indicated hydrogen is normally cited in parentheses after thelocant of the additional feature. Example:

indicator electrode
An electrode that serves as a transducer responding to the excitation signal (if any) and to thecomposition of the solution being investigated, but that does not affect an appreciable change of bulkcomposition within the ordinary duration of a measurement.

indicator (visual)
See: acid-base indicator, adsorption indicator, mixed indicator, colour indicator

indifferent absorbing ion
An ion which absorbs through Coulomb forces only and which is hence only repelled by surfaces oflike sign, attracted by surfaces of opposite sign, and is not absorbed on an uncharged surface.See also: specifically absorbing ion

indifferent electrolyte
Synonymous with supporting electrolyte.

indirect amplification
A type of amplification reaction where the constituent required is associated with some otherconstituent which is then amplified and measured.

indirect reaction
A chemical process in which the reactive complex has a lifetime that is longer than its periodof rotation is called an indirect reaction (in contrast to a direct reaction ). In a molecular-beamexperiment the products of such reactions are scattered at random with reference to the centre ofmass of the system. Indirect reactions are also called complex-mode reactions (They are sometimescalled complex reactions, but this usage is not recommended in view of the danger of confusion withcomposite reactions, which occur in more than one step).





induced radioactivity
Radioactivity induced by irradiation.

induced reaction
Also contains definition of: inductorA reaction which occurs or is accelerated only if another reaction is simultaneously occurring in thesame system. The substance, which causes an induced reaction, is termed inductor. The inductor,unlike the catalyst, is used up irreversibly during the process.







inductive effect
In strict definition, an experimentally observable effect (on rates of reaction, etc.) of the transmissionof charge through a chain of atoms by electrostatic induction. A theoretical distinction may be madebetween the field effect, and the inductive effect as models for the Coulomb interaction betweena given site within a molecular entity and a remote unipole or dipole within the same entity. Theexperimental distinction between the two effects has proved difficult, except for molecules of peculiargeometry, which may exhibit 'reversed field effects'. Ordinarily the inductive effect and the fieldeffect are influenced in the same direction by structural changes in the molecule and the distinctionbetween them is not clear. This situation has led many authors to include the field effect in the term'inductive effect'. Thus the separation of values into inductive and resonance components does notimply the exclusive operation of a through-bonds route for the transmission of the non-conjugativepart of the substituent effect. To indicate the all-inclusive use of the term inductive, the phrase 'socalled inductive effect' is sometimes used. Certain modern theoretical approaches suggest that the 'socalled inductive effect' reflects a field effect rather than through-bonds transmission.See also: mesomeric effect, polar effect

inductomeric effect
A molecular polarizability effect occurring by the inductive mechanism of electron displacement. Theconsideration of such an effect and the descriptive term have been regarded as obsolescent or evenobsolete, but in recent years theoretical approaches have reintroduced substituent polarizability as afactor governing reactivity, etc. and its parametrization has been proposed.

inelastic scattering
If in a molecular collision there is transfer of energy among degrees of freedom, but no chemicalreaction occurs, there is said to be inelastic scattering.

inert
Stable and unreactive under specified conditions.

inert gas
A non-reactive gas under particular conditions. For example, nitrogen at ordinary temperatures andthe noble gases (helium, argon, krypton, xenon and radon) are unreactive toward most species.

inertial defect
Difference of principal moments of inertia. For planar molecules it is close to zeroand for non-planar molecules it is negative.

inertial separator
Any dry type collector which utilizes the relatively greater inertia of particles to effect their removalfrom a gas stream; e.g. cyclonic and impingement separators, gravity settling chambers and highvelocity gas reversal chambers.

infinite source thickness
For a specified radiation, the minimum thickness of a flat preparation of a radioactive material wherethe intensity of the specified radiation at the surface does not increase when the thickness is increasedby adding more of similar radioactive material.

information theory
As applied in reaction dynamics, information theory analyses the deviations of experimentallydetermined energy distributions from predictions made on the basis of equal a priori probabilities forall possible outcomes.

infrared
Region of the electromagnetic spectrum extending fromto about.According to the CIE, the range betweenandis subdivided into:IR-A–IR-B–IR-C–Note:This is the wavelength region in which absorption by a molecular entity causes excitation of itsvibrational, rotational, and bending modes.





inhibitor
Also contains definition of: enzyme inhibitorA substance that diminishes the rate of a chemical reaction; the process is called inhibition. Inhibitorsare sometimes called negative catalysts, but since the action of an inhibitor is fundamentally differentfrom that of a catalyst, this terminology is discouraged. In contrast to a catalyst, an inhibitor may beconsumed during the course of a reaction. In enzyme-catalysed reactions an inhibitor frequently actsby binding to the enzyme, in which case it may be called an enzyme inhibitor.See also: effector

inhibitory concentration ( )
Concentration of a substance that causes a defined inhibition of a given system:is the medianconcentration that causes 50% inhibition.See also: lethal concentration









initiation
A reaction or process generating free radicals (or some other reactive reaction intermediates) whichthen induce a chain reaction. For example, in the chlorination of alkanes by a radical mechanism theinitiation step is the dissociation of molecular chlorine.

initiator
A substance introduced into a reaction system in order to bring about an initiation reaction.





inner filter effect
1.2.In an emission experiment, an apparent decrease in emission quantum yield and/or distortion ofbandshape as a result of reabsorption of emitted radiation.During a light irradiation experiment, absorption of incident radiation by a species other thanthe intended primary absorber.

inner Helmholtz plane (IHP)
The locus of the electrical centres of specifically adsorbed ions.See also: outer Helmholtz plane









inorganic polymer
Polymer or polymer network with a skeletal structure that does not include carbon atoms.Note:Examples include polyphosphazenes, polysilicates, polysiloxanes, polysilanes, polysilazanes,polygermanes, polysulfides, etc.

inorganic–organic polymer
Acronym: IOPPolymer or polymer network with a skeletal structure comprising inorganic and organic units.Note:Examples include poly(carbasilane)s, poly(phenylenesilanediyl)s, poly(phenylenesulfide)s, etc.

inositols
Cyclohexane-1,2,3,4,5,6-hexols.





insertion
1.A chemical reaction or transformation of the general type:in which the connecting atom or group Y replaces the bond joining the parts X and Z of thereactant XZ. An example is the carbene insertion reaction:The reverse of an insertion is called an extrusion.See also: α-addition2.







instantaneous current
At a dropping electrode, the total current that flows at the instant when a time has elapsed since thefall of the preceding drop. At any other electrode, the total current that flows at the instant when atime has elapsed since the beginning of an electrolysis. The instantaneous current is usually timedependent and may have the character of an adsorption, catalytic, diffusion, double-layer, or kineticcurrent, and may include a migration current. A plot of the dependence of instantaneous current ontime is commonly called an 'i-t curve'.



















intensity
1.The traditional term for photon flux, fluence rate, irradiance or radiant power (radiant flux).In terms of an object exposed to radiation, the term should now be used only for qualitativedescriptions.





intensive quantity
Physical quantity whose magnitude is independent of the extent of the system.

interaction distance
The farthest distance of approach of two particles at which it is discernible that they will not pass atthe impact parameter.

intercalation compounds
Compounds resulting from reversible inclusion, without covalent bonding, of one kind of moleculein a solid matrix of another compound, which has a laminar structure. The host compound, a solid,may be macromolecular, crystalline or amorphous.See also: inclusion compounds





interchange reaction
Reaction that results in an exchange of atoms or groups between a polymer and low-molar-massmolecules, between polymer molecules, or between sites within the same macromolecule.Note:An interchange reaction that occurs with polyesters is called transesterification.



interconal region
The region of a Bunsen flame where the combustion zone has the form of a cone.

interconvertible enzyme
An enzyme existing in at least two well defined, reversibly convertible forms, produced by covalentmodifications of amino acid side chains under biological conditions. Covalent modifications thatoccur as intermediates in the catalytic process are not included in this definition.

interface
The plane ideally marking the boundary between two phases.Note:The term should not be used synonymously with interphase.

interfacial adhesion
Adhesion in which interfaces between phases or components are maintained by intermolecular forces,chain entanglements, or both, across the interfaces.Notes:1. Interfacial adhesion is also referred to as tack.2. Adhesive strength (recommended symbol: , unit:) is the force required to separate one3.4.condensed phase domain from another at the interface between the two phase domains dividedby the area of the interface.Interfacial tension (recommended symbol: , unit:,) is the change in Gibbs energyper unit change in interfacial area for substances in physical contact.Use of the term interfacial energy for interfacial tension is not recommended.



interfacial double-layer
Also contains definitions of: electrical double-layer, surface charge layer, transition layerThe Coulombic interaction of interfacial charges (e.g. ions) and the magnetic or electrostaticinteraction of interfacial molecules lead to particularly complex interfacial structures. Complexinterfacial profiles that can be approximated by two distinct sub-layers with different physicalproperties (e.g. structure and/or nature and/or composition), are referred to as interfacial doublelayers. Examples of such approximated complex profiles are: the electrical double-layer consisting ofa surface charge layer (i.e. a two dimensional distribution of one type of ions) and a diffuse chargelayer (counter-ions distributed over the space region next to the surface); the approximated profile ofthe orientation angle of anisotropic liquid molecules within a 'double-layer' consisting of a distributionof so-called anchored molecules which are perturbed (strongly bound and orientated) by the surface,and the adjacent, so-called, transition layer, i.e. the region where the surface perturbation is damped.

interfacial layer
The inhomogeneous space region intermediate between two bulk phases in contact, and whereproperties are significantly different from, but related to, the properties of the bulk phases. Examplesof such properties are: compositions, molecular density, orientation or conformation, charge density,pressure tensor, electron density, etc. The interfacial properties vary in the direction normal to thesurface. Complex profiles of interfacial properties occur in the case of multicomponent systemswith coexisting bulk phases where attractive/repulsive molecular interactions involve adsorption ordepletion of one or several components. This interfacial region may also be regarded as a distinct,though not autonomous, phase and be called the interphase.



interfacial region
See: interfacial layer

interfacial tension
See: surface tension



interfering lines
Radiation from nearby spectral lines may perturb the measurement of the intensity of the line wanted.These lines are termed interfering lines.



interferometer
See: Fourier transform spectrometer

interferons
A class of glycoproteins (with sugar groups attached at specific locations) important in immunefunction. They are able to inhibit the multiplication of viruses in cells.

intermediate
A molecular entity with a lifetime appreciably longer than a molecular vibration (corresponding toa local potential energy minimum of depth greater than) that is formed (directly or indirectly)from the reactants and reacts further to give (either directly or indirectly) the products of a chemicalreaction; also the corresponding chemical species.See: reaction step, elementary reaction, stepwise reaction

intermediate neutrons
Neutrons of kinetic energy between the energies of slow and fast neutrons. In reactor physics, therange might beto.

intermolecular
1.2.Descriptive of any process that involves a transfer (of atoms, groups, electrons, etc.) orinteractions between two or more molecular entities.Relating to a comparison between different molecular entities.See also: intramolecular





internal compensation [obsolete]
Usage strongly discouraged.See: meso-compound

internal conversion
A photophysical process. An isoenenergetic radiationless transition between two electronic states ofthe same multiplicity. When the transition results in a vibrationally excited molecular entity in thelower electronic state, this usually undergoes deactivation to its lowest vibrational level, provided thefinal state is not unstable to dissociation.





internal reference electrode
An 'inner' reference electrode which is contained inside an ion-selective electrode assembly.Note:The system frequently consists of a silver/silver chloride electrode in contact with an appropriatesolution containing fixed concentrations of chloride and the ion for which the membrane is selective.This 'inner' filling solution is in contact with the ion-selective membrane.





internal valence force field
Acronym: IVFFA force field expressed in terms of bond-stretching, angle-bending, torsional and other displacementsdirectly connected to the structural parameters of the molecule:orwhere(or) are the force constants andthe internal valence coordinates.

international calorie
See: calorie

international unit [obsolete]
The unit of enzyme activity proposed by the International Union of Biochemistry in 1964.Specifically, it is the amount of enzyme that catalyses the conversion of one micromole of substrateper minute under the specified conditions of the assay method.Note:This unit is no longer recommended because the term does not indicate what physical quantity it refersto, and because the minute is not the SI unit of time.







interphase transition
A transition that occurs at boundaries between phases. Example: The precipitation of second phasesor the initiation of new phase growth at an interface.

intersection space
(3N − 8)-dimensional subspace of the (3N − 6)-dimensional nuclear coordinate space consisting ofan infinite number of conical intersection points (N is the number of nuclei).







intersystem crossing
A photophysical process. An isoenergetic radiationless transition between two electronic stateshaving different multiplicities. It often results in a vibrationally excited molecular entity in the lowerelectronic state, which then usually deactivates to its lowest vibrational level.

interval analysis
A method to estimate uncertainties in the results of a least-squares procedure. The input data areprimary values plus limits of intervals expressing their uncertainty. The output consists of derivedvalues plus limits of intervals expressing a pessimistic estimate of maximal uncertainty.

intervalence charge transfer
Electron transfer (thermal or photoinduced) between two metal sites differing only in oxidation state.Quite often such electron transfer reverses the oxidation states of the sites. The term is frequentlyextended to the case of metal-to-metal charge transfer between non-equivalent metal centres.

interzonal region
The region of the Bunsen flame confined by the inner and outer zones, where in many instances theconditions for flame analysis are optimum.





intramolecular
1.Descriptive of any process that involves a transfer (of atoms, groups, electrons, etc.) orinteractions between different parts of the same molecular entity.2. Relating to a comparison between atoms or groups within the same molecular entity.See also: intermolecular

intramolecular catalysis
The acceleration of a chemical transformation at one site of a molecular entity through the involvementof another functional ('catalytic') group in the same molecular entity, without that group appearingto have undergone change in the reaction product. The use of the term should be restricted tocases for which analogous intermolecular catalysis by chemical species bearing that catalytic groupis observable. Intramolecular catalysis can be detected and expressed in quantitative form by acomparison of the reaction rate with that of a comparable model compound in which the catalyticgroup is absent, or by measurement of the effective molarity of the catalytic group.See also: neighbouring group participation



intramolecular isotope effect
A kinetic isotopic effect observed when a single substrate, in which the isotopic atoms occupyequivalent reactive positions, reacts to produce a non-statistical distribution of isotopomeric products.In such a case the isotope effect will favour the pathway with lower force constants for displacementof the isotopic nuclei in the transition state.

intraphase transition
A transition that occurs within a phase. Example: Initiation of phase growth at an intragranular feature,such as twin planes and dislocations in steels.





intrinsic detector efficiency
The ratio of the number of particles or photons detected to the number of similar particles or photonswhich have struck the envelope limiting the sensitive volume of a radiation detector.













inverse isotope effect
A kinetic isotope effect in which, i.e. the heavier substrate reacts more rapidly than the lighterone, as opposed to the more usual 'normal' isotope effect, in which. The isotope effect willnormally be 'normal' when the frequency differences between the isotopic transition states are smallerthan in the reactants. Conversely, an inverse isotope effect can be taken as evidence for an increasein the corresponding force constants on passing from the reactant to the transition state.

inverse kinetic isotope effect
See: isotope effect



inversion
1.2.3.4.See: Walden inversionSee: pyramidal inversionSee: ring inversionA symmetry operation involving a centre of inversion ( ).









iodohydrins
See: halohydrins

iodometric titration
See: titration

ion
An atomic or molecular particle having a net electric charge.







ion exchange
1.In surface chemistry, if the adsorption of one or several ionic species is accompanied by thesimultaneous desorption (displacement) of an equivalent amount of one or more other ionicspecies, this process is called ion exchange.2.



ion exchanger
A solid or liquid, inorganic or organic substance containing exchangeable ions with others of thesame charge, present in a solution in which the ion exchanger is considered to be insoluble. It isrecognized that there are cases where liquid exchangers are employed and where it may be difficult todistinguish between the separation process as belonging to ion exchange or liquid-liquid distribution,but the broad definition given here is regarded as that which is most appropriate. A monofunctionalion exchanger contains only one type of ionogenic group, a bifunctional ion exchanger two types anda polyfunctional ion exchanger more than one type. In a macroporous ion exchanger the pores arelarge compared to atomic dimensions.



ion laser
A gas laser in which the active species is an ion formed in the electric discharge. Most practicallyimportant lasers of this type have continuous wave (CW) output. Examples are the argon ion, kryptonion and helium-cadmium (HeCd) lasers.

ion microscopy
Use of the secondary ion mass spectrometry (SIMS) technique to obtain micrographs of the elemental(or isotopic) distribution at the surface of a sample with a spatial resolution ofor better.

ion pair
Also contains definitions of: contact ion pair, intimate ion pair, loose ion pair, solventseparated ion pair, solvent-shared ion pair, tight ion pairA pair of oppositely charged ions held together by Coulomb attraction without formation of a covalentbond. Experimentally, an ion pair behaves as one unit in determining conductivity, kinetic behaviour,osmotic properties, etc. Following Bjerrum, oppositely charged ions with their centres closer togetherthan a distance:are considered to constitute an ion pair ('Bjerrum ion pair'). [ andare the charge numbers ofthe ions, and is the relative permittivity (or dielectric constant) of the medium.] An ion pair, theconstituent ions of which are in direct contact (and not separated by an intervening solvent or otherneutral molecule) is designated as a 'tight ion pair' (or 'intimate' or 'contact ion pair'). A tight ion pairof X+ and Y− is symbolically represented as X+Y−. By contrast, an ion pair whose constituent ionsare separated by one or several solvent or other neutral molecules is described as a 'loose ion pair',symbolically represented as X+ || Y−. The members of a loose ion pair can readily interchange withother free or loosely paired ions in the solution. This interchange may be detectable (e.g. by isotopiclabelling) and thus afford an experimental distinction between tight and loose ion pairs. A furtherconceptual distinction has sometimes been made between two types of loose ion pairs. In 'solventshared ion pairs' the ionic constituents of the pair are separated by only a single solvent molecule,whereas in 'solvent-separated ion pairs' more than one solvent molecule intervenes. However, the term'solvent-separated ion pair' must be used and interpreted with care since it has also widely been usedas a less specific term for 'loose' ion pair.See also: common-ion effect, dissociation, ion-pair return, special salt effect

ion pair return
Also contains definitions of: external ion-pair return, hidden return, internal returnThe recombination of a pair of ions R+ and Z− formed from ionization of RZ. If the ions are pairedas a tight ion pair and recombine without prior separation into a loose ion pair this is called 'internalion-pair return':It is a special case of 'primary geminate recombination'. If the ions are paired as a loose ion pair andform the covalent chemical species via a tight ion pair, this is called 'external ion-pair return':It is a special case of 'secondary geminate recombination'. When the covalent molecule RZ isreformed without direct evidence of prior partial racemization or without other direct evidence ofprior formation of a tight ion pair, (e.g. without partial racemization if the group R is suitably chiral)the internal ion-pair return is sometimes called a 'hidden return'. External (unimolecular) ion-pairreturn is to be distinguished from 'external (bimolecular) ion return', the (reversible) process wherebydissociated ions are converted into loose ion pairs:















ion-exchange polymer
Also contains definition of: ion-exchange membranePolymer that is able to exchange ions (cations or anions) with ionic components in solution.Notes:1. See also: ion exchange.2. An ion-exchange polymer in ionized form may also be referred to as a polyanion or a polycation.3. Synthetic ion-exchange organic polymers are often network polyelectrolytes.4. A membrane having ion-exchange groups is called an ion-exchange membrane.5. Use of the term 'ion-exchange resin' for 'ion-exchange polymer' is strongly discouraged.

ion-free layer
An interphase in which only non-specifically adsorbed ions are present.



ion-selective electrode cell
An ion-selective electrode in conjunction with a reference electrode. Generally, the cell contains tworeference electrodes, internal and external, and the thin film or membrane recognition-transductionelement. However, besides this conventional type of cell (with solution contact on both sides of themembrane) there are cell arrangements with wire contact to one side of the membrane (all solid stateand coated wire types).

ion-selective electrode (ISE)
An electrochemical sensor, based on thin films or selective membranes as recognition elements, and anelectrochemical half-cell equivalent to other half-cells of the zeroth (inert metal in a redox electrolyte),1st, 2nd and 3rd kinds. These devices are distinct from systems that involve redox reactions (electrodesof zeroth, 1st, 2nd and 3rd kinds), although they often contain a 2nd kind electrode as the 'inner' or'internal' reference electrode. The potential difference response has, as its principal component, theGibbs energy change associated with permselective mass transfer (by ion-exchange, solvent extractionor some other mechanism) across a phase boundary. The ion-selective electrode must be used inconjunction with a reference electrode (i.e. 'outer' or 'external' reference electrode) to form a completeelectrochemical cell. The measured potential differences (ion-selective electrode vs. outer referenceelectrode potentials) are linearly dependent on the logarithm of the activity of a given ion in solution.Comment: The term 'ion-specific electrode' is not recommended. The term 'specific' implies that theelectrode does not respond to additional ions. Since no electrode is truly specific for one ion, the term'ion-selective' is recommended as more appropriate. 'Selective ion-sensitive electrode' is a little-usedterm to describe an ion-selective electrode. 'Principal' or 'primary' ions are those which an electrodeis designed to measure. It is never certain that the 'principal' ion is most sensitively measured, e.g.nitrate ion-selective electrodes.







ionene
Polymer composed of macromolecules in which ionized or ionic groups are parts of main chains.Note:Most commonly, the ionic groups in ionenes are quaternary ammonium groups.





ionic concentration
See: concentration

ionic conductivity
Defined for ionic species B bywhereis the charge number of the ionic species B,mobility of species B. In most current practiceis the Faraday constant, andis the electricis taken as unity, i.e. ionic conductivity is takenas that of species such as Na+, Ca2+/2, La3+/3 etc. To avoid ambiguity the species considered shouldbe clearly stated, e.g. as.

ionic copolymerization
A copolymerization which is an ionic polymerization.



ionic polymer
Synonym: ion-containing polymerPolymer composed of macromolecules containing ionic or ionizable groups, or both, irrespective oftheir nature, content, and location.Synonym: ion-containing polymer.

ionic polymerization
A chain polymerization in which the kinetic-chain carriers are ions or ion pairs.Note:Usually, the growing chain ends are ions.





ionization
The generation of one or more ions. It may occur, e.g. by loss of an electron from a neutral molecularentity, by the unimolecular heterolysis of such an entity into two or more ions, or by a heterolyticsubstitution reaction involving neutral molecules, such as:The loss of an electron from a singly, doubly, etc. charged cation is called second, third, etc. ionization.This terminology is used especially in mass spectroscopy.See also: dissociation, ionization energy



ionization by sputtering
Ionization by bombardment of a solid specimen with accelerated ions or electrons or fast neutrals.

ionization chamber
A radiation detector which employs an electric field for the collection at the electrodes of chargesassociated with the ions produced in the sensitive volume by ionizing radiation, without chargemultiplication. The solid angle (2Π, 4π ) subtended when using the detector, is sometimes specified.

ionization cross-section
A measure of the probability that a given ionization process will occur when an atom or moleculeinteracts with an electron or a photon.

ionization efficiency
The ratio of the number of ions formed to the number of electrons or photons used in an ionizationprocess.





ionization potential [obsolete]
See: ionization energy



ionizing power
A term to denote the tendency of a particular solvent to promote ionization of an uncharged or, lessoften, charged solute. The term has been used both in a kinetic and in a thermodynamic context.See also: Dimroth–Reichardtparameter, Grunwald–Winstein equation, Z-value

ionizing radiation
Any radiation consisting of directly or indirectly ionizing particles or a mixture of both, or photonswith energy higher than the energy of photons of ultraviolet light or a mixture of both such particlesand photons.

ionizing voltage
The voltage difference through which electrons are accelerated before they are used to bring aboutelectron impact ionization. To obtain the true ionizing voltage, corrections for any contact or surfacepotentials must be made.Note:The term electron energy is frequently used in place of ionizing voltage.

ionogenic groups
The fixed groupings in an ion exchanger which are either ionized or capable of dissociation into fixedions and mobile counter-ions.

ionomer
Polymer composed of macromolecules in which a small but significant proportion of the constitutionalunits has ionic or ionizable groups, or both.Note:Ionic groups are usually present in sufficient amounts (typically less than 10% of constitutional units)to cause micro-phase separation of ionic domains from the continuous polymer phase. The ionicdomains act as physical crosslinks.

ionomer cluster
Ionic aggregate, in a polymer matrix of low polarity, formed through interactions of ionomermultiplets.Notes:1.2.The mobility of the polymer segments surrounding the multiplets is reduced relative to thatof bulk material. With increasing ion content, the number density of the ionomer multipletsincreases, leading to overlapping of the restricted mobility regions around the multiplets and theformation of clusters.Typically, an ionomer exhibits two glass transition temperatures ( ), one for the non-polarmatrix and the other for clusters.

ionomer molecule
A macromolecule in which a small but significant proportion of the constitutional units have ionizableor ionic groups, or both. Some protein molecules may be classified as ionomer molecules.

ionomer multiplet
Ionic aggregate, in a polymer matrix of low polarity, formed through the association of ion-pairs inan ionomer.

ionophore
A compound which can carry specific ions through membranes of cells or organelles.

ipso-attack
The attachment of an entering group to a position in an aromatic compound already carrying asubstituent group (other than hydrogen). The entering group may displace that substituent group butmay also itself be expelled or migrate to a different position in a subsequent step. The term 'ipsosubstitution' is not used, since it is synonymous with substitution. For example:where E + is an electrophile and Z is a substituent (other than hydrogen).See also: cine-substitution, tele-substitution

iridoids
Cyclic monoterpenoids having the iridane skeleton (1-isopropyl-2,3-di-methylcyclopentane), thetraditional, but not undisputed, numbering of which is shown in the diagram.

iron-sulfur cluster
A unit comprising two or more iron atoms and bridging sulfur ligands in an iron-sulfur protein. Therecommended designation of a cluster consists of the iron and sulfur content, in square brackets, forexample, [2Fe-2S], [3Fe-4S]. The possible oxidation levels are indicated by the net charge excludingthe ligands, for example [4Fe-4S]2+; [4Fe-4S]+ or ([4Fe-4S]2+;1+) cluster

iron-sulfur proteins
Proteins in which non-haem iron is coordinated with cysteine sulfur and usually also with inorganicsulfur. Divided into three major categories: rubredoxins; 'simple iron-sulfur proteins', containing onlyiron-sulfur clusters; and 'complex iron-sulfur proteins', containing additional active redox centres suchas flavin, molybdenum or haem. In most iron-sulfur proteins, the clusters function as electron-transfergroups, but in others they have other functions, such as catalysis of hydratase/dehydratase reactions,maintenance of protein structure, or regulation of activity.



irradiation
Exposure to ionizing radiation.

irregular macromolecule
A macromolecule the structure of which essentially comprises the repetition of more than one typeof constitutional unit or a macromolecule the structure of which comprises constitutional units not allconnected identically with respect to directional sense.

irregular polymer
A polymer composed of irregular macromolecules.

irreversible transition
A transition that changes the state of a system which cannot be readily reversed to restore the systemto its original state. Example: The conversion of TiO2 (anatase) to TiO2 (rutile).

ISC
Frequently used acronym for intersystem crossing.

isoabsorption point [obsolete]
The use of this term, equivalent to isosbestic point, is not recommended.







isobars
Different nuclides of equal mass number.





isoconfertic separation [obsolete]
See: isopycnic separation

isoconjugate systems
Molecular entities with similar conjugate networks which have the same number of π-electrons, e.g.cyclopentadienide anion and pyrrole or benzene and pyridine.

isocoumarins
Isocoumarin (1H-isochromen-1-one) and its derivatives formed by substitution.See: coumarins



isocyanates
The isocyanic acid tautomer, HN=C=O, of cyanic acid, HOC≡N and its hydrocarbyl derivativesRN=C=O.

isocyanides
The isomer HN+≡C− of hydrocyanic acid, HC≡N, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives RNC (RN+≡C−).

isocyclic compounds
A less preferred synonym for homocyclic compounds.

isodesmic reaction
A reaction (actual or hypothetical) in which the types of bonds that are made in forming the productsare the same as those which are broken in the reactants, e.g.Such processes have advantages for theoretical treatment. The Hammett equation as applied toequilibria [cf. (a)] essentially deals with isodesmic processes.

isodiazenes
Synonym: azaminesCompounds having the structure. These compounds can also becalled diazanylidenes or hydrazinylidenes. They have also been called by the trivial name azaminesand the incorrectly formed name 1,1-diazenes. They should not be called aminonitrenes.See: carbenes

isoelectric
A macro-ion of a polyampholyte (in particular a protein) is said to be isoelectric if it exhibits noelectrophoresis.





isoemissive point
Wavelength, wavenumber or frequency at which the total intensity of emission of light by a sampledoes not change during a chemical reaction or physical change. The terms isolampsic and isostilbicare sometimes used.Note:This term may be misleading because it does not specifically refer to light emission.isoentropic
A reaction series is said to be isoentropic if the individual reactions of the series have the same standardentropy of activation.

isoenzyme
One of a group of related enzymes catalysing the same reaction but having different molecularstructures and characterized by varying physical, biochemical and immunological properties.

isoequilibrium relationship
A relationship analogous to the isokinetic relationship but applied to equilibrium data. The equationdefining the isoequilibrium temperature is:whereandare enthalpy and entropy of reaction, respectively.

isogyric reaction
A reaction in which the number of electron pairs is conserved, for example:CH4(1A1) + H(2S) CH3(2A'2) + H2(1Σ+g)

isoionic
A macro-ion of a polyampholyte (in particular a protein) is said to be isoionic if besides thepolyampholyte and H+ or OH− ions (in general ions of the solvent) no other ions are present in thesystem.





isokinetic relationship
When a series of structurally related substrates undergo the same general reaction or when the reactionconditions for a single substrate are changed in a systematic way, the enthalpies and entropies ofactivation sometimes satisfy the relation:where the parameter is independent of temperature. This equation (or some equivalent form) issaid to represent an 'isokinetic relationship'. The temperature(at which all members of aseries obeying the isokinetic relationship react at the same rate) is termed the 'isokinetic temperature'.Supposed isokinetic relationships as established by direct correlation ofspurious and the calculated value ofis meaningless, because errors inwithare oftenlead to compensatingerrors in. Satisfactory methods of establishing such relationships have been devised.See also: compensation effect, isoequilibrium relationship, isoselective relationship



isolampsic point
Same as isoemissive point.Note:The term derives from the Greek words isos: equal, and lampein: to emit light or to shine. Isolampsicis thus parallel to isosbestic.

isolated double bonds
Those bonds which are neither conjugated nor cumulative as inor the B ring of

isolobal
The term is used to compare molecular fragments with each other and with familiar species fromorganic chemistry. Two fragments are isolobal if the number, symmetry properties, approximateenergy and shape of the frontier orbitals and the number of electrons in them are similar.See: isoelectronic

isomer
One of several species (or molecular entities ) that have the same atomic composition (molecularformula) but different line formulae or different stereochemical formulae and hence different physicaland/or chemical properties.



isomerases
Enzymes that catalyse intramolecular rearrangements. Isomerases are classified into racemases andepimerases, cis-trans isomerases, intramolecular lyases and other isomerases.

isomeric
Adjective derived from isomer.





isomerism
The relationship between isomers.

isomerization
A chemical reaction, the principal product of which is isomeric with the principal reactant. Anintramolecular isomerization that involves the breaking or making of bonds is a special case of amolecular rearrangement. Isomerization does not necessarily imply molecular rearrangement (e.g. inthe case of the interconversion of conformational isomers).

isometric
Also contains definition of: anisometricTwo molecular entities that are superposable or can be made superposable by reflection of one ofthem in a mirror are isometric; otherwise they are anisometric.

isomorphic polymer blend
Polymer blend of two or more different semi-crystalline polymers that are miscible in the crystallinestate as well as in the molten state.Notes:1.Such a blend exhibits a single, composition-dependent glass-transition temperature,2.single, composition-dependent melting point,.This behaviour is extremely rare; very few cases are known., and a





isonitroso compounds [obsolete]
An obsolete term for oximes, based on the fact that compounds with a nitroso group, –N=O, bondedto a –CR2H group readily tautomerize to oximes.

isooptoacoustic point
Wavelength, wavenumber or frequency at which the total energy emitted by a sample as heat doesnot change upon a chemical reaction in or a physical change of the sample. Its position depends onthe experimental conditions.Note:The spectral differences between the isosbestic points and the iso-optoacoustic points are the resultof the non-linear relationship between the molar absorption coefficient and the photoacoustic signal.

isopeptide bond
See: peptides

isopotential point
For an ion-selective electrode cell, there is often a particular activity of the measured ion for which theemf of the cell is independent of temperature. That activity, and the corresponding potential difference,defines the isopotential point. The specification of the ion-selective electrode and outer referenceelectrode must be described. Comment: When an isothermal cell is used with identical referenceelectrodes, the isopotential point is the activity of sensed species that gives zero net membranepotential, e.g. sensed activity is the same in the inner and outer (test) solution. Calibration lines fordifferent cell temperatures have different slopes, but intersect at a common activity point. Cells withtemperature gradients are not recommended.

isoprenes
See: prenols

isoprenoids
Compounds formally derived from isoprene (2-methylbuta-1,3-diene), the skeleton of which cangenerally be discerned in repeated occurrence in the molecule. The skeleton of isoprenoids may differfrom strict additivity of isoprene units by loss or shift of a fragment, commonly a methyl group. Theclass includes both hydrocarbons and oxygenated derivatives.See also: carotenoids, steroids, terpenes, terpenoids, prenols

isopycnic
An adjective describing components of a multicomponent system with equal partial specific volumes.

isopycnic separation
Chromatographic separations carried out using constant density conditions. The temperature andpressure may be altered during the run (originally the term isoconfertic separation was used but thisterm is not recommended).

isorefractive
An adjective describing components of a multicomponent system having zero refractive indexincrements with respect to each other.

isosbestic point
Wavelength, wavenumber or frequency at which the total absorbance of a sample does not changeduring a chemical reaction or a physical change of the sample.Notes:1. A simple example occurs when one molecular entity is converted into another that has the samemolar absorption coefficient at a given wavelength. As long as the sum of the concentrations ofthe two molecular entities in the solution is held constant there will be no change in absorbanceat this wavelength as the ratio of the concentrations of the two entities is varied.2. The name derives from the Greek words: isos: equal, the same, and sbestos: extinguishable.3. Contrary to a widely accepted idea, the existence of an isosbestic point does not prove thatthe reaction is a quantitative conversion of one species into a unique other species or that anequilibrium exists between only two species. The observation of isosbestic points only indicatesthat the stoichiometry of the reaction remains unchanged during the chemical reaction or thephysical change of the sample, and that no secondary reactions occur during the considered timerange, sinceoptical path,is invariant (is the absorbance at wavelength , is theis the molar decadic absorption coefficient of the species of concentration).For the reaction A + B → c C + d D + e E, with c, d, and e the percentages of the productsC, D, and E, an isosbestic point will be observed at every wavelength where the condition, provided that the values of the percentages c, d, and e remainconstant during the chemical reaction or the physical change. The use of the obsolete termisoabsorption point is not recommended.

isoselective relationship
A relationship analogous to the isokinetic relationship, but applied to selectivity data of reactions.At the isoselective temperature, the selectivities of the series of reactions following the relationshipare identical.See also: isoequilibrium relationship

isoselenocyanates
Selenium analogues of isocyanates RN=C=Se.

isostatic pressing
Application of a hydrostatic pressure through a liquid to achieve densification prior to the productionof a uniform compact monolith through ceramization of the densified liquid.





isostructural reaction
A ligand exchange reaction, where the structural type of the metal complex remains the same.MLn + X MLn-1X + L + ΔEAlthough these types of reactions are not necessarily isodesmic reactions, a substantial degree of errorcancellation for the calculated energy, ΔE, is achieved because the coordination sphere of the metalatom M is conserved.

isotactic macromolecule
A tactic macromolecule, essentially comprising only one species of configurational base unit, whichhas chiral or prochiral atoms in the main chain in a unique arrangement with respect to its adjacentconstitutional units.Notes:1. In an isotactic macromolecule, the configurational repeating unit is identical with theconfigurational base unit.2. An isotactic macromolecule consists of meso diads.

isotactic polymer
A polymer composed of isotactic macromolecules.







isothiocyanates
Sulfur analogues of isocyanates RN=C=S.

isotones
Nuclides having the same neutron number but different atomic numbers.

isotope dilution
Mixing of a given nuclide with one or more of its isotopes.

isotope dilution analysis
A kind of quantitative analysis based on the measurement of the isotopic abundance of a nuclide afterisotope dilution with the test portion.

isotope effect
Also contains definition of: equilibrium isotope effectThe effect on the rate or equilibrium constant of two reactions that differ only in the isotopiccomposition of one or more of their otherwise chemically identical components is referred to as akinetic isotope effect or a thermodynamic (or equilibrium) isotope effect, respectively.

isotope exchange
A chemical reaction in which the reactant and product chemical species are chemically identicalbut have different isotopic composition. In such a reaction the isotope distribution tends towardsequilibrium (as expressed by fractionation factors) as a result of transfers of isotopically differentatoms or groups. For example:

isotope exchange analysis
A kind of quantitative analysis based on the isotope exchange between isotopes of the element to bedetermined and other isotopes of this element in different valency states or in different molecules.



isotopes
Nuclides having the same atomic number but different mass numbers.

isotopic abundance
The relative number of atoms of a particular isotope in a mixture of the isotopes of an element,expressed as a fraction of all the atoms of the element.



isotopic enrichment
Any process by which the isotopic abundance of a specified isotope in a mixture of isotopes of anelement is increased.

isotopic enrichment factor
For a material enriched in a specified isotope, the ratio between the isotopic abundance and the naturalabundance of that isotope.

isotopic fractionation factor
The ratio,where is the abundance, expressed as the atom fraction of the isotope distinguished by the subscriptnumeral, when the two isotopes are equilibrated between two different chemical species A and B (orbetween specific sites A and B in the same or different chemical species). The term is most commonlymet in connection with deuterium solvent isotope effects, when the fractionation factor expressesthe ratio:for the exchangeable hydrogen atoms in the chemical species (or sites) concerned. The concept is alsoapplicable to transition states.

isotopic ion
Any ion containing one or more of the less abundant naturally occurring isotopes of the elements thatmake up its structure, e.g. CH2D+ .

isotopic labelling
Labelling in which the resulting product is only different from the initial one by its isotopiccomposition.

isotopic molecular ion
A molecular ion containing one or more of the less abundant naturally occurring isotopes of the atomsthat make up the molecular structure. Thus, for ethyl bromide there exist isotopic molecular ions suchas: 13CCH5Br+., C2H4DBr+., C2H581Br+., 13C2H581Br+., etc.

isotopic scrambling
The achievement, or the process of achieving, an equilibrium distribution of isotopes within aspecified set of atoms in a chemical species or group of chemical species (for an example, seediagram).See also: fractionation factor

isotopic separation
An operation for the purpose of modifying an isotopic abundance in a mixture of isotopes.

isotopic tracer
A tracer which only differs in isotopic composition from the substance to be traced.

isotopically deficient
An isotopically labelled compound may be designated as isotopically deficient when the isotopiccontent of one or more elements has been depleted, i.e. when one or more nuclide(s) is (are) presentin less than a natural ratio.

isotopically enriched ions
When the abundance of a particular nuclide is increased above the level at which it occurs in natureand is incorporated in a molecule, the term 'isotopically enriched ion' is used to describe any ionenriched in the isotope.

isotopically labelled
Describes a mixture of an isotopically unmodified compound with one or more analogous isotopicallysubstituted compound(s).

isotopically modified
Describes a compound that has a macroscopic composition such that the isotopic ratio of nuclidesfor at least one element deviates measurably from that occurring in nature. It is either an isotopicallysubstituted compound or an isotopically labelled compound.

isotopically substituted
Describes a compound that has a composition such that essentially all the molecules of the compoundhave only the indicated nuclide(s) at each designated position. For all other positions, the absence ofnuclide indication means that the nuclide composition is the natural one.

isotopically unmodified
Describes a compound that has a macroscopic composition such that its constituent nuclides arepresent in the proportions occurring in nature.

isotopologue
A molecular entity that differs only in isotopic composition (number of isotopic substitutions), e.g.CH4, CH3D, CH2D2.

isotopomer
Isomers having the same number of each isotopic atom but differing in their positions. Theterm is a contraction of 'isotopic isomer'. Isotopomers can be either constitutional isomers (e.g.CH2DCH=O and CH3CD=O) or isotopic stereoisomers [e.g. (R)- and (S)-CH3CHDOH or (Z)- and(E)-CH3CH=CHD].

isotropic
A quantity which is independent of direction. Anisotropic and nonisotropic refer to quantities whichare direction dependent.

isotropic carbon
A monolithic carbon material without preferred crystallographic orientation of the microstructure.Note:Isotropic carbon can also be a graphite material. The isotropy can be gross (bulk), macroscopic ormicroscopic, depending on the structural level at which isotropy is obtained. This word is widelyused today and its meaning covers all the above levels. For example, the aerospace graphites haveisotropy built in by random grain orientation. Some nuclear graphites are isotropic at the crystalline(sub-grain) level.





isozyme
Synonymous with isoenzyme.





Jahn–Teller effect
Molecular distortions due to an electronically degenerate ground state. For non-linear molecularentities in a geometry described by a point symmetry group possessing degenerate irreduciblerepresentations there always exists at least one non-totally symmetric vibration that makeselectronically degenerate states unstable at this geometry. The nuclei are displaced to new equilibriumpositions of lower symmetry causing a splitting of the originally degenerate states (first-order Jahn–Teller effect).Note:Effect due to the odd terms in the vibronic perturbation expansion. In the case of molecules with anon-degenerate ground electronic state but with a low-lying degenerate excited state, distortions ofproper symmetry arise that result in mixing of the ground and excited states, thereby lowering theground-state energy (pseudo Jahn–Teller effect). The pseudo Jahn–Teller effect manifests itself influxional behaviour (see fluxional molecules) and stereochemical non-rigidity of molecules and ions.The Jahn–Teller effect generates a surface crossing (e.g., a conical intersection) whereas a pseudoJahn–Teller effect generates an avoided crossing.See also: Renner–Teller effect

Jahn–Teller transition
A displacive crystal distortion to lower symmetry that cooperatively removes a localized-electronorbital degeneracy at an array of like atoms so as to leave the atoms in the centre of symmetry of theirdistorted sites. Example: The crystallographic distortion in Mn3O4.

joule
SI derived unit of energy,.

junction point
Branch point in a polymer network.

junction unit
A non-repeating atom or non-repeating group of atoms between blocks in a block macromolecule.

junction-point density
Number of junction points per unit volume in a polymer network.See also: crosslink density







Kasha rule
Polyatomic molecular entities luminesce with appreciable yield only from the lowest excited state ofa given multiplicity. There are exceptions to this rule.Note:The concept has been extended to the reaction of excited species, i.e., polyatomic molecular entitiesreact with appreciable yield only from the lowest excited state of a given multiplicity.

Kasha–Vavilov rule
The quantum yield of luminescence is independent of the wavelength of exciting radiation. There areexceptions to this rule.

katal
Unit for catalytic activity coherent with the SI, equal to the catalytic activity that catalyses a reactionrate of one mole per second in an assay system.use in the specific context of enzymes and clinical chemistry.. The katal is recommended for



kelvin
SI base unit of thermodynamic temperature (symbol: ). The kelvin is the fraction 1/273.16 of thethermodynamic temperature of the triple point of water.

ketals
Acetals derived from ketones by replacement of the oxo group by two hydrocarbyloxy groupsR2C(OR)2 ( R ≠ H ). This term, once abandoned, has been reinstated as a subclass of acetals.

ketazines
Azines of ketones R2C=NN=CR2.

ketenes
Compounds in which a carbonyl group is connected by a double bond to an alkylidene groupR2C=C=O .

ketenimines
Compounds having the structure R2C=C=NR . Thus imino analogues of ketenes.

ketimines
Compounds having the structure R2C=NR' ( R ≠ H ).See: imines

keto
See: oxo compounds

keto carbenes
The term has imprecisely been used to designate carboxylic acyl carbenes. Keto carbenes are carbenesbearing an oxo function at an unspecified site.

ketoaldonic acids
Also contains definition of: ulosonic acidsMonosaccharides in which a structure containing a keto group and a carboxylic acid group is inequilibrium with a hemiacetal structure. Specific compounds are named using the -ulosonic acidsuffix. E.g. D-arabino-hexulosonic acid:See also: oxo compounds

ketoaldoses
Monosaccharides which contain both an aldehydic and a ketonic carbonyl group in equilibrium withintramolecular hemiacetal forms.See also: oxo compounds

ketones
Compounds in which a carbonyl group is bonded to two carbon atoms R2C=O (neither R may be H).Note:Compounds of structure such as R3SiC(=O)R are not ketones but acyl derivatives of substitutedsilanes.

ketoses
Ketonic parent sugars (polyhydroxyketones H–[CHOH]n–C(=O)[CHOH]m–H with three or morecarbon atoms) and their intramolecular hemiacetals. The oxo group is usually at C-2. E.g. D-fructose:

ketoximes
Oximes of ketones, R2C=NOH (R ≠ H).

ketyls
Radical anions (or the corresponding salts) derived from ketones by addition of an electron R2C.–O−R2C−–O..Note:Ketyls produce two types of conjugate acids: R2C.–OH and R2CH–O.. The former are α-hydroxyalkylradicals and the latter are alkoxyl radicals, but they have also been called ketyls in photochemistry.

kilo
SI prefix for(symbol: ).



kind-of-property
An attribute of phenomena, bodies or substances that may be distinguished qualitatively. Examples:Colour (value: green, blue), transparency, length (value: long, short;,), amount-of-substance(value:,). Kind-of-property includes the concept kind-of-quantity. All kinds-of-propertymay be related to nominal (e.g. green, blue) and ordinal scales (e.g. small, large), but kinds-of-quantityare generally related to difference [e.g.(i.e.more than an arbitrary zero)] or ratio scales(lengthor).

kind-of-quantity
Abstract property common to several real quantities.See: quantity



kinematics
The study of the properties of motion that are independent of the nature of the forces. In reactiondynamics the term is often applied in particular to effects that occur when atomic masses are changed,the forces remaining the same.

kinetic activity factor
A factor involving activity coefficients that appears as a multiplier in the rate equation. For abimolecular reaction the factor is,where,andare the activity coefficients for the reactants A and B and the activated complex,respectively. For a unimolecular reaction the factor is,and for a trimolecular reaction it is.

kinetic ambiguity
See: kinetic equivalence



kinetic current
Also contains definitions of: surface reaction in electrochemistry, volume reaction inelectrochemistryA faradaic current that corresponds to the reduction or oxidation of an electroactive substance formedby a prior chemical reaction from another substance that is not electroactive, and that is partially orentirely controlled by the rate of that reaction. The reaction may be heterogeneous, occurring at anelectrode-solution interface (surface reaction), or it may be homogeneous, occurring at some distancefrom the interface (volume reaction).





kinetic equivalence
Two reaction schemes are kinetically equivalent if they imply the same rate law. For example, considerthe two schemes (i) and (ii) for the formation of C from A:Providing that B does not accumulate as a reaction intermediate.Providing that B does not accumulate as a reaction intermediate:Both equations forwhereandare of the form:are constants (sometimes called 'coefficients in the rate equation'). The equations areidentical in their dependence on concentrations and do not distinguish whether OH− catalyses theformation of B, and necessarily also its reversion to A, or is involved in its further transformation toC. The two schemes are therefore kinetically equivalent under conditions to which the stated provisosapply.

kinetic isotope effect
The effect of isotopic substitution on a rate constant is referred to as a kinetic isotope effect. Forexample, in the reaction:the effect of isotopic substitution in reactant A is expressed as the ratio of rate constants, where thesuperscripts and represent reactions in which the molecules A contain the light and heavy isotopes,respectively. Within the framework of transition state theory in which the reaction is rewritten as:and with neglect of isotopic mass on tunnelling and the transmission coefficient,can be regardedas if it were the equilibrium constant for an isotope exchange reaction between the transition state[TS]‡ and the isotopically substituted reactant A, and calculated from their vibrational frequencies asin the case of a thermodynamic isotope effect. Isotope effects like the above, involving a direct orindirect comparison of the rates of reaction of isotopologues, are called 'intermolecular', in contrastto intramolecular isotope effects, in which a single substrate reacts to produce a non-statisticaldistribution of isotopomeric product molecules.See also: isotope effect



kinetic resolution
The achievement of partial or complete resolution by virtue of unequal rates of reaction of theenantiomers in a racemate with a chiral agent (reagent, catalyst, solvent, etc.).

kinetic synergist [obsolete]
This term is not recommended for catalyst or accelerator.

kinetic theory of collisions
See: collision theory



Koopmans' theorem
Directly relates experimental ionization potentials with energy levels of molecular orbitals. Thetheorem states that the ionization potential required to remove an electron from the orbitalisgiven by the negative value of the energy of the orbital,, as calculated within the Hartree–Fock approximation. The theorem is not applied to localized molecular orbitals, which are noteigenfunctions of the effective hamiltonian.





Krafft point
The temperature (more precisely, narrow temperature range) above which the solubility of a surfactantrises sharply. At this temperature the solubility of the surfactant becomes equal to the critical micelleconcentration. It is best determined by locating the abrupt change in slope of a graph of the logarithmof the solubility against or .

Kratky plot
A diagrammatic representation of scattering data on large particles, obtained at different angles but atthe same concentration, constructed by plottingvs., orused for the determination of molecular shape.is the excess Rayleigh ratio,scattering function, the scattering angle and the length of the scattering vector.vs.andthe particle

krypton ion laser
A CW or pulsed laser emitting lines fromemissions are at,,andSee: gas lasersto.from singly ionized krypton. Principal





l
1.2.An obsolete prefix for (−)-,See: d, l, dlSee: l,u, for like and unlike diastereoisomers

label
A marker, tag or indicator distinguishable by the observer but not by the system and used to identifya tracer.

labelling
Providing a substance with a label.

labile
The term has loosely been used to describe a relatively unstable and transient chemical species or (lesscommonly) a relatively stable but reactive species. It must therefore not be used without explanationof the intended meaning.See also: inert, persistent, reactive, unreactive

laboratory sample
The sample or subsample(s) sent to or received by the laboratory. When the laboratory sample isfurther prepared (reduced) by subdividing, mixing, grinding or by combinations of these operations,the result is the test sample. When no preparation of the laboratory sample is required, the laboratorysample is the test sample. A test portion is removed from the test sample for the performance of the testor for analysis. The laboratory sample is the final sample from the point of view of sample collectionbut it is the initial sample from the point of view of the laboratory. Several laboratory samples may beprepared and sent to different laboratories or to the same laboratory for different purposes. When sentto the same laboratory, the set is generally considered as a single laboratory sample and is documentedas a single sample.

lachrymator
A substance which produces a flow of tears in a person or animal (e.g. acetyl chloride, acrylaldehyde,etc.).

lactams
Cyclic amides of amino carboxylic acids, having a 1-azacycloalkan-2-one structure, or analogueshaving unsaturation or heteroatoms replacing one or more carbon atoms of the ring. E.g.

lactides
Cyclic esters derived by multiple esterification between two (usually) or more molecules of lactic acidor other hydroxy carboxylic acids They are designated as dilactides, trilactides, etc. according to thenumber of hydroxy acid residues, e.g. a dilactide (a 1,4-dioxane-2,5-dione):

lactims
Tautomeric forms of lactams, having an endocyclic carbon-nitrogen double bond. Thus, cycliccarboximidic acids, e.g.

lactols
1.2.Cyclic hemiacetals formed by intramolecular addition of a hydroxy group to an aldehydic orketonic carbonyl group. They are thus 1-oxacy-cycloalkan-2-ols or unsaturated analogues, e.g.[obsolete]This term has also been used for hydroxy lactones, but such use is not recommended.

lactones
Cyclic esters of hydroxy carboxylic acids, containing a 1-oxacycloalkan-2-one structure, or analogueshaving unsaturation or heteroatoms replacing one or more carbon atoms of the ring.

ladder chain
A double-strand chain, consisting of an uninterrupted sequence of rings, with adjacent rings havingtwo or more atoms in common. Alternatively, a ladder chain is a double-strand chain with adjacentconstitutional units joined to each other through four atoms, two on one side and two on the otherside of each constitutional unit.

ladder macromolecule
A double-strand macromolecule consisting of an uninterrupted sequence of rings, with adjacent ringshaving two or more atoms in common. Alternatively, a ladder macromolecule is a double-strandmacromolecule with constitutional units joined to each other through four atoms, two on one side andtwo on the other side of each constitutional unit.

LADS
Acronym for lifetime-associated difference spectra.See: global analysis



lambda
Signifies, with its superscript, the bonding number, i.e. the sum of the number of skeletal bonds to anatom and the number of hydrogen atoms associated with it in a parent hydride, real or hypothetical.Its usage in names of compounds is generally restricted to non-standard valence states.

Lambert law
The fraction of light absorbed by a system is independent of the incident radiant power (holds only if). This lawis small, scattering is negligible, and multiphoton processes, excited state populations,and photochemical reactions are negligible.See: absorbance, Beer–Lambert law

lamellar crystal
A type of crystal with a large extension in two dimensions and a uniform thickness. A lamellar crystalis usually of a thickness in the –range, and it may be found individually or in aggregates.The parallel chain stems intersect the lamellar plane at an angle betweenand. The lamellaeoften have pyramidal shape owing to differences in the fold domains; as a result, one can deducedifferent fold planes and fold surfaces from the lamellar morphology.

lamp
A source of incoherent radiation.See: high-pressure mercury lamp (arc), medium-pressure mercury lamp (arc), low-pressure mercurylamp (arc), antimony–xenon lamp (arc), quartz-iodine lamp, resonance lamp, xenon lamp

lamp black
A special type of carbon black produced by incomplete combustion of a fuel rich in aromatics that isburned in flat pans. Lamp black is characterized by a relatively broad particle size distribution.

Landau–Zener model
Within the Born–Oppenheimer approximation, a semi-classical model for the probability,hopping from one electronic state to another of the same or different multiplicitywhere, ofis the potential energy gap between the two electronic states at a surface crossing point,is the difference in slopes between the intersecting potential energy curves at this point andis the nuclear relative velocity with which the system passes the point of closest approach.Note:The original formalism only considered states of the same spin multiplicity.

Landolt reaction
A slow chemical reaction, in which the formation of a product is delayed by a suitable reagent addedfor the purpose.

Langmuir monolayer [obsolete]
See: monolayer







Laporte rule
This rule states that for monophotonic radiative transitions in centrosymmetric systems, the only nonvanishing electric-dipole transition moments are those which connect an even term (g) with an oddterm (u).







LAS
Acronym for lifetime-associated spectra.See: global analysis

laser
A source of ultraviolet, visible, or infrared radiation which produces light amplification by stimulatedemission of radiation from which the acronym is derived. The light emitted is coherent except forsuperradiance emission. The essential elements of a laser are: 1, an active medium; 2, a pumpingprocess to make a population inversion; and 3, suitable geometry of optical feedback elements. Theactive medium consists of a host material (gas, liquid or solid) containing an active species.See: argon ion laser, atomic laser, crystal laser, glass laser, ion laser, molecular laser, organic dyelaser, helium–cadmium laser, chemical laser, CO2 laser, copper vapour laser, diode laser, dye laser,excimer laser, free electron laser, free-running laser, gas laser, helium–neon laser, krypton ion laser,mode-locked laser, neodymium laser, nitrogen laser, Q-switched laser, solid-state lasers, ruby laser.See also: lasing

laser beam ionization
Ionization by irradiation of a specimen with a laser beam.

laser dye
Organic dyes typically used dissolved in an organic solvent. The dye solution is circulatedcontinuously through the laser chamber of the dye laser, in which it is excited (pumped) by flashlamps or by another laser.













latent image
The primary result of radiation absorption in a photoimaging system which is susceptible todevelopment.







latex
An emulsion or sol in which each colloidal particle contains a number of macromolecules.

lath crystal
A lamellar crystal prevailingly extended along one lateral dimension.

lattice distortion
Structural disorder resulting from misalignment of the unit cells within the crystals.











least-squares technique
A procedure for replacing the discrete set of results obtained from an experiment by a continuousfunction. It is defined by the following. For the set of variablesthere are measuredvalues such asand it is decided to write a relation:whereare undetermined constants. If it is assumed that each measurementassociated with it a numberofhascharacteristic of the uncertainty, then numerical estimates of theare found by constructing a variable , defined by,and solving the equations obtained by writingexcept. If the relations between theand are linear, this is the familiar least-squarestechnique of fitting an equation to a number of experimental points. If the relations between theand are non-linear, there is an increase in the difficulty of finding a solution, but the problem isessentially unchanged.

leaving group
An atom or group (charged or uncharged) that becomes detached from an atom in what is consideredto be the residual or main part of the substrate in a specified reaction. For example, in the heterolyticsolvolysis of benzyl bromide in acetic acid:the leaving group is Br−; in the reaction:the leaving group is NMe3 ; in the electrophilic nitration of benzene, it is H+. The term has meaningonly in relation to a specified reaction. The leaving group is not, in general, the same as the substituentgroup present in the substrate (e.g. bromo and trimethylammonio in the substrates of the first twoexamples above.) A slightly different usage of the term prevails in the (non-mechanistic) naming oftransformations, where the actual substituent group present in the substrate (and also in the product)is referred to as the leaving group.See also: electrofuge, entering group, nucleofuge

lecithins
Choline esters of phosphatidic acids. Specific compounds should be named systematically.

lectins
Glycoproteins isolated from plants but recently found also in animals and microorganisms that reactspecifically with terminal glycosidic residues of other molecules (e.g. cell wall polysaccharides); somecausing cells to agglutinate (cf. agglutination ).

LED
Acronym for light-emitting diode.

left-to-right convention
Arrangement of the structural formulae of the reactants so that the bonds to be made or broken forma linear array in which the electrons move from left to right.



lethal concentration
Concentration of a potentially toxic substance in an environmental medium that causes deathfollowing a certain period of exposure (denoted by LC).See also: lethal dose

lethal dose
Amount of a substance or physical agent (radiation) that causes death when taken into the body bya single absorption (denoted by LD).See also: lethal concentration

lethal synthesis
Synonym: suicide metabolismMetabolic formation of a highly toxic compound from one that is relatively non-toxic (bioactivation),often leading to death of affected cells. Synonymous with suicide metabolism.

leuco bases
Colourless compounds formed by reduction of triphenylmethane dyes. Generally, they are amino orhydroxy derivatives of triphenylmethane. Use of this class name, which is more or less parochial to thetechnology of dyes, is not endorsed. E.g. (p-Me2NC6H4)2CHPh, the leuco base of Malachite Green.

leuco compounds [obsolete]
Dihydroxy polycyclic aromatic compounds which on oxidation form polycyclic quinone dyes(intermediates in vat dyeing). Use of this class name, which is more or less parochial to the technologyof dyes, is not endorsed.

leukotrienes
Linear C20 endogenous metabolites of arachidonic acid (icosa-5,8,11,14-tetraenoic acid) containinga terminal carboxy function and four or more double bonds (three or more of which are conjugated)as well as other functional groups. A subclass of icosanoids.

level
Logarithm of the ratio of a quantity and a reference value of that quantity.See: field level, power level



levelling effect
The tendency of a solvent to make all Brønsted acids whose acidity exceeds a certain value appearequally acidic. It is due to the complete transfer to a protophilic solvent of a hydron from a dissolvedacid stronger than the conjugate acid of the solvent. The only acid present to any significant extentin all such solutions is the lyonium ion. For example, the solvent water has a levelling effect onthe acidities of HClO4 , HCl and HI : aqueous solutions of these acids at the same (moderatelylow) concentrations have the same acidities. A corresponding levelling effect applies to strong basesprotogenic solvents.

Lewis acid
A molecular entity (and the corresponding chemical species ) that is an electron-pair acceptor andtherefore able to react with a Lewis base to form a Lewis adduct, by sharing the electron pair furnishedby the Lewis base. For example:See also: coordination, dipolar bond

Lewis acidity
The thermodynamic tendency of a substrate to act as a Lewis acid. Comparative measures of thisproperty are provided by the equilibrium constants for Lewis adduct formation of a series of Lewisacids with a common reference Lewis base.See also: acceptor number (AN), electrophilicity



Lewis base
A molecular entity (and the corresponding chemical species) able to provide a pair of electrons andthus capable of coordination to a Lewis acid, thereby producing a Lewis adduct.

Lewis basicity
The thermodynamic tendency of a substance to act as a Lewis base. Comparative measures of thisproperty are provided by the equilibrium constants for Lewis adduct formation for a series of Lewisbases with a common reference Lewis acid.See also: donor number (DN), nucleophilicity



Lewis octet rule
A classical rule for describing the electronic configuration of atoms in molecules: the maximumnumber of electron pairs that can be accommodated in the valence shell of a first-row element is four.For the second and subsequent row elements there are many exceptions to this rule.







ligand field
Ligand field theory is a modified crystal field theory that assigns certain parameters as variables ratherthan taking them as equal to the values found for free ions, thereby taking into account the potentialcovalent character of the metal-ligand bond.

ligand field splitting
The removal of a degeneracy of atomic or molecular levels in a molecule or ion with a given symmetry,induced by the attachment or removal of ligands to produce reduced symmetries.See: crystal field splitting





ligands
1.2.In an inorganic coordination entity, the atoms or groups joined to the central atom.



ligases (synthetases)
Enzymes that catalyse the ligation of two molecules with concomitant hydrolysis of the pyrophosphatebond in adenosine 5'-triphosphate (ATP) or a similar triphosphate, forming C–C , C–O , C–S , P–Oor C–N bonds. In recombinant DNA technology, ligases covalently join together two sequences ofDNA (e.g. host DNA and foreign DNA) by a phosphodiester bond.

ligate
To coordinate to a central atom as a ligand.

light polarization
A light beam is said to be linearly polarized if the end-point of the electric vector moves in a straightline when viewed along the direction of propagation of the beam. If it moves along a circle the beamis circularly polarized and if it moves along an ellipse the beam is elliptically polarized.Note:Circular polarization is said to be right-handed if the direction of rotation is clockwise when viewedagainst the direction of propagation and left-handed if the sense of the rotation is opposite. When theposition of the endpoint of the electric vector is viewed at a given time t as a function of distancealong x, it forms a left-handed helix if the light polarization is left-handed and a right-handed helixis it is right-handed.

light scattering
The redirection of a light beam due to interactions with molecules (Rayleigh and Raman scattering)and aerosols (Mie scattering). Scattered light received at any point in the atmosphere (sometimescalled sky radiation) is a very important component of the total radiation received from the sun; it isdependent on the solar zenith angle, elevation aerosol concentration etc.See also: elastic scattering

light source
See: lamp, laser

light-atom anomaly
A dynamical effect that arises for a processwhen the species A is light (e.g. a hydrogen atom) compared to B and C . The vibrational excitationof the product A–B is low, since the light atom A approaches to within the bonding distance of BCbefore the C atom retreats. The energy of reaction is therefore released as repulsion between A–B andC , with the result that there is translational excitation of the products.

light-emitting diode (LED)
Semiconductor (often a combination of gallium, arsenic and phosphorous or gallium and nitrogen)containing an n region (where electrons are more numerous than positive charges) separated from ap region (where positive charges are more numerous than negative charges). Upon application of avoltage, charges move and emission of ultraviolet, visible or infrared radiation is produced each timea charge recombination takes place. Although a LED emits incoherent monochromatic light, normallya very narrow frequency range is obtained.Notes:1. This effect is a form of electroluminescence.2. The colour depends on the semi-conducting material used, and can be ultraviolet, visible orinfrared.3. Organic light-emitting devices (OLEDs) contain diodes made of small molecules or made ofpolymeric materials. The latter are sometimes called PLEDs.

lignans
Also contains definition of: neolignansPlant products of low molecular weight formed primarily from oxidative coupling of two ppropylphenol moieties at their β carbon atoms; products with units coupled in other ways areneolignans, e.g.

lignins
Macromolecular constituents of wood related to lignans, composed of phenolic propylbenzeneskeletal units, linked at various sites and apparently randomly.





limiting adsorption current
The potential-independent value that is approached by an adsorption current as the rate of reductionor oxidation of the electroactive substance is increased by varying the applied potential. The termsadsorption current and limiting adsorption current should not be applied to faradaic currents thathave been increased or decreased by adding a non-electroactive surfactant to a solution containing anelectroactive substance, nor to apparent waves resulting from the effect of adsorption or desorptionon double-layer currents.

limiting catalytic current
The potential-independent value that is approached by a catalytic current as the rate of the chargetransfer process is increased by varying the applied potential.





limiting diffusion current
The potential-independent value that is approached by a diffusion current as the rate of the chargetransfer process is increased by varying the applied potential.

limiting kinetic current
The potential-independent value that is approached by a kinetic current as the rate of the chargetransfer process is increased by varying the applied potential.

limiting migration current
The limiting value of a migration current, which is approached as the rate of the charge-transferprocess is increased by varying the applied potential.





line repetition groups
The possible symmetries of arrays extending in one direction with a fixed repeating distance. Linearpolymer chains in the crystalline state must belong to one of the line repetition groups. Permittedsymmetry elements are: the identity operation (symbol l); the translation along the chain axis (symbolt); the mirror plane orthogonal to the chain axis (symbol ) and that containing the chain axis (symbol); the glide plane containing the chain axis (symbol ); the inversion centre, placed on the chain axis(symbol ); the two-fold axis orthogonal to the chain axis (symbol 2); the helical, or screw, symmetrywhere the axis of the helix coincides with the chain axis. In the latter case, the symbol is,where stands for the screw axis, is the class of the helix, * and / are separators, andis theintegral number of residues contained in turns, corresponding to the identity period ( and mustbe prime to each other). The class index may be dropped if deemed unnecessary, so that the helixmay also be simply denoted as.

line width
Width of a spectral line in terms of wavelength, frequency or wavenumber. Usually defined as full orhalf width of the line at half of the maximum intensity FWHM or HWHM, respectively).

line width
in Mössbauer spectroscopyThe full width at half maximum peak-height. The natural linewidth is the theoretical value of the fullwidth at half maximum of the nuclear transition, usually calculated from lifetime data.

line-of-centres model
A form of the collision theory of chemical reactions in which the assumption is made that reactioncan only occur if on collision the component of energy along the line of centres of the masses of thecolliding species is greater than a particular threshold energy.

line-shape analysis
Determination of rate constants for a chemical exchange from the shapes of spectroscopic lines ofdynamic processes. The method is most often used in nuclear magnetic resonance spectroscopy.

linear absorption coefficient
See: absorption coefficient

linear attenuation coefficient
See: attenuation coefficient

linear chain
A chain with no branch points intermediate between the boundary units.

linear chromatography
Chromatographic process, where the retention is governed by a linear distribution isotherm.

linear copolymer
A copolymer composed of linear macromolecules.







linear dispersion
See: dispersion (for spectroscopic instruments)



linear electron accelerator
An evacuated metal tube in which electrons pass through a series of small gaps (usually) in the formof cavity resonators in the high frequency range) so arranged and spaced that, at a specific excitationfrequency, the stream of electrons on passing through successive gaps gains additional energy fromthe electric field in each gap.

linear energy transfer
The average energy locally imparted to a medium by a charged particle of specified energy, per unitdistance traversed.

linear free-energy relation
Also contains definition of: linear Gibbs energy relationA linear correlation between the logarithm of a rate constant or equilibrium constant for one series ofreactions and the logarithm of the rate constant or equilibrium constant for a related series of reactions.Typical examples of such relations (also known as linear Gibbs energy relations) are the Brønstedrelation, and the Hammett equation (See also: σ-constant).The name arises because the logarithm of an equilibrium constant (at constant temperature andpressure) is proportional to a standard free energy (Gibbs energy) change, and the logarithm of a rateconstant is a linear function of the free energy (Gibbs energy) of activation.It has been suggested that this name should be replaced by linear Gibbs energy relation, but at presentthere is little sign of acceptance of this change.The area of physical organic chemistry which deals with such relations is commonly referred to as'Linear Free-Energy Relationships'.

linear macromolecule
A macromolecule the structure of which essentially comprises the multiple repetition in linearsequence of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of low relative molecular mass.

linear polarizer
An optical device which allows the transmission of radiation of which the electric vector is restrictedto one plane resulting in linearly polarized radiation.

linear polymer
A polymer composed of linear macromolecules.

linear pulse amplifier
A pulse amplifier which, within the limits of its normal operating characteristics, delivers an outputpulse of amplitude proportional to that of the input pulse.

linear range
Concentration range over which the intensity of the signal obtained is directly proportional to theconcentration of the species producing the signal.







lineic
Attribute to a physical quantity obtained by division by length. Lineic mass of a thread is the massof the thread divided by its length.

Lineweaver–Burk plot
A plot of the reciprocal of velocity of an enzyme-catalysed reaction (ordinate) versus the reciprocalof substrate concentration (abscissa). The plot is used to graphically define the maximum velocity ofan enzyme-catalysed reaction and the Michaelis constant for the enzyme.See also: Michaelis–Menten kinetics





lipids
A loosely defined term for substances of biological origin that are soluble in nonpolar solvents.They consist of saponifiable lipids, such as glycerides (fats and oils) and phospholipids, as well asnonsaponifiable lipids, principally steroids.

lipophilic
Literally 'fat-loving'. Applied to molecular entities (or parts of molecular entities) having a tendencyto dissolve in fat-like (e.g. hydrocarbon) solvents.See also: hydrophilic, hydrophobic interaction, lyophilic

lipophilicity
Lipophilicity represents the affinity of a molecule or a moiety for a lipophilic environment. It iscommonly measured by its distribution behaviour in a biphasic system, either liquid-liquid (e.g.,partition coefficient in 1-octanol/water) or solid-liquid (retention on reversed-phase high-performanceliquid chromatography (RP-HPLC) or thin-layer chromatography (TLC) system).

lipophobic
Literally, 'fat-rejecting'; the converse of lipophilic.

lipopolysaccharides
Natural compounds consisting of a trisaccharide repeating unit (two heptose units and octulosonicacid) with oligosaccharide side chains and 3-hydroxytetradecanoic acid units (they are a majorconstituent of the cell walls of Gram-negative bacteria).

lipoproteins
Clathrate complexes consisting of a lipid enwrapped in a protein host without covalent binding insuch a way that the complex has a hydrophilic outer surface consisting of all the protein and the polarends of any phospholipids.

liposome
Originally a lipid droplet in the endoplasmic reticulum of a fatty liver. Now applied to an artificiallyformed lipid droplet, small enough to form a relatively stable suspension in aqueous media and withpotential use in drug delivery.

Lippman's equation
An equation which gives the electric charge per unit area of an interface (electrode):whereis the interfacial tension,is the potential of a cell in which the reference electrode has aninterfacial equilibrium with one of the ionic components of A,interface,is the charge on unit area of theis the chemical potential of the combination of species whose net charge is zero,isthe thermodynamic temperature and is the external pressure. Since more than one type of referenceelectrode may be chosen, more than one quantitymay be obtained. Consequentlycannot beconsidered as equivalent to the physical charge on a particular region of the interphase. It is in fact analternative way of expressing a surface excess or combination of surface excess of charged species.

liquid chromatography (LC)
A separation technique in which the mobile phase is a liquid. Liquid chromatography can be carriedout either in a column or on a plane. Present-day liquid chromatography generally utilizing very smallparticles and a relatively high inlet pressure is often characterized by the term high-performance (orhigh-pressure) liquid chromatography, and the acronym HPLC.

liquid crystal
A substance in the liquid-crystalline state.

liquid excimer laser
A liquid laser in which excimer species in liquids are used as the active medium.

liquid ion exchange
A term used to describe a liquid-liquid extraction process that involves a transfer of ionic species fromthe extractant to the aqueous phase in exchange for ions from the aqueous phase. The term does notimply anything concerning the nature of the bonding in the extracted complex. The term solvent ionexchange is not recommended.

liquid ion laser
A liquid laser in which rare earth ions in solution are used as the laser active medium. An exampleis KrF in liquid Kr laser.

liquid junction
Any junction between two electrolyte solutions of different composition. Across such a junction therearises a potential difference, called the liquid junction potential. In the operational pH cell the junctionis between the test, or pH standard, solution and the filling solution or the bridge solution of thereference electrode.

liquid laser
A laser in which a liquid solution is the active species.

liquid membrane
Liquid phase existing either in supported or unsupported form that serves as a membrane barrierbetween two phases.

liquid scintillation detector
A scintillation detector in which the test portion is mixed with a liquid scintillator.







liquid-crystal polymer
A polymer material that, under suitable conditions of temperature, pressure, and concentration, existsas an LC mesophase.

liquid-crystal state
A mesomorphic state having long-range orientational order and either partial positional order orcomplete positional disorder.

liquid-crystal transitions
Also contains definitions of: cholesteric phase, nematic phaseA liquid crystal is a molecular crystal with properties that are both solid- and liquid-like. Liquidcrystals are composed predominantly of rod-like or disc-like molecules, that can exhibit one or moredifferent, ordered fluid phases as well as the isotropic fluid; the translational order is wholly or partiallydestroyed but a considerable degree of orientational order is retained on passing from the crystallineto the liquid phase in a mesomorphic transition.1. Transition to a nematic phase.A mesomorphic transition that occurs when a molecular crystal is heated to form a nematic phasein which the mean direction of the molecules is parallel or antiparallel to an axis known as thedirector.2. Transition to a cholesteric phase.A mesomorphic transition that occurs when a molecular crystal is heated to form a cholestericphase in which there is simply a spiralling of the local orientational order perpendicular to thelong axes of the molecules.3. Transition to a smectic state.A mesomorphic transition that occurs when a molecular crystal is heated to yield a smectic statein which there is a one-dimensional density wave which produces very soft/disordered layers.

liquid-crystalline phase
A phase occurring over a definite temperature range within the liquid-crystalline state.

liquid-crystalline polymer
Also contains definition of: liquid crystal polymerPolymeric material that, under suitable conditions of temperature, pressure, and concentration, existsas a liquid-crystalline mesophase.Notes:1. See also: liquid crystal.2. A liquid-crystalline polymer can exhibit one or more liquid state(s) with one- or two-dimensional,long-range orientational order over certain ranges of temperatures either in the melt (thermotropicliquid-crystalline polymer) or in solution (lyotropic liquid-crystalline polymer).

liquid-gel chromatography
Includes gel-permeation and ion-exchange chromatography. Liquid is the mobile phase, gel thestationary phase.



liquid-liquid extraction
This term may be used in place of liquid-liquid distribution when the emphasis is on the analyte(s)being distributed (or extracted).Note:The distinction between the distribution constant ( ) and the partition constant ( ) or theconcentration distribution ratio ( ) is reaffirmed and it is recommended that the terms partitionconstant, partition coefficient and extinction constant should not be used as synonyms for the(analytical) distribution ratio,. A distinction is drawn between the terms solvent and diluent, andthe term extractant is now restricted to the active substance in the solvent (i.e. the homogeneous'organic phase' which comprises the extractant, the diluent and/or the modifier) which is primarilyresponsible for the transfer of solute from the 'aqueous' to the 'organic' phase.



liquidus
A line on a binary phase diagram (or surface on a ternary phase diagram) that indicates thetemperature at which solidification begins on cooling or at which melting is completed on heatingunder equilibrium conditions.





litre
Non-SI unit of volume,. The other allowed symbol is .

live time
For a measurement, the time during which a radiation measuring assembly is capable of processingevents occurring in the radiation detector. It equals the clock time minus the integrated resolving ordead time (to be distinguished from 'life time').

living copolymerization
A copolymerization which is a living polymerization.

living polymer
Polymer with stable, polymerization-active sites formed by a chain polymerization in whichirreversible chain transfer and chain termination are absent.See also: living polymerization.

living polymerization
A chain polymerization from which chain transfer and chain termination are absent. In many cases,the rate of chain initiation is fast compared with the rate of chain propagation, so that the number ofkinetic-chain carriers is essentially constant throughout the polymerization.

load (on a precision balance)
The total weight acting, after counterbalancing, upon the terminal bearing which carries the objectbeing weighed.















localized adsorption
See: mobile adsorption, immobile adsorption





log-normal distribution
A distribution function, in which the logarithm of a quantity is normally distributed, i.e.whereis a Gaussian distribution. The size distributions of atmosphericaerosols are often described using this distribution function, although the term also applies to gaseouspollutants.



logit
In competitive binding assays, the logit-log dose relationship, in which the response is defined by:wherewith= fraction of tracer bound and= value ofwith no unlabelled ligand in the system. Logit transformed assay data frequently yield straight-linedose-response curves, amenable to statistical analysis.

London forces
Synonym: dispersion forcesAttractive forces between apolar molecules, due to their mutual polarizability. They are alsocomponents of the forces between polar molecules. Also called 'dispersion forces'.See also: van der Waals forces





lone (electron) pair
Two paired electrons localized in the valence shell on a single atom. Lone pairs should be designatedwith two dots. The term 'nonbonding electron pair' is more appropriate, and is found in many moderntext books.

long chain
A chain of high relative molecular mass.See: macromolecule (1)













Lorentzian band shape
This band shape is described by the function:whereis the mean band position,is the half band width at half maximum, andis thefrequency distribution function.See also: Gaussian band shape

Lorenz–Mie theory
Theory of light scattering by isotropic, homogeneous spheres.











low-spin state
When the separation between the highest occupied and the lowest unoccupied molecular orbitals isnot large, two alternative electronic states may be considered. The state with two electrons pairedup in the HOMO is called a low-spin state. The low-spin state is the ground state when the oneelectron energy needed to promote an electron to the LUMO is larger than the Coulomb and exchangerepulsion energies required to pair up two electrons in the HOMO.









luminance
Photometric counterpart of radiance, producing the visual sensation called brightness. Typical unitsare:( ),(),(). As with all photometricquantities, luminance does not refer to a specific wavelength, but applies to light emitted by astandard source (formerly a 'standard international candle', now a blackbody radiator emitting at thetemperature of solidifying platinum,). Conversion from photometric units to radiometricunits (e.g.) requires convolution over wavelength of the relative spectral response of the humaneye (photopic response tables).

luminescence
Spontaneous emission of radiation from an electronically or vibrationally excited species not inthermal equilibrium with its environment.See also: bioluminescence, chemiluminescence, electro-generated chemiluminescence, fluorescence,phosphorescence, photoluminescence, radioluminescence, sonoluminescence, thermoluminescence,triboluminescence.

luminescence quenching
Radiationless redistribution of excitation energy via interaction (electronic energy or charge transfer)between an emitting species and the quencher.

luminescence spectrometer
The instrument used to measure luminescence emission spectra.

luminous flux
Of a source of luminous intensityin an element of solid angleis given by.



luminous quantities
Group of quantities characterizing visible light in terms of the appearance to the human eye. Thesymbols of luminous quantities may be distinguished by adding a subscript v. The units for luminousquantities are derived from the SI base unit candela.See also: radiant quantities, photon quantities

lumiphore (luminophore)
A part of a molecular entity (or atom or group of atoms) in which electronic excitation associated witha given emission band is approximately localized. (Analogous to chromophore for absorption spectra).



lyases
Enzymes cleaving C–C, C–O, C–N and other bonds by other reactions than by hydrolysis or oxidation.Lyases catalyse the addition of molecules to unsaturated compounds or the elimination of moleculescreating an unsaturated residue.

lyate ion
The anion produced by hydron removal from a solvent molecule. For example, the hydroxide ion isthe lyate ion of water.

lyonium ion
The cation produced by hydronation of a solvent molecule. For example, (CH3OH2+) is the lyoniumion of methanol.See also: onium compounds

lyophilic
Also contains definition of: lyophobicThe terms lyophilic (hydrophilic, lipophilic, oleophilic, etc.) and lyophobic (lipophobic, etc.) may beused to describe the character of interaction of a particular atomic group with the medium. In thisusage the terms have the relative qualitative meaning of 'solvent preferring' (water-preferring, fatpreferring, etc.) and 'solvent rejecting' (water-rejecting, fat-rejecting, etc.) respectively.

lyophilic sols
These comprise both association colloids in which aggregates of small molecules are formedreversibly and macromolecules in which the molecules themselves are of colloidal size.

lyotropic mesophase
A mesophase formed by dissolving an amphiphilic mesogen in a suitable solvent, under appropriateconditions of concentration, temperature, and pressure.

lysimeter
Laboratory column of selected representative soil or a protected monolith of undisturbed field soilwith which it is possible to sample and monitor the movement of water and substances.





macrocycle
A cyclic macromolecule or a macromolecular cyclic portion of a macromolecule.Notes:1. See: chain (2)2. In the literature, the term 'macrocycle' is sometimes used for molecules of low molecular massthat would not be considered 'macromolecules' as specified in the definition given in this book.

macrolides
Macrocyclic lactones with a ring of twelve or more members.









macromonomer molecule
A macromolecule that has one end-group which enables it to act as a monomer molecule, contributingonly a single monomeric unit to a chain of the final macromolecule.





macroporous polymer
Glass or rubbery polymer that includes a large number of macropores (–in diameter)that persist when the polymer is immersed in solvents or in the dry state.Notes:1. Macroporous polymers are often network polymers produced in bead form. However, linearpolymers can also be prepared in the form of macroporous polymer beads.2. Macroporous polymers swell only slightly in solvents.3. Macroporous polymers are used, for example, as precursors for ion-exchange polymers, asadsorbents, as supports for catalysts or reagents, and as stationary phases in size-exclusionchromatography columns.4. Porous polymers with pore diameters from ca toare called mesoporous polymers.

macroradical
A macromolecule which is also a free radical.

macroscopic cross-section
The cross-section per unit volume of a given material for a specified process. For a pure nuclide, itis the product of the microscopic cross-section and the number of target nuclei per unit volume; fora mixture of nuclides, it is the sum of such products.





macroscopic kinetics
A term applied to a kinetic study in which the interest is in the behaviour of bulk systems, e.g. inchanges in concentrations of reactants and products.

magic angle
Upon excitation of an 'isotropic' sample (assuming an ultra short excitation pulse) the relationshipbetween the fluorescence intensity detected at a time and through a polarization analyser oriented atan angle with respect to the electric polarization of the exciting beam is given bywhereis the degree of alignment of the emitting transition dipole in the laboratory frame andis the excited-state population, both at time . For(the magic angle), the dipolealignment contribution vanishes and.Notes:1. This concept also applies for time-resolved absorption measurements in cases in whichphotoselection occurs because the detected species do not freely rotate fast enough to make themeasurement isotropic within the time of the experiment.2. Applies for steady-state measurements on fixed samples. In this case3.withthe intensity of the effect observed at an analyser angle with respect to the electricpolarization of the exciting beam, the excited-state population at steady-state equilibrium, andthe degree of alignment of the transition (dipole) moment of the excited molecular entity.The term magic angle is also used in NMR spectroscopy.

magnetic circular dichroism
Acronym: MCDMagnetic circular dichroism is observed when a sample differentially absorbs left- and rightcircularly polarized light in a magnetic field parallel to the light beam.Notes:1. The MCD signal, , is calculated as2.3.4.withandthe absorption coefficients for right and left circularly polarized light,respectively. The spectra are a representation ofvs wavelength. Often,is recorded as afunction of the applied field (up to) and the temperature.Phenomenon related to 'magnetically induced optical activity (Faraday effect)' by the 'KramersKronig transformations', which connect optical refraction and absorption, i.e., MCD is observedin optically active materials at wavelengths with non-vanishing absorption. It occurs fordiamagnetic, paramagnetic and (anti)-ferromagnetic material and has been observed from IR(infrared) to X-ray regions. MCD optical transitions in molecular species arise if (i) degenerateelectronic states are split in the presence of a magnetic field (first-order-Zeeman effect) or (ii)states are mixed together by the applied magnetic field (second-order-Zeeman effect). This mayoccur in the initial or the final states.MCD is used as a probe of paramagnetism that permits the identification of the electronicand magnetic properties of the ground states of transition metal ion centres. The wavelengthdependence of MCD can be used also to identify and assign optical transitions from metal ionsites.Technique complementary to both EPR and electronic absorption spectroscopies in facilitatingassignment of the ground-state spin and electronic transitions of a molecular entity.























magnetic transition
A transition between disordered and ordered arrays of atomic magnetic moments. Where the orderedphase has a net spontaneous magnetization,, the magnetic-ordering temperature is called aCurie temperature,; where the net spontaneous magnetization of the ordered phase remainszero, the ordering temperature is called a Néel temperature,. The temperature at which the twoferromagnetic subarrays of a ferrimagnet just cancel each other is called the compensation point.Materials exhibit ferromagnetic behaviour when unpaired electron spins are aligned in parallel,antiferromagnetic behaviour when the alignment is antiparallel, and ferrimagnetic behaviour if thealignment of the spins is antiparallel with unequal numbers in the two orientations or if the spinsare canted. Therefore, ferromagnetic, ferrimagnetic and weak ferromagnetic transitions involve a netmagnetic moment change, whereas antiferromagnetic transitions have zero net magnetic momentchange.Note:Antiferromagnetic order belowmay be complex; for example, canting of spins as in GdFeO3 ,spiral-spin configuration as may occur in MnO2 , and amplitude modulation, as in some rare-earthmetals.



magnetization transfer
NMR method for determining kinetics of chemical exchange by perturbing the magnetization of nucleiin a particular site or sites and following the rate at which magnetic equilibrium is restored. The mostcommon perturbations are saturation and inversion, and the corresponding techniques are often called'saturation transfer' and 'selective inversion-recovery'.See also: saturation transfer









mancude-ring systems
Synonym: mancunide-ring systemsRings having (formally) the maximum number of noncumulative double bonds, e.g. benzene, indene,indole, 4H-1,3-dioxine. Also called mancunide-ring systems.

manipulator
A hand-operated or -controlled device for remotely handling radioactive materials.





Marangoni effect
Motions of the surface of a liquid are coupled with those of the subsurface fluid or fluids, so thatmovements of the liquid normally produce stresses in the surface and vice versa. The movement of thesurface and of the entrained fluid(s) caused by surface tension gradients is called the Marangoni effect.





Marcus–Coltrin path
A path trajectory over a potential-energy surface which corresponds to the outermost vibrationalturning points for the molecular species involved. This path was suggested as a device for calculatingthe probability of quantum-mechanical tunnelling: the trajectory for the system is considered to followthis path.

Marcus–Hush relationship
Relationship between the barrier (optical charge-transfer transition () to thermal electron transfer, the energy of a corresponding), and the overall change in standard Gibbs energyaccompanying thermal electron transfer (). Assuming a quadratic relation between the energy ofthe system and its distortions from equilibrium (harmonic oscillator model) the expression obtained is:The simplest form of this expression obtains for degenerate electron transfer (symmetrical mixed valence systems:) in e.g.Note that for this situation the Marcus equation reads:

marker
1.2.3.(DNA) A fragment of known size used as reference for analytical purposes.(genetic) A gene with known phenotype and mapped position.(chromatography) A reference substance co-chromatographed with the sample to assist inidentifying the components.

Markownikoff rule
Also contains definition of: anti-Markownikoff addition'In the addition of hydrogen halides to unsymmetrically constituted [unsaturated] hydrocarbons, thehalogen atom becomes attached to the carbon bearing the lesser number of hydrogen atoms.' Originallyformulated by Markownikoff (Markovnikov) to generalize the orientation in additions of hydrogenhalides to simple alkenes, this rule has been extended to polar addition reactions as follows. 'In theheterolytic addition of a polar molecule to an alkene or alkyne, the more electronegative (nucleophilic)atom (or part) of the polar molecule becomes attached to the carbon atom bearing the smaller numberof hydrogen atoms.' This is an indirect statement of the common mechanistic observation, that themore electropositive (electrophilic) atom (or part) of the polar molecule becomes attached to the endof the multiple bond that would result in the more stable carbenium ion (whether or not a carbeniumion is actually formed as a reaction intermediate in the addition reaction). Addition in the oppositesense is commonly called 'anti-Markovnikov addition'.

Mark–Houwink equation
The equation describing the dependence of the intrinsic viscosity of a polymer on its relative molecularmass (molecular weight) and having the form:whereis the intrinsic viscosity, and are constants the values of which depend on the natureof the polymer and solvent as well as on temperature andis usually one of the relative molecularmass averages.Notes:1. The use of this equation with the relative molecular mass (molecular weight) is recommended,rather than with molar mass (which has the dimension of mass divided by amount of substance),since in the latter case the constant assumes awkward and variable dimensions owing to thefractional and variable nature of the exponent .2. Kuhn and Sakurada have also made important contributions and their names are sometimesincluded, as, for example, in the Kuhn–Mark–Houwink–Sakurada equation.

martensitic transition
A diffusionless transition (first studied in the steel alloy, Martensite), at constant composition,generated by coordinated atomic, ionic or molecular displacements over distances smaller thaninteratomic distances in the parent phase. The cooperative rearrangements of the crystal structuregenerally take place progressively by the movement of a two-dimensional interface through thesolid. Examples: The face-centred-cubic to body-centred-tetragonal transition of iron containing somecarbon; the transition of tetragonal ZrO2 to monoclinic ZrO2 .









mass density
See: density























mass spectrograph
An instrument in which beams of ions are separated (analysed) according to the quotient mass/charge,and in which the deflection and intensity of the beams are recorded directly on photographic plateor film.

mass spectrometer
An instrument in which beams of ions are separated (analysed) according to the quotient mass/charge,and in which the ions are measured electrically. This term should also be used when a scintillationdetector is employed.







mass spectrometry
The branch of science dealing with all aspects of mass spectroscopes and the results obtained withthese instruments.

mass spectroscope [obsolete]
A term (now essentially obsolete) which may refer to either a mass spectrometer or a massspectrograph.

mass spectroscopy
The study of systems by causing the formation of gaseous ions, with or without fragmentation, whichare then characterized by their mass-to-charge ratios and relative abundances.

mass spectrum
A spectrum which is obtained when a beam of ions is separated according to the mass-to-charge ( )ratios of the ionic species contained within it.









mass-distribution function
Synonym: weight-distribution functionA distribution function in which the relative amount of a portion of a substance with a specific value, ora weight distribution range of values, of the random variable(s) is expressed in terms of mass fraction.



mass-law effect
At equilibrium, the product of the activities (or concentrations) of the reacting species is constant.Thus for the equilibrium:See also: common-ion effect, equilibrium





massic
Attribute to a physical quantity obtained by division by mass; synonymous with specific.

massive transition
A transition in which a crystal structure is changed into a new structure during cooling or heating,predominantly by interface-controlled reactions and the usual nucleation and growth characteristicsassociated with thermal diffusion.











matrix isolation
A term which refers to the isolation of a reactive or unstable species by dilution in an inert matrix(argon, nitrogen, etc.), usually condensed on a window or in an optical cell at low temperature, topreserve its structure for identification by spectroscopic or other means.

Mattauch–Herzog geometry
An arrangement for a double-focusing mass spectrograph in which a deflection ofradial electrostatic field is followed by a magnetic deflection ofradians in aradians.





















































measurable quantity
An attribute of a substance which may be distinguished qualitatively and determined quantitatively.In the context of analytical chemistry, the attribute may refer to a physical quantity such as X- or γray energy, or it may refer to a measure of amount such as mass or concentration.

measurand
Particular quantity subject to measurement.







measurement
A description of a property of a system by means of a set of specified rules, that maps the property ontoa scale of specified values, by direct or 'mathematical' comparison with specified reference(s). Thedemand for rules makes 'measurement' a scientific concept in contrast to the mere colloquial senseof 'description'. However, in the present definition, 'measurement' has a wider meaning than given inelementary physics. Even a very incomplete description of, for instance, a patient (at a stated time)has to be given by a set of measurements, that are easier to manage and grasp.



measurement result
Also contains definitions of: bias, expectation value, expected value, limiting meanThe outcome of an analytical measurement (application of the chemical measurement process), orvalue attributed to a measurand. This may be the result of direct observation, but more commonly itis given as a statistical estimate derived from a set of observations. The distribution of such estimates(estimator distribution) characterizes the chemical measurement process, in contrast to a particularestimate, which constitutes an experimental result. Additional characteristics become evident if werepresent as follows:The true value, , is the value that would result if the chemical measurement process were errorfree. The error, , is the difference between an observed (estimated) value and the true value; i.e.(signed quantity). The total error generally has two components, bias ( ) and randomerror ( ), as indicated above. The limiting mean, , is the asymptotic value or population mean of thedistribution that characterizes the measured quantity; the value that is approached as the number ofobservations approaches infinity. Modern statistical terminology labels this quantity the expectationvalue or expected value,. The bias, , is the difference between the limiting mean and the truevalue; i.e.(signed quantity). The random error, , is the difference between an observedvalue and the limiting mean; i.e.(signed quantity).





mechanical entrapment
1.The process of random incorporation of comparatively small quantities of other phases (e.g.water, dust, particles, etc.) in the bulk of a precipitate during its formation.2.The deliberate capture of small quantities of such phases by the deliberate addition of solids toa liquid phase. (The term inclusion is not recommended).

mechanical hygrometer
An apparatus containing an element (hair, goldbeater's skin, carbon-film) whose dimension or massvaries as a function of its water content.



mechanism-based inhibition
Synonym: suicide inhibitionIrreversible inhibition of an enzyme due to its catalysis of the reaction of an artificial substrate. Alsocalled 'suicide inhibition'.



Mechano-chemical reaction
Chemical reaction that is induced by the direct absorption of mechanical energy.Note:Shearing, stretching, and grinding are typical methods for the mechano-chemical generation ofreactive sites, usually macroradicals, in polymer chains that undergo mechano-chemical reactions.

median
Depending on whether the number of observations is even or odd, the median can be estimated asfollows:1. If: The middle value of a series of observations, arranged in increasing ordecreasing order.2. If: The arithmetic mean of the two middle values of a series of observations, arrangedin increasing or decreasing order.Comment: The use of the median when reporting results of chemical analysis is generally notrecommended, because its statistical efficiency is less than that of the mean. In certain cases, however,especially when treating small sets of data, the median may offer advantages because it is a so-called'robust statistic', i.e. it offers considerable resistance to the effects of isolated outliers.















medium
The phase (and composition of the phase) in which chemical species and their reactions are studiedin a particular investigation.

medium effect
The medium effect on ionic species B due to transfer from solventto solvent(number) isdefined bywhereis the gas constant,potential of B in solventis the thermodynamic temperature andis the standard chemical(where = 1 or 2), the reference states being the same in both solvents.is not an exactly measurable quantity.





meiosis
The reductive cell division which results in daughter cells containing one copy of each of thechromosomes of the parent. The entire meiotic process involves two separate divisions (meiosis I andmeiosis II). The first division is a true reductive division with the chromosome number being halved,whereas the second division resembles mitosis in many ways. Thus, a diploid parental cell will giverise to haploid daughter cells (cf. ploidy).

Meisenheimer adduct
A cyclohexadienyl derivative formed as Lewis adduct from a nucleophile (Lewis base) and anaromatic or heteroaromatic compound, also called Jackson–Meisenheimer adduct. In earlier usage theterm 'Meisenheimer complex' was restricted to the typical Meisenheimer alkoxide adducts of nitrosubstituted aromatic ethers, e.g.Analogous cationic adducts, such as:considered to be reaction intermediates in electrophilic aromatic substitution reactions, are called'Wheland intermediates', and sometimes, inappropriately, σ-complexes.See also: σ-adduct

melting
The conversion of a solid to a liquid by the application of heat and/or pressure.Note:For a liquid crystal, melting occurs when the three-dimensional periodic structure of a solid collapsesto give a liquid-crystal phase in which the molecules have orientational order, but not long rangetranslational order.



membrane
Structure, having lateral dimensions much greater than its thickness, through which transfer may occurunder a variety of driving forces.

membrane emf
The potential differencebetween two saturated KCl bridges inserted into two solutions separatedby a membrane. The solutions need not be in equilibrium with one another and need not contain anycolloidal material.

membrane
in an ion-selective electrodeA general term which refers to a continuous layer, usually consisting of a semi-permeable material,with controlled permeability covering a structure, such as carbon or an inert metal, or separatingtwo electrolyte solutions. This latter case is the most general form of an ion-selective electrode. Themembrane separates the internal components of the ion-selective electrode from the test solution.The membrane of an ion-selective electrode is responsible for the EMF response and selectivityof the entire electrode. Comment: Membranes of sensor electrodes are thought to be practicallyhomogeneous, but an actual membrane may contain inhomogeneous regions, often at surfaces,and connected with materials and preparation methods used. Inhomogeneous regions include lowdielectric polymer regions with few charge sites and regions with high local site densities. Surfaceregions of plasticized liquid membranes often are low in sites and high in plasticizer or exudedimpurities.

membrane potential
Synonymous with membrane emf.









mercaptans [obsolete]
A traditional term abandoned by IUPAC, synonymous with thiols. This term is still widely used.

mercaptides [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for thiolates.

mercaptoles [obsolete]
An archaic term for dithioketals.See: thioacetals



mercury–xenon lamp
Synonym: mercury–xenon arcNon-coherent intense source of ultraviolet, visible, and near-infrared radiation produced by anelectrical discharge in a mixture of mercury vapour and xenon under high pressure.

mero
A prefix meaning part, partial or fragment, used in formation of compound words, e.g. merocyaninesare compounds related to cyanines but have a nitrogen atom at only one end of the chromogenicsystem instead of at both ends.



meso
A prefix to indicate the presence of a symmetry element of the second kind (see chirality) in a chemicalspecies which is usually one of a set of diastereoisomers that also includes a chiral member.See: meso-compound



meso-compound
A term for the achiral member(s) of a set of diastereoisomers which also includes one or more chiralmembers. For example:

mesogen
A compound that under suitable conditions of temperature, pressure, and concentration can exist asa mesophase or, in particular, as a liquid-crystal (LC) phase.

mesogenic group
A part of a molecule or macromolecule endowed with sufficient anisotropy in both attractive andrepulsive forces to contribute strongly to mesophase or, in particular, liquid-crystal mesophaseformation in low-molar-mass and polymeric substances.

mesogenic monomer
A monomer which can impart the properties of liquid crystals to the polymers formed by itspolymerization.

mesogenic pitch
A pitch with a complex mixture of numerous essentially aromatic hydrocarbons. It does not containanisotropic particles detectable by optical microscopy. Mesogenic pitch is low in quinoline-insolublefractions and capable of transforming into mesophase pitch during continuous heat treatment aboveby the formation of optically detectable carbonaceous mesophase.

mesoionic compounds
Dipolar five- (possibly six-) membered heterocyclic compounds in which both the negative andthe positive charge are delocalized, for which a totally covalent structure cannot be written, andwhich cannot be represented satisfactorily by any one polar structure. The formal positive charge isassociated with the ring atoms, and the formal negative charge is associated with ring atoms or anexocyclic nitrogen or chalcogen atom. Mesoionic compounds are a subclass of betaines.See also: munchnones, sydnones

mesolytic cleavage
Cleavage of a bond in a radical ion whereby a radical and an ion are formed. The term reflects themechanistic duality of the process, which can be viewed as homolytic or heterolytic depending onhow the electrons are attributed to the fragments.

mesomeric effect
Also contains definition of: resonance effectThe effect (on reaction rates, ionization equilibria, etc.) attributed to a substituent due to overlapof its p- or π-orbitals with the p- or π-orbitals of the rest of the molecular entity. Delocalization isthereby introduced or extended, and electronic charge may flow to or from the substituent. The effectis symbolized by M. Strictly understood, the mesomeric effect operates in the ground electronic stateof the molecule. When the molecule undergoes electronic excitation or its energy is increased onthe way to the transition state of a chemical reaction, the mesomeric effect may be enhanced by theelectromeric effect, but this term is not much used, and the mesomeric and electromeric effects tendto be subsumed in the term resonance effect of a substituent.See also: electronic effect, field effect, inductive effect

mesomerism
Essentially synonymous with resonance. The term is particularly associated with the picture of πelectrons as less localized in an actual molecule than in a Lewis formula. The term is intended to implythat the correct representation of a structure is intermediate between two or more Lewis formulae.See also: aromatic (2), delocalization

mesomorphic phase
Also contains definition of: nematic stateOften formed by concentrated systems of surfactants. These are states of matter in which anisometricmolecules (or particles) are regularly arranged in one (nematic state) or two (smectic state) directions,but randomly arranged in the remaining direction(s).

mesomorphic state
A state of matter in which the degree of molecular order is intermediate between the perfect threedimensional, long-range positional and orientational order found in solid crystals and the absence oflong-range order found in isotropic liquids, gases, and amorphous solids.

mesomorphic transition
A transition that occurs between a fully-ordered crystalline solid and an isotropic liquid. Mesomorphictransitions can occur (i) from a crystal to a liquid crystal (ii) from a liquid crystal to another liquidcrystal and (iii) from a liquid crystal to an isotropic liquid.See: liquid-crystal transitions



mesophase
A phase occurring over a definite range of temperature, pressure, or concentration within themesomorphic state.

mesophase pitch
A pitch with a complex mixture of numerous essentially aromatic hydrocarbons containing anisotropicliquid-crystalline particles (carbonaceous mesophase) detectable by optical microscopy and capableof coalescence into the bulk mesophase.Note:The carbonaceous mesophase particles are formed from the aromatics of high molecular mass inmesogenic pitch, which have not yet been aggregated to particles detectable by optical microscopywithin the apparently isotropic pitch matrix. The carbonaceous mesophase is insoluble in quinolineand pyridine, but the amount of mesophase measured from microscopical observation appearssomewhat higher because parts of the carbonaceous mesophase can be extracted by the solvents.



mesophiles
Microorganisms which grow at moderate temperatures in the rangeoptimum growth temperature in the range–.–, and which have an



mesoscale
In meteorology, the size or scale of phenomena smaller than ordinary cyclones or weather systems butlarger than such microscale phenomena as the thickness of the boundary layer, the wakes of objects,etc. Thunderstorms involve mesoscale processes, and other meteorological events the size of citiesare usually mesoscale processes.

mesosphere
That region of the atmosphere which lies above the stratopause (about) and below themesopause (about) and in which temperature decreases with increasing height; this is theregion in which the lowest temperatures of the atmosphere occur.

messenger RNA (mRNA)
An RNA molecule that transfers the coding information for protein synthesis from the chromosomesto the ribosomes. mRNA is formed from a DNA template by transcription. It may be a copy of a singlegene or of several adjacent genes (polycistronic mRNA). On the ribosome, the sequence is convertedinto the programmed amino acid sequence through translation.



metabolism
The entire physical and chemical processes involved in the maintenance and reproduction of life inwhich nutrients are broken down to generate energy and to give simpler molecules (catabolism) whichby themselves may be used to form more complex molecules (anabolism). In case of heterotrophicorganisms, the energy evolving from catabolic processes is made available for use by the organism.

metabolite
Any intermediate or product resulting from metabolism.





metallacycloalkanes
Monocyclic compounds containing a metal atom and saturated carbon atoms as ring members, e.g.:

metallocenes
Organometallic coordination compounds in which one atom of a transition metal such as iron,ruthenium or osmium is bonded to and only to the face of two cyclopentadienyl [η5-(C5H5)] ligandswhich lie in parallel planes. The term should not be used for analogues having rings other thancyclopentadienyl as ligands.

metalloenzyme
An enzyme that, in the active state, contains one or more metal ions which are essential for itsbiological function.

metallurgical coke
Metallurgical coke is produced by carbonization of coals or coal blends at temperatures up toto produce a macroporous carbon material of high strength and relatively large lump size.Note:Metallurgical cokes must have a high strength to support heavy loads in the blast furnace withoutdisintegration. Metallurgical coke is also used as filler coke for polygranular carbon products.

metal–carbene complexes
Synonym: carbene metal complexesMetal complexes of the type R2CMLn (M = metal, L = ligand) in which formally a carbene iscoordinated to a metal, e.g.

metal–carbyne complexes
Synonym: carbyne metal complexesMetal complexes of the type RCMLn (M = metal, L = ligand) in which formally a carbyne iscoordinated to a metal, e.g.

metal–insulator transition
Synonym: metal–nonmetal transitionA transition characterized by a sudden change in electrical transport properties (conductivity) due toa reversible change from localized to itinerant behaviour of the electrons. Example: The transitionatin VO2 where it changes from a high-temperature metallic behaviour to a low-temperaturesemiconductor behaviour. Synonymous with metal–nonmetal transition.See: localized-itinerant transition

metamagnetic transition
An antiferromagnetic to ferromagnetic transition forand/orwhereandrefer to the critical magnetic field and transition temperature, respectively.



metastable
See: metastable state in nuclear chemistry, metastable state in spectrochemistry, metastable ion inmass spectrometry, transient (chemical) species









methanogens
Strictly anaerobic archaebacteria, able to use only a very limited substrate spectrum (e.g. molecularhydrogen, formate, methanol, methylamine, carbon monoxide or acetate) as electron donors for thereduction of carbon dioxide to methane.





methylidyne
See: carbyne





micellar catalysis
The acceleration of a chemical reaction in solution by the addition of a surfactant at a concentrationhigher than its critical micelle concentration so that the reaction can proceed in the environmentof surfactant aggregates ( micelles ). (Rate enhancements may be due, for example, to higherconcentration of the reactants in that environment, more favourable orientation and solvation of thespecies, or enhanced rate constants in the micellar pseudophase of the surfactant aggregate.) Micelleformation can also lead to a decreased reaction rate.See also: catalyst

micellar mass
The term usually refers to a neutral micelle and therefore includes an equivalent amount of counterions with the surfactant ions.

micellar solubilization
Synonym: solubilizationIn a system formed by a solvent, an association colloid and at least one other component (thesolubilizate), the incorporation of this other component into or on the micelles is called micellarsolubilization, or, briefly, solubilization.

micelle
Surfactants in solution are often association colloids, that is, they tend to form aggregates of colloidaldimensions, which exist in equilibrium with the molecules or ions from which they are formed. Suchaggregates are termed micelles.See also: inverted micelle

micelle charge
Usually understood to include the net charge of the surfactant ions and the counterions bound to themicelle.



Michaelis–Menten kinetics
The dependence of an initial rate of reaction upon the concentration of a substrate S that is present inlarge excess over the concentration of an enzyme or other catalyst (or reagent) E with the appearanceof saturation behaviour following the Michaelis-Menten equation:,whereis the observed initial rate,is its limiting value at substrate saturation (i.e.andthe substrate concentration when. The definition is experimental, i.e. it applies to anyreaction that follows an equation of this general form. The symbolsfor. The parametersand),orare sometimes used(the 'Michaelis constant') of the equation can be evaluated fromthe slope and intercept of a linear plot ofvs.(a 'Lineweaver–Burk plot') or from slopeand intercept of a linear plot of vs.('Eadie–Hofstee plot'). A Michaelis–Menten equation is alsoapplicable to the condition where E is present in large excess, in which case the concentrationappears in the equation instead of. The term has sometimes been used to describe reactions thatproceed according to the scheme:in which case(Briggs–Haldane conditions). It has more usually been applied onlyto the special case in whichand; in this caseis a true dissociationconstant (Michaelis–Menten conditions).See also: rate-determining step





micro-network
Polymer network that has dimensions of the order ofto.Note:Modified from previous version. The definition proposed here is recommended as being more explicit.

microbial leaching
A process for the solubilization of metals, mostly from poor ores, by lithotrophic bacteria.

microcanonical rate constant
A rate constant calculated by microcanonical variational transition-state theory and therefore a rateconstant that relates to a fixed energy.







microdomain morphology
Morphology consisting of phase microdomains.Notes:1. Microdomain morphologies are usually observed in block, graft, and segmented copolymers.2. The type of morphology observed depends upon the relative abundance of the different types ofstructural units and the conditions for the generation of the morphology. The most commonlyobserved morphologies are spheres, cylinders, and lamellae.

microelectrophoresis
The electrophoresis technique involving the movement of a mass of particles on a small scale (e.g.paper electrophoresis).

microfiltration
Pressure-driven membrane-based separation process in which particles and dissolved macromoleculeslarger thanare rejected.

microgel
Also contains definition of: gel microparticleParticle of gel of any shape with an equivalent diameter of approximatelyto.Note:The definition proposed here is recommended for its precision and because it distinguishes betweena microgel and a nanogel.





microphotometer
The optical instrument used to measure transmittance in atomic emission spectroscopy.









microscopic chemical event
See: chemical reaction, molecularity





microscopic electrophoresis
A technique in which the electrophoresis of individual particles is observed with the aid of amicroscope or ultra-microscope.

microscopic film
A film which has lateral dimensions in the range–.

microscopic kinetics
This term applies to a kinetic study in which the emphasis is on the interpretation of the behaviourin terms of elementary reactions.See: macroscopic kinetics, molecular kinetics



microsome
Artefactual spherical particle, not present in the living cell, derived from pieces of the endoplasmicreticulum present in homogenates of tissues or cells: microsomes sediment from such homogenateswhen centrifuged atand higher: the microsomal fraction obtained in this way is often used asa source of mono-oxygenase enzymes.

microsyneresis
Syneresis in which the exudation of the liquid is from microscopic regions within a network.

middle atmosphere
The combined stratosphere and mesosphere in the atmosphere.

Mie scattering
The scattering of electromagnetic radiation by spherical particles of any size , relative to thewavelength, . Since the casesandare covered by Rayleigh (dipole) scattering andgeometric scattering theories, respectively, Mie scattering often refers to the case of.

migration
Also contains definition of: bond migration1.2.The (usually intramolecular) transfer of an atom or group during the course of a molecularrearrangement.The movement of a bond to a new position, within the same molecular entity is known as 'bondmigration'. Allylic rearrangements, e.g.exemplify both types of migration.

migration current
The difference between the current that is actually obtained, at any particular value of the potential ofthe indicator or working electrode, for the reduction or oxidation of an ionic electroactive substanceand the current that would be obtained, at the same potential, if there were no transport of thatsubstance due to the electric field between the electrodes. The sign convention regarding current issuch that the migration current is negative for the reduction of a cation or for the oxidation of an anion,and positive for the oxidation of a cation or the reduction of an anion. Hence the migration currentmay tend to either increase or decrease the total current observed. In any event the migration currentapproaches zero as the transport number of the electroactive substance is decreased by increasing theconcentration of the supporting electrolyte, and hence the conductivity





migratory aptitude
The term is applied to characterize the relative tendency of a group to participate in a rearrangement.In nucleophilic rearrangements ( migration to an electron-deficient centre), the migratory aptitude of agroup is loosely related to its capacity to stabilize a partial positive charge, but exceptions are known,and the position of hydrogen in the series is often unpredictable.

migratory insertion
A combination of migration and insertion. The term is mainly used in organometallic chemistry.

milli
SI prefix for(symbol:).



millimetre of mercury
Non-SI unit for pressure;but it is used for blood pressure.. This old unit is not recognized by CIPM or ISO,

milling (grinding)
The mechanical reduction of the particle size of a sample by attribution (friction), impact or cutting.The required particle size of a sample is related to the size of the test portion and the number ofparticles required to ensure homogeneity among test portions. The reduction in particle size maysometimes result in particles of different hardness and density, which produces inhomogeneity duringthe preparation of the test sample or during the withdrawal of the test portion.













miscibility
Capability of a mixture to form a single phase over certain ranges of temperature, pressure, andcomposition.Notes:1. Whether or not a single phase exists depends on the chemical structure, molar-mass distribution,and molecular architecture of the components present.2. The single phase in a mixture may be confirmed by light scattering, X-ray scattering, and neutronscattering.3. For a two-component mixture, a necessary and sufficient condition for stable or metastableequilibrium of a homogeneous single phase is,where4.is the Gibbs energy of mixing andthe composition, whereis usually takenas the volume fraction of one of the components. The system is unstable if the above secondderivative is negative. The borderline (spinodal) between metastable and unstable states isdefined by the above second derivative equalling zero. If the compositions of two conjugate(coexisting) phases become identical upon a change of temperature or pressure, the thirdderivative also equals zero (defining a critical state).If a mixture is thermodynamically metastable, it will demix if suitably nucleated. If a mixtureis thermodynamically unstable, it will demix by spinodal decomposition or by nucleation andgrowth if suitably nucleated, provided there is minimal kinetic hindrance.

miscibility gap
Area within the coexistence curve of an isobaric phase diagram (temperature vs composition) or anisothermal phase diagram (pressure vs composition).Note:A miscibility gap is observed at temperatures below an upper critical solution temperature (UCST)or above the lower critical solution temperature (LCST). Its location depends on pressure. In themiscibility gap, there are at least two phases coexisting.





mitosis
The process whereby a cell nucleus divides into two daughter nuclei, each having the same geneticcomplement as the parent cell.

mixed ceramic
Ceramic material consisting of co-continuous interpenetrating networks of two or more metalcarbides, nitrides or oxides.

mixed control
See: transport control





mixed indicator
An indicator containing a supplementary dye selected to heighten the overall colour change.

mixed labelled
A specifically labelled compound is referred to as mixed labelled when the isotopically substitutedcompound has more than one kind of modified atom e.g. CH3–CH2–[18O][2H].

mixed potential
The value of the potential of a given electrode with respect to a suitable reference electrode whenappreciable contributions to the total anodic and/or cathodic partial currents are made by speciesbelonging to two or more different couples, but the total current is zero, i.e.whereis the partial current of reaction

mixing control
The experimental limitation of the rate of reaction in solution by the rate of mixing of solutions ofthe two reactants. It can occur even when the reaction rate constant is several powers of 10 less thanthat for an encounter-controlled rate. Analogous (and even more important) effects of the limitationof reaction rates by the speed of mixing are encountered in heterogeneous (solid/liquid, solid/gas,liquid/gas) systems.See also: microscopic diffusion control, stopped flow







mixture
Portion of matter consisting of two or more chemical substances called constituents.

MLCT
Abbreviation for Metal to Ligand Charge Transfer.

mobile adsorption
Also contains definition of: non-localized adsorptionA situation in which molecules of adsorbate are free to move about the surface. Mobility of theadsorbate will increase with temperature and mobile adsorption may be either localized or nonlocalized. In localized mobile adsorption the adsorbate spends most of the time on the adsorption sitesbut can migrate or be desorbed and readsorbed elsewhere. In non-localized adsorption the mobilityis so great that a small fraction of the adsorbed species is on the desorption sites and a large fractionat other positions on the surface.







mobility (general)
Mass transport is described by a mobility , defined by:whereis the average drift velocity andis the force on particle .



Möbius aromaticity
A monocyclic array of orbitals in which there is a single out-of-phase overlap (or, more generally,an odd number of out-of-phase overlaps) reveals the opposite pattern of aromatic character toHückel systems; withelectrons it is stabilized (aromatic), whereas withit is destabilized(antiaromatic). In the excited stateMöbius π-electron systems are stabilized, andsystemsare destabilized. No examples of ground-state Möbius π-electron systems are known, but the concepthas been applied to transition states of pericyclic reactions [See: aromatic]. The name is derived fromthe topological analogy of such an arrangement of orbitals to a Möbius strip.See also: Hückelrule

mode
The value of the variable occurring with the greatest frequency in the series of observations. A bimodaldistribution is one which contains two maxima. The use of mode when reporting results of chemicalanalysis is generally not recommended.

mode-locked laser
A laser in which many resonant modes are coupled in phase, to yield a train of very short pulses(e.g. ps pulses). The coupling of the modes is obtained by modulation of the gain in the resonator,and can be active (electro-optic modulation of the losses or of the pump intensity), or passive (witha saturable absorber).See also: free-running laser

model network
Polymer network synthesized using a reactant or reactants of known molar mass or masses andchemical structure.Notes:1. A model network can be prepared using a non-linear polymerization or by crosslinking ofexisting polymer chains.2. A model network is not necessarily a perfect network. If a non-linear polymerization is used toprepare the network, non-stoichiometric amounts of reactants or incomplete reaction can lead to3.4.5.network containing loose ends. If the crosslinking of existing polymer chains is used to preparethe network, then two loose ends per existing polymer chain result. In the absence of chainentanglements, loose ends can never be elastically active network chains.In addition to loose ends, model networks usually contain ring structures as networkimperfections.Loose ends and ring structures reduce the concentration of elastically active network chains andresult in the shear modulus and Young´ s modulus of the rubbery networks being less than thevalues expected for a perfect network structure.Physical entanglements between network chains can lead to an increase in the concentration ofelastically active network chains and, hence, increases in the shear modulus and the Young´ smodulus above the values expected for a perfect network structure.







modified Arrhenius equation
This is an extension of the simple Arrhenius equation in which the pre-exponential factor isproportional towhere is the temperature and a constant:is a temperature-independent constant.

modified sample
A sample or a known fraction of the parent population in which the analyte has been isolated or(usually) concentrated before being submitted to the laboratory. If the isolation or concentration occursin the laboratory, the procedure is usually considered part of the preparation of the test sample fromthe laboratory sample (in-laboratory processing).







moiety
In physical organic chemistry moiety is generally used to signify part of a molecule, e.g. in an esterR1COOR2 the alcohol moiety is R2O. The term should not be used for a small fragment of a molecule.

MOL file format
The MOL file format is used to encode chemical structures, substructures and conformations as textbased connection tables. It is used by MDL Information Systems Inc. (e.g., in their MACCS or ISISprograms).

molfile
PAC, 1997, 69, 1137 (Glossary of terms used in computational drug design (IUPACRecommendations 1997)) on page 1147molal
See: molality



molar
Adjective before the name of an extensive quantity generally meaning division by amount of substanceto make it intensive. Molar volume is volume divided by amount of substance. In a few special casesmolar is used to denote division by amount concentration (e.g. molar absorption coefficient).













molarity
Term sometimes used for amount concentration.



molecular anion
See: molecular ion

molecular beams
Also contains definitions of: beam-gas experiments, crossed molecular beamsA molecular beam is produced by allowing a gas at higher pressure to expand through a small orificeinto a container at lower pressure. The result is a beam of particles (atoms, free radicals, moleculesor ions) moving at approximately equal velocities, with few collisions occurring between them.In a crossed molecular-beam experiment a reaction is studied using collimated beams of reactantmolecules. For a bimolecular reaction, beams of the two reactants are caused to impinge on oneanother, often at an angle of 90°. In a beam-gas scattering experiment a collimated beam is introducedinto a gas, and the scattering patterns are observed.

molecular cation
See: molecular ion



molecular connectivity index
A molecular connectivity index is a numeric descriptor derived from molecular topology.

molecular design
Molecular design is the application of all techniques leading to the discovery of new chemical entitieswith specific properties required for the intended application.

molecular dynamics
Synonymous with reaction dynamics.

molecular dynamics
in drug designMolecular dynamics is a simulation procedure consisting of the computation of the motion of atomsin a molecule or of individual atoms or molecules in solids, liquids and gases, according to Newton'slaws of motion. The forces acting on the atoms, required to simulate their motions, are generallycalculated using molecular mechanics force fields.



molecular formula
For compounds consisting of discrete molecules, a formula according with the relative molecularmass (or the structure).

molecular graph
The graph with differently labelled (coloured) vertices (chromatic graph) which represent differentkinds of atoms and differently labelled (coloured) edges related to different types of bonds. Withinthe topological electron distribution theory, a complete network of the bond paths for a given nuclearconfiguration.

molecular graph theory
The theory which deals with analyses of all consequences of connectivities inherent in molecularstructure and chemical transformations. The theory does not produce numerical data but uses availabledata and searches for regularities that can be attributed to combinatorial and topological origins.

molecular graphics
Molecular graphics is a technique for the visualization and manipulation of molecules on a graphicaldisplay device.





molecular laser
A gas laser which makes use of electronic, vibrational or rotational energy levels in molecules. Themolecules can be excited by an electric discharge, as in the case of the N2 or CO2 laser, by chemicalreactions, as in the HF or DF lasers, or by another laser, as in the CH3F far IR laser.





molecular modeling
Molecular modeling is the investigation of molecular structures and properties using computationalchemistry and graphical visualization techniques in order to provide a plausible three-dimensionalrepresentation under a given set of circumstances.





molecular orientation
Absorption probability (referred to electric dipolar absorption) for a molecular transition with itselectric transition (dipole) moment at an angle with the electric vector of the light is proportional to. For the whole sample it is proportional to the orientation factor, averagedover all sample molecules. This average is for a sample with all transition moments perfectly alignedalong the electric vector of the light,for an isotropic sample and for a sample where all transitionmoments are perpendicular to the electric vector.Notes:1.The directional cosines provide, especially for uniaxial samples, a simple description of exactlythose orientation properties of the sample that are relevant for light absorption. With the principalcoordinate system ( , , ), forming angleswith the light electric vector in thedirection, all orientation effects induced by light absorption are contained in. Since thesum of2.for three perpendicular molecular axes is equal to , only two independent parametersare required to describe the orientation effects on light absorption.A related, commonly used description is based on diagonalized Saupe matrices:The principal (molecular) coordinate system ( , , ) forming angleselectric vector should be chosen such that the matrix and the tensor3.with the lightare diagonal.To describe processes involving two or more photons, such as luminescence of a uniaxial, alignedsample, an expansion of the directional cosines to the fourth power is required.Order parameters (related to Wigner matrices) are an alternative to the directional cosine-baseddescription of molecular alignment. Order-parameter methods also work well for non-uniaxialsamples and provide a seemingly more complex, but in other ways convenient, description ofmolecular orientation distributions. Wigner matrices are used as a basis set for an expansion ofthe orientation–distribution function.

molecular rearrangement
Also contains definition of: principle of minimum structural changeThe term is traditionally applied to any reaction that involves a change of connectivity (sometimesincluding hydrogen), and violates the so-called 'principle of minimum structural change'. Accordingto this oversimplified principle, chemical species do not isomerize in the course of a transformation,e.g. substitution, or the change of a functional group of a chemical species into a different functionalgroup is not expected to involve the making or breaking of more than the minimum number of bondsrequired to effect that transformation. For example, any new substituents are expected to enter theprecise positions previously occupied by displaced groups. The simplest type of rearrangement is anintramolecular reaction in which the product is isomeric with the reactant (one type of 'intramolecularisomerization'). An example is the first step of the Claisen rearrangement:The definition of molecular rearrangement includes changes in which there is a migration of an atomor bond (unexpected on the basis of the principle of minimum structural change), as in the reaction:where the rearrangement stage can formally be represented as the '1,2-shift' of hydride betweenadjacent carbon atoms in the carbocation:Such migrations occur also in radicals, e.g.:The definition also includes reactions in which an entering group takes up a different position fromthe leaving group, with accompanying bond migration. An example of the latter type is the 'allylicrearrangement':A distinction is made between 'intramolecular rearrangements' (or 'true molecular rearrangements')and ' intermolecular rearrangements' (or 'apparent rearrangements'). In the former case the atomsand groups that are common to a reactant and a product never separate into independent fragmentsduring the rearrangement stage (i.e. the change is intramolecular), whereas in an 'intermolecularrearrangement' a migrating group is completely free from the parent molecule and is re-attached to adifferent position in a subsequent step, as in the Orton reaction:

molecular Rydberg state
An excited electronic state which is composed primarily of atomic orbitals with principal quantumnumbers greater than that of the ground state and the valence excited states. Such electronic statestypically have a large polarizability.

molecular shape
The molecular shape is an attribute of a molecule dealing with spatial extension, form, framework, orgeometry. It is often described by, e.g., principal axes, ovality, or connectivity indices.

molecular sieve effect
With respect to porous solids, the surface associated with pores communicating with the outside spacemay be called the internal surface. Because the accessibility of ores may depend on the size of thefluid molecules, the extent of the internal surface may depend on the size of the molecules comprisingthe fluid, and may be different for the various components of a fluid mixture. This effect is knownas the molecular sieve effect.

molecular spectra
Spectra formed by bands consisting of rotational lines originating from rotational, vibrational andelectronic transitions of molecules. These may be emission or absorption spectra.

molecular weight
See: relative molecular mass



molecularity
Also contains definitions of: bimolecular, termolecular, unimolecularThe number of reactant molecular entities that are involved in the 'microscopic chemical event'constituting an elementary reaction. (For reactions in solution this number is always taken to excludemolecular entities that form part of the medium and which are involved solely by virtue of theirsolvation of solutes.) A reaction with a molecularity of one is called 'unimolecular', one with amolecularity of two 'bimolecular' and of three 'termolecular'.See also: chemical reaction, order of reaction

molecule
An electrically neutral entity consisting of more than one atom (). Rigorously, a molecule, inwhichmust correspond to a depression on the potential energy surface that is deep enough toconfine at least one vibrational state.See also: molecular entity

molfile
A molfile is a table containing atom type, connectivity and a more or less arbitrary 2D or3D information about a molecule. Well-known file formats include the MOLfile used by MDLInformation Systems Inc. (e.g., in the database MACCS), the MOL2 file used by Tripos Associates(e.g., in the modeling package SYBYL), or the CSSR format.

MOL file format
PAC, 1997, 69, 1137 (Glossary of terms used in computational drug design (IUPACRecommendations 1997)) on page 1146molozonides
1,2,3-Trioxolanes, the primary products of the reaction of ozone at a carbon–carbon double bond.See: ozonides







momentum spectrum
A spectrum which is obtained when a beam of ions is separated according to the momentum-tocharge ratios of the ionic species contained within it. A sector magnetic field achieves separation ofthe various ionic species in this way. If the ion beam is homogeneous in translational energy, as isthe case with sector instruments, separation according to the ratios is also achieved and a massspectrum is obtained.

monitoring
Continuous or repeated observation, measurement, and evaluation of health and/or environmentalor technical data for defined purposes, according to prearranged schedules in space and time, usingcomparable methods for sensing and data collection.

mono-energetic radiation
Radiation consisting of particles of a single kinetic energy or photons of a single energy.

monochromator
Optical device that transmits a mechanically selectable narrow band of wavelengths ofelectromagnetic radiation chosen from a wider range of wavelengths available at the input.Note:To spatially separate the wavelengths, a monochromator can use either the phenomenon of opticaldispersion in a prism, or that of diffraction using a grating.





monodisperse polymer
See: uniform polymer

monoisotopic mass spectrum
A spectrum containing only ions made up of the principal isotopes of atoms making up the originalmolecule.

monolayer
Also contains definition of: floating monolayerA single, closely packed layer of atoms or molecules. The term floating monolayer is used for certainspread monolayers or films which are in the condensed — often solid — state. The term Langmuirmonolayer has recently been coined for spread monolayers. This usage is not recommended.

monolayer capacity
For chemisorption the amount of adsorbate which is needed to occupy all adsorption sites asdetermined by the structure of the adsorbent and by the chemical nature of the absorptive. Forphysisorption, the amount needed to cover the surface with a complete monolayer of atoms ormolecules in close-packed array, the kind of close packing having to be stated explicitly whennecessary.

monolith
Shaped, fabricated, intractable article with a homogeneous microstructure which does not exhibit anystructural components distinguishable by optical microscopy.Note:The article is usually fabricated by cold pressing or hot pressing of a polymeric material, or by usinga reactive processing technique such as reaction injection moulding, crosslinking, sol-gel processing,sintering, etc.

monomer
A substance composed of monomer molecules.

monomer molecule
A molecule which can undergo polymerization thereby contributing constitutional units to theessential structure of a macromolecule.



monosaccharides
A term which includes aldoses, ketoses and a wide variety of derivatives. Derivation includesoxidation, deoxygenation, introduction of other substituents, alkylation and acylation of hydroxygroups, and chain branching. E.g.See also: aldoketoses, uronic acids, amino sugars, saccharides, glycosides

monotectic reaction
The reversible transition, on cooling, of a liquid to a mixture of a second liquid and a solid:.

monotectoid reaction
A reaction in a system containing two solid solution phases,andin whichdecomposes intoand a new phase :

monotectoid temperature
The maximum temperature at which a monotectoid reaction can occur.

monoterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C10 skeleton.

monotropic transition
The irreversible transition from a metastable polymorphic form to the stable polymorph. Example:The transition of metastable CaCO3 (aragonite-type) to the stable CaCO3 (calcite-type).Note:For liquid crystals the term refers to a liquid crystal to liquid-crystal transition that occurs below themelting point and is revealed by supercooling of the crystal.





mordant
Substance that fixes a dyestuff in or on a material by combining with the dye to form an insolublecompound, used to fix or intensify stains in a tissue or cell preparation.





morphology
Shape, optical appearance, or form of phase domains in substances, such as high polymers, polymerblends, composites, and crystals.Note:For a polymer blend or composite, the morphology describes the structures and shapes observed, oftenby microscopy or scattering techniques, of the different phase domains present within the mixture.

morphology coarsening
Also contains definition of: phase ripeningProcess by which phase domains increase in size during the aging of a multiphase material.Notes:1. In the coarsening at the late stage of phase separation, volumes and compositions of phasedomains are conserved.2. Representative mechanisms for coarsening at the late stage of phase separation are: (1) materialflow in domains driven by interfacial tension (observed in a co-continuous morphology), (2)the growth of domain size by evaporation from smaller droplets and condensation into largerdroplets, and (3) coalescence (fusion) of more than two droplets. The mechanisms are usuallycalled (1) Siggia s mechanism, (2) Ostwald ripening (or the Lifshitz–Slyozov mechanism), and(3) coalescence.3. Morphology coarsening can be substantially stopped by, for example, vitrification, crosslinking,and pinning, the slowing down of molecular diffusion across domain interfaces.

morphotropic transition
An abrupt change in the structure of a solid solution with variation in composition.

Morse potential
The empirical function relating the potential energy of a molecule to the inter-atomic distance raccounting for the anharmonicity (See: harmonic approximation) of bond stretching:whereis the bond-dissociation energy,characteristic of a given molecule.is the equilibrium bond length, andis a parameter

Mössbauer effect
Resonance absorption of γ-radiation by nuclei arranged in a crystal lattice in such a way that the recoilmomentum is shared by many atoms.





Mott transition
Synonym: Mott–Hubbard transitionA transition occurring only in 'single-valent' systems from strongly correlated () to weaklycorrelated () electrons as a result of a change of bandwidth .reflects the strength ofthe interatomic interactions in a periodic array of like atoms and is a measure of the intra-atomicinteractions, i.e. the electrostatic energy involved in the creation of polar states by transferring anelectron from one atom to the next, as shown schematically by the disproportionation reaction:Aproduces a magnetic semiconductor; agives rise to a metal (normallynonmagnetic). Note also thatandcan be altered by changes in interatomic distances, broughtabout through temperature or pressure variations or by introducing an alloying element. Synonymouswith Mott–Hubbard transition.

mucopolysaccharides
Polysaccharides composed of alternating units from uronic acids and glycosamines, and commonlypartially esterified with sulfuric acid.



multi-centre bond
Representation of some molecular entities solely by localized two-electron two-centre bonds appearsto be unsatisfactory. Instead, multi-centre bonds have to be considered in which electron pairs occupyorbitals encompassing three or more atomic centres. Examples include the three-centre bonds indiborane, the delocalized π-bonding of benzene and bridged carbocations.

multi-centre reaction [obsolete]
A synonym for pericyclic reaction. The number of 'centres' is the number of atoms not bonded initially,between which single bonds are breaking or new bonds are formed in the transition state. This numberdoes not necessarily correspond to the ring size of the transition state for the pericyclic reaction. Thus,a Diels–Alder reaction is a 'four-centre reaction'. This terminology has largely been superseded by themore detailed one developed for the various pericyclic reactions.See: cycloaddition, sigmatropic rearrangement







multicoat morphology
Morphology observed in a blend of a block copolymer with the homopolymer of one of the blocksand characterized by alternating concentric shells of the copolymer and the homopolymer.Note:The morphology is identical to onion morphology within a matrix of homopolymer.





multienzyme complex
A multienzyme with catalytic domains on more than one type of polypeptide chain.

multienzyme polypeptide
A polypeptide chain containing at least two types of catalytic domains.

multilayer
A system of adjacent layers or monolayers. The term bilayer applies to the particular case of amultilayer two monolayers thick. Monolayers and multilayers may be alternatively named 'films'provided boundaries can be defined for them.

multilayer adsorption
Adsorption such that the adsorption space accommodates more than one layer of molecules, and notall adsorbed molecules are in contact with the surface layer of the adsorbent .



multiphase copolymer
Copolymer comprising phase-separated microdomains.

multiphoton absorption
See: multiphoton processSee also: biphotonic excitation



multiphoton process
A process involving interaction of two or more photons with a molecular entity.See: biphotonic process, two-photon process





multiple scattering
Successive rescattering of radiation within the scattering medium.See also: light scattering



multiplex spectrometer
A spectrometer in which a single photodetector simultaneously receives signals from different spectralbands which are specifically encoded. In the case of frequency multiplexing, each spectral bandis modulated at a specific frequency. Decoding is achieved by filtering out, by electronic means,the corresponding signals. Frequency multiplexing may be realized by changing the path differencebetween the two interfering beams at a uniform rate. Fourier transform of the interferogram soobtained yields the spectrum. This method is called Fourier transform spectrometry (FTS).











multistage sampling
Samples taken in a series of steps with the sampling portions constituting the sample (units orincrements) at each step being selected from the larger or greater number of portions of the previousstep, or from a primary or composite sample. The first set of portions (units or increments) taken fromthe population available for sampling is the primary sample. The subsequent samples (secondary,tertiary, etc.) are the sets of subsamples, units, items, individuals or increments taken from thepreceding step. The units may be different steps of multistage sampling (e.g. pallets, cases, packages).

multivariate statistics
Multivariate statistics is a set of statistical tools to analyze data (e.g., chemical and biological) matricesusing regression and/or pattern recognition techniques.

munchnones
Mesoionic compounds having a 1,3-oxazole skeleton bearing an oxygen atom attached to the 5position with the following delocalized structure:

muonium
Atom-like particle consisting of a positive muon and an electron.

mustard oils [obsolete]
An archaic term for isothiocyanates, RN=C=S.

mustards
Also contains definition of: nitrogen mustardsCompounds having two β-haloalkyl groups bound to a sulfur atom, as in (XC2H2C2H2)2S, and theiranalogues, the nitrogen (and phosphorus) mustards, (XC2H2C2H2)2NR. Compounds having one βhaloalkyl group and one β-hydroxyalkyl group on S are termed hemi- or semi-mustards by somechemists.

mutagen
Agent that can induce heritable changes (mutations) of the genotype in a cell as a consequence ofalterations or loss of genetic material.

mutagenesis
The introduction of permanant heritable changes i.e. mutations into the DNA of an organism.

mutarotation
The change in optical rotation accompanying epimerization. In sugar chemistry this term usuallyrefers to epimerization at the hemiacetal carbon atom.

mutation
A heritable change in the nucleotide sequence of genomic DNA (or RNA in RNA viruses), or in thenumber of genes or chromosomes in a cell, which may occur spontaneously or be brought about bychemical mutagens or by radiation (induced mutation).





Myelin cylinders
Birefringent cylinders which form spontaneously from lipid-containing material in contact with water.

n → π* state
An excited state related to the ground state by a n → π* transition.

n → π* transition
An electronic transition described approximately as promotion of an electron from a 'nonbonding' (lone-pair) n orbital to an 'antibonding' π orbital designated as π*.

n → σ* transition
An electronic transition described approximately as promotion of an electron from a 'nonbonding' (lone-pair) n orbital to an 'antibonding ' σ orbital designated as σ*. Such transitions generallyinvolve high transition energies and appear close to or mixed with Rydberg transitions.



nano
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

nanocomposite
Composite in which at least one of the phase domains has at least one dimension of the order ofnanometres.

nanodomain morphology
Morphology consisting of phase nanodomains.

nanofiltration
Pressure-driven membrane-based separation process in which particles and dissolved macromoleculessmaller thanare rejected.

nanogel
Also contains definition of: gel nanoparticleParticle of gel of any shape with an equivalent diameter of approximatelyto.

nanoscopic film
A film which has lateral dimensions in the range of–.

naphthenes [obsolete]
Cycloalkanes especially cyclopentane, cyclohexane and their alkyl derivatives. The term seems to beobsolescent, except in the petrochemical industry.

naphthenic acids [obsolete]
Acids chiefly monocarboxylic, derived from naphthene. The term seems to be obsolescent, except inthe petrochemical industry.

narcissistic reaction [obsolete]
A chemical reaction that can be described as the conversion of a reactant into its mirror image, withoutrotation or translation of the product, so that the product enantiomer actually coincides with the mirrorimage of the reactant molecule. Examples of such reactions are cited under the entries fluxional anddegenerate rearrangement.

natural atomic orbital (NAO)
A valence-shell atomic orbital whose derivation involves diagonalising the localized block of thefull density matrix of a given molecule associated with basis functionson that atom. Adistinguishing feature of NAOs is that they meet the simultaneous requirement of orthonormalityand maximum occupancy. For isolated atoms, NAOs coincide with natural orbitals. In a polyatomicmolecule the NAOs (in contrast to natural orbitals that become delocalised over all nuclear centres)mostly retain one-centre character, and thus are optimal for describing the molecular electron densityaround each atomic centre.

natural bond orbital (NBO)
The orbital which is formed from natural hybrid orbitals. For a localized σ-bond between atoms Aand B, the NBO is:whereandare the natural hybrids centred on atoms A and B. NBOs closely correspond to thepicture of localized bonds and lone pairs as basic units of molecular structure, so that is possible toconveniently interpret ab initio wave-functions in terms of the classical Lewis structure concepts bytransforming these functions to NBO form.





natural hybrid orbital (NHO)
Symmetrically orthogonalised directed hybrid orbital derived through unitary transformation ofnatural atomic orbitals centred on a particular atom.

natural isotopic abundance
Of a specified isotope of an element, the isotopic abundance in the element as found in nature.

natural orbital
The orbitals defined (P. Lowdin) as the eigenfunctions of the spinless one-particle electron densitymatrix. For a configuration interaction wave-function constructed from orbitals , the electron densityfunction, , is of the form:where the coefficientsdensity matrixare a set of numbers which form the density matrix. The NOs reduce theto a diagonal form:where the coefficientsare occupation numbers of each orbital. The importance of natural orbitalsis in the fact that CI expansions based on these orbitals have generally the fastest convergence. If aCI calculation was carried out in terms of an arbitrary basis set and the subsequent diagonalisation ofthe density matrixgave the natural orbitals, the same calculation repeated in terms of the naturalorbitals thus obtained would lead to the wave-function for which only those configurations built upfrom natural orbitals with large occupation numbers were important.





natural radioactivity
Radioactivity of naturally occurring nuclides in materials where the isotopic abundance of that nuclideis natural.

necrosis
Sum of morphological changes resulting from cell death by lysis and/or enzymatic degradation,usually affecting groups of cells in a tissue.

needle coke
The commonly used term for a special type of coke with extremely high graphitizability resultingfrom a strong preferred parallel orientation of its turbostratic layer structure and a particular physicalshape of the grains.Note:Needle coke is derived mainly from clean (i.e. lacking hetero atoms and solids) and highly aromatic(i.e. several condensed rings per cluster) feedstocks with a very low concentration of insolubles. Uponsolidification a material with a distinctive streaked or flow-like macroscopic appearance is produced.Upon grinding the coke breaks up first into macroscopic needles and then, after further grinding, intomicroplatelets. Sometimes the word 'acicular' is used as a synonym for needle-like.

negative adsorption
The depletion of one or more components in an interfacial layer.

negative hyper-conjugation
The effect of donation of electron density from filled π or nπ-orbitals to the symmetry adaptedσ*-orbital(s) of σ-bond(s) of a molecular entity resulting in building π-character into bonds thatnominally possess only σ-character. The consequences of the effect are, for example, in elongationof the C–F bond in the β-fluoroethyl anion and stabilization of the anti-periplanar conformation offluoromethylamine.











nephelometry
Analytical methods which depend on the measurement of the intensity of scattered light emanatingfrom an illuminated volume of an aerosol. The ratio of scattered intensity to illuminating intensity iscompared with a standard of known properties.

Nernst's diffusion layer
Also contains definition of: effective thickness of diffusion layerA fictitious layer corresponding to the dotted straight lines of the diagram which shows theconcentration profile along the direction perpendicular to an electrode surface. The thickness of thislayer is called the effective (or equivalent) thickness of the diffusion layer. Its definition is apparentfrom the figure. It is the thickness which the diffusion layer would have if the concentration profilewere a straight line coinciding with the tangent to the true concentration profile at the interface, andthat straight line were extended up to the point where the bulk concentration is reached. has a formalsignificance only. It is simply another way of writing the mass transfer coefficient defined in termsof a resistivity instead of a conductivity.

net current
The sum of cathodic and anodic partial currents.





net shaping
Production of an object in, or as close as possible to, its final shape prior to ceramization.

network
Highly ramified structure in which essentially each constitutional unit is connected to each otherconstitutional unit and to the macroscopic phase boundary by many paths through the structure, thenumber of such paths increasing with the average number of intervening constitutional units; the pathsmust on average be co-extensive with the structure.Notes:1. Usually, and in all systems that exhibit rubber elasticity, the number of distinct paths is veryhigh, but, in most cases, some constitutional units exist that are connected by a single path only.2. Modified from previous definition. The definition proposed here is a generalization to cover bothpolymeric networks and networks comprised of particles.

network defect
Elastically ineffective chains in a polymer network.Note:A network defect is caused by a loose end or a cyclic structure.

network
Also contains definition of: covalent networkin polymer chemistryA highly ramified macromolecule in which essentially each constitutional unit is connected to eachother constitutional unit and to the macroscopic phase boundary by many permanent paths through themacromolecule, the number of such paths increasing with the average number of intervening bonds;the paths must on the average be co-extensive with the macromolecule.Notes:1. Usually, and in all systems that exhibit rubber elasticity, the number of distinct paths is very high,but, in most cases, some constitutional units exist which are connected by a single path only.2. If the permanent paths through the structure of a network are all formed by covalent bonds, theterm covalent network may be used.3. The term physical network may be used if the permanent paths through the structure of a networkare not all formed by covalent bonds but, at least in part, by physical interactions, such thatremoval of the interactions leaves individual macromolecules or a macromolecule that is not anetwork.







neutrino (electron neutrino)
An elementary particle of negligible mass and zero electric charge. There are also a muon neutrinoand tau neutrino.

neutron
Nuclear particle of zero charge, spin quantum numberand a mass of.

neutron density
The number of free neutrons divided by the containing volume. Partial densities may be defined forneutrons characterized by such parameters as energy and directions.

neutron multiplication
The process in which a neutron produces on the average more than one neutron in a medium containingfissile material.



neutron rest mass
Atomic fundamental physical constant.

neutron temperature
The temperature assigned to a population of neutrons when this population is approximated by aMaxwellian distribution.

neutrophilic organisms
Organisms preferring a neutral medium for growth.

Newman projection
A projection formula representing the spatial arrangement of bonds on two adjacent atoms in amolecular entity. The structure appears as viewed along the bond between these two atoms, and thebonds from them to other groups are drawn as projections in the plane of the paper. The bonds fromthe atom nearer to the observer are drawn so as to meet at the centre of a circle representing that atom.Those from the further atom are drawn as if projecting from behind the circle.



Newton black film
In soap films, two types of equilibrium film are often observed, sometimes successively in the samesystem: one characterized by thicknesses of the order ofor more which varies significantly withminor changes in composition such as ionic strength, and the other having a lesser thickness relativelyindependent of such changes. When a distinction is needed, the former are designated as commonblack films, and the latter as Newton black films. The current use of first or secondary for the commonblack film and of second, primary or Perrin's for the Newton black film is discouraged.

Newton diagram
A vector diagram used to show the relationship between initial and final velocities or momentain a two-particle scattering process. It is commonly used to relate laboratory and centre-of-masscoordinates.

Newtonian fluid
A fluid in which the components of the stress tensor are linear functions of the first spatial derivativesof the velocity components. These functions involve two material parameters (taken as constantsthroughout the fluid, although depending on ambient temperature and pressure).



Nier–Johnson geometry
An arrangement for a double-focusing mass spectrometer in which a deflection ofradians in a radialelectrostatic field analyser is followed by a magnetic deflection of radians. The electrostatic analyseruses a symmetrical object-image arrangement and the magnetic analyser is used asymmetrically.

NIH shift
The intramolecular hydrogen migration which can be observed in enzymatic and chemicalhydroxylations of aromatic rings. It is evidenced by appropriate deuterium labelling, i.e.In enzymatic reactions the NIH shift is generally thought to derive from the rearrangement of areneoxide intermediates, but other pathways have been suggested. (NIH stands for U.S. National Institutesof Health where the shift was discovered.)



nitramines
Amines substituted at N with a nitro group (a contracted form of N-nitroamines); they are thusamides of nitric acid, and the class is composed of nitramide, O2NNH2, and its derivatives formedby substitution.

nitrenes
Synonym: aminylenes1.2.The neutral compound HN: having univalent nitrogen, and its derivatives RN. Aminylenes is arecognized but less widely used synonym. Other names that have been used include aminediyls,imidogens, azenes. They may exist in either a singlet or a triplet electronic state (four spin-pairedelectrons, or two spin-paired and two with parallel spins, respectively), e.g. CH3N: methylnitrene.Until the 1960s, nitrenes had a totally different meaning: analogues of nitrones in which thedouble-bonded oxygen is replaced by double-bonded carbon, thus azomethine ylides.See: carbenes

nitrenium ions
Synonym: aminylium ionsThe cation (H2N:+) and its N-hydrocarbyl derivatives (R2N:+), in which the nitrogen has a positivecharge, and two unshared electrons. A synonymous but less widely used term is aminylium ions. Thealkylidene derivatives of (H2N:+), (R2C=N:+), still belong to the class nitrenium ions, but are moreprecisely designated by the term iminylium ions.

nitrification
Sequential oxidation of ammonium salts to nitrite and nitrate by microorganisms.

nitrile imides
Synonym: nitriliminesYlideshavingtheknown as nitrile imines or nitrilimines, especially in the German literature.See also: dipolar compoundsstructure.Also

nitrile imines
See: nitrile imides, imides (2)

nitrile oxides
Ylides having the structureSee also: dipolar compounds.

nitrile sulfides
Sulfur analogues of nitrile oxidesSee also: dipolar compounds.

nitrile ylides
Also contains definition of: alkylideneamino carbenes1,3-Dipolar compounds having the structure:The uncharged canonical formis called an alkylidene- (or hydrocarbylidene-)amino carbene; the name iminyl carbene is incorrect because iminyl is not a recognized prefix for–N=CR2.See also: carbenes

nitriles
Compounds having the structure RC≡N; thus C-substituted derivatives of hydrocyanic acid, HC≡N.In systematic nomenclature, the suffix nitrile denotes the triply bound ≡N atom, not the carbon atomattached to it.See also: cyanides, isocyanides, carbonitriles

nitrilium betaines
Derivatives of nitriles having the general structure R–C≡N+–Y−. A subclass of 1,3-dipolarcompounds including nitrile imides, nitrile oxides, nitrile sulfides and nitrile ylides.

nitrilium ions
Cations derived formally by attachment of one hydron to the nitrogen atom of a nitrile and hydrocarbylderivatives thereof. E.g.benzonitrilium.

nitrimines
Compounds having the structure O2NN=CR2 (also called N-nitroimines).

nitro compounds
Compounds having the nitro group, –NO2 (free valence on nitrogen), which may be attached tocarbon, nitrogen (as in nitramines), or oxygen (as in nitrates), among other elements (in the absenceof specification, C-nitro compounds are usually implied).See also: dipolar compounds

nitrogen fixation
The assimilation of atmospheric nitrogen by microbial reduction to ammonia and conversion intoorganonitrogen compounds such as amino acids. Only a limited number of microorganisms are ableto fix nitrogen.

nitrogen laser
A source of pulsed semi-coherent superradiance mainly aroundmolecular nitrogen.See: gas lasers. The lasing species is

nitrolic acids
Compounds having the structure RC(=NOH)NO2.

nitrones
The N-oxides of imines, that have the structure R2C=N+(O−)R' (R' ≠ H). Synonymous withazomethine oxides. N-Oxides R2C=N+(O−)H may be included.See also: dipolar compounds

nitrosamides
Although this term has, regrettably, been used to mean the N-nitroso derivatives of amides, logically itrefers to amides of nitrous acid; the unstable parent compound H2NNO is, in fact, named nitrosamide,but its derivatives formed by substitution with hydrocarbyl groups are by long custom callednitrosamines.See also: nitramines

nitrosamines
N-Nitroso amines, compounds of the structure R2NNO. Compounds RNHNO are not ordinarilyisolable, but they, too, are nitrosamines. The name is a contraction of N-nitrosoamine and, as such,does not require the N locant.See also: nitrosamides

nitrosimines
N-Nitroso imines O=NN=CR2.

nitroso compounds
Compounds having the nitroso group, –NO. attached to carbon, or to another element, most commonlynitrogen or oxygen.See: nitrosamines

nitrosolic acids
Compounds having the structure RC(=NOH)NO.

nitroxides
Nitroxide is the parent name used by Chemical Abstracts Service for H2N–O., e.g. (ClCH2)2N–O.bis(chloromethyl) nitroxide. The IUPAC name is bis(chloromethyl)aminoxyl. Nitroxides should notbe used as a class name for aminoxyl radicals.See: aminoxyl radicals



no carrier added
A preparation of a radioactive isotope which is essentially free from stable isotopes of the elementin question.



no-bond resonance
See: hyperconjugation







noise
The random fluctuations occurring in a signal that are inherent in the combination of instrument andmethod.



nominally labelled tracer
A tracer in which the label is present mainly in a specified position.



non-crossing rule
Electronic states of the same symmetry cannot cross along a reaction coordinate.Note:Only applies to diatomic molecules and not to polyatomic molecules.

non-crystalline electrodes
Electrodes in which a support matrix, containing an ion exchanger (either cationic or anionic), aplasticizer solvent, and possibly an uncharged, selectivity-enhancing species, forms the ion-selectivemembrane which is usually interposed between two aqueous solutions. The support used can be eithermacroporous [e.g. poly(propylene carbonate) filter, glass frit, etc.] or microporous (e.g. 'thirsty' glassor inert polymeric material such as PVC) yielding with the ion-exchanger and the solvent a 'solidified'homogeneous mixture. These electrodes exhibit a response due to the presence of the ion-exchangematerial in the membrane. The solvent-polymeric-membrane is an example.







non-equilibrium reaction
If the reactants in a chemical reaction are not initially present in a Boltzmann distribution the reactionis referred to as a non-equilibrium reaction.See: equilibrium reaction

non-graphitic carbon
All varieties of solids consisting mainly of the element carbon with two-dimensional long-range orderof the carbon atoms in planar hexagonal networks, but without any measurable crystallographic orderin the third direction (c-direction) apart from more or less parallel stacking.Note:Some varieties of non-graphitic carbon convert on heat treatment to graphitic carbon (graphitizablecarbon) but some others do not (non-graphitizable carbon).See also: amorphous carbon

non-graphitizable carbon
A non-graphitic carbon which cannot be transformed into graphitic carbon solely by high-temperaturetreatment up tounder atmospheric pressure or lower pressure.Note:The term non-graphitizable is limited to the result of heat treatment without additional influence offoreign matter or neutron radiation. Non-graphitizable carbon can be transformed into graphitic carbonby a high-temperature process via intermediate dissolution in foreign matter and precipitation underhigh pressure or by radiation damage.





non-ideal chromatography
Chromatographic process with normal peak-broadening effects.

non-isotopic labelling
Labelling in which the resulting product has a different chemical composition from the initial one.

non-Kekulé molecules
Molecules that are fully conjugated, but each of whose Kekulé structures contains at least twoatoms that are not π-bonded. Examples of non-Kekule hydrocarbons are trimethylenemethane (2methylidenepropane-1,3-diyl) 1, m-benzodiquinomethane (benzene-1,2-diyldimethyl) 2, and 1,2,4,5- tetramethylenebenzene (benzene-1,2,4,5-tetrayltetramethyl) 3.

non-linear chromatography
Chromatographic process, where the retention is governed by a non-linear distribution isotherm.



non-linear optical effect
An effect brought about by electromagnetic radiation the magnitude of which is not proportional tothe irradiance. Non-linear optical effects of importance to photochemistry are harmonic frequencygeneration, lasers, Raman shifting, upconversion, and others.

non-linear optical polymer
Polymer that exhibits an optical effect brought about by electromagnetic radiation such that themagnitude of the effect is not proportional to the irradiance.Notes:1. See also: non-linear optical effect.2. An example of non-linear optical effects is the generation of higher harmonics of the incidentlight wave.3. A polymer that exhibits a non-linear optical effect due to anisotropic electric susceptibilitieswhen subjected to electric field together with light irradiation is called an electro-optical polymer.A polymer that exhibits electro-optical behavior combined with photoconductivity is called aphoto-refractive polymer.

non-linear optical techniques
Collective name applied to techniques related to non-linear optical effects.Notes:1. Some of these spectroscopies are four-wave mixing, hole burning, photon echoes, timeresolved coherent anti-Stokes Raman (CARS), transient grating and stimulated pumping. Thesetechniques differ in the nature of the pulse sequence, the geometry and the choice of a spatialdirection (phase matching), as well as the mode of detection.2. Low order non-linear techniques, such as three-wave mixing, are related to the secondorder polarization. For a random isotropic medium with inversion symmetry, the secondorder polarization vanishes and then the lowest order optical non-linear techniques, as wellas the higher order non-linear techniques are related to the third-order polarization and thecorresponding 'hyper-susceptibility'.



non-polarized interphases
Interphases for which the exchange of common charged components between the phases proceedsunhindered.

non-radiative decay
The disappearance of an excited species due to a radiationless transition.

non-specific adsorption
Ions approach an interface differently depending on the forces in play. Ions are non-specificallyadsorbed (positively or negatively) when they are subjected in the interphase only to long-rangecoulombic interactions (attraction or repulsion). They are believed to retain their solvation shell, andin the position of closest approach to the interface they are separated from it by one or more molecularlayers.See also: specific adsorption

non-uniform corrosion
Corrosion is non-uniform if the time average of the corrosion current through a unit area dependson its position on the surface. Non-uniform corrosion can be due to inhomogeneities of structure orof composition of the corroding material, or to inhomogeneities of the environment. Special casesof non-uniform corrosion such as pitting or intergranular corrision are sometimes called localizedcorrosion.

non-uniform polymer
A polymer comprising molecules non-uniform with respect to relative molecular mass or constitutionor both.See: uniform polymer (3)

non-vertical energy transfer
Energy transfer process with a low Franck–Condon factor because the nuclear geometries of theminima on the ground- and excited-state potential energy surfaces of the donor or of the acceptor arestrongly displaced.Note:A Franck–Condon transition is always vertical. Thus, it is not strictly correct to speak aboutnon-vertical transition. However, the term implies that the projection of all the vibrational wavefunctions of the donor state onto all the vibrational functions of the acceptor will result in low Franck–Condon factors.

nonadiabatic coupling
This is momentum coupling between two adiabatic potential-energy surfaces.See also: adiabatic











nonclassical structure
The structure of molecules or molecular ions that escapes description in terms of conventional rulesof valency and stereochemistry. Nonclassical structures are characteristic of carbonium ions withhypercoordinated (see hypercoordination) carbon atoms, e.g., methanium ion 1, pyramidal dicationC6H62+ 2 (isomeric to benzene dication), and the molecular species whose structure cannot beadequately represented by the equilibrium (2-norbornyl cation, 3) or resonance of two or moreclassical structures. From the stereochemical point of view, those structures are assigned to thenonclassical type for which all tetracoordinate carbon bonds extend into a single hemisphere, i.e., thevalence angle of a carbon atom is greater than 180°. A hypothetical example is pyramidane, 4, thestructure of which corresponds to a local minimum on the C5H4 potential energy surface.

nonselectively labelled
An isotopically labelled compound is designated as nonselectively labelled when the position(s) andthe number of the labelling nuclide(s) are both undefined.



normal
The term 'normal' in e.g. 'normal boiling temperature' means the value at a pressure of.

normal distribution
See: Gaussian band shape

normal kinetic isotope effect
See: isotope effect





normal X-ray level
Synonymous with diagram level.





Norrish Type I photoreaction
α-Cleavage of an excited carbonyl compound leading to an acyl-alkyl radical pair (from an acycliccarbonyl compound) or an acyl-alkyl diradical (from a cyclic carbonyl compound) as a primaryphotoproduct.Notes:1. An example is:2.Decarbonylation of the primary diradical formed from cyclic carbonyl compounds andsubsequent recombination of the biradical afford very interesting cyclic compounds.





nth order phase transition
A transition in which the molar Gibbs energy (or chemical potential) and itsth-orderderivatives are continuous, whereas the th-order derivatives with respect to temperature and pressureare discontinuous at the transition point.See: first-order transition, second-order transition

nuclear atom
See: coordination entity

nuclear chemistry
The part of chemistry which deals with the study of nuclei and nuclear reactions using chemicalmethods.

nuclear decay
A spontaneous nuclear transformation.

nuclear disintegration
Nuclear decay involving a splitting into more nuclei or the emission of particles.

nuclear fission
The division of a nucleus into two or more parts with masses of equal order of magnitude, usuallyaccompanied by the emission of neutrons, gamma radiation and, rarely, small charged nuclearfragments.

nuclear fuel
Material containing fissile nuclides, which when placed in a reactor, enables a chain reaction to beachieved.

nuclear fusion
See: nuclear fusion reaction

nuclear fusion reaction
A reaction between two light nuclei resulting in the production of a nuclear species heavier than eitherinitial nucleus.

nuclear graphite
A polygranular graphite material for use in nuclear reactor cores consisting of graphitic carbon ofvery high chemical purity. High purity is needed to avoid absorption of low-energy neutrons and theproduction of undesirable radioactive species.Note:Apart from the absence of neutron-absorbing impurities, modern reactor graphites are alsocharacterized by a high degree of graphitization and no preferred bulk orientation. Such propertiesincrease the dimensional stability of the nuclear graphite at high temperatures and in a high flux ofneutrons. The term nuclear graphite is often, but incorrectly, used for any graphite material in a nuclearreactor, even if it serves only for structural purposes.

nuclear isomers
Nuclides having the same mass number and atomic number, occupying different nuclear energy states.

nuclear level
One of the energy values at which a nucleus can exist for an appreciable time ().

nuclear magneton
Electromagnetic fundamental physical constantwhereis the electron rest mass,the proton rest mass and,the Bohr magneton.

nuclear particle
A nucleus or any of its constituents in any of their energy states.



nuclear reactor
A device in which a self-sustaining nuclear fission chain reaction can be maintained and controlled.The term is sometimes applied to a device in which a nuclear fusion reaction can be produced andcontrolled.

nuclear transformation
The change of one nuclide into another with a different proton number or nucleon number.

nuclear transition
For a nucleus a change from one quantized energy state into another or a nuclear transformation.

nuclearity
The number of central atoms joined in a single coordination entity by bridging ligands or metal-metalbonds is indicated by dinuclear, trinuclear, tetranuclear, polynuclear, etc.

nucleating agent
A material either added to or present in a system, which induces either homogeneous or heterogeneousnucleation.

nucleation and growth
A process in a phase transition in which nuclei of a new phase are first formed, followed by thepropagation of the new phase at a faster rate.See: continuous precipitation, discontinuous precipitation





nucleic acids
Macromolecules, the major organic matter of the nuclei of biological cells, made up of nucleotideunits, and hydrolysable into certain pyrimidine or purine bases (usually adenine, cytosine, guanine,thymine, uracil), D-ribose or 2-deoxy-D-ribose and phosphoric acid.See: ribonucleic acids, , deoxyribonucleic acids

nucleofuge
A leaving group that carries away the bonding electron pair. For example, in the hydrolysis of an alkylchloride, Cl− is the nucleofuge. The tendency of atoms or groups to depart with the bonding electronpair is called nucleofugality. The adjective is nucleofugal.See also: electrofuge, nucleophile

nucleon
Heavy nuclear particle: proton or neutron.

nucleon number
Synonymous with mass number.

nucleophile (nucleophilic)
A nucleophile (or nucleophilic reagent) is a reagent that forms a bond to its reaction partner (theelectrophile) by donating both bonding electrons. A 'nucleophilic substitution reaction' is a heterolyticreaction in which the reagent supplying the entering group acts as a nucleophile. For example:The term 'nucleophilic' is also used to designate the apparent polar character of certain radicals, asinferred from their higher relative reactivity with reaction sites of lower electron density. Nucleophilicreagents are Lewis bases.



nucleophilic catalysis
Catalysis by a Lewis base, involving formation of a Lewis adduct as a reaction intermediate. Forexample, the hydrolysis of acetic anhydride in aqueous solution catalysed by pyridine:See also: electrophilic, nucleophilicity

nucleophilicity
1.2.The property of being nucleophilic.The relative reactivity of a nucleophilic reagent. (It is also sometimes referred to as 'nucleophilicpower'.) Qualitatively, the concept is related to Lewis basicity. However, whereas Lewis basicityis measured by relative equilibrium constants:nucleophilicity of a Lewis base is measured by relative rate constants of different nucleophilicreagents towards a common substrate, most commonly involving formation of a bond to carbon:See also: electrophilicity, Ritchie equation, Swain–Scott equation

nucleoproteins
Proteins having nucleic acids as prosthetic groups, and thus yielding nucleic acids (or their cleavageproducts) as well as amino acids on hydrolytic cleavage.

nucleosides
Ribosyl or deoxyribosyl derivatives (rarely, other glycosyl derivatives) of certain pyrimidine orpurine bases. They are thus glycosylamines or N-glycosides related to nucleotides by the lack ofphosphorylation. It has also become customary to include among nucleosides analogous substancesin which the glycosyl group is attached to carbon rather than nitrogen ('C-nucleosides').See also: nucleic acids

nucleotide bases
The heterocyclic pyrimidine and purine compounds which are constituents of all nucleic acids.Adenine (A), guanine (G) and cytosine (C) are found in both DNA and RNA, thymine (T) is found(primarily) in DNA and uracil (U) only in RNA.

nucleotides
Compounds formally obtained by esterification of the 3 or 5 hydroxy group of nucleosides withphosphoric acid. They are the monomers of nucleic acids and are formed from them by hydrolyticcleavage.

nucleus
The positively charged central portion of an atom, excluding the orbital electrons.

nuclide
A species of atom, characterized by its mass number, atomic number and nuclear energy state,provided that the mean life in that state is long enough to be observable.

nuclidic mass
The rest mass of a nuclide expressed in atomic mass units.











number fraction
See: amount fraction



number-distribution function
A distribution function in which the relative amount of a portion of a substance with a specific value,or a range of values, of the random variable(s) is expressed in terms of mole fraction.











occlusion (molecular)
The process of incorporation of foreign substances as molecular species within precipitates as theyare formed.



odd-electron ion
Synonymous with radical ion.







OLED
Acronym for organic light-emitting device.

olefins
Acyclic and cyclic hydrocarbons having one or more carbon–carbon double bonds, apart from theformal ones in aromatic compounds. The class olefins subsumes alkenes and cycloalkenes and thecorresponding polyenes.

oligo
A prefix meaning 'a few', and used for compounds with a number of repeating units intermediatebetween those in monomers and those in high polymers. The limits are not precisely defined, andin practice vary with the type of structure being considered, but are generally from 3 to 10, e.g.oligopeptides, oligosaccharides.

oligomer
Also contains definition of: telomerA substance composed of oligomer molecules. An oligomer obtained by telomerization is often termeda telomer.

oligomer molecule
Also contains definition of: oligomericA molecule of intermediate relative molecular mass, the structure of which essentially comprises asmall plurality of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of lower relative molecularmass.Notes:1. A molecule is regarded as having an intermediate relative molecular mass if it has propertieswhich do vary significantly with the removal of one or a few of the units.2. If a part or the whole of the molecule has an intermediate relative molecular mass and essentiallycomprises a small plurality of units derived, actually or conceptually, from molecules of lowerrelative molecular mass, it may be described as oligomeric, or by oligomer used adjectivally.

oligomerization
The process of converting a monomer or a mixture of monomers into an oligomer. An oligomerizationby chain reaction carried out in the presence of a large amount of chain-transfer agent, so that the endgroups are essentially fragments of the chain transfer agent, is termed telomerization.

oligonucleotides
See: oligo, nucleotides

oligopeptides
See: oligo, peptides

oligosaccharides
See: oligo, saccharides

one-bond-flip
Acronym: OBFPhotoisomerization of one double bond in a conjugated double bond system. It is a regular E/Zphotoisomerization.Compare with bicycle-pedal mechanism, hula-twist mechanism.

one-photon photochromism
Photochromic process involving a one-photon mechanism. In this case, the photoproduct B is formedfrom the singlet or from the triplet state of the thermodynamically-stable molecular entity A.

onion morphology
Multiphase morphology of roughly spherical shape that comprises alternating layers of differentpolymers arranged concentrically, all layers being of similar thickness.

onium compounds
1.Cations (with their counter-ions) derived by addition of a hydron to a mononuclear parent hydrideof the nitrogen, chalcogen and halogen families.(H4N+) ammonium(H3O+) oxonium(H2F+) fluoronium(H4P+) phosphonium(H3S+) sulfonium(H2Cl+) chloronium(H4As+) arsonium(H3Se+) selenonium(H2Br+) bromonium(H4Sb+) stibonium(H3Te+) telluronium(H2I+) iodonium2.(H4Bi+) bismuthoniumDerivatives formed by substitution of the above parent ions by univalent groups. Thenumber of substituted hydrogen atoms is, especially in the case of hydrocarbyl substituents,indicated by the adjectives primary, secondary, tertiary or quaternary. E.g. (Cl2F+)dichlorofluoronium, (CH3)2S+H dimethylsulfonium (a secondary sulfonium ion), Cl(CH3)3P+3.chlorotrimethylphosphonium, (CH3CH2)4N+ tetraethylammonium (a quaternary ammoniumion).See also: arsonium compounds, halonium ions, oxonium ions, phosphonium compounds,quaternary ammonium compounds, stibonium compounds, sulfonium compoundsDerivatives formed by substitution of the above parent ions by groups having two or threefree valencies on the same atom. Such derivatives are, where possible, designated by a specificclass name. E.g. RC≡O+ hydrocarbylidyne oxonium ions, R2C=N+H2X− iminium compounds,RC≡NH+ nitrilium ions.

open film
Also contains definitions of: closed film, partly open filmA film in which mass transfer can occur between the film and the coexisting bulk phases, for all thecomponents. The term partly open film applies to a film in which mass transfer can occur only forcertain components. The term closed film applies to those films with fixed mass.



open-shell systems
Atomic or molecular systems in which the electrons are not completely assigned to orbitals in pairs.



operational pH cell
An electrochemical cell which is the basis of practical pH measurement consisting of a hydrogen ionresponsive electrode (hydrogen gas, or glass) and a reference electrode immersed in the test solution.See: pH

operational pH standard
Certain substances which meet the criteria of (i) preparation in highly pure state reproducibly and(ii) stability of solution over a reasonable period of time are designated as operational standards inaqueous solution of specified concentration. Their number is in principle unlimited but values areavailable now for 15 solutions. The values of operational pH standard, i.e., are assigned bycomparison with the reference value pH standard, i.e., in cells with liquid junction, theoperational cells, where the liquid junctions are formed within verticaltubes.

operator gene
See: operon

operon
A functional unit consisting of a promoter, an operator and a number of structural genes, found mainlyin prokaryotes. The structural genes commonly code for several functionally related enzymes, andalthough they are transcribed as one (polycistronic) mRNA each is independently translated. In thetypical operon, the operator region acts as a controlling element in switching on or off the synthesisof mRNA.

opposing reactions
Composite reactions, occurring in forward and reverse directions:

optical activity
A sample of material able to rotate the plane of polarization of a beam of transmitted plane-polarizedlight is said to possess optical activity (or to be optically active). This optical rotation is the classicaldistinguishing characteristic (sufficient but not necessary) of systems containing unequal amounts ofcorresponding enantiomers. An enantiomer causing rotation in a clockwise direction (when viewedin the direction facing the oncoming light beam) under specified conditions is called dextrorotatoryand its chemical name or formula is designated by the prefix (+)-; one causing rotation in the oppositesense is laevorotatory and designated by the prefix (−)-. Materials with optical activity also exhibitother chiroptic phenomena.

optical antipodes [obsolete]
Obsolete synonym for enantiomers. (Usage strongly discouraged).



optical filter
Also contains definition of: interference filterA device which reduces the spectral range (bandpass, cut-off, and interference filter) or radiant powerof incident radiation (neutral density or attenuance filter) upon transmission of radiation.

optical isomers [obsolete]
Obsolescent synonym for stereoisomers with different optical properties. They should be describedas diastereoisomers or enantiomers. (Usage strongly discouraged).







optical purity
The ratio of the observed optical rotation of a sample consisting of a mixture of enantiomers to theoptical rotation of one pure enantiomer.See: enantiomeric excess

optical resolution [obsolete]
Usage strongly discouraged.See: resolution

optical rotation
See: optical activity

optical rotatory power
Angle of optical rotation divided by the optical path length through the medium and by either themass concentration of the substance giving the specific optical rotatory powerconcentration, giving the molar optical rotatory power,or by amount.

optical spectroscopy
The study of systems by the electromagnetic radiation with which they interact or that they produce.By convention, spectroscopic properties are expressed in terms of wavelength in vacuo, not thewavelength within the medium being studied.

optical yield
In a chemical reaction involving chiral reactants and products, the ratio of the optical purity of theproduct to that of the precursor, reactant or catalyst. This should not be confused with enantiomericexcess. The optical yield is in no way related to the chemical yield of the reaction.See: stereoselectivity



optically active polymer
Polymer capable of rotating the polarization plane of a transmitted beam of linear-polarized light.Notes:1. See also: optical activity.2. The optical activity originates from the presence of chiral elements in a polymer such as chiralcenters or chiral axes due to long-range conformational order in a polymer (helicity) (See also:helicity).

optically labile [obsolete]
A term describing a system in which stereoisomerization results in a change of optical rotation withtime. (Usage strongly discouraged).

optoacoustic spectroscopy
Same as photoacoustic spectroscopy.Note:Frequently used to denominate the laser-induced production of acoustic waves combined with apiezoelectric detector and distinguish it from the amplitude-modulated excitation combined with agas-coupled microphone as detector.

orbital (atomic or molecular)
Wavefunction depending explicitly on the spatial coordinates of only one electron.See also: atomic orbital, molecular orbital

orbital energy
Eigenvalue of a one-electron effective hamiltonian belonging to an orbital.

orbital steering
A concept expressing that the stereochemistry of approach of two reacting species is governed by themost favourable overlap of their appropriate orbitals

orbital symmetry
The behaviour of an atomic or localized molecular orbital under molecular symmetry operationscharacterizes its orbital symmetry. For example, under a reflection in an appropriate symmetry plane,the phase of the orbital may be unchanged (symmetric), or it may change sign (antisymmetric), i.e.the positive and negative lobes are interchanged. A principal context for the use of orbital symmetryis the discussion of chemical changes that involve 'conservation of orbital symmetry'. If a certainsymmetry element (e.g. the reflection plane) is retained along a reaction pathway, that pathway is'allowed' by orbital symmetry conservation if each of the occupied orbitals of the reactant(s) is of thesame symmetry type as a similarly (e.g. singly or doubly) occupied orbital of the product(s). Thisprinciple permits the qualitative construction of correlation diagrams to show how molecular orbitalstransform (and how their energies change) during idealized chemical changes (e.g. cycloadditions ).An idealized single bond is a σ-bond, i.e. it has cylindrical symmetry, whereas a p-orbital or π-bondorbital has π-symmetry, i.e. it is antisymmetric with respect to reflection in a plane passing through theatomic centres with which it is associated. In ethene, the π-bonding orbital is symmetric with respect toreflection in a plane perpendicular to and bisecting the C–C bond, whereas the π*-antibonding orbitalis antisymmetric with respect to this operation. Considerations of orbital symmetry are frequentlygrossly simplified in that, for example, the p-orbitals of a carbonyl group would be treated as havingthe same symmetry as those of ethene, and the fact that the carbonyl group in, for example, camphor,unlike that in formaldehyde, has no mirror planes would be ignored. These simplified considerationsnevertheless afford the basis of one approach to the understanding of the rules which indicate whetherpericyclic reactions are likely to occur under thermal or photochemical conditions.See also: sigma, pi



order parameter
A normalized parameter that indicates the degree of order of a system. An order parameter of 0indicates disorder; the absolute value in the ordered state is 1.

order-disorder transition
A transition in which the degree of order of the system changes. Three principal types of disorderingtransitions may be distinguished: (i) positional disordering in a solid, (ii) orientational disorderingwhich may be static or dynamic and (iii) disordering associated with electronic and nuclear spin states.Examples:1. The transition of LiFeO2, with a tetragonal unit cell, in which the Li+ and Fe3+ cations areperfectly ordered on crystallographically non-equivalent octahedral sites to cubic LiFeO2 in2.3.which the Li+ and Fe3+ cations are distributed randomly over all the octahedral sites.The transition of orthorhombic KCN to cubic KCN in which the CN− ions become oriented inany of the eight [111] directions.A superconducting transition



organelles
Separated compartments within a cell with specialized functions, e.g. nuclei (containing most ofthe genetic material), mitochondria (respiratory energy supply for the cell), chloroplasts (location ofphotosynthesis ) etc.

organic dye laser
A liquid laser in which the active medium is an organic dye in a solvent.

organically modified silica
Also contains definition of: organically modified silicateSilica modified by organic groups.Notes:1. Organically-modified silicas can be obtained by sol-gel processing.2. An organically modified silica is of general structure (RO)aSi(B)b(C)c(D)d, where(a+b+c+d)=4, R is any alkyl, aryl or heteroaryl group and B, C and D are generally organicgroups.3. Though it is a commonly used acronym for organically modified silica, 'Ormosil' is a trademarkand as such its terminological use is discouraged.







organoheteryl groups
Univalent groups containing carbon, which are thus organic, but which have their free valenceat an atom other than carbon. This collective term is seldom used; specific subclasses are morefrequently encountered (organothio or organylthio, organogermanium or organylgermanium groups).The synonymous term organoelement groups is occasionally encountered. E.g. phenoxy, acetamido,pyridinio (C5H5N+), thiocyanato ( N≡C–S−), trimethylsilyl; but not hydroxyphenyl, aminoacetyl.See: organyl

organometallic compounds
Classically compounds having bonds between one or more metal atoms and one or more carbon atomsof an organyl group. Organometallic compounds are classified by prefixing the metal with organo-,e.g. organopalladium compounds. In addition to the traditional metals and semimetals, elementssuch as boron, silicon, arsenic and selenium are considered to form organometallic compounds,e.g. organomagnesium compounds MeMgI iodo(methyl)magnesium, Et2Mg diethylmagnesium;an organolithium compound BuLi butyllithium; an organozinc compound ClZnCH2C(=O)OEtchloro(ethoxycarbonylmethyl)zinc; an organocuprate Li+[CuMe2]− lithium dimethylcuprate; anorganoborane Et3B triethylborane. The status of compounds in which the canonical anion has adelocalized structure in which the negative charge is shared with an atom more electronegative thancarbon, as in enolates, may vary with the nature of the anionic moiety, the metal ion, and possiblythe medium; in the absence of direct structural evidence for a carbon–metal bond, such compoundsare not considered to be organometallic.See: acetylides, ferrocenophanes, Grignard reagents, metallocenes

organyl groups
Any organic substituent group, regardless of functional type, having one free valence at a carbonatom, e.g. CH3CH2–, ClCH2– , CH3C(=O)– , 4-pyridylmethyl. Organyl is also used in conjunctionwith other terms, as in organylthio- (e.g. MeS– ) and organyloxy.See: heterocyclyl groups, hydrocarbyl, organoheteryl

origin of replication (ori)
A sequence of DNA at which replication is initiated on a chromosome, plasmid or virus.

ortho acids
Hypothetical compounds having the structure RC(OH)3. Thus hydrated forms of carboxylic acids.Orthocarbonic acid, C(OH)4 , is generically included.See also: ortho amides, ortho esters

ortho amides
Hypothetical compounds having the structure RC(NH2)3, and N-substituted derivatives thereof.(R2N)4C are generically included, but such use is obsolescent.

ortho esters
Compounds having the structure RC(OR')3 ( R' ≠ H), or the structure C(OR')4 ( R' ≠ H), e.g.HC(OCH3)3 trimethyl orthoformate, C(OCH3)4 tetramethyl orthocarbonate.









oscillating reaction
A reaction is said to be oscillating if the concentration of one or more intermediates does not varymonotonically, but passes through maximum and minimum values.











osones [obsolete]
An obsolescent and non-recommended term for 1,2-ketoaldoses, usually derived by hydrolysis ofosazones.

osotriazoles
The 1,2,3-triazoles formed on oxidizing osazones.

Ostwald ripening
Dissolution of small crystals or sol particles and the redeposition of the dissolved species on thesurfaces of larger crystals or sol particles.Notes:1. The process occurs because smaller particles have a higher surface energy, hence higher totalGibbs energy, than larger particles, giving rise to an apparent higher solubility.2. Modified from previous definition. The definition proposed here is recommended for itsinclusion of sol particles.













output rate
The number of results that is produced by an instrument divided by time of operation.

overall activation energy
See: activation energy













oxidation number
Of a central atom in a coordination entity, the charge it would bear if all the ligands were removedalong with the electron pairs that were shared with the central atom. It is represented by a Romannumeral.Note:The term Stock number is no longer recommended.

oxidation state
A measure of the degree of oxidation of an atom in a substance. It is defined as the charge an atommight be imagined to have when electrons are counted according to an agreed-upon set of rules: (l)the oxidation state of a free element (uncombined element) is zero; (2) for a simple (monatomic) ion,the oxidation state is equal to the net charge on the ion; (3) hydrogen has an oxidation state of 1 andoxygen has an oxidation state of -2 when they are present in most compounds. (Exceptions to this arethat hydrogen has an oxidation state of -1 in hydrides of active metals, e.g. LiH, and oxygen has anoxidation state of -1 in peroxides, e.g. H2O2; (4) the algebraic sum of oxidation states of all atoms in aneutral molecule must be zero, while in ions the algebraic sum of the oxidation states of the constituentatoms must be equal to the charge on the ion. For example, the oxidation states of sulfur in H2S, S8(elementary sulfur), SO2, SO3, and H2SO4 are, respectively: -2, 0, +4, +6 and +6. The higher theoxidation state of a given atom, the greater is its degree of oxidation; the lower the oxidation state,the greater is its degree of reduction.



oxidative addition
The insertion of a metal complex into a covalent bond involving formally an overall two-electron losson one metal or a one-electron loss on each of two metals, i.e.,orIn radical chemistry, the term is used to indicate a radical addition to a carbon–carbon double bond,under oxidative conditions. For example:

oxidative coupling
The coupling of two molecular entities through an oxidative process, usually catalysed by a transitionmetal compound and involving dioxygen as the oxidant; e.g.

oxide network
Network comprising only metal–oxygen linkages.

oxidized species
A term used to characterize the degree of oxidation (or reduction) in atoms, molecules and ions. It canbe applied to an atom in a molecule or an ion which has a high oxidation state. An element or atomin a compound can be oxidized by reaction with oxygen, while it can be reduced by reaction withhydrogen. An oxidized species may be formed also through the loss of electrons (either to the positiveelectrode in a cell, or through transfer to another atom or group of atoms). For example, the sulfurin H2S is reduced sulfur relative to elementary sulfur, while SO2 and SO3 are oxidized. Metallic iron(Fe) is a reduced state of iron, while the Fe2+ ion (ferrous ion) and Fe3+ ion (ferric ion) are oxidizedstates of iron. Fe3+ is in a higher oxidation state than Fe2+ which is in a higher oxidation state than Fe.See: oxidation state

oxidoreductases
Enzymes that catalyse electron transfer in oxidation-reduction reactions. Oxidoreductases areclassified into several groups according to their respective donors or acceptors.

oxime O-ethers
O-Hydrocarbyl oximes R2C=NOR' ( R' ≠ H).

oximes
Compounds of structure R2C=NOH derived from condensation of aldehydes or ketones withhydroxylamine. Oximes from aldehydes may be called aldoximes; those from ketones may be calledketoximes.

oxo carboxylic acids
Synonym: oxo acidsCompounds having a carboxy group as well as an aldehydic or ketonic group in the same molecule,e.g. HC(=O)CH2CH2CH2C(=O)OH 5-oxopentanoic acid. In an organic context the term is generallyshortened to oxo acids. The full name should be used if confusion with oxoacids seems possible.

oxo compounds
Compounds containing an oxygen atom, =O, doubly bonded to carbon or another element. The termthus embraces aldehydes, carboxylic acids, ketones, sulfonic acids, amides and esters. Oxo used as anadjective (and thus separated by a space) modifying another class of compound, as in oxo carboxylicacids, indicates the presence of an oxo substituent at any position. To indicate a double-bonded oxygenthat is part of a ketonic structure, the term keto is sometimes used as a prefix, but such use has beenabandoned by IUPAC for naming specific compounds. A traditional use of keto is for indicatingoxidation of CHOH to C=O in a parent compound that contains OH groups, such as carbohydrates,e.g. 3-ketoglucose.See: ketoaldonic acids, ketoaldoses

oxoacids
Synonym: oxyacid (oxy-acid)Oxoacids (and its variants oxyacids, oxo acids, oxy-acids, oxiacids, oxacids) is a traditional name forany acid having oxygen in the acidic group. The term stands in contradistinction to `hydracids' (e.g.HCl) lacking oxygen. The term oxoacid now refers to a compound which contains oxygen, at least oneother element, and at least one hydrogen bound to oxygen, and which produces a conjugate base byloss of positive hydrogen ion(s) (hydrons). E.g. P(OH)3 , RC(=O)OH , HOSOH , HOCl , HON=O ,(HO)2SO2 , RP(=O)(OH)2 .See also: oxo carboxylic acids

oxocarbons
Compounds consisting wholly of carbon and oxygen, e.g. CO, O=C=O , O=C=C=C=O ,

oxonium ions
The parent ion H3O+ and substitution derivatives thereof.See: onium compounds

oxonium ylides
1.2.Compounds having the structure R2O+–C−R2.See: ylidesA class of 1,3-dipolar compounds of general structure R2C=O+–Y− , comprising carbonylimides, carbonyl oxides and carbonyl ylides.



oxylium ions
Species of the form RO+ , e.g. CH3O+ methoxylium, HO+ hydroxylium.

ozone hole
A region of the stratosphere over Antarctica in which a marked decrease in the concentration of ozonehas been observed in the Antarctic spring in recent years. The origin of this phenomenon is not yetestablished, but several theories based on both physical (transport related) and chemical processes(involvement of the halocarbons and their products of oxidation) have been suggested. The latterexplanation appears to be in better accord with recent findings.

ozonides
The 1,2,4-trioxolanes formed by the reaction of ozone at a carbon–carbon double bond, or theanalogous compounds derived from acetylenic compounds.See: molozonides

π – π* state
An excited state related to the ground state by a π → π* transition.

π → π* transition
An electronic transition described approximately as a promotion of an electron from a 'bonding' πorbital to an 'antibonding' π orbital designated as π*.

π → σ* transition
An electronic transition described approximately as a promotion of an electron from a 'bonding' orbitalπ to an 'antibonding' orbital σ designated as σ*. Such transitions generally involve high transitionenergies and appear close to or mixed with Rydberg transitions.

π-adduct
An adduct formed by electron-pair donation from a π-orbital into a σ-orbital, or from a σ-orbital intoa π-orbital, or from a π-orbital into a π-orbital. For example:Such an adduct has commonly been known as a 'π-complex', but, as the bonding is not necessarilyweak, it is better to avoid the term complex.See also: coordination

π-bond
See: σ, π

π-complex [obsolete]
See: π-adduct

















PAN-based carbon fibres
Carbon fibres obtained from polyacrylonitrile (PAN) precursor fibres by stabilization treatment,carbonization and final heat treatment.

paraffin [obsolete]
Obsolescent term for saturated hydrocarbons, commonly but not necessarily acyclic. Still widely usedin the petrochemical industry, where the term designates acyclic saturated hydrocarbons, and standsin contradistinction to naphthenes.

parallel reactions
See: composite reaction, simultaneous reactions





parametric amplification
Amplification of a signal based on parametric processes.

parametric processes
Synonym: optical parametric processesInteraction of photons in a non-linear medium satisfying the energy and momentum conservationlaws. During the interaction the photon frequencies are mixed and photon(s) with different frequenciesare created.Note:Optical parametric processes of three interacting beams, called frequency mixing processes,are: second-harmonic generation (SHG), sum-frequency generation (SFG), difference-frequencygeneration (DFG), optical parametric generation and amplification (OPG and OPA), and opticalparametric oscillation (OPO).

parent hydride
An unbranched acyclic or cyclic structure or an acyclic/cyclic structure having a semisystematic ortrivial name to which only hydrogen atoms are attached.



















partial least squares (PLS)
Partial least squares projection to latent structures (PLS) is a robust multivariate generalized regressionmethod using projections to summarize multitudes of potentially collinear variables.





partial molar Gibbs energy
See: chemical potential

partial molar quantity
Change in the considered extensive quantity when an infinitesimal amount of substance is added to thesystem at constant temperature, pressure and amounts of all other constituents of the system dividedby the added amount.

partial pressure
See: pressure

partial rate factor
The rate of substitution at one specific site in an aromatic compound relative to the rate of substitutionat one position in benzene. For example, the partial rate factormonosubstituted benzene C6H5Z is related to the rate constantsfor para-substitution in aandfor the totalreaction (i.e. at all positions) of C6H5Z and benzene, respectively, and % para (the percentage parasubstitution in the total product formed from C6H5Z) by the relation:Similarly for meta-substitution:(The symbols,,are also in use.) The term applies equally to the ipso position, and it can beextended to other substituted substrates undergoing parallel reactions at different sites with the samereagent according to the same rate law.See also: selectivity



partially draining
An adjective describing a chain macromolecule that behaves in a hydrodynamic field as though thesolvent within the domain of the macromolecule were progressively more immobilized with respect tothe macromolecule in the direction from its outer fringes inward. A freely draining macromolecule anda non-draining macromolecule are two extremes of the concept of a partially draining macromolecule.







particle scattering function
Synonym: particle scattering factorThe ratio of the intensity of radiation scattered at an angle of observationscattered at an angle zero, i.e.to the intensity of radiation. An alternative recommended symbol is. Synonymouswith particle scattering factor.





particular property
A property of a given object (phenomenon, body or substance). 'Particular property' includes theconcept of particular quantity. The adjective 'particular' may be omitted, if no ambiguity is caused.See also: property

particulate carbon
A carbon material consisting of separated monolithic particles.Note:Distinctions should be made between coarse particulate carbon or granular carbon (larger than about, but smaller than aboutin average size), fine particulate carbon or powder or flour(between andin average size) and colloidal carbon (below approximatelyin size inat least one direction), e.g. carbon blacks and colloidal carbon.

particulate gel
Gel in which the network component comprises solid particles.





partition
This term is often used as a synonym for distribution and extraction. However, an essential differenceexists by definition between distribution constant or partition ratio and partition constant. The termpartition should be, but is not invariably, applied to the distribution of a single definite chemicalspecies between the two phases.

partition chromatography
Chromatography in which separation is based mainly on differences between the solubility of thesample components in the stationary phase ( gas chromatography), or on differences between thesolubilities of the components in the mobile and stationary phases (liquid chromatography).

partition coefficient [obsolete]
This term is not recommended and should not be used as a synonym for partition constant, partitionratio or distribution ratio.See also: distribution constant



partition function
For a molecule the ratio of the total number of molecules to their number in the non-degenerate groundstate.











passive metal
A metal corroding in the passive state.

passive sampler
A device for preconcentration of trace substances from gaseous media based on molecular diffusionwithout controlled conveyance of the gas to be investigated (e.g. work place air).



Paterno–Büchi reaction
The photocycloaddition of an electronically excited carbonyl group to a ground state olefin yieldingan oxetane.

pattern recognition
Pattern recognition is the identification of patterns in large data sets, using appropriate mathematicalmethodology. Examples are principal component analysis (PCA), SIMCA, partial least squares (PLS)and artificial neural networks (ANN).

paucidisperse system
A colloidal system in which only a few particle-sizes occur.

Pauli exclusion principle
A rule, complementary to the aufbau principle, of building up the electronic configuration of atomsand molecules: a maximum of two electrons can occupy an orbital and then only providing thatthe spins of the electrons are paired, i.e. opposed. The principle demands that the wavefunctionfor a many-electron system must be asymmetric with respect to the permutation of the space-spincoordinates for every pair of electrons.Note:See also: antisymmetry principle.

peak analysis
The extraction of relevant peak parameters (i.e. position, area) from a measured spectrum.



peak area method
A kind of peak analysis in which a peak area is calculated by subtracting an estimate of the underlyingcontinuum in a relevant part of a measured spectrum.





peak current
In linear-sweep voltammetry, triangular-wave voltammetry, cyclic triangular-wave voltammetry, andsimilar techniques, the maximum value of the faradaic current due to the reduction or oxidation ofa substance B during a single sweep. This maximum value is attained after an interval during whichthe concentration of B at the electrode-solution interface decreases monotonically, while the faradaiccurrent due to the reduction or oxidation of B increases monotonically, with time. It is attained beforean interval during which this current decreases monotonically with time because the rate of transportof B toward the electrode-solution interface is smaller than the rate at which it is removed from theinterface by electrolysis. The term has also been used to denote the maximum value of the faradaiccurrent attributable to the reduction or oxidation of an electroactive substance in techniques suchas ac polarography, differential pulse polarography, and derivative polarography. However, thesetechniques give curves that arise in ways different from that cited above, and the terms summit, summitcurrent, and summit potential are therefore recommended for use in connection with such techniques.See also: apex current



peak enthalpimetry [obsolete]
See: flow injection enthalpimetry

peak fitting
A kind of peak analysis in which a relevant part of a spectrum is fitted with a theoretical responsefunction.















Peierls distortion
Distortion of a regular one-dimensional structure with a partially occupied band to give bondalternation, eventually leading to dimerization or oligomerization. The degree of oligomerization,depends on the electronic population of the conduction band indicated by the wave vector of the Fermilevel
Note:A Peierls distortion opens a gap at the Fermi level, producing a net stabilization of the distortedstructure. The Peierls distortion for chain compounds is analogous to the Jahn–Teller effect formolecules. The prototypical example of the Peierls distortion in organic chemistry is the bondalternation present in polyvinylene.

Peierls transition
A metal-insulator transition in quasi one-dimensional solids that occurs as a result of a band gapopening up at the Fermi energy due to a displacive distortion of the regular array increasing the unitcell length, usually a dimerization; the decrease in electronic energy outweighs the increase in latticeenergy. Example: The transition in methylethylmorpholinium tetracyanoquinodimethanide at.



penams
Natural and synthetic antibiotics containing the 4-thia-1-azabicyclo[3.2.0]heptan-7-one structure,generally assumed to have the 5R configuration unless otherwise specified. The numbering of thepenam skeleton differs from that of the von Baeyer named bicyclic system. Where they differ the vonBaeyer numbering is shown in parentheses in the example.See also: penems

pendant group (side group)
An offshoot, neither oligomeric nor polymeric from a chain.

penems
2,3-Didehydropenams.See: penams

penetrant (permeant)
Entity from a phase in contact with one of the membrane surfaces that passes though the membrane.

penicillins
Substituted penams having the basic structure shown, including the natural penicillins and syntheticanalogues.

Penning gas mixture
A Penning gas mixture consists of a rare gas containing impurity atoms possibly at very lowconcentrations. The impurity atoms have an ionization potentialwhich is lower than or equal tothe metastable potential () of the parent noble gas. The Penning effect in a Penning gas mixtureis the ionization by charge transfer (charge exchange) during collision between a metastable atom anda neutral atom which decreases the average energy to form an ion pair, e.g.In a glow discharge, this results in an increase of the the ionization coefficient (Townsend firstcoefficient), a decrease in breakdown potential and a lowering of the cathode fall potential. Themagnetic Penning effect describes the increase of the ionization probability of gas in a low pressureelectrical discharge resulting from the helical (spiral) movement of electrons in a magnetic field placednormal to the anode-cathode electrical field.







peptidoglycan
A glycosaminoglycan formed by alternating residues of D-glucosamine and either muramic acid {2amino-3-O-[(S)-1-carboxyethyl]-2-deoxy-D-glucose} or L-talosaminuronic acid (2-amino-2-deoxy-Ltaluronic acid), which are usually N-acetylated or N-glycoloylated. The carboxyl group of the muramicacid is commonly substituted by a peptide containing residues of both L- and D-amino acids, whereasthat of L-talosaminuronic acid is substituted by a peptide consisting of L-amino acids only.

peptization
Also contains definition of: deflocculationReversal of coagulation or flocculation, i.e., the dispersion of agglomerates to form a colloidally stablesuspension or emulsion.

per acids [obsolete]
An ambiguous term, which may imply either a higher oxidation state of a central atom, as in perchloricacid, or a derivative of hydrogen peroxide, as in CH3C(=O)OOH. Accordingly, it is not recommendedas a class name.See: peroxy acids

percent
One part in a hundred,.

percentage error
See: percentage relative error







perfect network
Also contains definition of: perfect polymer networkPolymer network composed of chains all of which are connected at both of their ends to differentjunction points.Note:If a perfect network is in the rubbery state then, on macroscopic deformation of the network, all of itschains are elastically active and display rubber elasticity.





pericyclic reaction
A chemical reaction in which concerted reorganization of bonding takes place throughout a cyclicarray of continuously bonded atoms. It may be viewed as a reaction proceeding through a fullyconjugated cyclic transition state. The number of atoms in the cyclic array is usually six, but othernumbers are also possible. The term embraces a variety of processes, including cycloadditions,cheletropic reactions, electrocyclic reactions, sigmatropic rearrangements, etc. (provided they areconcerted).See also: multi-centre reaction





periodic copolymer
A copolymer consisting of macromolecules comprising more than two species of monomeric unitsin regular sequence.

periodic copolymerization
A copolymerization in which a periodic copolymer is formed.

periodic voltage
This general term is applicable to square, triangular, and other wave forms.



periselectivity
The differentiation between two symmetry-allowed processes, for example the [2+4] vs. [4+6]cycloaddition of cyclopentadiene to tropone.

peritectic reaction
Synonym: incongruent reactionAn isothermal, reversible reaction between two phases, a liquid and a solid, that results, on cooling of abinary, ternary, ... , system in one, two, ... () new solid phases. Synonymous with incongruentreaction.

peritectoid reaction
Synonym: metatectoid reactionAn isothermal, reversible reaction in the solid state, that, on cooling of a binary, ternary, ... , system,results in one, two, ... () new solid phases. For example, in a binary system containing two solidsandSynonymous with metatectoid reaction.

peritectoid temperature
The maximum temperature at which a peritectoid reaction can occur.

permanent crosslink
Crosslink formed by covalent bonds, intermolecular or intramolecular interactions that are stableunder the conditions of use of the material formed.





permeate
Stream containing penetrants that leaves a membrane module.

permeation chromatography
Also contains definition of: gel permeation chromatographySeparation based mainly upon exclusion effects, such as differences in molecular size and/or shape(e.g. molecular-sieve chromatography) or in charge (e.g. ion-exclusion chromatography). The termgel-permeation chromatography is widely used for the process when the stationary phase is a gel. Theterm gel-filtration is not recommended.

permeation tube
A device used for dynamic preparation of test gas mixtures by means of controlled permeation of agaseous analyte out of a container through polymer material into a carrier gas stream. These devicescontaining certain condensable gases (e.g. NO2 , SO2 , etc.) when operated at closely controlledtemperatures can be used as primary standards calibrated in terms of the weight loss per unit time.



permittivity of vacuum
Fundamental physical constantthe speed of light in vacuum. It is equal toexactly, whereis the permeability of vacuum and.

permselectivity
A term used to define the preferential permeation of certain ionic species through ion-exchangemembranes.

peroxides
Compounds of structure ROOR in which R may be any organyl group (The term is also used in aninorganic sense to denote salts of the anion O22−).See also: hydroperoxides

peroxisome
Organelle, similar to a lysosome, characterized by its content of catalase (EC 1.11.1.6), peroxidase(EC 1.11.1.7) and other oxidative enzymes.

peroxy acids
Acids in which an acidic –OH group has been replaced by an –OOH group, e.g. CH3C(=O)OOHperoxyacetic acid, PhS(=O)2OOH benzeneperoxysulfonic acid.

perpendicular effect
See: More O'Ferrall–Jencks diagram





perspective formula
A geometric representation of stereochemical features of a molecule or model which appears as aview from an appropriate direction.See: Fischer projection, Newman projection, projection formula, saw-horse projection, wedgeprojection, zig-zag projectionSee also: stereochemical formula

perstraction
Separation process in which membrane permeation and extraction phenomena occur by contactingthe downstream with an extracting solvent.

perturbation theory
Along with variational method, the second major quantum-mechanical approximation method. Themethods of perturbation theory are based on representation of the Hamiltonian of a system understudy,, through the Hamiltonian,, of a system, whose Schroedinger equation is solvable,and its relatively small perturbation :. Numerous techniques are derived allowingone to relate the unknown eigenvalues and eigenfunctions of the perturbed system to the knowneigenvalues and eigenfunctions of the unperturbed system. As distinct from the variational method,the methods of perturbation theory are applicable to all the electronic states of an atom or molecule.Whenis time-dependent, the perturbed system does not have stationary states. In this case timedependent perturbation theory, which is the method of approximate calculation of the expansion ofwave-functions of the perturbed system over wave-functions of stationary states of the unperturbedsystem, must be employed. The applications of this method are associated mostly with studies of lightemission and absorption by atoms and molecules.





pesticide
Strictly, a substance intended to kill pests: in common usage, any substance used for controlling,preventing, or destroying animal, microbiological or plant pests.

pesticide residue
Any substance or mixture of substances in food for man or animals resulting from the use of a pesticideincluding any specified derivatives, such as degradation and conversion products, metabolites,reaction products and impurities considered to be of toxicological significance.

peta
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

petroleum coke
A carbonization product of high-boiling hydrocarbon fractions obtained in petroleum processing(heavy residues). It is the general term for all special petroleum coke products such as green, calcinedand needle petroleum coke.Note:High-boiling hydrocarbon fractions (heavy residues) used as feedstock for petroleum coke are residuesfrom distillation (atmospheric pressure, vacuum) or cracking (e.g. thermal, catalytic, steam-based)processes. The nature of feedstock has a decisive influence on the graphitizability of the calcined coke.

petroleum pitch
A residue from heat treatment and distillation of petroleum fractions. It is solid at room temperature,consists of a complex mixture of numerous predominantly aromatic and alkyl-substituted aromatichydrocarbons, and exhibits a broad softening range instead of a defined melting temperature.Note:The hydrogen aromaticity (ratio of aromatic to total hydrogen atoms) varies between 0.3 and 0.6.The aliphatic hydrogen atoms are typically present in alkyl groups substituted on aromatic rings oras naphthenic hydrogen.



pH glass electrode
A hydrogen-ion responsive electrode usually consisting of a bulb, or other suitable form, of specialglass attached to a stem of high resistance glass complete with internal reference electrode and internalfilling solution system. Other geometrical forms may be appropriate for special applications, e.g.capillary electrode for measurement of blood pH.





pH-rate profile
A plot of observed rate coefficient, or more usually its decadic logarithm, against pH of solution, othervariables being kept constant.





pharmacodynamics
Study of pharmacological actions on living systems, including the reactions with and binding to cellconstituents, and the biochemical and physiological consequences of these actions.

pharmacokinetics
1.2.Process of the uptake of drugs by the body, the biotransformation they undergo, the distributionof the drugs and their metabolites in the tissues, and the elimination of the drugs and theirmetabolites from the body over a period of time.Study of such processes.

phase
An entity of a material system which is uniform in chemical composition and physical state.

phase domain
Region of a material that is uniform in chemical composition and physical state.Notes:1. A phase in a multiphase material can form domains differing in size.2. The term 'domain' may be qualified by the adjective microscopic or nanoscopic or the prefixmicro- or nano- according to the size of the linear dimensions of the domain.3. The prefixes micro-, and nano- are frequently incorrectly used to qualify the term 'phase' insteadof the term 'domain'; hence, 'microphase domain', and 'nanophase domain' are often used. Thecorrect terminology that should be used is phase microdomain and phase nanodomain.

phase fluorimetry
See: lifetime of luminescence





phase interaction
Molecular interaction between the components present in the interphases of a multiphase mixture.Note:The interphase elasticity is the capability of a deformed interphase to return to its original dimensionsafter the force causing the deformation has been removed.

phase inversion
A term used in two senses which should be specified: density inversion or continuity inversion.





phase rule
The number of degrees of freedom, , that a system containingphases are in equilibrium, is given as:components can have when

phase separation
The process by which a single solid (liquid) phase separates into two or more new phases.

phase transition
A change in the nature of a phase or in the number of phases as a result of some variation in externallyimposed conditions, such as temperature, pressure, activity of a component or a magnetic, electricor stress field.

phase-space theory
This is a theory applied to unimolecular or bimolecular reactions proceeding through long-livedcomplexes. The probability of reaction is assumed to be proportional to the number of states availableto a particular product channel divided by the number of states corresponding to all product channels.The theory is used to predict rates, product energy distributions, product velocity distributions, andproduct angular momentum distributions.

phase-transfer catalysis
The phenomenon of rate enhancement of a reaction between chemical species located in differentphases (immiscible liquids or solid and liquid) by addition of a small quantity of an agent (calledthe 'phase-transfer catalyst') that extracts one of the reactants, most commonly an anion, across theinterface into the other phase so that reaction can proceed. These catalysts are salts of 'onium ions' (e.g.tetraalkylammonium salts) or agents that complex inorganic cations (e.g. crown ethers). The catalystcation is not consumed in the reaction although an anion exchange does occur.

phenolates
Synonymous with phenoxides. The term phenolate should not be used for solvates derived from aphenol, for the ending -ate often occurs in names for anions.

phenols
Compounds having one or more hydroxy groups attached to a benzene or other arene ring, e.g. 2naphthol:

phenomenological equation
In the following only media which are isotropic with respect to mass transport (i.e. the transportcoefficients are independent of direction) are being considered. In the linear range (not too far fromequilibrium), for uniform temperature and neglecting external fields such as the earth's gravitationalfield, the flux density of species B is related to the gradients of the electrochemical potentials of allspecies by the phenomenological equation:withwhereis the gradient of the electrochemical potential of species i. The proportionality factorsare called phenomenological coefficients. Their values depend on the frame of reference. Thelatter is taken here to move with the velocityof species A, and hence:.

phenonium ions
The traditional generic name for those cyclohexadienyl cations that are spiro-annulated with acyclopropane unit. Phenonium ions constitute a subclass of arenium ions.See also: bridged carbocation

phenotype
The observable structural and functional characteristics of an organism determined by its genotypeand modulated by its environment.

phenoxides
Salts or analogous metal derivatives of phenols; synonymous with phenolates. A preferable generalterm, however, is aryloxides.

pheromone
Synonyms: ectohormone, feromoneSubstance used in olfactory communication between organisms of the same species eliciting a changein sexual or social behaviour. Synonymous with ectohormone, feromone.

phonon
Elementary excitation in the quantum mechanical treatment of vibrations in a crystal lattice. An energybundle that behaves as a particle of energy, with the vibration frequency and the Planckconstant.Notes:1. A phonon can be considered as an acoustic mode of thermal vibration of a crystal lattice (orliquid helium II).2. Every harmonic vibration can be decomposed in phonons, which are the elementary vibrations.The total number of phonons in a system that has internal vibrations (e.g., a crystal) is relatedto the temperature of the system.3. The concept of phonons provides a simplification in the theories of thermal and electricalconduction in solids.4. For example, interactions between phonons and electrons are thought to be responsible for suchphenomena as 'superconductivity'.

phosphanes
The saturated hydrides of tervalent phosphorus having the general formula PnHn+2 . Individualmembers having an unbranched phosphorus chain are named phosphane, diphosphane, triphosphane,etc. The name of a saturated hydride of phosphorus wherein one or more phosphorus atoms have abonding number of 5 is formed by prefixing locants and symbols to the name of the correspondingphosphane. Hydrocarbyl derivatives of PH3 belong to the class phosphines.

phosphanylidenes
Synonym: phosphinidenesRecommended name for carbene analogues having the structure RP: (former IUPAC name isphosphinediyls). A common non-IUPAC synonym is phosphinidenes.

phosphatidic acids
Derivatives of glycerol in which one hydroxy group, commonly but not necessarily primary, isesterified with phosphoric acid and the other two are esterified with fatty acids.See: lecithins, phosphoglycerides, phospholipids

phosphazenes
Compounds containing a phosphorus–nitrogen double bond, i.e. derivatives of H3P=NH andHP=NH . A multiplicity of such bonds is present in various well-established chain, ring and cagecompounds. E.g.

phosphine oxides
Compounds having the structure R3P=Osulfides).See: imides (2)R3P+–O− (analogously, phosphine imides and phosphine

phosphines
PH3 and compounds derived from it by substituting one, two or three hydrogen atoms by hydrocarbylgroups R3P . RPH2 , R2PH and R3P (R ≠ H) are called primary, secondary and tertiary phosphines,respectively. A specific phosphine is preferably named as a substituted phosphane, e.g. CH3PH2methylphosphane.See: phosphanes

phosphinic acids
H2P(=O)OH (phosphinic acid) and its P-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

phosphinous acids
H2POH (phosphinous acid) and its P-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

phospho
1.A prefix used in biochemical nomenclature in place of phosphono to denote the –P(=O)(OH)2group linked to a heteroatom, e.g. Me3N+–CH2CH2–OP(=O)(OH)O− phosphocholine.2. An infix used in biochemical nomenclature to name phosphoric diesters, e.g.glycerophosphocholine.See: phosphoglycerides

phosphoglycerides
Phosphoric diesters, esters of phosphatidic acids, generally having a polar head group (OH or NH2)on the esterified alcohol which typically is 2-aminoethanol, choline, glycerol, inositol, serine. Theterm includes lecithins, cephalins. E.g.

phospholipids
Lipids containing phosphoric acid as mono- or di-esters, including phosphatidic acids andphosphoglycerides.

phosphonic acids
HP(=O)(OH)2 (phosphonic acid) and its P-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

phosphonitriles
Compounds of stoichiometric composition [X2PN]n, in which X is alkoxy, halogen, or otherelectronegative group, and is a variable integer, the value of which may not be known.See: phosphazenes

phosphonium compounds
Salts (and hydroxides) [R4P+]X− containing tetracoordinate phosphonium ion and the associatedanion.See: onium compounds

phosphonium ylides
Synonyms: phosphorus ylides, Wittig reagentsCompounds having the structure R3P+–C−R2See: ylidesR3P=CR2. Also known as Wittig reagents.

phosphono
A prefix indicating the presence of the group –P(=O)(OH)2 .See: phospho

phosphonous acids
HP(OH)2 (phosphonous acid) and its P-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

phosphoramides
Compounds in which one or more of the OH groups of phosphoric acid have been replaced with anamino or substituted amino group; commonly confined to the phosphoric triamides, P(=O)(NR2)3, since replacement of one or two OH groups produces phosphoramidic acids P(=O)(OH)(NR2)2 ,P(=O)(OH)2(NR2) .

phosphoranes
The mononuclear hydride PH5 , systematically named -phosphane, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.By extension, the literature also applies the term to phosphonium ylides.See also: phosphanes

phosphoranyl radicals
A tetracoordinate phosphorus species which has nine valence-shell electrons R4P. .

phosphorescence
From a phenomenological point of view, the term has been used to describe long-lived luminescence.In mechanistic photochemistry, the term designates luminescence involving change in spinmultiplicity, typically from triplet to singlet or vice versa. The luminescence from a quartet state toa doublet state is also phosphorescence.



phosphoroscope
A mechanical device used to separate phosphorescence from fluorescence.

phosphorylation
A process (catalysed by enzymes) involving the transfer of a phosphate group from a donor to asuitable acceptor; in general, an ester linkage is formed, for example:ATP + alcohol ADP + phosphate ester

phosphylenes [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for phosphanylidenes.

photo-Bergman cyclization
Intramolecular photoinduced cyclization of enediynes leading to aromatic compounds.Notes:1. The solvent plays a key role in the reaction efficiency and product distribution. The reversibilityof the initial photoreaction and competing radical vs ionic pathways dictate product distribution,in stark contrast to the thermal process.2. This reaction is particularly attractive in molecular biology and molecular medicine. In particular,it permits the expeditious synthesis of core synthones of great diversity.

photo-Claisen rearrangement
Rearrangement closely related to the photo-Fries rearrangement; it is experienced by aryl ethers(instead of aryl esters) and follows an analogous mechanism.Note:An example is the photoinduced rearrangement of phenyl ethers to ortho and para-alkyl phenols.

photo-elastic polymer
Polymer that, under stress, exhibits birefringence.

photo-Fries rearrangement
A photorearrangement of aryl or acyl esters to give the [1,3]-rearranged product (as well as the [1,5]rearranged product):

photoacoustic detector
A pressure-sensitive detector used to detect intermittent radiation absorbed in a black body or in thesample concerned. The resulting rapid temperature change produces a transient pressure oscillationthat is observed with the help of a microphone, or a piezoelectric device.See also: radiation detector

photoacoustic effect
Generation of heat after absorption of radiation, due to radiationless deactivation or chemical reaction.See also: photoacoustic spectroscopy

photoacoustic spectroscopy
A spectroscopic technique based on the photoacoustic effect. A photoacoustic spectrum consists ofa plot of the intensity of the acoustic signal detected by a microphone or a 'piezoelectric' detector,against the excitation wavelength or another quantity related to the photon energy of the modulatedexcitation.See also: isooptoacoustic point

photoadsorption
Also contains definition of: photodesorptionIrradiation by light (usually visible or ultraviolet) may affect adsorption. In a system containingadsorptive and adsorbent exposure to light may lead to increased adsorption (photoadsorption) or itmay lead to desorption of an adsorbate (photodesorption).

photoaffinity labelling
Acronym: PALTechnique by which a photochemically reactive molecular entity, specifically associated with abiomolecule, is photo-excited in order to covalently attach a label to the biomolecule, usuallyvia intermediates. Identification of the resulting photo-crosslinked product provides structuralinformation on the protein′s binding site.Notes:1. Technique widely used for identifying in general ligand-receptor interactions in biologicalmacromolecules and in particular the binding site within proteins.2.Typical examples are nitrenes, carbenes, ketone excited states, cations and radicals.

photoassisted catalysis
Catalytic reaction involving production of a catalyst by absorption of light.See: photocatalysis

photobiology
Branch of biology concerned with the biological and bioenvironmental effects of ultraviolet, visibleor infrared radiation.

photocatalysis
Change in the rate of a chemical reaction or its initiation under the action of ultraviolet, visible orinfrared radiation in the presence of a substance—the photocatalyst—that absorbs light and is involvedin the chemical transformation of the reaction partners.

photocatalyst
Catalyst able to produce, upon absorption of light, chemical transformations of the reaction partners.The excited state of the photocatalyst repeatedly interacts with the reaction partners forming reactionintermediates and regenerates itself after each cycle of such interactions.

photochemical curing
Also contains definition of: photo-curingCuring induced by photo-irradiation.

photochemical equivalence
According to the principle of photochemical equivalence, there is a one-to-one relationship betweenthe number of photons absorbed by a system and the number of excited species produced. Theprinciple often fails for light of high intensity (e.g. laser beams), when molecules may absorb morethan one photon.

photochemical funnel
Molecular structure where the excited-state reactant or intermediate is delivered to the ground stateto initiate product formation.Note:For a broad class of organic reactions, the structure of the funnel can take the form of a conicalintersection or a singlet–triplet crossing.

photochemical hole burning
See: hole burning





photochemical reaction path
Sequence of geometries adopted by a molecule after initial electronic excitation, combined with aspecification of the electronic state at each geometry, from radiation absorption to product formation.Theoretically, this usually involves the computation of the MERP connecting the Franck–Condonpoint, located on the potential-energy surface of the spectroscopic state, to the final photoproductslocated on the ground-state potential ?energy surface. Experimentally, a photochemical reaction pathcan be probed by detecting transient species or reaction intermediates.

photochemical smog
Product of photochemical reactions caused by solar radiation and occurring in polluted air as well asin air contaminated by compounds emitted by natural sources, such as those emitted by vegetation.

photochemical yield
See: quantum yield

photochemistry
The branch of chemistry concerned with the chemical effects of light (far UV to IR).See: photochemical reaction

photochromism
Reversible transformation of a molecular entity between two forms, A and B, having differentabsorption spectra, induced in one or both directions by absorption of electromagnetic radiation. Thespectral change produced is typically, but not necessarily, of visible colour and is accompanied bydifferences in other physical properties.The thermodynamically stable form A is transformed by irradiation into form B. The back reactioncan occur thermally (photochromism of type T) or photochemically (photochromism of type P).The terms 'switch-on' and 'switch-of' are sometimes used to denote the two directions of thephotochromic reaction.Note:An important parameter is the 'number of cycles' that a photochromic system can undergo under welldefined conditions (solution, matrix, concentration, temperature).

photoconductive detector
In a photoconductive detector an electric potential is applied across the absorbing region and causes acurrent to flow in proportion to the irradiance if the photon energy exceeds the energy gap between thevalence and the conduction band. Depending on their spectral responsivity function, photoconductivedetectors are divided into photoconductive detectors for the visible wavelength range e.g. cadmiumsulfide or CdS photoconductive detectors, photoconductive detectors for the near infrared wavelengthrange e.g. lead sulfide or PbS photoconductive detectors, photoconductive detectors for the infraredwavelength range e.g. silicon doped with arsenide or Si:As photoconductive detectors, and themercury-cadmium-telluride or HgCdTe photoconductive detector.

photoconductivity
Electrical conductivity resulting from photoproduction of charge carriers.

photocrosslinking
The formation of a covalent linkage between two macromolecules or between two different parts ofone macromolecule.

photocurrent yield
The quantum efficiency of electron transport between the two electrodes of a photovoltaic cell orphotoelectrochemical cell.

photocyclization
Intramolecular photochemical process leading to carbo- or hetero- cyclic ring systems by formation ofone new single bond, either by a concerted process (e.g., electrocyclization) or by multi-step processessuch as Norrish–Yang reaction, photoinduced electron transfer processes, Yang photocyclization andothers.

photocycloaddition
Intermolecular photochemical process leading to carbo- or hetero- cyclic ring systems by formationof two new single bonds, either by a concerted process (e.g., a concerted addition) or by multi-stepprocesses (e.g., the Paternò–Büchi reaction).Note:Triplet state photocycloadditions are two-step processes involving the formation of diradicalintermediates.

photodecarbonylation
Photoinduced extrusion of carbon monoxide (CO).Notes:1. Typical example is the Norrish Type I photoreaction, in which, after production of the diradicalupon photoinduced α-cleavage, CO is eliminated. This reaction has been widely exploited forthe production of radicals in crystals, as well as for the synthesis of cyclic compounds.2.Another example is the photodecarbonylation of alpha-aryl aldehydes.

photodecarboxylation
Photoinduced extrusion of carbon dioxide (CO2).Note:Typical examples are the CO2 extrusion upon excitation of anti-inflamatory 2-arylpropionic acids,such as ketoprofen.

photodeconjugation
Photoinduced reaction of conjugated compounds (e.g., enones and carboxylic acid derivatives)leading to loss of conjugation.Note:This reaction has important synthetic applications for the synthesis of frameworks of numerous naturalproducts, such as β,γ-unsaturated carboxylic acids from photoexcitation of α,β-unsaturated carboxylicacid derivatives, excluding the use of strong bases, as required for similar isomerizations performedin the ground state.

photodegradation
The photochemical transformation of a molecule into lower molecular weight fragments, usually inan oxidation process. This term is widely used in the destruction (oxidation) of pollutants by UVbased processes.





photodiode array
An arrangement of a number of photodiodes on a single chip.

photodynamic effect
A term used in photobiology to refer to photoinduced damage requiring the simultaneous presence oflight, photosensitizer and molecular oxygen. A sensitized photooxidation which involves molecularoxygen.





photoelectrical effect
The ejection of an electron from a solid or a liquid by a photon.

photoelectrochemical cell
An electrochemical cell in which current and a voltage are simultaneously produced upon absorptionof light by one or more of the electrodes. Usually at least one of the electrodes is a semiconductor.See also: photovoltaic cell, photoelectrolytic cell, photogalvanic cell





photoelectrolytic cell
Also contains definition of: photocatalytic cellA cell in which radiant energy causes a net chemical conversion in the cell, e.g. so as to producehydrogen as a useful fuel. These cells can be classified as photosynthetic or photocatalytic. In theformer case, radiant energy provides a Gibbs energy to drive a reaction such as,and electrical or thermal energy may be later recovered by allowing the reverse, spontaneous reactionto proceed. In a photocatalytic cell the photon absorption promotes a reaction withso thereis no net storage of chemical energy, but the radiant energy speeds up a slow reaction.





photoemissive detector
Also contains definition of: external photoelectric effectA detector in which a photon interacts with a solid surface, which is called the photocathode, or a gas,releasing a photoelectron. This process is called the external photoelectric effect. The photoelectronsare collected by an electrode at positive electric potential, i.e. the anode.

photoexcitation
The production of an excited state by the absorption of ultraviolet, visible, or infrared radiation.



photohydration
Photochemical process leading to the addition of water across a C–C double (or triple) bond or to acarbonyl (or carbonyl analogue) group.







photoionization
The term generally used to describe ionization of any species by photons. The process may, forexample, be writtenElectrons and photons do not 'impact' molecules or atoms; they interact with them in ways that resultin various electronic excitations including ionization. For this reason it is recommended that in massspectrometry the terms 'electron impact' and 'photon impact' not be used.



photoisomerization
Photochemical process leading to an isomerization of the substrate, either by bond rotation, skeletalrearrangement or atom- or group- transfer.Notes:1. Typical examples are cis-trans photosomerization of alkenes, polyenes andphototautomerization.2. Photochemical pathways have the advantage over thermal and catalytic methods of giving isomermixtures (photostationary states) rich in thermodynamically unstable isomers.3. Photoisomerization is the primary photochemical reaction of the chromophore in severalbiological photoreceptors such as retinal proteins (e.g., rhodopsin), phytochromes, and thephotoactive yellow protein.

photoluminescence
Luminescence from direct photoexcitation the emitting species.

photoluminescent polymer
Polymer that exhibits luminescence (i.e., fluorescence or phosphorescence arising from photoexcitation).See: photoluminescence.

photolysis
The cleavage of one or more covalent bonds in a molecular entity resulting from absorption of light,or a photochemical process in which such cleavage is an essential part. For example:The term is used incorrectly to describe irradiation of a sample, although in the combination flashphotolysis this usage is accepted.

photometry
The measurement of light over wavelengths which produce visual sensation (approximately). Thus photometric quantities do not refer to a specific wavelength but to the light emittedby a standard source (formerly a 'standard international candle', now a blackbody radiator emitting atthe temperature of solidifying platinum,). Luminance and illuminance are the photometricanalogues of the radiometric quantities radiance and irradiance, respectively, but conversion fromphotometric units (e.g.) to radiometric units (e.g.) requires convolution overwavelength of the spectral radiation with the relative spectral response of the human eye. The standardresponse is called the 'spectral luminous efficiency of radiation', and is tabulated for daylight adaptedvision in photopic response tables.

photomultiplier tube
Also contains definitions of: channel photomultiplier tube, strip dynode photomultipliertubeA vacuum phototube with additional amplification by electron multiplication. It consists of aphotocathode, a series of dynodes, called a dynode chain on which a secondary-electron multiplicationprocess occurs, and an anode. According to the desired response time, transit time, time spread,gain, or low dark current, different types of dynode structures have been developed, e.g. circularcage structure, linear focused structure, venetian blind structure, box and grid structure. Some specialdynode structures permit combination with additional electric or magnetic fields. A strip dynodephotomultiplier tube consists of a photocathode followed by thin dynode material on an insulatingsubstrate. In a continuous-strip photomultiplier, two strip dynodes are arranged in parallel. A potentialapplied to the ends of the two strips produces an electric field across the continuous strip dynodes,giving rise to electron multiplication along the dynodes. In a resistance-strip magnetic photomultiplier,a uniform magnetic field is applied to the planes of the strips, so that the electrons travel in the crossedelectric and magnetic fields. A channel photomultiplier tube photocathode consists of a channelelectron multiplier (CEM) system for the photoelectrons, and an anode to collect the final electroncurrent. The basic part of the CEM is a tube with a semiconducting inner surface. In general it iscurved in order to inhibit the acceleration of positive ions towards the photocathode. A number ofsmall channels called microchannels can be constructed in arrays for imaging applications.

photon
Particle of zero charge, zero rest mass, spin quantum number 1, energyand momentum( isthe Planck constant, the frequency of radiation and the speed of light), carrier of electromagneticforce.

photon activation
See: activation in radiochemistry

photon counting
Also contains definition of: single-photon countingRecording of sequential single photons counted by way of recording and counting sequential electronpulses at the anode of the photomultiplier.Notes:1. Each electron pulse consists of 105–106 electrons resulting from the multiplication, in the'dynode' arrangement (or the microchannel plate) of a photomultiplier, of a single photoelectronemitted by a photosensitive layer (the photocathode of the photomultiplier) upon arrival of asingle photon.2. Technique used for two purposes: (i) sensitive measurement of low levels of radiation such asthose originating from a luminophore and (ii) recording of emission decays.

photon echo
Time-resolved optical spectroscopy in which the inhomogeneous broadening of absorbers iseliminated by the proper choice of geometry in a four-wave mixing experiment.Notes:1. Term applied to a group of non-linear optical techniques such as integrated echo, time-gatedecho, three-pulse echo peak shift, heterodyne-detected echo and 2D-echo.2. Photon echo techniques make use of the third-order optical polarization and 'hypersusceptibility'. The main distinguishing feature of photon echo methods from all other third-orderprocesses is the time ordering of the field interactions that leads to a rephasing process in theinduced polarization to remove inhomogeneous contributions to the absorption linewidth.3. In terms of mathematical description, the photon echo is equal to the spin echo (solid-statephysics) from which a term 'echo' was borrowed.4. Technique used, e.g., to probe solvation dynamics upon (ultra-short) pulse excitation of achromophore.

















photon quantities
A group of quantities characterizing electromagnetic radiation in terms of the number of photons. Thesymbols of photon quantities may be distinguished by adding a subscript p.See also: radiant, luminous quantities



photooxidation
Oxidation reactions induced by light. Common processes are: 1, the loss of one or more electrons froma chemical species as a result of photoexcitation of that species; 2, the reaction of a substance withoxygen under the influence of light. When oxygen remains in the product this latter process is alsocalled photooxygenation. Reactions in which neither the substrate nor the oxygen are electronicallyexcited are sometimes called photoinitiated oxidations.See also: photoreduction

photooxygenation
The incorporation of molecular oxygen into a molecular entity. There are three common mechanisms:Type I: the reaction of triplet molecular oxygen with radicals formed photochemically. Type II: thereaction of photochemically produced singlet molecular oxygen with molecular entities to give rise tooxygen containing molecular entities. The third mechanism proceeds by electron transfer producingsuperoxide anion as the reactive species.See also: photooxidation

photophoresis
In aerosol physics, the motion of particles due to the influence of light. In many cases, this amountsto a special form of thermophoresis due to the heating of the particles by the light.

photophosphorylation
The transformation of light (solar) energy for the reduction of CO2 and the generation of adenosine5'-triphosphate, ATP.

photophysical processes
Photoexcitation and subsequent events which lead from one to another state of a molecular entitythrough radiation and radiationless transitions. No chemical change results.

photopolymerization
Polymerization processes requiring a photon for the propagation step.See also: photoinduced polymerization

photorearrangement
Photoisomerization involving changes in the arrangement of the atoms within the molecular species.It may lead to unstable isomers that react further by, e.g., dehydrogenation, deprotonation, or otherreactions.Note:Examples are photorearrangements of alkenes (other than cis-trans photoisomerization), ofcyclohex-2-enones, of endoperoxides, of thioarenes, the di-π-methane rearrangement and others.

photoreduction
Reduction reactions induced by light. Common processes are: 1, addition of one or more electrons toa photoexcited species; 2, the photochemical hydrogenation of a substance. Reactions in which thesubstrate is not electronically excited are sometimes called photoinitiated reductions.See also: photooxidation

photoresist
A photoimaging material, generally applied as a thin film, whose local solubility properties can bealtered photochemically. A subsequent development step produces an image which is useful for thefabrication of microelectronic devices (e.g. integrated circuits).

photoselection
Selection of an aligned subset of sample molecules by an exciting light beam. The selected subset willhave an orientation distribution that is determined by the electric vector of the beam. If the beam islinearly polarized a uniaxial sample with a known orientation distribution will be produced. Also, theset of remaining molecules will be aligned with a known orientation distribution (residual anisotropy).

photosensitive polymer
Polymer that responds to ultraviolet or visible light by exhibiting a change in its physical propertiesor its chemical constitution.Notes:1. Examples of the changes in photosensitive polymers are a change in molecular shape (photoresponsive polymer), a change in its constitution (photo-reactive polymer), and a reversiblechange in color (photochromic polymer).2. Photosensitivity in photosensitive polymers means that the polymers are sensitive to theirradiated light leading to some change in properties or structure. It is different fromphotosensitization.3. See also: photoreaction, photochromism.

photosensitization
The process by which a photochemical or photophysical alteration occurs in one molecular entityas a result of initial absorption of radiation by another molecular entity called a photosensitizer. Inmechanistic photochemistry the term is limited to cases in which the photosensitizer is not consumedin the reaction.See: energy transfer

photosensitizer
See: photosensitization

photostationary state
A steady state reached by a reacting chemical system when light has been absorbed by at least oneof the components. At this state the rates of formation and disappearance are equal for each of thetransient molecular entities formed.

photosynthesis
A metabolic process involving plants and some types of bacteria (e.g. Chromataceae,Rhodospirillaceae, Chlorobiaceae) in which light energy absorbed by chlorophyll and otherphotosynthetic pigments results in the reduction of CO2 followed by the formation of organiccompounds. In plants the overall process involves the conversion of CO2 and H2O to carbohydrates(and other plant material) and the release of O2 .

photosystem
A membrane-bound complex in plants and photosynthetic bacteria, responsible for light-harvestingand primary electron transfer. Comprises light-harvesting pigments such as chlorophyll; a primaryelectron-transfer centre, and secondary electron carriers. In green plant photosynthesis, PhotosystemI transfers electrons from plastocyanin to a [2Fe-2S] ferredoxin, and contains iron-sulfur proteins.Photosystem II transfers electrons from the oxygen-evolving complex to plastoquinone, and containsan iron centre.

photothermal effect
An effect produced by photoexcitation resulting partially or totally in the production of heat.

photothermography
A process utilizing both light and heat, simultaneously or sequentially, for image recording.

phototransistor
Also contains definitions of: Darlington phototransistor, field effect phototransistorA bipolar transistor with its base-collector junction acting as a photodiode, which, if irradiated,controls the response of the device. Due to the inherent current gain (of the transistor) the responsivityof the phototransistor is greater than that of photodiodes. A Darlington phototransistor consists of twoseparate transistors coupled in the high-impedance Darlington configuration with a phototransistor asthe input transistor. A field effect phototransistor or photo-FET is a field effect transistor (FET) thatemploys photogeneration of carriers in the channel region (the neutral region sandwiched between theinsulator and the depletion region under the gate of the FET). It is characterized by high responsivitydue to the high current gain of the FET.

photovoltaic cell
A solid state device, usually a semiconductor such as silicon, which absorbs photons with energieshigher than or equal to the bandgap energy and simultaneously produces electric power.See also: photogalvanic cell

phthaleins
3,3-Bis(hydroxyaryl)-2-benzofuran-1(3H)-ones generally derived from the condensation of phthalicanhydride with phenols. E.g. phenolphthalein.See: xanthenes

phthalides
3,3-Di(hydrocarbyl) or 3-hydrocarbylidene-2-benzofuran-1(3H)-ones.See: phthaleins

physical network
Polymer network with junction points or zones formed by physically interacting chains which neednot be permanent.Notes:1. The junction points or zones need not be permanent over the time scale of the observation ormeasurement.2. The interaction can be due to hydrogen bonds, π–π interactions, chain entanglements, etc.3.Modification of the entry given as a note within the definition of network in polymer chemistry.







pico
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

picrates
Salts or charge-transfer complexes of picric acid (2,4,6-trinitrophenol).See: styphnates

piezoelectric polymer
1.2.Polymer that exhibits a change in dielectric properties on application of pressure orpolymer that shows a change in its dimensions when subjected to an electric field.

piezoluminescence
Luminescence observed when certain solids are subjected to a change in pressure.See: triboluminescence





pinacols
Tetra(hydrocarbyl)ethane-1,2-diols, R2C(OH)–(OH)R2 , of which the tetramethyl example is thesimplest one and is itself commonly known as pinacol (benzpinacol is the tetraphenyl analogue).

pinocytosis
Type of endocytosis in which soluble materials are taken up by the cell and incorporated into vesiclesfor digestion.

pitch
A residue from pyrolysis of organic material or tar distillation which is solid at room temperature,consisting of a complex mixture of numerous, essentially aromatic hydrocarbons and heterocycliccompounds. It exhibits a broad softening range instead of a defined melting temperature. When cooledfrom the melt, pitches solidify without crystallization.Note:The ratio of aromatic to aliphatic hydrogen depends mainly on the source of the starting material.The hydrogen aromaticity (ratio of aromatic to total hydrogen atoms) varies between 0.3 and 0.9.The aliphatic hydrogen in pitch is largely associated with alkyl side chains substituted on aromaticrings. The content of heterocyclic compounds in pitches varies depending on their origins. Also, thesoftening temperature can vary in a broad range between aboutanddepending on themolecular weight (relative molecular mass) and composition of the constituents.

pitch-based carbon fibres
Carbon fibres obtained from pitch precursor fibres after stabilization treatment, carbonization andfinal heat treatment.Note:The term pitch-based carbon fibres comprises the isotropic pitch-based carbon fibres as well asthe anisotropic mesophase pitch-based carbon fibres (MPP-based carbon fibres). The isotropic typebelongs to the carbon fibres type LM (low modulus) and is mainly used as filler in polymers andinsulation materials and for similar applications. The anisotropic type (MPP-based carbon fibres)belongs to the carbon fibres type HM and is used mainly for reinforcement purposes due to its highYoung's modulus value.

pitting corrosion
A special type of non-uniform corrosion of passive metals, resulting in the formation of pits, whichusually occurs in the presence of certain anions at electrode potentials positive to a critical pittingpotential.

planar chirality
Also contains definition of: Rp, SpSynonym: planar stereoisomerismTerm used by some authorities to refer to stereoisomerism resulting from the arrangement of outof-plane groups with respect to a plane (chirality plane ). It is exemplified by the atropisomerism of(E)-cyclooctene (chiral plane = double bond and attached atoms) or monosubstituted paracyclophane(chiral plane = substituted ring). The configuration of molecular entities possessing planar chiralityis specified by the stereodescriptorsand(or and ).

planar chromatography
A separation technique in which the stationary phase is present as or on a plane. The plane can bea paper, serving as such or impregnated by a substrate as the stationary bed (paper chromatography,PC) or a layer of solid particles spread on a support e.g. a glass plate (thin layer chromatography,TLC). Sometimes planar chromatography is also termed open-bed chromatography.

planar film
A film whose boundaries are represented by ideal parallel planes. The planar film thickness is definedas the distance between these planes. The terms nanometre thick film, micrometre thick film andmillimetre thick film refer specifically to film thickness in the ranges,and, respectively.



Planck constant
Universalfundamentalphysicalconstant,or. The latter is used as atomic unit of action.

plane angle
See: angle







plasmid
An extrachromosomal genetic element consisting generally of a circular duplex of DNA which canreplicate independently of chromosomal DNA. R-plasmids are responsible for the mutual transfer ofantibiotic resistance among microbes. Plasmids are used as vectors for cloning DNA in bacteria oryeast host cells.

plastic flow
Steady flow occurring only above a certain finite stress.

plastic transition
A first-order transition that occurs when a low-temperature phase transforms to an orientationallydisordered high-temperature phase with a strong variation of enthalpy.









pleiotropic gene
A gene affecting more than one (apparently unrelated) characteristic of the phenotype.

ploidy
A term indicating the number of sets of chromosomes present in an organism, e.g. haploid (one) ordiploid (two).



plumbylenes [obsolete]
An older, no longer recommended name for plumbylidenes.

plumbylidenes
Carbene analogues having the structure R2Pb: .





pneumatic detector
A pressure-sensitive detector based on the pressure increase of a gas. A special type is the Golay cellwhere the pressure change is detected by observing the deflection off one of the chamber walls.

point group
The classification of the symmetry elements of an object. It is denoted in the Schoenflies notation byan italic symbol, such as,, , etc.

point of zero charge (p.z.c.)
A surface charge is at its point of zero charge when the surface charge density is zero. It is a value ofthe negative logarithm of the activity in the bulk of the charge-determining ions.





Poisson distribution
A discrete distribution with the differential mass-distribution function of the form:where is a parameter characterizing the chain length, such as relative molecular mass or degree ofpolymerization and is a positive adjustable parameter.

polar aprotic solvent [obsolete]
See: dipolar aprotic solvent

polar effect
For a reactant molecule RY, the polar effect of the group R comprises all the processes wherebya substituent may modify the electrostatic forces operating at the reaction centre Y, relative to thestandard. These forces may be governed by charge separations arising from differences inthe electronegativity of atoms (leading to the presence of dipoles), the presence of unipoles, orelectron delocalization. It is synonymous with electronic effect or 'electrical effect' of a substituentas distinguished from other substituent effects, e.g. steric effects. Sometimes, however, the term'polar effect' is taken to refer to the influence, other than steric, that non-conjugated substituents exerton reaction rates, i.e. effects connected with electron delocalization between a substituent and themolecular framework to which it is attached are excluded. Polar effect is then not synonymous withelectronic effectSee also: field effect, inductive effect, mesomeric effect

polar solvent
See: polarity

polarity
When applied to solvents, this rather ill-defined term covers their overall solvation capability(solvation power) for solutes (i.e. in chemical equilibria: reactants and products; in reaction rates:reactants and activated complex; in light absorptions: ions or molecules in the ground and excitedstate), which in turn depends on the action of all possible, nonspecific and specific, intermolecularinteractions between solute ions or molecules and solvent molecules, excluding such interactionsleading to definite chemical alterations of the ions or molecules of the solute. Occasionally, the termsolvent polarity is restricted to nonspecific solute/solvent interactions only (i.e. to van der Waalsforces).See also: Dimroth–Reichardtparameter, Grunwald–Winstein equation, ionizing power, Kamlet–Taft solvent parameters, van der Waals forces, Z-value

polarizability
The ease of distortion of the electron cloud of a molecular entity by an electric field (such as that dueto the proximity of a charged reagent). It is experimentally measured as the ratio of induced dipolemoment () to the field which induces it:The units of are. In ordinary usage the term refers to the 'mean polarizability', i.e., theaverage over three rectilinear axes of the molecule. Polarizabilities in different directions (e.g. alongthe bond in Cl2 , called 'longitudinal polarizability', and in the direction perpendicular to the bond,called 'transverse polarizability') can be distinguished, at least in principle. Polarizability along thebond joining a substituent to the rest of the molecule is seen in certain modern theoretical approachesas a factor influencing chemical reactivity, etc., and parametrization thereof has been proposed.See also: electric polarizability









polarography
A measure of current as a function of potential when the working electrode is a dropping mercury (orother liquid conductor) electrode and unstirred solutions are used.

polaron
Lattice distortion or polarization caused by photoexcitation.

pollution (pollutant)
See: air pollutant, air pollution

polyacid
In polymer terminology, polyelectrolyte composed of macromolecules containing acid groups on asubstantial fraction of the constitutional units.Note:Most commonly, the acid groups are –COOH , –SO3H, or –PO3H2 .

polyaddition
A polymerization in which the growth of polymer chains proceeds by addition reactions betweenmolecules of all degrees of polymerization.Notes:1. The growth steps are expressed by:whereanddenote chains of degrees of polymerizationand , respectively.2.The earlier term 'addition polymerization' embraced both the current concepts of 'polyaddition'and 'chain polymerization', but did not include 'condensative chain polymerization'.

polybase
In polymer terminology, polyelectrolyte composed of macromolecules containing basic groups on asubstantial fraction of the constitutional units.Note:Most commonly, the basic groups are amino groups.

polybetaine
Ampholytic polymer in which pendant groups have a betaine-type structure.Note:A polybetaine is a type of zwitterionic polymer.

polychromator
An extension of a monochromator, a number of exit slits being placed in the focal plane, so allowinga number of discrete bands to pass through (to fall, for example, upon a number of photomultipliers).

polycondensation
A polymerization in which the growth of polymer chains proceeds by condensation reactions betweenmolecules of all degrees of polymerization.Notes:1. The growth steps are expressed by:whereanddenote chains of degree of polymerizationmolar-mass by-product.and , respectively, anda low-2.The earlier term 'polycondensation' was synonymous with 'condensation polymerization'. Itshould be noted that the current definitions of polycondensation and condensative chainpolymerization were both embraced by the earlier term 'polycondensation'.

polycrystalline graphite
A graphite material with coherent crystallographic domains of limited size regardless of the perfectionand preferred orientation (texture) of their crystalline structure.Note:The common use of the term polycrystalline graphite for polygranular graphite is in line with thisdefinition but may be inexact because usually all grains of polygranular graphite are polycrystallinethemselves. Polycrystalline graphite can exhibit a random orientation, more or less preferredorientation, or a highly oriented texture as in some pyrolytic graphites There is no sharp transition,however, between the typical polycrystalline texture and the 'single crystal-like' texture of highlyoriented pyrolytic graphite (HOPG).

polycyclic system
A molecular system regarded as containing a number of rings equal to the number of scissions requiredto convert it into an open-chain compound.

polydisperse medium
A colloidal system in which many particle sizes occur.

polydisperse polymer
See: non-uniform polymer

polyelectrolyte
Synonyms: polymer electrolyte, polymeric electrolytePolymer composed of macromolecules in which a substantial portion of the constitutional unitscontains ionic or ionizable groups, or both.Notes:1. The terms polyelectrolyte, polymer electrolyte, and polymeric electrolyte should not be confusedwith the term solid polymer electrolyte.2. Polyelectrolytes can be either synthetic or natural. Nucleic acids, proteins, teichoic acids, somepolypeptides, and some polysaccharides are examples of natural polyelectrolytes.

polyelectrolyte complex
Neutral polymer-polymer complex composed of macromolecules carrying charges of opposite signcausing the macromolecules to be bound together by electrostatic interactions.Note:A polyelectrolyte complex is also called a polysalt. Use of this term is not recommended.

polyelectrolyte gel
Polymer gel in which the polymer network contains ionic or ionizable groups in a significant fractionof its constitutional units.

polyelectrolyte network
Polymer network containing ionic or ionizable groups in a substantial fraction of its constitutionalunits.Notes:1. A polyelectrolyte network is sometimes called a crosslinked polyelectrolyte. Use of the latterterm is not recommended unless the polyelectrolyte network is formed by the crosslinking ofexisting polyelectrolyte macromolecules rather than by non-linear polymerisation2. In contrast to a polyelectrolyte, a polyelectrolyte network is always insoluble, although swellingor contraction can occur when it is immersed in a solvent.3. A polyelectrolyte network in contact with a solution of a salt is able to exchange counter-ions(cations or anions) with ionic species in the solution and act as an ion exchanger. Therefore, apolyelectrolyte network is frequently described as an ion-exchange polymer.

polyfunctional catalysis
See: bifunctional catalysis

polygranular carbon
A carbon material composed of grains, which can be clearly distinguished by means of opticalmicroscopy.Note:Industrial carbon materials (such as electrodes) are mostly polygranular, but special grades areagranular materials, such as glass-like carbon, carbon fibres or pyrolytic carbon. Such materials arecovered by the term agranular carbon.

polygranular graphite
A graphite material composed of grains which can be clearly distinguished by means of opticalmicroscopy.Note:From the viewpoint of crystallinity, a polygranular graphite is always a polycrystalline graphite butnot vice versa. Most industrial graphite materials are polygranular. Monogranular materials consistmostly of non-graphitic carbon, such materials are called monolithic or agranular carbons.

polyhedral symbol
The polyhedral symbol indicates the geometrical arrangements of the coordinating atoms about thecentral atom. It consists of one or more capital italic letters derived from common geometric terms(tetrahedron, square plane, octahedron, etc.) which denote the idealised geometry of the ligands aroundthe coordination centre, and an arabic numeral that is the coordination number of the central atom.The polyhedral symbol is used as an affix, enclosed in parentheses, and separated from the name bya hyphen. Examples are T-4, SP-4, TBPY-5, SPY-5, OC-6, and CU-8.

polyhedranes
Polycyclic hydrocarbons of the (CH)n series having skeletons corresponding to the regular andsemiregular geometrical solids, e.g. cubane,

polyions
Polycations or polyanions — multiply charged ions.

polyketides
Synonyms: acetogenins, ketidesNatural compounds containing alternating carbonyl and methylene groups ('β-polyketones'),biogenetically derived from repeated condensation of acetyl coenzyme A (via malonyl coenzyme A),and usually the compounds derived from them by further condensations. Considered by many to besynonymous with the less frequently used terms acetogenins and ketides.

polymer
A substance composed of macromolecules.

polymer alloy
Polymeric material, exhibiting macroscopically uniform physical properties throughout its wholevolume, that comprises a compatible polymer blend, a miscible polymer blend or a multiphasecopolymer.

polymer blend
Macroscopically homogeneous mixture of two or more different species of polymer.Notes:1.2.3.4.5.In most cases, blends are homogeneous on scales larger than several times the wavelengths ofvisible light.In principle, the constituents of a blend are separable by physical means.No account is taken of the miscibility or immiscibility of the constituent macromolecules, i.e.,no assumption is made regarding the number of phase domains present.The use of the term polymer alloy for a polymer blend is discouraged, as the former term includesmultiphase copolymers but excludes incompatible polymer blends.The number of polymeric components which comprise a blend is often designated by anadjective, viz. binary, ternary, quaternary, etc.

polymer catalyst
Polymer that exhibits catalytic activity.Notes:1. Certain synthetic polymer catalysts can behave like enzymes.2. Poly(4-vinylpyridine) in its basic form, and sulfonated polystyrene in its acid form, are examplesof polymers that can act as catalysts in some base- and acid-catalyzed reactions, respectively.

polymer compatibilizer
Polymeric additive that, when added to a blend of immiscible polymers, modifies their interfaces andstabilizes the blend.Note:Typical polymer compatibilizers are block or graft copolymers.

polymer complexation
Also contains definition of: polymer complex formationProcess that results in the formation of a polymer–polymer complex or a complex composed of apolymer and a low-molar-mass substance.

polymer composite
Composite in which at least one component is a polymer.

polymer crystal
A crystalline domain usually limited by well-defined boundaries.Notes:1. Polymer crystals frequently do not display the perfection that is usual for low-molar-masssubstances.2. Twinned polymer crystals are, sometimes, erroneously referred to as 'crystals'.3. Polymer crystals that can be manipulated individually are often called (polymer) single crystals.A single crystal may contain different fold domains.

polymer crystallite
A small crystalline domain. A crystallite may have irregular boundaries and parts of its constituentmacromolecules may extend beyond its boundaries. This definition is not identical with that used inclassical crystallography.

polymer cyclization
Chemical reaction that leads to the formation of ring structures in or from polymer chains.Notes:1. Examples of cyclization along polymer chains are: (a) cyclization of polyacrylonitrile, (b)acetalization of poly(vinyl alcohol) with an aldehyde, (c) cyclization of polymers of conjugateddienes, such as polyisoprene or polybutadiene, leading to macrocycles.2. Examples of cyclization of polymer molecules are: (a) cyclization of poly(dimethylsiloxane), (b)back-biting reaction during ionic polymerizations of heterocyclic monomers.

polymer degradation
Chemical changes in a polymeric material that usually result in undesirable changes in the in-useproperties of the material.Notes:1. In most cases (e.g., in vinyl polymers, polyamides) degradation is accompanied by a decrease inmolar mass. In some cases (e.g., in polymers with aromatic rings in the main chain), degradationmeans changes in chemical structure. It can also be accompanied by crosslinking.2. Usually, degradation results in the loss of, or deterioration in, useful properties of the material.However, in the case of biodegradation (degradation by biological activity), polymers maychange into environmentally acceptable substances with desirable properties.

polymer drug
Polymer that contains either chemically-bound drug molecules or pharmacologically active moieties.Note:A polymer drug is usually used to provide drug-delivery targeted to an organ and controlled releaseof an active drug at the target organ.

polymer functionalization
Introduction of desired chemical groups into polymer molecules to create specific chemical, physical,biological, pharmacological, or other properties.

polymer gel
Gel in which the network component is a polymer.

polymer membrane
Thin layer of polymeric material that acts as a barrier permitting mass transport of selected species.Note:See also: membrane

polymer network
See: network polymer





polymer reaction
Chemical reaction in which at least one of the reactants is a high-molar-mass substance.

polymer solvent
Polymer that acts like a solvent for compounds of low molar mass.Note:An example of a polymer solvent is poly(oxyethylene); it can dissolve various inorganic salts bycomplexation.

polymer sorbent
Polymer that adsorbs or absorbs a certain substance or certain substances from a liquid or a gas.Notes:1. A polymer sorbent may be a polymer adsorbent or a polymer absorbent. The former acts bysurface sorption and the latter by bulk sorption.2. See also: sorption, adsorption, absorption.

polymer support
Polymer to or in which a reagent or catalyst is chemically bound, immobilized, dispersed, orassociated.Notes:1. A polymer support is usually a network polymer.2. A polymer support is usually prepared in bead form by suspension polymerization.3. The location of active sites introduced into a polymer support depends on the type of polymersupport. In a swollen-gel-bead polymer support the active sites are distributed uniformlythroughout the beads, whereas in a macroporous-bead polymer support they are predominantlyon the internal surfaces of the macropores.

polymer surfactant
Polymer that lowers the surface tension of the medium in which it is dissolved, or the interfacialtension with another phase, or both.Note:See also: surfactant.

polymer-derived ceramic
Acronym: PDCCeramic derived from a polymeric ceramic precursor.

polymer-metal complex
Complex comprising a metal and one or more polymeric ligands.

polymer-poor phase
Synonym: dilute phase in polymer chemistryThat phase of a two-phase equilibrium system, consisting of a polymer and low molecular weightmaterial, in which the polymer concentration is lower. The use of the name 'sol phase' is discouraged.Synonymous with dilute phase.

polymer-rich phase
Synonym: concentrated phase in polymer chemistryThat phase of a two-phase equilibrium system, consisting of a polymer and low molecular weightmaterial, in which the polymer concentration is higher. The use of the name 'gel phase' is discouraged.Synonymous with concentrated phase.

polymer-supported catalyst
Catalyst system comprising a polymer support in which catalytically active species are immobilizedthrough chemical bonds or weaker interactions such as hydrogen bonds or donor–acceptorinteractions.Notes:1. Polymer-supported catalysts are often based on network polymers in the form of beads. They areeasy to separate from reaction media and can be used repeatedly.2.3.Examples of polymer-supported catalysts are: (a) a polymer-metal complex that can coordinatereactants, (b) colloidal palladium dispersed in a swollen network polymer that can act as ahydrogenation catalyst.Polymer-supported enzymes are a type of polymer-supported catalysts.

polymer-supported reaction
Chemical reaction in which at least one reactant or a catalyst is bound through chemical bonds orweaker interactions, such as hydrogen bonds or donor–acceptor interactions, to a polymer.Notes:1. The easy separation of low-molar-mass reactants or products from the polymer-supported speciesis a great advantage of polymer-supported reactions.2. Typical examples of polymer-supported reactions are: (a) reactions performed by use of polymersupported catalysts, (b) solid-phase peptide synthesis, in which intermediate peptide moleculesare chemically bonded to beads of a suitable polymer support.









polymer–polymer complex
Complex, at least two components of which are different polymers.Notes:1. A complex is a molecular entity formed from two or more components that can be ionic oruncharged.2. Although the intrinsic binding energy between the individual interacting sites giving rise to thecomplex is weaker than a covalent bond, the total binding energy for any single molecule mayexceed the energy of a single covalent bond.3. The properties of a complex defined here differ from those given elsewhere because, owing to therepeating nature of a polymer molecule, many interacting sites may be present, which togetherwill provide stronger bonding than a single covalent bond.

polymer–solvent interaction
The sum of the effects of all intermolecular interactions between polymer and solvent molecules insolution that are reflected in the Gibbs and Helmholtz energies of mixing.

polymolecularity correction
A correction applied to relationships between a property and the molar mass or relative molecularmass, obtained from polymers non-uniform with respect to relative molecular mass, in order to obtainthe corresponding relationship for polymers strictly uniform with respect to relative molecular mass.

polymorphic transition
A reversible transition of a solid crystalline phase at a certain temperature and pressure (the inversionpoint ) to another phase of the same chemical composition with a different crystal structure.Note:In a liquid-crystal transition, this term refers to phase changes in the smectic state or columnar discoticstate.Examples:1. The transitions of SiO2 (quartz-type) atto SiO2 (tridymite-type), and atto SiO2(cristobalite-type).2. The transition of β-AgI (wurtzite-type structure) to α-AgI (body-centred-cubic structure) at. Synonymous with enantiotropic transition.

polypeptides
Peptides containing ten or more amino acid residues.

polyprenols
A subgroup of prenols in whichthan 4.in the general formula H–[CH2–C(CH3)=CH–CH2]n–OH is greater

polyquinanes (polyquinenes)
Saturated or unsaturated, respectively, polycyclic hydrocarbons consisting of fused fivemembered rings, commonly but not necessarily incorporating the skeleton of quinacene(tricyclo[5.2.1.04,10]deca-2,5,8-triene):E.g. bicyclo[3.3.0]octane, dodecahedrane.

polysaccharides
Compounds consisting of a large number of monosaccharides linked glycosidically. This term iscommonly used only for those containing more than ten monosaccharide residues. Also calledglycans.

polysulfanes
Compounds having an unbranched chain of sulfur atoms (S2 or higher) terminating in H: HSnH. Somechemists exclude disulfane, HS2H, from the class polysulfanes.

polysulfides
Compounds R–[S]n–R , with a chain of sulfur atoms (disulfides, RS2R , from the class polysulfides.) and R ≠ H. Some chemists exclude

polytopal rearrangement
Stereoisomerization interconverting different or equivalent spatial arrangements of ligands about acentral atom or of a cage of atoms, where the ligand or cage defines the vertices of a polyhedron. Forexample pyramidal inversion of amines, Berry pseudorotation of PF5, rearrangements of polyhedralboranes.

polytypic transition
A transition of a crystalline structure into one or more forms which differ in the way identical layers ofatoms are stacked. Example: ZnS consists of two identical close packings, one of Zn atoms, the otherS atoms, with the one displaced to the other along the c-axis through one-quarter of the layer spacing.In sphalerite-type ZnS the layers have the face-centred-cubic (ABC ABC) sequence, in wurtzite-typeZnS they have the hexagonal-close-packed (AB AB) sequence. The transition of sphalerite-type ZnSto wurtzite-type ZnS occurs at.





population inversion
A situation in which a higher energy state is more populated than a lower energy state.

pore size distribution
The distribution of pore volume with respect to pore size; alternatively, it may be defined by therelated distribution of pore area with respect to pore size.

porosity
A concept related to texture, referring to the pore space in a material.



porphyrinogens
Hexahydroporphyrins in which the nitrogen atoms and four meso positions are saturated.

porphyrins
Natural pigments containing a fundamental skeleton of four pyrrole nuclei united through the αpositions by four methine groups to form a macrocyclic structure (porphyrin is designated porphinein Chemical Abstracts indexes).See also: corrinoids



positive feedback
See: composite reaction





positronium
Atom-like pair of particles consisting of an anti-electron (positron) and an electron.





postprecipitation
The subsequent precipitation of a chemically different species upon the surface of an initial precipitateusually, but not necessarily, including a common ion.





potential of a cell reaction
See: standard electrode potential

potential temperature
The temperature that a dry air parcel would have if lowered or raised adiabatically to a level of 1000pressure (or other arbitrary standard pressure).









potentiometer
1.2.In electronics, a sensitive voltage measuring device based on a null technique which providesinfinite impedance at null.In chemistry, potentiometric methods involve the measurement with a potentiometer of voltagegenerated in a cell. A high impedance digital voltmeter is often used today as a convenientalternative to a potentiometer.







power level
Logarithm of the ratio of a power to a reference power. Levels are expressed in different ways:, where, whereis the symbol for the unitnepercoherent with the SI, oris the symbol for the unit decibel .

pre-association
A step on the reaction path of some stepwise reactions in which the molecular entity C is alreadypresent in an encounter pair or encounter complex with A during the formation of B from A, e.g.In this mechanism the chemical species C may but does not necessarily assist the formation of B fromA, which may itself be a bimolecular reaction with some other reagent. Pre-association is importantwhen B is too short-lived to permit B and C to come together by diffusion.See also: microscopic diffusion control, spectator mechanism









pre-gel regime
Stage of a network-forming polymerization or crosslinking process extending up to, but not beyond,the gel point.Note:The pre-gel regime may be expressed as the length of time or the chemical conversion required toreach the gel point from the start of a polymerization or crosslinking process.

pre-gel state
State of a network-forming polymerization or crosslinking process in the pre-gel regime.Note:In the pre-gel state, the sol fraction is equal to unity. All the molecules formed have finite (statisticallydefinable) relative molecular masses.

pre-polymer
A polymer or oligomer composed of pre-polymer molecules.

pre-polymer molecule
Also contains definition of: telechelic moleculeA macromolecule or oligomer molecule capable of entering, through reactive groups, into furtherpolymerization, thereby contributing more than one monomeric unit to at least one chain of the finalmacromolecule. A pre-polymer molecule capable of entering into further polymerization throughreactive end-groups, often deliberately introduced, is known as a telechelic molecule.

pre-reactive complexes
Weakly bound complexes with a potential minimum that precedes the activation barrier along thereaction path. In contrast with the van der Waals complexes, which fall apart reversibly into theirconstituents, the pre-reactive complexes may undergo a vigorous reaction to form different products.

precipitation
1.The sedimentation of a solid material (a precipitate) from a liquid solution in which the materialis present in amounts greater than its solubility in the liquid.









precipitation
in sol-gel processingSedimentation of a solid material (a precipitate) from a liquid solution in which the material is presentin amounts greater than its solubility in the liquid.Note:When precipitation occurs in sol-gel processing, sol particles have aggregated to a size wheregravitational forces cause them to sink or float. Generally, aggregation arises from a change in thesol that reduces the interparticle repulsion.



























prenols
Alcohols possessing the general formula H–[CH2C(Me)=CHCH2]nOH in which the carbon skeletonis composed of one or more isoprene units (biogenetic precursors of the isoprenoids).

prepolymer
Polymer or oligomer the molecules of which are capable of entering, through reactive groups, intofurther polymerization and thereby contributing more than one structural unit to at least one type ofchain of the final polymer.

prepreg
Sheets of a substrate that have been impregnated with a curable polymer, curable polymers, or liquidreactants, or a thermoplastic, and are ready for fabrication of laminates.Note:During the impregnation, the curable polymer, curable polymers, or liquid reactants may be allowedto react to a certain extent (sometimes termed degree of ripening).





pressure jump
See: relaxation

pressure-induced transition
A transition induced by a change of pressure. Example: The room-temperature transition of CdS witha wurtzite-type structure, at, to CdS with a NaCl-type structure.

pressure-sensitive detector
A detector which employs the pressure change which results from the absorption of radiation.



primary crystallization
The first stage of crystallization, considered to be ended when most of the spherulite surfaces impingeon each other. In isothermal crystallization, primary crystallization is often described by the Avramiequation.



primary isotope effect
A kinetic isotope effect attributable to isotopic substitution of an atom to which a bond is madeor broken in the rate-controlling step or in a pre-equilibrium step of a specified reaction. Thecorresponding isotope effect on the equilibrium constant of a reaction in which one or more bonds toisotopic atoms are broken, is called a 'primary equilibrium isotope effect'.See also: secondary isotope effect





primary pH standards
Certain substances which meet the criteria of:1. reproducible preparation in a highly pure state;2. stability of solution over a reasonable period of time;3. having a low value of the residual liquid junction potential;4. having pH betwen 3 and 11.









primary sample
The collection of one or more increments or units initially taken from a population. The portions maybe either combined (composited or bulked sample) or kept separate (gross sample). If combined andmixed to homogeneity, it is a blended bulk sample. The term 'bulk sample' is commonly used in thesampling literature as the sample formed by combining increments. The term is ambiguous since itcould also mean a sample from a bulk lot and it does not indicate whether the increments or units arekept separate or combined. Such use should be discouraged because less ambiguous alternative terms(composite sample, aggregate sample) are available. 'Lot sample' and 'batch sample' have also beenused for this concept, but they are self limiting terms. The use of 'primary' in this sense is not meantto imply the necessity for multistage sampling.

primary structure
In the context of macromolecules such as proteins, constitutional formula, usually abbreviated to astatement of the sequence and if appropriate cross-linking of chains.See also: secondary structure, tertiary structure, quaternary structure

primary structure
of a segment of a polypeptideThe amino acid sequence of the polypeptide chain(s), without regard to spatial arrangement (apartfrom configuration at the α-carbon atom).Note:This definition does not include the positions of disulfide bonds and is therefore not identical with'covalent structure'.

primitive change
One of the conceptually simpler molecular changes into which an elementary reaction can benotionally dissected. Such changes include bond rupture, bond formation, internal rotation, changeof bond length or bond angle, bond migration, redistribution of charge, etc. The concept of primitivechanges is helpful in the detailed verbal description of elementary reactions, but a primitive changedoes not represent a process that is by itself necessarily observable as a component of an elementaryreaction.

principal group
The characteristic group chosen for citation at the end of a name by a suffix or a class name.











priority
See: CIP priority

pro-E, pro-Z
One of a pair of identical groups c attached to a double bond (as in abC=Cc2) is described as pro-E if,when it is arbitrarily assigned CIP priority over the other group c, the stereodescriptor of the moleculebecomes E. The other group c is then described as pro-Z.

pro-R, pro-S
A stereoheterotopic group c (as in tetrahedral Xabc2) is described as pro-R if, when it is arbitrarilyassigned CIP priority over the other stereoheterotopic group c, the configuration of the thus generatedchiral centre is assigned the stereodescriptor R. The other group c is then described as pro-S. Thismethod for distinguishing between stereoheterotopic groups can be applied to other kinds of prochiralmolecular entities or prochiral parts of molecular entities considered on their own.See: prochirality centre







process
A phenomenon by which change takes place in a system. In physiological systems, a process maybe chemical, physical or both.

prochirality
Also contains definition of: proprochiralityThis term is used in different, sometimes contradictory ways; four are listed below.1. The geometric property of an achiral object (or spatial arrangement of points or atoms) whichis capable of becoming chiral in a single desymmetrization step. An achiral molecular entity,or a part of it considered on its own, is thus called prochiral if it can be made chiral bythe replacement of an existing atom (or achiral group) by a different one. An achiral objectwhich is capable of becoming chiral in two desymmetrization steps is sometimes described asproprochiral. For example the proprochiral CH3CO2H becomes prochiral as CH2DCO2H andchiral as CHDTCO2H .2. The term prochirality also applies to an achiral molecule or entity which contains a trigonalsystem and which can be made chiral by the addition to the trigonal system of a new atom orachiral group. For example addition of hydrogen to one of the enantiotopic faces of the prochiralketone CH3CH2COCH3 gives one of the enantiomers of the chiral alcohol CH3CH2CHOHCH3;the addition of CN− to one of the diastereotopic faces of the chiral aldehyde shown belowconverts it into one of the diastereoisomers of the cyanohydrin. The two faces of the trigonalsystem may be described as Re and Si.3.The term prochiral also applies to a tetrahedral atom of an achiral or chiral molecule which isbonded to two stereoheterotopic groups. For example, the prochiral molecule CH3CH2OH canbe converted into the chiral molecule CH3CHDOH by the isotopic replacement of one of the twoenantiotopic hydrogen atoms of the methylene group. The carbon atom of the methylene groupis called prochiral. The prochiral molecule HO2CCH2CHOHCH2CO2H can be converted into a4.chiral product by esterification of one of the two enantiotopic –CH2CO2H groups. The carbonatom of the CHOH group is called prochiral. The chiral molecule CH3CHOHCH2CH3 can beconverted into one of the diastereoisomers of CH3CHOHCHDCH3 by the isotopic replacementof one of the two diastereotopic hydrogen atoms of the methylene group. The carbon atomof the methylene group is called prochiral. The stereoheterotopic groups in these cases maybe described as pro-R or pro-S. Reference to the two stereoheterotopic groups themselves asprochiral, although common, is strongly discouraged.See: chirality centreThe term prochirality is also applied to the enantiotopic faces of a trigonal system.

prochirality centre
An atom of a molecule which becomes a chirality centre by replacing one of the two stereoheterotopicligands attached to it by a different ligand, e.g. C-1 of ethanol; C-3 of butan-2-ol.

product
A substance that is formed during a chemical reaction.See: reactant

product development control
The term is used for reactions under kinetic control where the selectivity parallels the relative(thermodynamic) stabilities of the products. Product development control is usually associated witha transition state occurring late on the reaction coordinate.See also: steric-approach control, thermodynamic control

product ion
Synonymous with daughter ion.

product state distribution
The distribution of available energy among the vibrational, rotational and translation degrees offreedom in the product molecules. The distribution usually referred to is that of the products at theinstant of their formation.

product-determining step
The step of a stepwise reaction in which the product distribution is determined. The productdetermining step may be identical to, or occur later than, the rate-controlling step on the reactioncoordinate.













projection formula
Also contains definition of: stereoformulaA formal two-dimensional representation of a three-dimensional molecular structure obtained byprojection of bonds (symbolized as lines) onto a plane with or without the designation of thepositions of relevant atoms by their chemical symbols. A projection formula which indicates thespatial arrangement of bonds is called a stereochemical formula or stereoformula. Examples ofstereoformulae are Fischer projection, Newman projection, sawhorse projection, wedge projectionand zig-zag projection.See also: perspective formula



promoter (gene technology)
The DNA region, usually upsteam to the coding sequence of a gene or operon, which binds and directsRNA polymerase to the correct transcriptional start site and thus permits the initation of transcription.



promotion
See: pseudo-catalysis

prompt coincidence
The occurrence of two or more events separated by a time interval which is less than a specified smallvalue.

prompt neutrons
Neutrons accompanying the fission process without measurable delay.

propagation
See: chain reaction

propellanes
Tricyclic saturated hydrocarbons, systematically named tricyclo[a.b.c.0referred to as [a.b.c]propellanes.1,(a+2)]alkanes; have beenSee: paddlanes



prophage
The latent state of a phage genome in a lysogenic bacterium.

proportional counter
A gas-filled X-ray detector in which the electric potential is high enough for the gain to reach avalue in the range fromto. Each electron produced by the initial photo-ionization causes oneavalanche. Since the number of avalanche events is proportional to the energy of the incident photons,the charge collected by the anode is proportional to the X-ray photon energy.

proportional counter tube
A counter tube operated under such conditions that the magnitude of each pulse is proportional to theamount of energy deposited in it.







prostanoids
The family of natural prostaglandins and prostaglandin-like compounds.

prosthetic group
The non-amino acid portion of a conjugated protein. Examples include cofactors such as flavines orcytochromes as well as lipids and polysaccharides, which are the prosthetic groups of lipoproteinsand glycoproteins, respectively.

proteases
Enzymes that catalyse the hydrolysis of proteins. Usually several proteolytic enzymes are necessaryfor the complete breakdown of polypeptides to their amino acids.

protected lyophobic colloid
A colloidally stable mixture of a lyophobic and a lyophilic colloid.





protein engineering
A technique used to produce proteins with altered or novel amino acid sequences. The methods usedare:1. Transcription and translation systems from synthesized lengths of DNA or RNA with novelsequences.2. Chemical modification of 'normal' proteins.3.Solid-state polypeptide synthesis to form proteins.

proteins
Naturally occurring and synthetic polypeptides having molecular weights greater than about 10000(the limit is not precise).See also: peptides

proteoglycan
A subclass of protein in which the carbohydrate units are polysaccharides that contain amino sugars.The protein is glycosylated by one or more (up to about 100) glycosaminoglycans [linear polymersof up to about 200 repeating disaccharide units that consist of a hexosamine (D-glucosamine or Dgalactosamine) alternating with a uronic acid (D-glucuronic or L-iduronic) or a neutral sugar (Dgalactose)].

proteome
Complete set of proteins encoded by the genome.

protic
See: protogenic

protium
Also contains definitions of: protide, protioA specific name for the atom 1H. The cation 1H+ is a proton, the species 1H is a protide anion, and1H is the protio group. The word proton should not be used for H+ in its natural abundance.

protogenic (solvent)
Capable of acting as a proton donor (strongly or weakly acidic as a Brønsted acid). The term ispreferred to the synonym protic or the more ambiguous expression acidic by itself.

protolysis [obsolete]
This term has been used synonymously with proton (hydron)-transfer reaction. Because of itsmisleading similarity to hydrolysis, photolysis, etc., its use is discouraged.See also: autoprotolysis

proton
Nuclear particle of charge number +1, spin quantum numberSee also: protiumand rest mass of.

proton affinity
The negative of the enthalpy change in the gas phase reaction (real or hypothetical) between aproton (more appropriately hydron) and the chemical species concerned, usually an electrically neutralspecies to give the conjugate acid of that species. Proton affinity is often, but unofficially, abbreviatedas PA.See also: gas phase basicity

proton magnetic moment
Atomic fundamental physical constant.

proton magnetogyric ratio
Atomic fundamental physical constant.

proton rest mass
Atomic fundamental physical constant.

proton transfer reaction
A chemical reaction, the main feature of which is the intermolecular or intramolecular transfer of aproton (hydron) from one binding site to another. For example:In the detailed description of proton transfer reactions, especially of rapid proton transfers betweenelectronegative atoms, it should always be specified whether the term is used to refer to the overallprocess (including the more-or-less encounter-controlled formation of a hydrogen bonded complexand the separation of the products; see microscopic diffusion control) or just to the proton transferevent (including solvent rearrangement) by itself.See also: autoprotolysis, tautomerism



protonation constant
The equilibrium constantfor the addition of the th proton to a charged or uncharged ligand.The cumulative protonation constant,, is the equilibrium constant for the formation of HnL fromH+ and L. The same equilibrium constant may be described in several ways, depending on how theligand, L, or the acid, has been defined.

protophilic (solvent)
Capable of acting as proton acceptor, strongly or weakly basic (as a Brønsted base ). Also called HBA(hydrogen bond acceptor) solvent.See also: protogenic solvent

protoplast
A spherical, osmotically-sensitive cell without its cell wall but retaining an intact cell membrane.Protoplasts are used to create hybrid cells via protoplast fusion.

prototrophs
Microoganisms capable of growing at or below a temperature optimum of.



pseudo acids
Potentially acidic compounds that require some structural reorganization, such as keto–enoltautomerization, having a non-negligible activation energy, in order to show normal acidic properties,e.g. nitroalkanes:

pseudo bases
Hydroxy compounds that give salts with acids by formation of water accompanied by a change ofconstitution.See: anhydro bases

pseudo rate constant
A term sometimes used for a rate coefficient. For example, if the rate equation is:the functionis the pseudo first-order rate constant (or first-order rate coefficient) with respect toB. Similarly,is the pseudo first-order rate constant (or first-order rate coefficient) with respectto A. The term pseudo rate constant is particularly useful when the concentration of one reactant ismuch greater than that of another.See also: rate coefficient





pseudo-co-oligomer
An irregular oligomer, the molecules of which are derived from only one species of monomer butwhich display a variety of structural features more appropriate for description in co-oligomer terms.

pseudo-copolymer
Also contains definition of: statistical pseudo-copolymerAn irregular polymer, the molecules of which are derived from only one species of monomer butwhich display a variety of structural features more appropriate for description in copolymer terms.Note:Where appropriate, adjectives specifying the types of 'copolymer' may be applied to'pseudo-copolymer'. The term statistical pseudo-copolymer, for instance, may be used to describe anirregular polymer in the molecules of which the sequential distribution of configurational units obeysknown statistical laws.

pseudo-first-order reaction
See: order of reaction

pseudo-unimolecular [obsolete]
A term sometimes used as synonymous with pseudo-first-order, but is inherently meaningless.See: molecularity, order of reaction

pseudo-zero-order reaction
See: order of reaction

pseudohalogens
Compounds that resemble the halogen elements, X2, in their chemistry, e.g. (CN)2 cyanogen, (SCN)2thiocyanogen, ICN iodine cyanide. Certain ions that have sufficient resemblance to halide ions aresometimes referred to as pseudohalide ions, e.g. N3−, SCN−, CN−.



pseudopericyclic
A concerted transformation is pseudopericyclic if the primary changes in bonding occur within acyclic array of atoms at one (or more) of which nonbonding and bonding atomic orbitals interchangeroles. A formal example is the enolenol prototropy of pentane-2,4-dione (acetylacetone).Because the - and -atomic orbitals that interchange roles are orthogonal, such a reaction does notproceed through a fully conjugated transition state and is thus not a pericyclic reaction and thereforenot governed by the rules that express orbital symmetry restrictions applicable to pericyclic reactions.

pseudorotation
Also contains definitions of: Berry pseudorotation, turnstile rotationStereoisomerization resulting in a structure that appears to have been produced by rotation ofthe entire initial molecule and is superposable on the initial one, unless different positions aredistinguished by substitution, including isotopic substitution. One example of pseudorotation is afacile interconversion between the many envelope and twist conformers of a cyclopentane due to theout of plane motion of carbon atoms. Another example of pseudorotation (Berry pseudorotation) is apolytopal rearrangement that provides an intramolecular mechanism for the isomerization of trigonalbipyramidal compounds (e.g.-phosphanes), the five bonds to the central atom E being representedas , , , and . Two equatorial bonds move apart and become apical bonds at the same timeas the apical bonds move together to become equatorial.A related conformational change of a trigonal bipyramidal structure is described as turnstile rotation.The process may be visualized as follows.An apical and an equatorial bond rotate as a pair ca. 120° relative to the other three bonds. (Doubtshave been expressed about the distinct physical reality of this mechanism.)

pseudoureas [obsolete]
An obsolescent synonym for isoureas.

psychosine
See: glycolipids

psychrometric hygrometer
Instrument by which the relative humidity of the atmosphere may be determined. It is generallycomposed of two temperature sensors, one of which measures the temperature of the air; the othersensor is moistened with water and senses the cooling due to evaporation of water. The temperaturedifference between the two sensors is a function of relative humidity; sometimes referred to as a 'wetand-dry bulb' thermometer.



puffing
An irreversible expansion of some carbon artifacts during graphitization heat treatment betweenand.Note:Puffing is caused by the release of heteroatoms, for instance sulfur atoms, from the coke in associationwith specific microstructural rearrangements.

puffing inhibitor
Metals or metal compounds with a high chemical affinity for the heteroatoms in the carbons. Theyare distributed as fine particles within the carbon materials to be graphitized.Note:Iron and iron compounds are most frequently used as puffing inhibitors when puffing is related tosulfur.

pulse amplitude analyser
Synonym: pulse height analyserA sub-assembly for determining the distribution function of a set of pulses in terms of their amplitude.Synonymous with pulse height analyser.

pulse amplitude selector
Synonym: single channel pulse height analyserA circuit which gives an output pulse for each input pulse whose amplitude lies within a choseninterval. Synonymous with single channel pulse height analyser.





pump-dump-probe technique
Transient absorption spectroscopy using three pulses (a strong pump, a dump pulse that can alter thecourse of the reaction photoinduced by the first pulse, and a weak probe). In general, femtosecondlaser pulses are used.

pump-probe technique
Transient absorption spectroscopy using two pulses (strong pump and weak probe) and capable ofachieving a high temporal resolution. A pump pulse excites the sample and triggers the process underinvestigation. A second delayed pulse, the probe, monitors an optical property. By varying the timedelay between the pump and probe pulses, it is possible to assemble measurements as a function oftime. The probe pulse is typically a UV, visible or infrared pulse in which case a snap-shot spectrumis taken as a function of the delay time. Often the probe pulse is generated from a portion of theexcitation beam, but it can also be an independently generated electromagnetic pulse.Note:In the case of an optical probe, this interaction is formally a non-linear optical process that isthird-order in polarization. The excitation intensity to create the excited state constitutes a two-fieldinteraction and the determination of the change in the time-dependent optical properties involves athird field monitoring the induced time-dependent changes in the 'linear susceptibility'. Diffractiveprobes (e.g., electrons and X-rays) can also be used, in which case one measures a diffraction patternas a function of time.

purine bases
Purine and its substitution derivatives, especially naturally occurring examples. The customarynumbering shown below is not systematic.purine

pyramidal inversion
A polytopal rearrangement in which the change in bond directions to a three-coordinate central atomhaving a pyramidal arrangement of bonds (tripodal arrangement) causes the central atom (apex of thepyramid) to appear to move to an equivalent position on the other side of the base of the pyramid. Ifthe three ligands to the central atom are different pyramidal inversion interconverts enantiomers.

pyranoses
Cyclic hemiacetal forms of monosaccharides in which the ring is six-membered (a tetrahydropyran).See: furanoses

pyrimidine bases
Pyrimidine and its substitution derivatives, especially naturally occurring examples.

pyro
A prefix designating compounds formed by heating a compound, usually with the elimination ofwater, carbon dioxide, or other simple molecule, e.g. pyroglutamic acid from glutamic acid.

pyroelectric detector
A detector (based on the temperature dependence of ferroelectricity in some crystals) which producesan electrical signal proportional to the energy flux on the collector surface.

pyrolysis
Thermolysis, usually associated with exposure to a high temperature.Notes:1. The term generally refers to reaction in an inert environment.2. Pyrolysis is the commonly used term for a high-temperature treatment that converts a ceramicprecursor to a ceramic.3. Modified from previous definition. The definition proposed here is more explicit about theelevated temperatures involved.





pyrolytic graphite
A graphite material with a high degree of preferred crystallographic orientation of the c-axesperpendicular to the surface of the substrate, obtained by graphitization heat treatment of pyrolyticcarbon or by chemical vapour deposition at temperatures above.Note:'Pyrographite', a synonym for pyrolytic graphite, was introduced as a trademark and should not beused as a term. Hot working of pyrolytic graphite (by heat treatment under compressive stress attemperatures above) results in highly oriented pyrolytic graphite (HOPG).

pyrromethenes
A less preferred term for dipyrrins. (The term 'pyrromethane' has been used for the system with a –CH2– linkage).

Q-switched laser
A laser in which the state of the device introducing important losses in the resonant cavity andpreventing lasing operation is suddenly switched to a state where the device introduces very lowlosses. This increases rapidly the Quality factor of the cavity, allowing the build-up of a short andvery intense laser pulse. Typical pulse durations are in the ns range. The Q-switching may be active(a rotating mirror or electro-optic device) or passive (a saturable absorber).See also: free-running laser







quadrupole mass analyser
An arrangement in which ions with a desired quotient mass/charge are made to describe a stable pathunder the effect of a static and a high-frequency electric quadrupole field, and are then detected. Ionswith a different mass/charge are separated from the detected ions because of their unstable paths.



qualitative analysis
Analysis in which substances are identified or classified on the basis of their chemical or physicalproperties, such as chemical reactivity, solubility, molecular weight, melting point, radiativeproperties (emission, absorption), mass spectra, nuclear half-life, etc.See also: quantitative analysis



quality assurance
The guarantee that the quality of a product (analytical data set, etc.) is actually what is claimed onthe basis of the quality control applied in creating that product. Quality assurance is not synonymouswith quality control. Quality assurance is meant to protect against failures of quality control.

quality control
The maintenance and statement of the quality of a product (data set, etc.) specifically that it meets orexceeds some minimum standard based on known, testable criteria.





quantitative analysis
Analyses in which the amount or concentration of an analyte may be determined (estimated) andexpressed as a numerical value in appropriate units. Qualitative analysis may take place withoutquantitative analysis, but quantitative analysis requires the identification (qualification) of the analytesfor which numerical estimates are given.





quantity
Attribute of a phenomenon, body or substance that may be distinguished qualitatively and determinedquantitatively.Notes:1. The term quantity may refer to a quantity in a general sense, for example length, mass, or to aparticular quantity, for example length of a particular rod, mass of a specified object.2. The term kind-of-quantity refers to the abstract concept of a quantity common to a group ofrelated quantities.

quantity calculus
Algebra with quantities where the symbols of quantities represent products of numerical values andtheir units.



quantized internal energy
The quantized internal energy of a molecule in its electronic ground or excited state can beapproximated with sufficient accuracy for analytical purposes by:whereis the electronic,the vibrational andthe rotational energy, respectively.

quantum counter
A medium emitting with a quantum yield independent of the excitation energy over a defined spectralrange (e.g, concentrated rhodamine 6G solutions betweenand). Also used for devicesproducing an electrical signal proportional to the photon flux absorbed in a medium.

quantum efficiency
See: efficiencyFor a primary photochemical process, quantum efficiency is identical to quantum yield.













quartz–iodine lamp
Wolfram (tungsten) filament high-intensity incandescent lamp containing iodine in a quartz envelope.Used primarily as a source of visible radiation.Notes:1. In halogen lamps, the quartz envelope is closer to the filament than the glass used in conventionallight bulbs. Heating the filament to a high temperature causes the tungsten (wolfram) atoms toevaporate and combine with the halogen gas. These heavier molecules are then deposited back onthe filament surface. This recycling process increases the life of the tungsten (wolfram) filament2.and enables the lamp to produce more light per unit of input energy. Consequently, halogenlamps are used in a variety of applications, including automobile headlights.Halogens other than iodine may be used in these lamps.



quasi-enantiomers
Constitutionally different yet closely related chemical species MX and MY having the oppositechirality sense of the large common chiral moiety M. For example (R)-2-bromobutane is aquasi-enantiomer of (S)-2-chlorobutane.See also: quasi-racemic compound

quasi-equilibrium
In conventional transition-state theory it is assumed that activated complexes are formed in a state ofequilibrium with the reactants. They are not in classical equilibrium with the reactants; if they were,addition of more activated complexes to the system would cause the equilibrium to shift in favour ofthe reactants. This would not occur for an activated complex, and the term quasi-equilibrium is usedto denote this special type of equilibrium.



quasi-racemic compound
The crystalline product of a 1:1 association between quasi-enantiomers.

quasi-single-strand polymer
A regular linear polymer that can be described by a preferred constitutional repeating unit in whichonly one terminal constituent subunit is connected through a single atom to the other identicalconstitutional repeating units or to an end group.





quencher
A molecular entity that deactivates (quenches) an excited state of another molecular entity, either byenergy transfer, electron transfer, or by a chemical mechanism.See: quenching, Stern–Volmer kinetic relationships

quenching
Also contains definitions of: dynamic quenching, static quenchingDeactivation of an excited molecular entity intermolecularly by an external environmental influence(such as a quencher) or intramolecularly by a substituent through a non-radiative process.Notes:1. When the external environmental influence (quencher) interferes with the behaviour of theexcited state after its formation, the process is referred to as dynamic quenching. Commonmechanisms include energy transfer, electron transfer, etc.2. When the environmental influence inhibits the excited state formation the process is referred toas static quenching.





quinarenes
Mancude assemblies of three carbocyclic rings, a six-membered quinonoid ring bonded at the 1,4positions to odd-membered rings which differ in ring size by two, e.g.

quinhydrones
Molecular complexes of one equivalent amount of a quinone with one equivalent amount of thecorresponding hydroquinone.

quinomethanes
Also contains definition of: xylylenesMethylidenecyclohexadienones and dimethylidenecyclohexadienes, formally derived from quinonesby replacement of one or both of the quinone oxygens by methylidene groups. (The diradical, tripletstate of quinodimethanes can also be called o- or p-xylylenes).



quinone diazides
A potentially confusing term for diazooxides; the presence of an azido group, –N3, is falsely suggested.

quinones
Compounds having a fully conjugated cyclic dione structure, such as that of benzoquinones, derivedfrom aromatic compounds by conversion of an even number of number of –CH= groups into –C(=O)–groups with any necessary rearrangement of double bonds (polycyclic and heterocyclic analogues areincluded).





ρ-value (rho-value)
A measure of the susceptibility to the influence of substituent groups on the rate constant orequilibrium constant of a particular organic reaction involving a family of related substrates. Definedby Hammett for the effect of ring substituents in meta- and para-positions of aromatic side-chainreactions by the empirical ' -equation' of the general form:in whichis a constant characteristic of the substituent X and of its position in the reactant molecule.More generally (and not only for aromatic series), -values (modified with appropriate subscripts andsuperscripts) are used to designate the susceptibility of reaction series for families of various organiccompounds to any substituent effects, as given by the modified set of -constants in an empirical-correlation. Reactions with a positive -value are accelerated (or the equilibrium constants ofanalogous equilibria are increased) by substituents with positive -constants. Since the sign of wasdefined so that substituents with a positive increase the acidity of benzoic acid, such substituentsare generally described as attracting electrons away from the aromatic ring. It follows that reactionswith a positive -value are considered to involve a transition state (or reaction product) so that thedifference in energy between this state and the reactants is decreased by a reduction in electron densityat the reactive site of the substrate.See also: Hammett equation, -constant, Taft equation





r, s
Stereodescriptor s of pseudo-asymmetric atoms

R*, S*
See: relative configuration

rabbit
A small container propelled pneumatically or hydraulically through a tube leading from the laboratoryto a location in a nuclear reactor or other device where irradiation of a sample can take place.

racemate
Also contains definitions of: rac, RSSynonym: SRAn equimolar mixture of a pair of enantiomers. It does not exhibit optical activity. The chemical nameor formula of a racemate is distinguished from those of the enantiomers by the prefix (±)- or rac- (orracem-) or by the symbols RS and SR.

racemic
Pertaining to a racemate.

racemic compound
A crystalline racemate in which the two enantiomers are present in equal amounts in a well definedarrangement within the lattice of a homogeneous crystalline addition compound.

racemic conglomerate
Also contains definition of: spontaneous resolutionAn equimolar mechanical mixture of crystals each one of which contains only one of the twoenantiomers present in a racemate. The process of its formation on crystallization of a racemate iscalled spontaneous resolution, since pure or nearly pure enantiomers can often be obtained from theconglomerate by sorting.

racemic mixture [obsolete]
The term is confusing since it has been used as a synonym for both racemate and racemicconglomerate. Usage strongly discouraged.

racemization
The production of a racemate from a chiral starting material in which one enantiomer is present inexcess.























radiant flux
See: radiant power





radiant quantities
Group of quantities characterizing electromagnetic radiation in terms of energy. The symbols ofradiant quantities may be distinguished by adding a subscript e.

radiation
A term embracing electromagnetic waves as well as fast moving particles. In radioanalytical chemistrythe term usually refers to radiation emitted during a nuclear process (radioactive decay, nuclearreaction, nuclear fission, accelerators).

radiation chemistry
The part of chemistry which deals with the chemical effects of ionizing radiation, as distinguishedfrom photochemistry associated with visible and ultraviolet electromagnetic radiation.

radiation constants
Fundamentalradiation
physicalconstantconstantsischaracterizingblackbodyradiation.,theThesecondfirstis, whereis the Planck constantthe speed of light andthe Boltzmann constant.



radiation counter
Radiation measuring assembly comprising a radiation detector in which individual ionizing eventscause electrical pulses and the associated equipment for processing and counting the pulses. Often anexpression is added indicating the type of radiation detector (e.g. scintillation, semiconductor ).

radiation detector
Also contains definitions of: energy dispersive detector, nonselective detector, nonselectivequantum counter, photochemical detector, photoelectric detector, selective detector, thermaldetectorA device in which incident radiation produces a measurable effect. If this effect is a rise in temperatureit is called a thermal detector. If it is a rise in pressure it is called a photoacoustic detector. In the casewhere an electrical signal is produced it is called a photoelectric detector. Photoelectric detectors canbe classified as photo-emissive detectors and semiconductor detectors. Where the radiation producesa chemical reaction, it is termed a photochemical detector. A detector yielding an output signal thatis independent of the wavelength of the radiation over a specific region is called a nonselectivedetector. Where it is wavelength specific it is a selective detector. A detector having a quantumefficiency independent of the wavelength is a nonselective quantum counter. Certain detectors are ableto distinguish between different quantum energies. This property is described by the energy resolutionand the energy resolving powerray spectroscopy, the reciprocal. These detectors are called energy dispersive detectors. In Xis often used but this is discouraged.

radiation hazard
Hazard that exists in a region where there is a radiation field, other than what is considered to benormal background radiation.

radiation reaction
Chemical reaction that is induced by ionizing radiation with γ-ray, X-ray, electron, or other highenergy beams.Notes:1. Radiation reactions involving polymers often lead to chain scission and crosslinking.2. A photochemical reaction is sometimes regarded as a type of radiation reaction.

radiation spectrum
The components of radiation arranged in order of their wavelengths, frequencies or quantum energies.For particle radiation they are arranged in order of their kinetic energies.

radiation trapping
Process by which the resonance radiation emitted in a lamp is absorbed and re-emitted many times inthe plasma prior to striking the phosphor. This process is called radiation trapping or imprisonment.Note:Radiation trapping lengthens the effective lifetime of emission as viewed from outside the lamp. Thecontrol of this trapping is, therefore, an important design consideration for low-pressure lamps.

radiationless deactivation
Also contains definition of: radiationless decayLoss of electronic excitation energy without photon emission or chemical change. Often, ultrafastradiationless decays are mediated by conical intersections.

radiationless transition
A transition between two states of a system without photon emission or absorption.See also: radiative transition



radiative capture
Capture of a particle by a nucleus followed by immediate emission of gamma radiation.



radiative energy transfer
Also contains definition of: trivial energy transferTransfer of excitation energy by radiative deactivation of a donor molecular entity and reabsorptionof the emitted radiation by an acceptor molecular entity.Notes:1. Radiative transfer results in a decrease of the donor fluorescence intensity in the region of spectraloverlap. Such a distortion of the fluorescence spectrum is called inner-filter effect.2. Radiative energy transfer depends on the shape and size of the vessel utilized and on theconfiguration of the latter with respect to excitation and observation.3. The fraction of photons emitted by D and absorbed by A is given bywhereis the molar concentration of acceptor,is the fluorescence quantum yield in theabsence of acceptor, is the thickness of the sample,andare the spectral distributionof the spectral radiant intensity of the donor fluorescence and the molar decadic absorptioncoefficient of the acceptor, respectively, with the normalization conditionFor relatively low absorbance,.can be approximated bywhere the integral represents the overlap between the donor fluorescence spectrum and theacceptor absorption spectrum.



radiative transition
A transition between two states of a molecular entity, the energy difference being emitted or absorbedas photons. In principle, radiative and radiationless transitions can be distinguished in molecules. Thefirst occur by absorption or emission of light quanta, and the latter is the result of the transformationof electronic excitation energy into vibrational/rotational energy.See also: radiationless transition

radical centre(s)
The atom (or group of atoms) in a polyatomic radical on which an unpaired electron is largelylocalized. Attachment of a monovalent atom to a radical centre gives a molecule for which it is possibleto write a Lewis formula in which the normal stable valencies are assigned to all atoms.

radical combination
See: colligation

radical copolymerization
A copolymerization which is a radical polymerization.

radical (free radical)
A molecular entity such as .CH3 , .SnH3 , Cl. possessing an unpaired electron. (In these formulae thedot, symbolizing the unpaired electron, should be placed so as to indicate the atom of highest spindensity, if this is possible.) Paramagnetic metal ions are not normally regarded as radicals. However,in the 'isolobal analogy' the similarity between certain paramagnetic metal ions and radicals becomesapparent. At least in the context of physical organic chemistry, it seems desirable to cease using theadjective 'free' in the general name of this type of chemical species and molecular entity, so that theterm 'free radical' may in future be restricted to those radicals which do not form parts of radical pairs.Depending upon the core atom that possesses the unpaired electron, the radicals can be described ascarbon-, oxygen-, nitrogen-, metal-centred radicals. If the unpaired electron occupies an orbital havingconsiderable s or more or less pure p character, the respective radicals are termed σ- or π-radicals. Inthe past, the term 'radical' was used to designate a substituent group bound to a molecular entity, asopposed to 'free radical', which nowadays is simply called radical. The bound entities may be calledgroups or substituents, but should no longer be called radicals.See also: biradical

radical ion
Also contains definitions of: anion radical, cation radical, radical anion, radical cationA radical that carries an electric charge. A positively charged radical is called a 'radical cation' (e.g. thebenzene radical cation C6H6.+ ); a negatively charged radical is called a 'radical anion' (e.g. the benzeneradical anion C6H6.− or the benzophenone radical anion Ph2C–O.− ). Commonly, but not necessarily,the odd electron and the charge are associated with the same atom. Unless the positions of unpairedspin and charge can be associated with specific atoms, superscript dot and charge designations shouldbe placed in the order .+ or .− suggested by the name 'radical ion'. (e.g. C3H6.+ ).Note:In the previous edition of this Compendium, it was recommended to place the charge designationdirectly above the centrally placed dot. However, this format is now discouraged because of thedifficulty of extending it to ions bearing more than one charge, and/or more than one unpaired electron.In mass spectroscopic usage the symbol for the charge precedes the dot representing the unpairedelectron.

radical pair (geminate pair)
The term is used to identify two radicals in close proximity in solution, within a solvent cage. Theymay be formed simultaneously by some unimolecular process, e.g. peroxide decomposition, or theymay have come together by diffusion. While the radicals are together, correlation of the unpairedelectron spins of the two species cannot be ignored: this correlation is responsible for the CIDNPphenomenon. A radical pair is called geminate provided that each radical partner is a descendant ofthe same parental pair.See also: geminate recombination

radical photosubstitution
Also contains definition of: free-radical photosubstitutionPhoto-induced substitution resulting from the reaction of radicals produced by photolysis of anappropriate reagent, such as, e.g., halogenated compounds.

radical polymerization
A chain polymerization in which the kinetic-chain carriers are radicals.Note:Usually, the growing chain end bears an unpaired electron.

radicofunctional name
See: functional class name

radioactive
The property of a nuclide of undergoing spontaneous nuclear transformations with the emission ofradiation.

radioactive age
The time, estimated from measurement of the isotopic composition, during which the content of aradioactive species within an object has remained unchanged except for nuclear decay.

radioactive contamination
A radioactive substance in a material or place where it is undesirable.

radioactive cooling
Of a strongly radioactive material, the decrease of its activity by nuclear decay.

radioactive dating
The determination of the radioactive age of an object from its content of radioactive substances andof their daughter products.

radioactive decay
Nuclear decay in which particles or electromagnetic radiation are emitted or the nucleus undergoesspontaneous fission or electron capture.

radioactive equilibrium
Among the members of a decay chain, the state which prevails when the ratios between the activitiesof successive members remain constant. (This is not an equilibrium in the strict sense since radioactivedecay is an irreversible process).

radioactive fallout
The deposition on the ground of radioactive substances from nuclear explosions and other injectionsof radioactive material into the atmosphere.

radioactive source
Any quantity of radioactive material which is intended for use as a source of ionizing radiation.

radioactive tracer
A tracer containing a radioactive label.



radioactive waste
Unwanted radioactive materials obtained in the processing or handling of radioactive materials.

radioactivity
The property of certain nuclides showing radioactive decay.





radiochemical purity
For a material, the fraction of the stated isotope present in the stated chemical form.

radiochemical separation
Separation by a chemical means of the radioactive isotopes of a specific element from a mixture ofradionuclides.

radiochemical yield
The yield of a radiochemical separation expressed as a fraction of the activity originally present.



radiochromatograph
A measuring assembly designed to measure the spatial or time distribution of the activity of a mixtureof radioactive components after separation by a chromatographic method.

radiocolloid
A colloid in which some atoms are radioactive.

radioenzymatic assay
An assay of the catalytic activity of an enzyme based on the use of a radioactive substrate.

radiograph
A visual representation of an object produced by placing the object between a source of ionizingradiation and a photographic plate or film.

radiogravimetric analysis
A kind of quantitative analysis in which the activity of a precipitate is used as a measure of its mass.

radioimmunoassay
An assay based on the reversible and non-covalent binding of an antigen (hapten) by a specificantibody employing radioactivity labelled antigen (hapten) to measure the fraction of the antigen(hapten) bound to a substoichiometric amount of antibody.

radioiodination
The process of incorporating the radionuclides of iodine (usually 125I, 131I or 123I) into, or of covalentlylinking a radioiodinated substance to, a substance.

radioisotope
A radioactive isotope of a specified element.





radioluminescence
Luminescence arising from excitation by high-energy particles or radiation.

radiolysis
The cleavage of one or several bonds resulting from exposure to high-energy radiation. The termis also often used loosely to specify the method of irradiation ('pulse radiolysis') used in anyradiochemical reaction, not necessarily one involving bond cleavage.

radiometric analysis
A kind of quantitative analysis in which measurement of the activity is an essential step.

radiometric titration
A titration in which a radioactive indicator is used to monitor the end-point of the titration.

radiometry
The measurement of quantities associated with radiant energy. The quantities may also describe thevariation of the energy with respect to other variables such as wavelength, time, position, direction(solid angle), area normal to the light or projected area of emitting or receiving surfaces. If the light ismonochromatic, it is sometimes convenient to replace the radiant energy by the corresponding numberof photons (or quanta) which is obtained by dividing the energy bywhereis the Planck constant,the velocity of light and the wavelength of the light.See: intensity, radiance, irradiance

radionuclide
A nuclide that is radioactive.

radionuclidic purity
For a material, that fraction of the total activity which is present in the form of the stated radionuclide,including daughter products.

radioreceptor assay
An assay employing a radioactively labelled receptor protein as a tracer.

radiorelease analysis
A kind of quantitative analysis based on the release of radioactivity from the reagent by reaction withthe analyte.

radiosonde
A miniature radio transmitter with instruments in a package that is carried aloft (e.g. by an unmannedballoon) for broadcasting every few seconds by means of precise tone signals or other suitable method,the humidity, temperature, pressure or other parameter.



raffinate
The phase remaining after extraction of some specified solute(s). When necessary it should be furtherspecified, e.g. scrub raffinate. The original meaning of raffinate as a 'refined product' has becomeextended and changed by common usage. The term should normally be applied only to waste streamsbut the latter may form the feed to a further extraction process for another solute.







random copolymer
A copolymer consisting of macromolecules in which the probability of finding a given monomericunit at any given site in the chain is independent of the nature of the adjacent units.Note:In a random copolymer, the sequence distribution of monomeric units follows Bernoullian statistics.

random copolymerization
A copolymerization in which a random copolymer is formed.

random error
Result of a measurement minus the mean that would result from an infinite number of measurementsof the same measurand carried out under repeatability conditions.See also: measurement result

random sample
The sample so selected that any portion of the population has an equal (or known) chance of beingchosen. Haphazard or arbitrary choice of units is generally insufficient to guarantee randomness.





rate
Derived quantity in which time is a denominator quantity. Rate ofis.

rate coefficient
See: order of reaction, kinetic equivalence



rate of change of a quantity
The time derivativeof the value of the quantity. The differential quotient may also be calledderivative (or instantaneous) rate of change. Examples are: rate of change of mass,of amount of substance,; rate of change.

rate of change ratio
The quotient of two rates where the quantities are of the same kind in the same system for differentcomponents:For finite time intervals, mean rate of change ratio is:Rate of change ratio has the dimension one. The denominator is often called the reference quantity.Examples are: mass rate ratio,; amount of substance rate ratio,.





rate of disappearance
See: rate of reaction









rate of nucleation
The number of nuclei formed in unit time per unit volume of the liquid phase.









ratio
Quotient of quantities of the same kind for different components within the same system.

raw coke
The term raw coke is equivalent to green coke although it is now used less frequently.

Rayleigh ratio
The quantity used to characterize the scattered intensity at the scattering angle, whereis the intensity of the incident radiation,, defined asis the total intensity of scatteredradiation observed at an angle and a distance from the point of scattering and is the scatteringvolume. The factor takes account of polarization phenomena. It depends on the type of radiationemployed.1. For light scattering, dependent on the polarization of the incident beam,for verticallypolarized light,for horizontally polarized light andlight.2. For small-angle neutron scattering,.3. For small-angle X-ray scattering,, if.Notes:1. The dimension ofis.2.3.for unpolarizedIn small-angle neutron scattering the term cross-section is often used instead ofquantities are identical.An alternative recommended symbol is .; the two

Rayleigh scattering
The scattering of light by particles and molecules which are much smaller than the wavelength ofthe light. In the ideal case, the process is one of pure dipole and induced dipole interactions with theelectric field of the light wave. The scattering cross section for light of wavelength is proportionalto.

rayon-based carbon fibres
Carbon fibres made from rayon (cellulose) precursor fibres.Note:Rayon-based carbon fibres have a more isotropic structure than similarly heat-treated polyacrylonitrile(PAN)- or mesophase pitch (MPP)-based carbon fibres. Their Young's modulus values are thereforedrastically lower (; tensile strength). Rayon-based carbon fibres can betransformed into anisotropic carbon fibres with high strength and Young's modulus values by hotstretching treatment at temperatures of approximately.

Re, Si
A stereoheterotopic face of a trigonal atom is designated Re if the ligands of the trigonal atom appearin a clockwise sense in order of CIP priority when viewed from that side of the face. The oppositearrangement is termed Si.See also: enantiotopic, and illustrated under prochirality.

re-extraction [obsolete]
Since the prefix 're' can signify 'back' as well as 'again' this term is ambiguous and should be avoided,except where the process of extraction (e.g. from aqueous solution to an organic phase) in a singledirection is repeated (following stripping). It should not be used as a synonym for stripping orback-extraction.



reactant
A substance that is consumed in the course of a chemical reaction. It is sometimes known, especiallyin the older literature, as a reagent, but this term is better used in a more specialized sense as a testsubstance that is added to a system in order to bring about a reaction or to see whether a reactionoccurs (e.g. an analytical reagent).

reacting bond rules
1.For an internal motion of a molecular entity corresponding to progress over a transition state(energy maximum), any change that makes the motion more difficult will lead to a new moleculargeometry at the energy maximum, in which the motion has proceeded further. Changes that makethe motion less difficult will have the opposite effect. (This rule corresponds to the Hammondprinciple).2. For an internal motion of a molecular entity that corresponds to a vibration, any change that tendsto modify the equilibrium point of the vibration in a particular direction will actually shift theequilibrium in that direction.3. Effects on reacting bonds (bonds made or broken in the reaction) are the most significant. Thebonds nearest the site of structural change are those most strongly affected.See also: More O'Ferrall–Jencks diagram

reaction
See: chemical reaction

reaction barrier
The energy barrier to chemical reaction. In vibrationally adiabatic transition-state theory its height isthe zero-point energy of the activated complex minus that of the reactants.

reaction chromatography
A technique in which the identities of the sample components are intentionally changed betweensample introduction and detection. The reaction can take place upstream of the column when thechemical identity of the individual components passing through the column differs from that of theoriginal sample, or between the column and the detector when the original sample components areseparated in the column but their identity is changed prior to entering the detection device.

reaction coordinate
A geometric parameter that changes during the conversion of one (or more) reactant molecular entitiesinto one (or more) product molecular entities and whose value can be taken for a measure of theprogress of an elementary reaction (for example, a bond length or bond angle or a combination ofbond lengths and/or bond angles; it is sometimes approximated by a non-geometric parameter, suchas the bond order of some specified bond). In the formalism of ' transition-state theory ', the reactioncoordinate is that coordinate in a set of curvilinear coordinates obtained from the conventional onesfor the reactants which, for each reaction step, leads smoothly from the configuration of the reactantsthrough that of the transition state to the configuration of the products. The reaction coordinate istypically chosen to follow the path along the gradient (path of shallowest ascent/deepest descent) ofpotential energy from reactants to products. The term has also been used interchangeably with the termtransition coordinate, applicable to the coordinate in the immediate vicinity of the potential energymaximum. Being more specific, the name transition coordinate is to be preferred in that context.See also: potential-energy profile, potential-energy reaction surface, minimum-energy reaction path



reaction dynamics
A branch of chemical kinetics that is concerned with the intermolecular and intramolecular motionsthat occur in the elementary act of chemical change, and with the details of the relationships betweenthe quantum states of the reactant molecules and those of the product molecules. It is also known asmolecular dynamics.

reaction injection moulding
Acronym: RIMReactive polymer processing that produces polymer monoliths by low-pressure injection and mixingof low-viscosity precursors into moulds.Note:Reaction injection moulding commonly uses two-component precursors that produce polymernetworks after mixing.

reaction intermediate
See: intermediate

reaction path
1. A synonym for mechanism.2. A trajectory on the potential-energy surface.3. A sequence of synthetic steps.See also: minimum-energy reaction path

reaction path degeneracy
Also contains definition of: statistical factorA factor that is introduced into rate theory to take account of the fact that the process may be able tooccur in different but equivalent ways. Thus the process:has a reaction path degeneracy of 2 since the chlorine atom can abstract either of the two hydrogenatoms in the hydrogen molecule. The reaction path degeneracy has also been referred to as thestatistical factor for the reaction.



reaction stage
A set of one or more (possibly experimentally inseparable) reaction steps leading to and/or from adetectable or presumed reaction intermediate.

reaction step
An elementary reaction, constituting one of the stages of a stepwise reaction in which a reactionintermediate (or, for the first step, the reactants) is converted into the next reaction intermediate (or,for the last step, the products) in the sequence of intermediates between reactants and products.See also: rate-limiting step, reaction stage

reaction time
The period of time that elapses between the start of the reaction and the attainment of a given extentof a reaction.

reactive adsorption
Also contains definition of: reactive desorptionReactive adsorption (and its reverse, reactive desorption) resembles dissociative adsorption (and itsreverse, associative desorption) but one fragment adds to an adsorbate rather than to a surface site.

reactive blending
Mixing process that is accompanied by the chemical reaction(s) of components of a polymer mixture.Notes:1. Examples of reactive blending are: (a) blending accompanied by the formation of a polymerpolymer complex, (b) the formation of block or graft copolymers by a combination of radicalsformed by the mechano-chemical scission of polymers during blending.2. Reactive blending may also be carried out as reactive extrusion or reaction injection molding(RIM).

reactive complex
A species of very short life that occurs as an intermediate in a chemical reaction. An activated complex(or transition state) is a special case.

reactive polymer
Polymer having reactive functional groups that can undergo chemical transformation under theconditions required for a given reaction or application.

reactive polymer processing
Process whereby a polymeric monolith is produced through an in-situ polymerization or polymermodification reaction.Notes:1. The polymerization or modification reaction and the transformation of the resulting polymer intoa shaped product is accomplished in the same processing equipment.2. This type of processing is commonly accomplished by extrusion or injection moulding.3. Reaction injection moulding and reinforced reaction injection moulding are types of reactivepolymer processing.

reactive (reactivity)
As applied to a chemical species, the term expresses a kinetic property. A species is said to be morereactive or to have a higher reactivity in some given context than some other (reference) species if ithas a larger rate constant for a specified elementary reaction. The term has meaning only by referenceto some explicitly stated or implicitly assumed set of conditions. It is not to be used for reactions orreaction patterns of compounds in general. The term is also more loosely used as a phenomenologicaldescription not restricted to elementary reactions. When applied in this sense the property underconsideration may reflect not only rate, but also equilibrium, constants.See also: stable, unreactive, unstable

reactive scattering
If in a molecular-beam experiment a chemical reaction occurs there is said to be reactive scattering.

reactivity index
Any numerical index derived from quantum mechanical model calculations that permits the predictionof relative reactivities of different molecular sites. Many indices are in use, based on a variety oftheories and relating to various types of reaction. The more successful applications have been tothe substitution reactions of conjugated systems where relative reactivities are determined largely bychanges of π-electron energy.





reading
Datum provided by an instrument.

reagent
See: reactant

real (electrified) interphase
See: electrified interphase





rearrangement
See: degenerate rearrangement, molecular rearrangement, sigmatropic rearrangement



rearrangement stage
The elementary reaction or reaction stage (of a molecular rearrangement ) in which there is bothmaking and breaking of bonds between atoms common to a reactant and a reaction product or areaction intermediate. If the rearrangement stage consists of a single elementary reaction, this is a'rearrangement step'.

rebound reaction
If in a chemical process, occurring in a molecular beam, the reaction products are scattered backwardswith respect to the moving centre of mass of the system, the reaction is called a rebound reaction.

receptor
Molecular structure in or on a cell that specifically recognizes and binds to a compound and acts asa physiological signal transducer, or mediator of, an effect.

receptor
in drug designA receptor is a protein or a protein complex in or on a cell that specifically recognizes and binds toa compound acting as a molecular messenger (neurotransmitter, hormone, lymphokine, lectin, drug,etc). In a broader sense, the term receptor is often used as a synonym for any specific (as opposedto non-specific such as binding to plasma proteins) drug binding site, also including nucleic acidssuch as DNA.

recognition site
1.2.A nucleotide sequence to which a protein binds specifically.An amino acid sequence in an antibody molecule to which the specific antigen binds specifically.











recovery
1.2.In toxicology, the process leading to partial or complete restoration of a cell, tissue, organ ororganism following its damage from exposure to a harmful substance or agent.Term used in analytical and preparative chemistry to denote the fraction of the total quantity ofa substance recoverable following a chemical procedure.



recrystallization
1.2.(chemical): The repeated dissolution and precipitation of a solid from a liquid solvent.(metallurgical): The process in which a crystalline solid with a high degree of disorder developsa new microstructure by the nucleation of relatively imperfection-free regions, and theirpropagation throughout the complete solid.

red shift
Informal term for bathochromic shift.

redox ion exchangers
Conventional ion exchangers in which reversible redox couples have been introduced as counter-ionseither by sorption or complex formation. They closely resemble redox polymers in their behaviour.

redox polymer
Also contains definitions of: electron-exchange polymer, oxidation-reduction polymerPolymer containing groups that can be reversibly reduced or oxidized.Notes:1. Reversible redox reaction can take place in a polymer main-chain, as in the case of polyanilineand quinone/hydroquinone polymers, or on side-groups, as in the case of a polymer carryingferrocene side-groups.2. Use of the term 'redox resin' is strongly discouraged.

redox potential
Any oxidation-reduction (redox) reaction can be divided into two half reactions: one in which achemical species undergoes oxidation and one in which another chemical species undergoes reduction.If a half- reaction is written as a reduction, the driving force is the reduction potential. If the halfreaction is written as oxidation, the driving force is the oxidation potential related to the reductionpotential by a sign change. So the redox potential is the reduction/oxidation potential of a compoundmeasured under standards conditions against a standard reference half-cell. In biological systems thestandard redox potential is defined at pH – 7.0 versus the hydrogen electrode and partial pressure ofhydrogen = 1 bar.See also: electrode potential

reduced adsorption
Of component , defined by the equationwhere,andare, respectively, the total Gibbs surface concentration and the totalconcentrations in the bulk phases α and β:The reduced adsorption is invariant to the location of the Gibbs surface. Alternatively, the reducedadsorption may be regarded as the Gibbs surface concentration of when the Gibbs surface is chosenso thatis zero, i.e. the Gibbs surface is chosen so that the reference system has not only the samevolume, but also contains the same total amount of substance ( ) as the real system.







reduced osmotic pressure
The osmotic pressure divided by mass concentration.

reduced sample
A representative part of the primary (composited or gross) sample obtained by a division and reductionprocess. Typically the mass approximates that of the final laboratory sample.











reductive elimination
The reverse of oxidative addition.

reductones
Compounds containing an enediol structure stabilized by conjugation and hydrogen bonding with anadjacent carbonyl group, RC(OH)=C(OH)C(=O)R. They are strong reducing agents, fairly strongacids and commonly derived from saccharides by oxidation at the carbon atom alpha to the carbonylfunction, e.g. ascorbic acid.

referee sample
See: umpire sample



reference dose (RfD)
An estimate (with uncertainty spanning perhaps an order of magnitude) of daily exposure to the humanpopulation (including sensitive subgroups) that is likely to be without appreciable risk of deleteriouseffects during a lifetime.

reference electrode
1.2.An external electrode system which comprises an inner element, usually mercury–mercury(I)chloride (calomel), silver–silver chloride or thallium amalgam–thallium(I) chloride, a chambercontaining the appropriate filling solution and a device for forming a liquid junction, e.g.capillary, ceramic plug, fritted disc or ground glass sleeve.



reference material
A substance or mixture of substances, the composition of which is known within specified limits, andone or more of the properties of which is sufficiently well established to be used for the calibration ofan apparatus, the assessment of a measuring method or for assigning values to materials. Referencematerials are available from national laboratories in many countries [e.g. National Institute forStandards and Technology (NIST), USA.; Community Bureau of Reference, UK].

reference method
A method having small, estimated inaccuracies relative to the end use requirement. The accuracy of areference method must be demonstrated through direct comparison with a definitive method or witha primary reference material.





reference value pH standard
An aqueous solution ofpotassium hydrogen phthalate per kg water which is the referencevalue for the definition of pH(RVS) values in the temperature range .See also: operational pH standard, primary pH standard





reflection factor
See: reflectance



refraction effects
The luminescence flux emitted from the interior of a rectangular sample reaching a photodetectorplace at some distance from the sample is decreased by a factor of approximately(where is therefractive index of the medium) compared with a medium whose refractive index is 1.0. Such effectsare termed refraction effects.













regular coke
A petroleum coke with good graphitizability, characterized by a combination of properties whichdiffer significantly from those of metallurgical coke but do not reach the quality level of premiumcoke. These properties are: optical anisotropy, medium reversible thermal expansion and low ashcontent. Regular coke is mainly used for the production of synthetic carbon and graphite materials.

regular macromolecule
A macromolecule the structure of which essentially comprises the repetition of a single constitutionalunit with all units connected identically with respect to directional sense.

regular oligomer molecule
An oligomer molecule the structure of which essentially comprises the repetition of a singleconstitutional unit with all units connected identically with respect to directional sense.







Rehm–Weller equation
Empirical correlation found between the observed second-order rate constant,, for anintermolecular electron-transfer reaction and the Gibbs energy of the photoinduced electron transferprocess within the encounter complex ():withandthe rate constant for the formation and separation, respectively, of the encounter(precursor) complex,the absolute temperature andreaction.Note:,the universal collision frequency factor,the gas constant,the activation Gibbs energy of the forward electron transferIn the original formulation of this equation the valuein acetonitrile was used.



Reissert compounds
Compounds formed by formal addition of an acyl group and a cyano group to a nitrogen atomand carbon atom, respectively, of a nitrogen–carbon bond in quinolines, isoquinolines, and relatednitrogen heterocycles, e.g.

rel
See: relative configuration

relative
Quotient of quantities having the same kind-of-quantity in different systems.Notes:1. The denominator quantity is often called the reference quantity.2. Preferentially the same component is found in the numerator and denominator quantity.

relative activity
See: activity

relative adsorption
Ifandare the Gibbs surface concentrations of components i and 1, respectively, with referenceto the same, but arbitrarily chosen, Gibbs surface, then the relative adsorption of component i withrespect to component 1, is defined asand is invariant to the location of the Gibbs surface. Alternatively,may be regarded as the Gibbssurface concentration of when the Gibbs surface is chosen so thatis zero, i.e. the Gibbs surfaceis chosen so that the reference system contains the same amount of component 1 as the real system.Hence.





relative configuration
1.The configuration of any stereogenic (asymmetric) centre with respect to any other stereogeniccentre contained within the same molecular entity. Unlike absolute configuration, relativeconfiguration is reflection-invariant. Relative configuration, distinguishing diastereoisomers,may be denoted by the configurational descriptors,(or l) and,(or u) meaning,respectively, that the two centres have identical or opposite configurations. For molecules withmore than two asymmetric centres the prefix rel- may be used in front of the name of oneenantiomer where R and S have been used. If any centres have known absolute configuration2.then onlyandcan be used for the relative configuration.See also: α (alpha), β (beta) (1 and 3)Two different molecules Xabcd and Xabce, may be said to have the same relative configurationsif e takes the position of d in the tetrahedral arrangement of ligands around X (i.e. the pyramidalfragments Xabc are superposable). By the same token the enantiomer of Xabce may be said tohave the opposite relative configuration to Xabcd. The terms may be applied to chiral molecularentities with central atoms other than carbon but are limited to cases where the two relatedmolecules differ in a single ligand.Both definitions can be generalized to include stereogenic units other than asymmetric centres.





relative detection limit
(Often incorrectly referred to as sensitivity). Smallest amount of material detectable (3σ-criterion) ina matrix relative to the amount of material analysed — given in atomic, mole or weight fractions.

relative electrode potential
The electrode potential of a single electrode is not amenable to direct experimental determination andcan only be measured against a reference system. The measured quantity, , is the relative electrodepotential.

relative elongation
See: linear strain

relative error
Error of measurement divided by the true value of the measurand. Since a true value cannot bedetermined, in practice the conventional true value is used.

relative hardness
The difference between the values of the absolute hardnesses ( ) of a given molecule and thecorresponding reference structure ( ):. The values of relative hardnesses correlate wellwith the resonance energies of cyclic compounds and may be used as an index of aromaticity.

relative humidity
The ratio, often expressed as a percentage, of the partial pressure of water in the atmosphere at someobserved temperature, to the saturation vapour pressure of pure water at this temperature.

relative micellar mass
Also contains definition of: micellar weightThe relative molecular mass () of a micelle is called the relative micellar mass or micellar weightand is defined as the mass of a mole of micelles divided by the mass ofmole of 12C.

relative molar mass
Molar mass divided by(the latter is sometimes called the standard molar mass).





















relative viscosity
Synonym: viscosity ratioThe ratio of the viscosity of the solution, , to the viscosity of the solvent,, i.e.. Synonymouswith viscosity ratio.

relative viscosity increment
The ratio of the difference between the viscosities of solution and solvent to the viscosity of thesolvent, i.e., whereis the viscosity of the solution andis the viscosity of the solvent.The use of the term 'specific viscosity' for this quantity is discouraged, since the relative viscosityincrement does not have the attributes of a specific quantity.

relative volumic mass
Synonymous with relative density.

relativistic effects
Corrections to exact non-relativistic energy from the fact that inner shell electrons in heavy atomsmove with velocities comparable in order of magnitude to the velocity of light. The most importantrelativistic effect is spin-orbit coupling.

relaxation
If a system is disturbed from its state of equilibrium it relaxes to that state, and the process is referredto as relaxation. The branch of kinetics concerned with such processes is known as relaxation kinetics.Relaxation techniques include temperature jump and pressure jump.See also: chemical relaxation

relaxation kinetics
See: relaxation

relaxation time
1.In magnetic resonance spectroscopy the longitudinal relaxation time,spin-lattice relaxation, and the transverse relaxation time,definitions are:and, whereof magnetization parallel and perpendicular to the static fieldequilibrium value.2., is associated with, with spin-spin relaxation. Theandare the componentsand the subscript e denotes the







Renner–Teller effect
Molecular distortion in linear molecular species with degenerate electronic states (e.g., belonging tothegroup). The Renner–Teller effect is a particular case of the Jahn–Teller effect. From thepoint of view of the potential? energy surfaces the Renner–Teller effect generates a surface touching(see scheme below).Notes:1. The Renner–Teller effect arises from splittings in the vibrational levels of molecular entities dueto even terms in the vibronic perturbation expansion. This is generally a minor effect for nonlinear molecular entities compared to the Jahn–Teller effect, which is due to the odd terms.2. For linear molecular entities it is the only possible vibronic effect characteristic of degenerateelectronic states.







repetency
See: wavenumber

replacement name
A name in which the replacement of an atom or a group of a parent structure by another atom or groupis indicated by affixes attached to or inserted into the name of the parent structure. There are two maintypes of replacement names.1. Skeletal replacement name. A name in which the replacement of skeletal atoms and theirassociated hydrogen atoms is indicated by non-detachable prefixes. When carbon atoms arereplaced by heteroatoms this method has been called 'a' nomenclature since the prefixes end in 'a'.Certain names in which the prefix 'thio-', 'seleno-' or 'telluro-' indicates replacement of a skeletaloxygen atom by a sulfur, selenium or tellurium atom, respectively, are also skeletal replacementnames.2. Functional replacement name. A name containing prefixes or infixes which indicate thereplacement of an oxygen atom or hydroxy group of a characteristic group, functional parent orclass name by other atoms or groups.



replicate (duplicate) sample
Multiple (or two) samples taken under comparable conditions. This selection may be accomplishedby taking units adjacent in time or space. Although the replicate samples are expected to be identical,often the only thing replicated is the act of taking the physical sample. A duplicate sample is a replicatesample consisting of two portions. The umpire sample is usually used to settle a dispute; the replicatesample is usually used to estimate sample variability.

replication
The duplication of DNA as part of the reproductive cycle of a cell or virus. During replication the twoDNA strands in the double helix separate, and each strand then acts as a template specifying the basesequence of newly synthesized complementary strands.



reprecipitation
The planned repetition of a precipitation in order to remove chemically different species from aprevious precipitate or to improve its stoichiometry.

representative sample
A sample resulting from a sampling plan that can be expected to adequately reflect the properties ofinterest of the parent population. A representative sample may be a random sample or, for example, astratified sample, depending upon the objective of sampling and the characteristics of the population.The degree of representativeness of the sample may be limited by cost or convenience.

repression
Binding of a protein (repressor) to the operator sequence in an operon thus preventing the transcriptionof the following structural gene(s) into mRNA and consequently synthesis of protein (cf. enzymerepression).

reproducibility
The closeness of agreement between independent results obtained with the same method onidentical test material but under different conditions (different operators, different apparatus, differentlaboratories and/or after different intervals of time). The measure of reproducibility is the standarddeviation qualified with the term 'reproducibility' as reproducibility standard deviation. In somecontexts reproducibility may be defined as the value below which the absolute difference between twosingle test results on identical material obtained under the above conditions, may be expected to liewith a specified probability. Note that a complete statement of reproducibility requires specificationof the experimental conditions which differ.See also: repeatability





residence time
1.2.(instrumentation): The time required for air or reagent parcel to pass from the entrance to theexit of an instrument. Often this is approximated as the ratio of the interior volume of the deviceto the flow rate.(atmospheric): The average time a molecule or aerosol spends in the atmosphere after it isreleased or generated there. For compounds with well defined sources and emission rates, thisis estimated by the ratio of the average global concentration of a substance to its production rateon a global scale. It is a function of not only the emission rates but the loss rates by chemicaland physical removal processes.



residual current
The current that flows, at any particular value of the applied potential, in the absence of the substancewhose behaviour is being investigated (i.e. in a blank solution).

residual emission anisotropy
Photoselected molecules hindered in their rotation (e.g., in lipid bilayers or liquid crystals) do notbecome randomly oriented even after long time periods. Thus, the emission anisotropy does not decayto zero but to a steady value, , called residual emission anisotropy. In the case of a single rotationalcorrelation time,whereor , the decay of emission anisotropy following δ-pulse excitation is given by:is the fundamental emission anisotropy.Note:The term residual anisotropy is to be preferred to 'limiting anisotropy'.

residual fuel/oil
The liquid or semi-liquid, high-boiling fraction of residue from the distillation of petroleum whichis used as a fuel. After removal of the lower boiling fraction of crude oil, sold as petroleum gas, thesomewhat higher boiling fraction becomes gasoline and diesel oil. A portion of the higher boilingfraction is 'cracked' to yield additional gasoline. Still heavier oils become lubricants. Paraffin, asphalt,etc., are also extracted from the crude oil. It is the remaining residual oil, not economically usable forother industrial purposes, which is then sold as a relatively low cost fuel for burning.







resist polymer
Polymeric material that, when irradiated, undergoes a marked change in solubility in a given solventor is ablated.Notes:1. A resist polymer under irradiation either forms patterns directly or undergoes chemical reactionsleading to pattern formation after subsequent processing.2. A resist material that is optimized for use with ultraviolet or visible light, an electron beam, anion beam, or X-rays is called a photoresist, electron-beam resist, ion-beam resist, or X-ray resist,respectively.3. In a positive-tone resist, also called a positive resist, the material in the irradiated area not coveredby a mask is removed, which results in an image with a pattern identical with that on the mask.In a negative-tone resist, also called a negative resist, the non-irradiated area is subsequentlyremoved, which results in an image with a pattern that is the complement of that on the mask.





















resonance
In the context of chemistry, the term refers to the representation of the electronic structure of amolecular entity in terms of contributing structures. Resonance among contributing structures meansthat the wavefunction is represented by 'mixing' the wavefunctions of the contributing structures. Theconcept is the basis of the quantum mechanical valence bond methods. The resulting stabilization islinked to the quantum mechanical concept of 'resonance energy'. The term resonance is also used torefer to the delocalization phenomenon itself.See also: mesomerism







resonance energy
The difference in potential energy between the actual molecular entity and the contributing structureof lowest potential energy. The resonance energy cannot be measured, but only estimated, sincecontributing structures are not observable molecular entities.See: resonance

resonance energy
in radiochemistryThe energy of a particle entering a nuclear reaction, this energy being just sufficiently high to lead tothe formation of reaction products in one of their excited states.

















resonance neutrons
Neutrons whose energy corresponds to the resonance energy of a specified nuclide or element. If thenuclide is not specified, the term refers to resonance neutrons of 239U.

resonance radiation
Synonymous with resonance fluorescence.







responsive gel
Gel that responds to external electrical, mechanical, thermal, light-induced or chemical stimulation.Note:The use of the term intelligent gel is discouraged.





restriction enzymes
Endonucleases which recognize specific base sequences within a DNA helix, creating a double-strandbreak of DNA. Type I restriction enzymes bind to these recognition sites but subsequently cut theDNA at different sites. Type II restriction enzymes both bind and cut within their recognition or targetsites.







retarder
This term, used mainly in polymerization kinetics, refers to a substance that reduces the rate ofreaction. Synonymous with inhibitor.

retentate
See: dialysate















retinoids
Oxygenated derivatives of 3,7-dimethyl-1-(2,6,6-trimethylcyclohex-1-enyl)nona-1,3,5,7-tetraene asshown and derivatives thereof.See also: carotenoids, retro

retro
1.A prefix which indicates a shift by one position of all single and double bonds in a conjugatedpolyene system. It has been applied only to carotenoids and retinoids, e.g. retro-carotenoids,retro-retinoids.2.A prefix which indicates the reverse sequence of a peptide.

retroaddition [obsolete]
See: cycloelimination

retrocycloaddition [obsolete]
See: cycloelimination

reverse osmosis
Liquid-phase pressure-driven separation process in which applied transmembrane pressure causesselective movement of solvent against its osmotic pressure difference.

reverse transcriptases
Enzymes found in retroviruses that can synthesize complementary single-strands of DNA froman mRNA sequence as template They are used in genetic engineering to produce specific cDNAmolecules from purified preparations of mRNA.









reversible transition
A transition that returns a system directly to its original state by reversing the process that changed it.





rheology
The study of the flow and deformation of matter under the influence of a mechanical force. It isconcerned particularly with material behaviour which cannot be described by the simple linear modelsof hydrodynamics and elasticity. Some of these departures are due to the presence of colloidal particlesor to the influence of surfaces.

rheopexic gel
Also contains definition of: rheotropic gelGel for which the time of solidification after discontinuation of a relatively high shear rate, is reducedby applying a small shear rate.

rheopexy
A phenomenon in which the time of solidification, after discontinuation of a relatively high shear rate,is shortened by applying a small shear rate.

rhodamine dyes
Dyes derived from condensation of phthalic anhydride with m-dialkylaminophenols.See: xanthene dyes

rhombohedral graphite
A thermodynamically unstable allotropic form of graphite with an ABCABC stacking sequence ofthe layers. The exact crystallographic description of this allotropic form is given by the space group, (unit cell constants:,).Note:The structure of rhombohedral graphite can be best considered as an extended stacking fault inhexagonal graphite. Rhombohedral graphite can not be isolated in pure form (natural graphiteand laboratory preparations contain less than 40% of rhombohedral graphite in combination withhexagonal graphite). It is produced by shear deformation of hexagonal graphite and transformsprogressively to the hexagonal (ABAB) modification on heating above.

ribbon delocalisation
Electron delocalization realized in both acyclic and cyclic π-conjugated, 1, and σ-bonded, 2, ribbonlike systems.For cyclic systems, a variety of linkage fashions between several ribbons (pericyclic, spirocyclic,longicyclic and laticyclic) is possible.

ribonucleic acids (RNA)
Naturally occurring polyribonucleotides.See also: nucleic acids, nucleosides, nucleotides, ribonucleotides, messenger RNA, transfer RNA,ribosomal RNA

ribonucleotides
Nucleotides in which the glycosyl group is a ribosyl group.

ribosomal RNA (rRNA)
RNA molecules which are essential structural and functional components of ribosomes, thesubcellular units responsible for protein synthesis.

ribosomes
Subcellular units composed of specific RNA molecules and a large number of proteins that areresponsible for protein synthesis.









ring assembly
Two or more cyclic systems (single rings or fused systems) which are directly joined to each otherby double or single bonds are named ring assemblies when the number of such direct ring junctionsis one less than the number of cyclic systems involved. Examples:

ring reversal (ring inversion)
The interconversion by rotation about single bonds (coupled with angle deformation in the transitionstate) of cyclic conformers having equivalent ring shapes (e.g. chair → chair) though not necessarilyequivalent spatial positions of substituents (e.g. equatorial → axial).





ring-sector
Also contains definitions of: atomic ring-sector, bond ring-sectorA sequence of ring atoms, linked together as an unbranched chain and connecting two bridgeheadsor junctions, but not itself containing any bridgehead or junction, is termed an atomic ring-sector. Abond linking together directly two bridgeheads or junctions is termed a bond ring-sector.



ringing gel
Also contains definition of: humming gelGel with energy dissipation in the acoustic frequency range.Note:A ringing gel is often a hydrogel with a surfactant as a third component and has a composition withinan isotropic, one-phase region of its ternary phase diagram.



risk
1.2.Probability of adverse effects caused under specified circumstances by an agent in an organism,a population, or an ecological system.Expected frequency of occurrence of a harmful event arising from such an exposure.

risk assessment
Identification and quantification of the risk resulting from a specific use or occurrence of an agent,taking into account possible harmful effects on individuals exposed to the agent in the amount andmanner proposed and all the possible routes of exposure.

risk estimation
Assessment with or without mathematical modeling, of the probability and nature of effects ofexposure to a substance based on quantification of dose-effect and dose-response relationships forthat substance and the population(s) and environmental components likely to be exposed and onassessment of the levels of potential exposure of people, organisms, and environment at risk.

Ritchie equation
The linear free-energy relationapplied to the reactions between nucleophiles and certain large and relatively stable organic cations,e.g. arenediazonium, triarylmethyl and aryltropylium cations in various solvents.is the rateconstant for reaction of a given cation with a given nucleophilic system (i.e. given nucleophile in agiven solvent). is the rate constant for the same cation with water in water, andis a parameterwhich is characteristic of the nucleophilic system and independent of the cation. A surprising featureof the equation is the absence of a coefficient of, characteristic of the substrate (cf. the in theSwain–Scott equation), even though values ofvary over 13 log units. The equation thus involvesa gigantic breakdown of the reactivity–selectivity principle. The equation has been extended both inform and in range of application.











rotational barrier
In a rotation of groups about a bond, the potential energy barrier between two adjacent minima of themolecular entity as a function of the torsion angle.

rotational constants
Coefficients of quantum numbers in the rotational term expression and inversely proportional to theprincipal moments of inertia. Symbols:(dimension frequency) where, ,.is the Planck constant and(dimension wavenumber),the speed of light in vacuum.













rotator phase transition
A transition from a fully-ordered crystal of globular or quasi-spherical molecules to a crystal thatretains translational order but exhibits dynamic orientational disorder and is usually mechanically soft(plastic phase). Example: The transition of CBr4 to a plastic phase which exists fromto.

rotatory power
The quantitative measure of optical activity.

rotaxanes
Molecules in which a ring encloses another, rod-like molecule having end groups too large to passthrough the ring opening, and thus holds the rod-like molecule in position without covalent bonding.See: catenanes

rotenoids
Naturally occurring substances containing a cis-fused tetrahydrochromeno[3,4-b]chromene nucleus.Many rotenoids contain an additional ring, e.g rotenone:





rovibronic state
A state corresponding to a particular rotational sublevel of a particular vibrational level of a particularelectronic state.

rubredoxin
An iron-sulfur protein without acid-labile sulfur, in which an iron centre is coordinated by four sulfurcontaining ligands, usually cysteine. The function, where known, is an electron carrier.

ruby laser
A pulsed source of coherent radiation emitting mainly at 694.3aluminium oxide.See: laser, solid state lasersfrom chromium ions (Cr3+) in







Rydberg orbital
For an atom, an orbital with principal quantum number greater than that of any occupied orbital ofthe ground state. For a molecular entity, a molecular orbital which correlates with a Rydberg atomicorbital in an atomic fragment produced by dissociation. Typically, the extension of the Rydberg orbitalis large compared to the size of the atom or molecular entity.

Rydberg state
An electronic state that arises by the excitation of a valence electron to a diffuse atomic-like orbital.For instance, the lowest lying Rydberg state (n, 3S) of NH3 can be described as resulting from theexcitation of a non-bonding orbital to a 3S Rydberg orbital.

Rydberg transition
An electronic transition described approximately as promotion of an electron from a 'bonding' orbitalto a Rydberg orbital. Spectral bands corresponding to Rydberg transitions approximately fit theRydberg formula:where is the wavenumber, the ionization potential of the atom or molecular entity, a principalquantum number, the Rydberg constant, and the quantum defect which differentiates between s,p, d, etc., orbitals. The notation used is, e.g..

σ, π (sigma, pi)
The terms are symmetry designations, π molecular orbitals being antisymmetric with respect to adefining plane containing at least one atom (e.g. the molecular plane of ethene) and σ molecularorbitals symmetric with respect to the same plane. In practice the terms are used both in this rigoroussense (for orbitals encompassing the entire molecule) and also for localized two-centre orbitals orbonds, and it is necessary to make a clear distinction between the two usages. In the case of twocentre bonds, a π-bond has a nodal plane that includes the internuclear bond axis, whereas a σ-bondhas no such nodal plane. (A δ-bond in organometallic or inorganic molecular species has two nodes.)Radicals are classified by analogy into σ- and π-radicals. Such two-centre orbitals may take part inmolecular orbitals of σ- or π-symmetry. For example, the methyl group in propene contains three C–H bonds, each of which is of local σ-symmetry (i.e. without a nodal plane including the internuclearaxis), but these three 'σ-bonds' can in turn be combined to form a set of group orbitals one of whichhas π-symmetry with respect to the principal molecular plane and can accordingly interact with thetwo-centre orbital of π-symmetry (π-bond) of the double-bonded carbon atoms, to form a molecularorbital of π-symmetry. Such an interaction between the CH3 group and the double bond is an exampleof what is called hyperconjugation. This cannot rigorously be described as 'σ–π conjugation' since σand π here refer to different defining planes, and interaction between orbitals of different symmetries(with respect to the same defining plane) is forbidden.

σ → σ* transition
An electronic transition described approximately as promotion of an electron from a 'bonding' σorbital to an 'antibonding' σ orbital designated as . Such transitions generally involve high transitionenergies, and appear close to or mixed with Rydberg transitions.

σ-adduct
The product formed by the attachment of an electrophilic or nucleophilic entering group or of a radicalto a ring carbon of an aromatic species so that a new σ-bond is formed and the original conjugation isdisrupted. (This has generally been called a 'σ-complex', but adduct is more appropriate than complexaccording to the definitions given.) The term may also be used for analogous adducts to unsaturated(and conjugated) systems in general.See also: Meisenheimer adduct

σ-bond
See: σ, π

σ-constant
Specifically the substituent constant for meta- and for para-substituents in benzene derivatives asdefined by Hammett on the basis of the ionization constant of a substituted benzoic acid in water at, i.e.), whereis the ionization constant of a m- or p-substituted benzoic acid andthat of benzoic acid itself. The term is also used as a collective description for related electronicsubstituent constants based on other standard reaction series, of which, ,and are typical; alsoconstants which represent dissected electronic effects such as and . For this purpose it might bebetter always to spell out the term in full, i.e. as 'Hammett sigma constant', and restrict -constantsto the scale of substituent constants which is based on benzoic acid. A large positive -value implieshigh electron-withdrawing power by inductive and/or resonance effect, relative to H; a large negative-value implies high electron-releasing power relative to H.See also: Hammett equation, ρ-value, Taft equation

σ-orbital
See: σ, π

s-cis, s-trans
The spatial arrangement of two conjugated double bonds about the intervening single bond isdescribed as s-cis if synperiplanar and s-trans if antiperiplanar. This term should not be applied toother systems such as N-alkyl amides (use E/Z or sp/ap).

saccharides
The monosaccharides and di-, oligo - and polysaccharides, which are made up of n monosaccharideunits linked to each other by a glycosidic bond. Considered by some to be synonymous withcarbohydrates.

Sackur–Tetrode constant
Fundamental physical constant representing the translational contribution to molar entropy;atand standard pressure of, whereis the gas constant.

sacrificial acceptor
Molecular entity that acts as the electron acceptor in a photoinduced electron transfer process and isnot restored in a subsequent oxidation process but is destroyed by irreversible chemical conversion.

sacrificial donor
Molecular entity that acts as the electron donor in a photoinduced electron transfer process and is notrestored in a subsequent reduction process but is destroyed by irreversible chemical conversion.

salt
A chemical compound consisting of an assembly of cations and anions.

salt effect [obsolete]
See: kinetic electrolyte effect















sampler
A device used to withdraw and deliver a volume or an amount of a sample.

sampling error
That part of the total error (the estimate from a sample minus the population value) associated withusing only a fraction of the population and extrapolating to the whole, as distinct from analytical ortest error. It arises from a lack of homogeneity in the parent population. In chemical analysis, the finaltest result reflects the value only as it exists in the test portion. It is usually assumed that no samplingerror is introduced in preparing the test sample from the laboratory sample. Therefore, the samplingerror is usually associated exclusively with the variability of the laboratory sample. Sampling error isdetermined by replication of the laboratory samples and their multiple analyses. Since sampling erroris always associated with analytical error, it must be isolated by the statistical procedure of analysisof variance.









sanitary land fill
An engineered burial of refuse. The refuse is dumped into trenches and compacted by bulldozer,where, it is hoped, aerobic metabolism by microorganisms decomposes the organic matter to stablecompounds (H2O, CO2, etc.). Moisture is essential for the biological degradation and groundwaterassists the process except when it fills air voids and prevents the transport of oxygen to the refuse.Land fills of unsatisfactory design can be major sources of air, water and soil pollution.

saprophyte
A microorganism that feeds on dead and decaying organic matter. Saprophytes excrete enzymes thatdigest organic residues externally, the low molecular weight compounds formed then being absorbed.

saturated solution
A solution which has the same concentration of a solute as one that is in equilibrium with undissolvedsolute at specified values of the temperature and pressure.

saturation
The state of a saturated solution.

saturation activity
For a specified isotope, the value of the activity of an irradiated element, whence state of saturationis reached.



saturation
in radioanalytical chemistryOf an irradiated element for a specified isotope, the steady state reached when the disintegration rateof the nuclide formed is equal to its production rate.

saturation transfer
A term used in nuclear magnetic resonance. When a nucleus is strongly irradiated, its spin populationmay partly be transferred to another nucleus by an exchange process.See: magnetization transfer

saturation vapour pressure
The pressure exerted by a pure substance (at a given temperature) in a system containing only thevapour and condensed phase (liquid or solid) of the substance.

sawhorse projection
A perspective formula indicating the spatial arrangement of bonds on two adjacent carbon atoms. Thebond between the two atoms is represented by a diagonal line, the left-hand bottom end of whichlocates the atom nearer the observer and the right-hand top end the atom that is further away. In generala Newman or zig-zag projection is preferred.



sc
See: torsion angle

scaler
A sub-assembly for counting electrical pulses and containing one or more scaling circuits.

scaling circuit
An electronic circuit which produces an output pulse for each time a specified number of pulses hasbeen received at its input.

scaling factor
A variational parameter used as a multiplier of each nuclear Cartesian and electronic coordinate chosento minimize the variational integral and to make a trial variation function to satisfy the virial theorem.In practical calculations, the numeral factor to scale computed values, e.g. vibrational frequencies, tothose found in experiments.







scattering
A process in which a change in direction or energy of an incident radiation is caused by interactionwith a particle, a system of particles, or a photon.







scattering matrix
The Stokes parameters of scattered light are given by the matrix equationwhere the 4, 4 scattering matrixis comprised of 16 scattering matrix elements. These matrixelements, which may originate in theory or experiment, provide a complete description of the scatteredradiation in terms of the incident radiation.

scattering plane
The plane containing the incident light beam and the line from the centre of the scattering systemto the observer.

scattering vector
The vector difference between the wave propagation vectors of the incident and the scattered beam,both of length, whereis the wavelength of the scattered radiation in the medium.

scavenger
A substance that reacts with (or otherwise removes) a trace component (as in the scavenging of tracemetal ions) or traps a reactive reaction intermediate.See also: inhibition

scavenging
1.2.3.(in radiation chemistry) Binding radicals or free electrons with a receptive (or reactive) material.(in radiochemistry) The use of a precipitate to remove from solution by absorption orcoprecipitation, a large fraction of one or more radionuclides.



Schenck reaction
The diastereoselective ene reaction of singlet molecular dioxygen with alkenes.An example is:





Schiller layers
Synonym: iridescent layersIn some systems, sedimenting particles form layers separated by approximately equal distances of theorder of the wavelength of light. This gives rise to strong colours when observed in reflected light andthe system is said to form iridescent layers or Schiller layers.

Schulze–Hardy rule
The generalization that the critical coagulation concentration for a typical lyophobic sol isextremely sensitive to the valence of the counter-ions (high valence gives a low critical coagulationconcentration).

Schulz–Zimm distribution
In an assembly of macromolecules, a continuous distribution with the differential mass-distributionfunction of the form:where is a parameter characterizing the chain length, such as relative molecular mass or degree ofpolymerization, and are positive adjustable parameters, and () is the gamma functionof ().

scintillation
Burst of luminescence of short duration caused by an individual energetic particle.

scintillation counter
A scintillator coupled to a photomultiplier tube. Incident X-ray photons are converted in the scintillatorinto bursts of visible light photons, some of which fall on the photocathode and can be measured. Forincident photons having energies higher than the absorption edge of the elements contained in thescintillator, an escape peak can be observed.

scintillation detector
A radiation detector using a medium in which a burst of luminescence radiation, produced along thepath of an ionizing particle, is quantified.

scintillation spectrometer
A measuring assembly incorporating a scintillation detector and a pulse amplitude analyser used fordetermining the energy spectrum of certain types of radiation.

scintillators
Materials used for the measurement of radioactivity, by recording the radioluminescence. Theycontain compounds (chromophores) which combine a high fluorescence quantum efficiency, a shortfluorescence lifetime, and a high solubility. These compounds are employed as solutes in aromaticliquids and polymers to form organic liquid and plastic scintillators, respectively.

scrambling
See: isotopic scrambling











second messenger
Intracellular effector substance increasing or decreasing as a response to the stimulation of a receptorby an agonist, considered as the 'first messenger'.



second-order transition
Synonym: continuous transitionA transition in which a crystal structure undergoes a continuous change and in which the firstderivatives of the Gibbs energies (or chemical potentials) are continuous but the second derivativeswith respect to temperature and pressure (i.e. heat capacity, thermal expansion, compressibility)are discontinuous. Example: The order-disorder transition in metal alloys, for example, CuZn.Synonymous with continuous transition.

secondary crystallization
Crystallization occurring after primary crystallization, usually proceeding at a lower rate.











secondary isotope effect
A kinetic isotope effect that is attributable to isotopic substitution of an atom to which bonds areneither made nor broken in the rate-controlling step or in a pre-equilibrium step of a specified reaction,and is therefore not a primary isotope effect. One speaks of α, β, (etc.) secondary isotope effects, whereα, β, (etc.) denote the position of isotopic substitution relative to the reaction centre. The correspondingisotope effect on the equilibrium constant of such a reaction is called a 'secondary equilibriumisotope effect'. Secondary isotope effects have been discussed in terms of the conventional electroniceffects of physical organic chemistry, e.g. induction, hyperconjugation, hybridization, etc., since theseproperties are determined by the electron distribution, that depends on vibrationally averaged bondlengths and angles which vary slightly with isotopic substitution. While this usage is legitimate, theterm 'electronic isotope effect' should be avoided, because of the misleading implication that such aneffect is electronic rather than vibrational in origin.See also: steric isotope effect









secondary structure
The conformational arrangement (α-helix, β-pleated sheet, etc.) of the backbone segments of amacromolecule such as a polypeptide chain of a protein without regard to the conformation of theside chains or the relationship to other segments.See also: primary structure, tertiary structure, quaternary structure

secular equation
In molecular orbital theory, the determinant of matrix elements whose solution leads to the set ofenergy levels of molecular orbitals for a given system.

secular equilibrium
Radioactive equilibrium where the half life of the precursor isotope is so long that the change of itsactivity can be ignored during the period of interest and all activities remain constant.

sediment
The highly concentrated suspension which may be formed by the sedimentation of a dilute suspension.

sedimentation
In the atmospheric sciences, the process of removal of an air borne particle from the atmosphere dueto the effect of gravity.



sedimentation equilibrium
The equilibrium established in a centrifugal field when there is no net flux of any component acrossany plane perpendicular to the centrifugal force.

sedimentation field strength
The potential differenceper unit length in a sedimentation or centrifugation cell. As thecontributions of the interfacial potential differences at the electrodes are not included inthisquantity, although theoretically important, is not accessible to measurement.

sedimentation
in chemistrySeparation of a dispersed system under the action of a gravitational or centrifugal field according tothe different densities of the components.







sedimentation volume
The volumeof sediment formed in a suspension. If the sediment is formed in a centrifugal field,the strength of this field should be explicitly indicated, otherwise normal gravity is understood.

















selection rule
A rule that states whether a given transition is allowed or forbidden, on the basis of the symmetry orspin of the wavefunctions of the initial and final states.

selective corrosion
Corrosion of a single phase having more than one component, when the ratio of the corrosion ratesof the components differs from the ratio of bulk mole fractions. Selective corrosion changes thecomposition of the material in the interfacial region.











selective sample
A sample that is deliberately chosen by using a sampling plan that screens out materials with certaincharacteristics and/or selects only material with other relevant characteristics.



selectively labelled
An isotopically labelled compound is designated as selectively labelled when a mixture of isotopicallysubstituted compounds is formally added to the analogous isotopically unmodified compound in sucha way that the position(s) but not necessarily the number of each labelling nuclide is defined. Aselectively labelled compound may be considered as a mixture of specifically labelled compounds.

selectivity
This term is used in two different ways:1. It sometimes refers to the discrimination shown by a given reactant A when it reacts with twoalternative reactants B and C, or in two different ways (e.g. at two different sites) with a reactantB.2. The term also sometimes refers to the ratio of products obtained from given reactants. Thismeaning is of importance for catalysts, which can have a wide range of selectivities. Selectivity isquantitatively expressed by ratios of rate constants for the alternative reactions, or by the decadiclogarithms of such ratios.See also: isoselective relationship, partial rate factor, regioselectivity, selectivity factor,stereoselectivity








selectivity
in analysis1.2.(qualitative): The extent to which other substances interfere with the determination of a substanceaccording to a given procedure.(quantitative): A term used in conjunction with another substantive (e.g. constant, coefficient,index, factor, number) for the quantitative characterization of interferences.

selectivity
of a reagentSee: selectivity factor

selectivity ratio
Synonymous with selectivity coefficient.

selenenic acids
Compounds having the structure RSeOH (R ≠ H), e.g. ArSeOH, areneselenenic acids.

selenides
1.2.Compounds having the structure RSeR (R ≠ H). They are thus selenium analogues of ethers.Metal salts of selane, H2Se.

seleninic acids
Compounds having the structure RSe(=O)OH.

selenocyanates
Salts and esters of selenocyanic acid, HSeCN, e.g. CH3CH2SeCN ethyl selenocyanate.

selenols
Compounds having the structure RSeH (R ≠ H).



selenonic acids
Compounds having the structure RSe(=O)2OH.

selenoxides
Compounds having the structure R2Se=O (R ≠ H).



self-absorption
Occurs in emission sources of finite thickness when radiant energy quanta emitted by atoms (ormolecules) are absorbed by atoms of the same kind present in the same source. The absorbed energyis usually dissipated by collisional transfer of energy, or through emission of radiant energy of thesame or other frequencies. In consequence, the observed radiant intensity of a spectral line (or bandcomponent) emitted by a source may be less than the radiant intensity would be from an optically thinsource having the same number of emitting atoms. Self-absorption may occur in all emitting sourcesto some degree, whether they are homogeneous or not.







self-diffusion coefficient
The diffusion coefficientto the diffusion coefficientwhereof species in the absence of a chemical potential gradient. It is relatedbyis the activity of in the solution, andis the concentration of . If an isotopically labelledspecies ( ) is used to study diffusion, the tracer diffusion coefficient,, is practically identical tothe self-diffusion coefficient provided that the isotope effect is sufficiently small.





self-quenching
Quenching of an excited atom or molecular entity by interaction with another atom or molecular entityof the same species in the ground state.See also: Stern–Volmer kinetic relationships

self-reversal
A case of self-absorption, when a line is self-absorbed to such an extent that the peak or centralwavelength intensity is less than at the wings or non-central wavelengths.

self-shielding
The lowering of the flux density in the inner part of an object due to absorption in its outer layers.

selones
Compounds having the structure R2C=Se (R ≠ H). They are thus selenium analogues of ketones.





semi-rigid chain
A chain for which the contour length is greater than the persistence length but for which their ratiois still below the Gaussian limit.

semicarbazones
Compounds having the structure R2C=NNHC(=O)NH2, formally derived by condensation ofaldehydes or ketones with semicarbazide [NH2NHC(=O)NH2].

semicoke
A carbonaceous material intermediate between a fusible mesophase pitch and a non-deformable greencoke produced by incomplete carbonization at temperatures between the onset of fusion (of coal, ca.), and complete devolatilization. Semicoke still contains volatile matter, therefore.Note:Semicoke may be conceived as covering a continuous range from coal that has not yet been fused tocoke breeze. Semicoke can also be used as a filler in carbon mixtures.See also: coal tar pitch

semiconductor
Material whose conductivity, due to charges of both signs, is normally in the range between that ofmetals and insulators and in which the electric charge carrier density can be changed by externalmeans.

semiconductor detector
A radiation detector using a semiconductor, in which free electric charges are produced along thepath of an ionizing particle, in combination with a high voltage and electrodes to collect the inducedelectric charges.

semiconductor laser [obsolete]
Usage not recommended.See: diode laser





semiquinones
Radical anions having the structure O−–Z–O. where Z is an ortho- or para-arylene group or analogousheteroarylene group; they are formally generated by the addition of an electron to a quinone.













sensitization
See: photosensitization

sensitization
in colloid chemistryAddition of small amounts of a hydrophilic colloid to a hydrophobic sol to possibly make the lattermore sensitive to flocculation by electrolyte.



sensitizer
See: photosensitizer

separability assumption
This expression refers to the assumption, essential to conventional transition-state theory, that theenergy of the system may be expressed as the sum of components associated with different degreesof freedom. In transition-state theory it is assumed that the energy of the motion of the systemthrough the dividing surface of the potential-energy surface is separable into various components. Inmany practical calculations it is assumed that the energy of the system is separable into electronic,vibrational, rotational and translational energy.



separation coefficient [obsolete]
Synonymous with separation factor. Use of this term is not recommended.









sequence
The order of neighbouring amino acids in a protein or of the purine or pyrimidine bases in RNA orDNA.See also: primary structure

sequence rules
See: priority









sequential measuring cell
A measuring cell which operates according to a succession of operations on the sample or on thesensitive elements (or on both), these operations being carried out according to one or more repetitiveprograms.

sequential sample
Units, increments or samples taken one at a time or in successive predetermined groups, untilthe cumulative result of their measurements (typically applied to attributes), as assessed againstpredetermined limits, permits a decision to accept or reject the population or to continue sampling.The number of observations required is not determined in advance, but the decision to terminate theoperation depends, at each stage, on the results of the previous observations. The plan may have apractical, automatic termination after a certain number of units have been examined.



sequential spectrometer
A spectrometer which enables the intensity of several spectral bands of radiation to be measured oneafter the other in time, i.e. sequentially.



serum
1.2.Watery proteinaceous portion of the blood that remains after clotting. Synonym: blood serumClear watery fluid especially that moistening the surface of serous membranes or that exudedthrough inflammation of any of these membranes.

sesquiterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C15 skeleton.

sesterterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C25 skeleton. Sometimes erroneously referred to as sesterpenoids.





settling velocity
The terminal rate of fall of a particle through a fluid as induced by gravity or other external force.



shape-memory polymer
Polymer that, after heating and being subjected to a plastic deformation, resumes its original shapewhen heated above its glass-transition or melting temperature.Note:Crystalline trans-polyisoprene is an example of a shape-memory polymer.

shear dependent viscosity
For systems showing non-Newtonian behaviour when measured in steady simple shear, a coefficientequal to at a given value of the shear rate , where is the stress;is the limiting viscosityat zero shear rate, andthe limiting viscosity at infinite shear rate;is the limit of intrinsicviscosity at zero shear.



shear rate
The velocity gradient in a flowing fluid.





shear thinning
Also contains definition of: shear thickeningIf viscosity is a univalued function of the rate of shear, a decrease of the viscosity with increasing rateof shear is called shear thinning, and an increase of the viscosity shear thickening.

shear transition
A diffusionless transition that involves a change of the shape of the unit cell by a process that canbe described as shear.

shear viscosity
For a Newtonian fluid, the shear viscosity is often termed simply viscosity since in most situationsit is the only one considered. It relates the shear components of stress and those of rate of strain ata point in the fluid by:where, the shear component of rate of strain is defined as follows:Corresponding relations hold forandon a plate normal to the -axis; , ,See also: shear dependent viscosity;is the component of stress acting in the -directionare the components of velocity.

shielding
Also contains definition of: deshieldingIn the context of NMR spectroscopy shielding is the effect of the electron shells of the observed andthe neighbouring nuclei on the external magnetic field. The external field induces circulations in theelectron cloud. The resulting magnetic moment is oriented in the opposite direction to the externalfield, so that the local field at the central nucleus is weakened, although it may be strengthened atother nuclei (deshielding). The phenomenon is the origin of the structural dependence of the resonancefrequencies of the nuclei.See also: chemical shift



shish-kebab structure
A polycrystalline morphology of double habit consisting of fibrous crystals overgrown epitaxially bylamellar crystals, the stems of which are parallel to the fibre axis.

short chain
A chain of low relative molecular mass.See: oligomer molecule (1)



shrinkage
Decrease in volume of a network, gel or solid associated with the exudation of a fluid.





shuttle vector
A DNA molecule (e.g. plasmid ) that is able to replicate in two different host organisms and cantherefore be used to 'shuttle' or convey genes from one to the other.

SI
Synonym: International system of unitsSystème International d'Unités, the international system of units established in 1960 and based onseven base units for the quantities: length, time, mass, electric current, thermodynamic temperature,amount of substance and luminous intensity.

sialon
A generic name for compounds or solid solutions in the system M–Si–Al–O–N where M is a metal.(The use of capitals as in SiAlON is discouraged since they suggest a chemical composition.)







sigmatropic rearrangement
A molecular rearrangement that involves both the creation of a new σ-bond between atoms previouslynot directly linked and the breaking of an existing σ-bond. There is normally a concurrent relocationof π-bonds in the molecule concerned, but the total number of π- and σ- bonds does not change.The term was originally restricted to intramolecular pericyclic reactions, and many authors use itwith this connotation. It is, however, also applied in a more general, purely structural, sense. If suchreactions are intramolecular, their transition state may be visualized as an association of two fragmentsconnected at their termini by two partial σ-bonds, one being broken and the other being formed as,for example, the two allyl fragments in (a'). Considering only atoms within the (real or hypothetical)cyclic array undergoing reorganization, if the numbers of these in the two fragments are designatedand , then the rearrangement is said to be a sigmatropic change of order [ , ] (conventionally). Thus the rearrangement (a) is of order [3,3], whilst reaction (b) is a [1,5]sigmatropicshift of hydrogen. (N.B. By convention square brackets [...] here refer to numbers of atoms, in contrastwith current usage in the context of cycloaddition.)The descriptors a and s (antarafacial and suprafacial) may also be annexed to the numbers and ;(b) is then described as a [1s,5s] sigmatropic rearrangement, since it is suprafacial with respect bothto the hydrogen atom and to the pentadienyl system:The prefix 'homo' (meaning one extra atom, interrupting conjugation — cf. 'homoaromaticity') hasfrequently been applied to sigmatropic rearrangements, but is misleading.See also: cycloaddition, tautomerism



silanes
Saturated silicon hydrides, analogues of the alkanes; i.e. compounds of the general formula SinH2n+2.Silanes may be subdivided into silane, oligosilanes and polysilanes. Note hydrocarbyl derivatives andother derivatives are often referred to loosely as silanes.

silanols
1.2.In a strict sense, hydroxy derivatives of silanes SinH2n+1OH.A name commonly applied to Si-hydrocarbyl derivatives, R3SiOH, of silanol, H3SiOH.

silasesquiazanes
Compounds in which every silicon atom is linked to three nitrogen atoms and every nitrogen atomis linked to two silicon atoms, thus consisting of SiH and NH units, and having the general formula(SiH)2n(NH)3n . By extension hydrocarbyl derivatives are commonly included.



silasesquithianes
Compounds in which every silicon atom is linked to three sulfur atoms and every sulfur atom is linkedto two silicon atoms, and having the general formula (SiH)2nS3n. By extension hydrocarbyl derivativesare commonly included.

silathianes
Compounds having the structure H3Si[SSiH2]nSSiH3 and branched-chain analogues. They areanalogous in structure to siloxanes with –S– replacing –O–. By extension hydrocarbyl derivatives arecommonly included.

silazanes
Saturated silicon-nitrogen hydrides, having straight or branched chains. They are analogous instructure to siloxanes with –NH– replacing –O– , e.g. H3SiNHSiH2NHSiH3 trisilazane. By extensionhydrocarbyl derivatives are commonly included.

silicones
Polymeric or oligomeric siloxanes, usually considered unbranched, of general formula [–OSiR2–]n(R ≠ H).

siloxanes
Saturated silicon-oxygen hydrides with unbranched or branched chains of alternating siliconand oxygen atoms (each silicon atom is separated from its nearest silicon neighbours bysingle oxygen atoms). The general structure of unbranched siloxanes is H3Si[OSiH2]nOSiH3.H3Si[OSiH2]nOSiH[OSiH2OSiH3]2 is an example of a branched siloxane. By extension hydrocarbylderivatives are commonly included.See also: silicones

silver film
When viewed in reflected white light against a black background, transparent films show the classicalinterference colours of thin plates which permit an estimate of their thickness to be made. When ofthe order of() in thickness they appear white (silver film) and when thinner theyappear gradually less intensely white, then grey and finally black.

silyl groups
1.2.In a strict sense, the silyl group is H3Si–.A name commonly applied to hydrocarbyl derivatives of the silyl group R3Si–.

silyl radicals
1.2.In a strict sense, the silyl radical is H3Si. .A name commonly applied to the silicon-centered radicals R3Si. .

silylene
1.2.Generic name for H2Si: and substitution derivatives thereof, containing an electrically neutralbivalent silicon atom with two non-bonding electrons. (The definition is analogous to that givenfor carbene.)The silanediyl group (H2Si), analogous to the methylene group (H2C).

simple shear
An idealized treatment of a fluid between two large parallel plates (to permit ignoring edge effects)of area , separated by a distance . If one plate moves relative to the other with a constant velocity, requiring a force acting in the direction of movement, and the density, pressure, and viscositythroughout the fluid are constant, the Newtonian equation can be coupled with the equations of motionand of continuity to show that the velocity gradient in the fluid is constant (= ), and thatThis idealized case (simple shear) is sometimes used to define shear viscosity..





simultaneous pair transitions
Simultaneous electronic transitions in two coupled absorbers or emitters. Because of the coupling,transitions which are spin-forbidden in one of the centres might become spin-allowed (spin flip).

simultaneous reactions
Composite reactions, in which processes likeandoccur in parallel, can be called simultaneous or parallel reactions. Sometimes there is competitioninvolved, like in the scheme:andwhere B and C compete with one another for A.



simultaneous spectrometer
A spectrometer which has more than one detector and enables the intensities of several spectral bandsto be measured at the same time.

single cell protein (SCP)
Microbial biomass or proteins extracted therefrom obtained from processes in which bacteria, yeasts,other fungi or algae are cultivated in large quantities as human or animal protein supplement in animalfeed or in human nutrition.

single escape peak
In a γ-ray spectrum, the peak due to pair production in the detector and escape, from the sensitive partof the detector, of one of the photons ofresulting from annihilation.

single scattering
Radiation scattering in which there is only one scattering encounter.See also: light scattering









single-step reaction
A reaction that proceeds through a single transition state.





single-strand polymer
A polymer the macromolecules of which are single-strand macromolecules.



singlet state
A state having a total electron spin quantum number equal to 0.See: multiplicity

singlet-singlet absorption
Absorption which results in the transition from the singlet ground state of the molecule into singletexcited states ( → ) and leads to the UV/visible absorption spectrum.

singlet-singlet annihilation
See: annihilation, spin conservation rule





singlet-triplet energy transfer
Transfer of excitation from an electronically excited donor in a singlet state to produce anelectronically excited acceptor in a triplet state.See: energy transfer, spin conservation rule

singlet–triplet crossing
Point of intersection between the potential energy surfaces of states of different multiplicity.Note:The intersection belongs to a ()-dimensional subspace of the ()-dimensional nuclearcoordinate space and therefore appears as a line on a two-dimensional energy surface ( is the numberof nuclei). In this case the branching plane is one-dimensional and is defined by the gradient differencevector .

singly labelled
A specifically labelled compound in which the isotopically substituted molecule has only oneisotopically modified atom e.g. CH3–CH[2H]–OH .







skeletal atom
An atom of a skeletal structure.

skeletal bond
A bond connecting two skeletal atoms.

skeletal structure
The sequence of atoms in the constitutional unit(s) of a macromolecule, an oligomer molecule, a blockor a chain which defines the essential topological representation.

skew
See: torsion angle, chair, boat, twist

Slater determinant
The determinantal representation of many-electron wavefunctionrequirement of the antisymmetry principle.which conforms to the

Slater-type orbital
An approximate atomic orbital attempts to allow for electron-electron repulsion by scaling the nuclearcharge for each orbital.

slip
Ceramic precursor dispersed in a liquid.



slow neutrons
Neutrons of kinetic energy less than some specified value. This value may vary over a wide range anddepends on the application. In reactor physics, the value is frequently chosen to be; in dosimetry,the effective cadmium cut-off is used.

SM-interference
Interference by a substance that produces a signal by a similar mechanism to the analyte, which inthe given procedure (including the apparatus used) can not be distinguished from the signal given bythe analyte. For example, in a colour reaction with an organic ligand by also reacting with the ligandand producing a coloured compound absorbing at the same wavelength as the compound produced bythe analyte or in an atomic spectrochemical analysis by absorbing or emitting at the same wavelengthas the analyte.





SMILES
SMILES (Simplified Molecular Input Line Entry System) is a string notation used to describe thenature and topology of molecular structures.







smoke
An aerosol originating from combustion, thermal decomposition or thermal evaporation. Its particlesmay be solid (magnesium oxide smoke) or liquid (tobacco smoke).

soap
Also contains definition of: neat soapA salt of a fatty acid, saturated or unsaturated, containing at least eight carbon atoms or a mixture ofsuch salts. A neat soap is a lamellar structure containing much (e.g. 75%) soap and little (e.g. 25%)water.

soap curd
A gel-like mixture of fibrous soap-crystals ('curd-fibres') and their saturated solution (not amesomorphic phase).

soap film
A term established by usage for A/W/A films stabilized by surfactants although it is not a film ofsoap, nor is the stabilizing surfactant necessarily a soap. (A/W/A means water film in air).

soft-segment phase domain
Phase domain of microscopic or smaller size, usually in a block, graft, or segmented copolymer,comprising essentially those segments of the polymer that have glass transition temperatures lowerthan the temperature of use.Note:Soft-segment phase domains are often larger than hard-segment phase domains and are oftencontinuous.





sol fraction
Mass fraction of the dissolved or dispersed material, resulting from a network-forming polymerizationor crosslinking process, that is constituted of molecules of finite (statistically definable) relativemolecular masses.

sol-gel coating
Coating formed through a sol-gel process.

sol-gel critical concentration
Also contains definition of: critical concentrationConcentration of an added electrolyte above which a particulate sol undergoes coagulation insteadof gelation.

sol-gel material
Material formed through a sol-gel process.

sol-gel metal oxide
Metal oxide formed through a sol-gel process.

sol-gel process
Process through which a network is formed from solution by a progressive change of liquidprecursor(s) into a sol, to a gel, and in most cases finally to a dry network.Note:An inorganic polymer, e.g., silica gel, or an organic–inorganic hybrid can be prepared by sol-gelprocessing.

sol-gel silica
Silica formed through a sol-gel process.

sol-gel transition
Transition of a sol to a gel at the gel point.Note:Corrected from previous definition, within which the definition improperly attempts a redefinition ofthe terms sol and gel. The definition proposed here is recommended for its precision through crossreference to the properly defined terms.

solar conversion efficiency
The ratio of the Gibbs energy gain per unit time perirradiance, , integrated betweenand.See also: photoelectrolytic cellof surface exposed to the sun and the solar

solar flare
A bright eruption of energy from the sun's chromosphere.







solid polymer electrolyte
Electrically conducting solution of a salt in a polymer.Notes:1. An example of a solid polymer electrolyte is a solution of a lithium salt in a poly(oxyethylene)matrix; the ionic conductivity of such material is due to the mobility of lithium cations and theircounterions in an electric field.2. Although the adjective 'solid' is used, the material may be a liquid.3. The term solid polymer electrolyte should not be confused with the term polymeric electrolyte.4. See also: conducting polymer composite.

solid state lasers
CW or pulsed lasers in which the active medium is a solid matrix (crystal or glass) doped with anion (e.g. Nd3+ , Cr3+ , Er3+ ). The emitted wavelength depends on the active ion, the selected opticaltransition, and the matrix. Some of these lasers are tunable within a very broad range (e.g. fromtofor Ti3+ doped sapphire). Pulsed lasers may be free-running, Q-switched, or mode-locked.Some CW lasers may be mode-locked.





solidification
The transition of a liquid or gas into a solid.

solidus
A line on a binary phase diagram (or a surface on a ternary phase diagram) that indicates thetemperature at which a system becomes completely solid on cooling or at which melting begins onheating under equilibrium conditions.

soliton
Localized excitations propagating in a system with constant velocity and colliding with each otherwithout change in their shapes.

solubility
The analytical composition of a saturated solution, expressed in terms of the proportion of a designatedsolute in a designated solvent, is the solubility of that solute. The solubility may be expressed as aconcentration, molality, mole fraction, mole ratio, etc.



solubility product
The product of the ion activities raised to appropriate powers of an ionic solute in its saturated solutionexpressed with due reference to the dissociation equilibria involved and the ions present.

solute
The minor component of a solution which is regarded as having been dissolved by the solvent.



solution
Also contains definition of: solventA liquid or solid phase containing more than one substance, when for convenience one (or more)substance, which is called the solvent, is treated differently from the other substances, which are calledsolutes. When, as is often but not necessarily the case, the sum of the mole fractions of solutes is smallcompared with unity, the solution is called a dilute solution. A superscript attached to thesymbolfor a property of a solution denotes the property in the limit of infinite dilution.

solvation
Any stabilizing interaction of a solute (or solute moiety) and the solvent or a similar interaction ofsolvent with groups of an insoluble material (i.e. the ionic groups of an ion-exchange resin). Suchinteractions generally involve electrostatic forces and van der Waals forces, as well as chemicallymore specific effects such as hydrogen bond formation.See also: cybotactic region

solvation energy
The change in Gibbs energy when an ion or molecule is transferred from a vacuum (or the gas phase)to a solvent. The main contributions to the solvation energy come from:1. the cavitation energy of formation of the hole which preserves the dissolved species in thesolvent;2. the orientation energy of partial orientation of the dipoles;3. the isotropic interaction energy of electrostatic and dispersion origin; and4. the anisotropic energy of specific interactions, e.g. hydrogen bonds, donor-acceptor interactionsetc.

solvatochromic relationship
A linear free-energy relationship based on solvatochromism.See also: Kamlet–Taft solvent parameters

solvatochromism
The (pronounced) change in position and sometimes intensity of an electronic absorption or emissionband, accompanying a change in the polarity of the medium. Negative (positive) solvatochromismcorresponds to a hypsochromic (bathochromic) shift with increasing solvent polarity.See also: Dimroth–Reichardtparameter, Z-value

solvent extraction
The process of transferring a substance from any matrix to an appropriate liquid phase. If the substanceis initially present as a solute in an immiscible liquid phase the process is synonymous with liquidliquid extraction.Notes:1.2.If the extractable material is present in a solid (such as a crushed mineral or an ore) the termleaching may be more appropriate. The extractable material may also be a liquid entrapped withinor adsorbed on a solid phase.Common usage has established this term as a synonym for liquid-liquid distribution. This isacceptable provided that no danger of confusion with extraction from solid phases exists in agiven context.











solvent parameter
Quantitative measures of the capability of solvents for interaction with solutes. Such parameters havebeen based on numerous different physicochemical quantities, e.g. rate constants, solvatochromicshifts in ultraviolet/visible spectra, solvent-induced shifts in infrared frequencies, etc. Some solventparameters are purely empirical in nature, i.e. they are based directly on some experimentalmeasurement. It may be possible to interpret such a parameter as measuring some particular aspect ofsolvent–solute interaction or it may be regarded simply as a measure of solvent polarity. Other solventparameters are based on analysing experimental results. Such a parameter is considered to quantifysome particular aspect of solvent capability for interaction with solutes.See also: Dimroth–Reichardtparameter, Grunwald–Winstein equation, Kamlet–Taft solventparameters, Koppel–Palm solvent parameters, solvophobicity parameter, Z-value



solvent shift
A shift in the frequency of a spectral band of a chemical species arising from interaction with itssolvent environment.See: bathochromic shift, hyposchromic shift









SOMO
A Singly Occupied Molecular Orbital (such as the half-filled HOMO of a radical).See also: frontier orbitals

sonication
Irradiation with (often ultra)sound waves, e.g. to increase the rate of a reaction or to prepare vesiclesin mixtures of surfactants and water.

sonogel
Colloidal gel produced by the action of ultrasonically induced cavitation.

sonoluminescence
Luminescence induced by sound waves.See: triboluminescence

sonosol
Sol produced by the action of ultrasonically induced cavitation.

soot
A randomly formed particulate carbon material and may be coarse, fine and/or colloidal in proportionsdepending on its origin. Soot consists of variable quantities of carbonaceous and inorganic solidstogether with absorbed and occluded tars and resins.Note:An unwanted by-product of incomplete combustion or pyrolysis. Soot generated within flamesconsists essentially of aggregates of spheres of carbon. Soot found in domestic fireplace chimneyscontains few aggregates but may contain substantial amounts of particulate fragments of coke or char.Soot from diesel engines consists essentially of aggregates together with tars and resins. For historicalreasons, the term soot is sometimes incorrectly used for carbon black. This misleading use shouldbe avoided.



Soret band
A very strong absorption band in the blue region of the optical absorption spectrum of a haem protein.









sp
See: torsion angle









spacer
A flexible segment used to link successive mesogenic units in the molecules of MCPLCs (main-chainpolymer liquid crystals) or to attach mesogenic units as side-groups onto the polymer backbone ofSGPLCs (side-group polymer liquid crystals).







special salt effect
The initial steep rate increase observed in the kinetic electrolyte effect on certain solvolysis reactions,upon addition of some non-common ion salts, especially LiClO4.





species (taxonomic)
A taxonomic subdivision of a genus; a group of closely related, morphologically and physiologicallysimilar individuals.

specific
Attribute to a physical quantity obtained by division by mass. Specific volume is the volume of asample divided by its mass.

specific acid–base catalysis
Catalysis by acids or bases in solution is said to be specific when the only observable catalytic effectsare those due to the ions formed from the solvent itself (e.g. if when water is the solvent the onlyobservable catalysis is that due to the H+ and OH− ions).See: general acid catalysis, general base catalysis



specific adsorption
Ions become specifically adsorbed when short-range interactions between them and the interphasebecome important. They are believed then to penetrate into the inner layer and may (but notnecessarily) come into contact with the surface. They are usually assumed to form a partial or completemonolayer.See: non-specific adsorption

specific burn-up
The total energy released through induced nuclear transformations divided by the mass of a nuclearfuel.

specific catalysis
The acceleration of a reaction by a unique catalyst, rather than by a family of related substances. Theterm is most commonly used in connection with specific hydrogen-ion or hydroxide-ion (lyonium ionor lyate ion) catalysis.See also: general acid catalysis, general base catalysis, pseudo-catalysis









specific
in analysisA term which expresses qualitatively the extent to which other substances interfere with thedetermination of a substance according to a given procedure. Specific is considered to be the ultimateof selective, meaning that no interferences are supposed to occur.













specific weight
See: mass density

specifically absorbing ion
Ions which possess a chemical affinity for the surface in addition to the Coulomb interaction, wherechemical is a collective adjective, embracing all interactions other than purely Coulombic. Examplesare van der Waals or hydrophobic bonding, pi-electron exchange and complex formation. Specificallyadsorbing ions can adsorb on an initially uncharged surface and hence provide it with a charge. Theterm specifically adsorbed applies to the sorption of all other ions having an affinity to the surface inaddition to the purely Coulombic contribution.See also: indifferent adsorbing ion

specifically labelled
An isotopically labelled compound is designated as specifically labelled when a unique isotopicallysubstituted compound is formally added to the analogous isotopically unmodified compound. In sucha case, both position(s) and number of each labelling nuclide are defined.

specifically labelled tracer
A tracer in which the label is present in a specified position.





spectator-stripping reaction
An extreme type of stripping reaction in which one reaction product has almost the same directionand momentum as one of the reactant molecules had before the reactive collision occurred.



spectral distribution
The variation of the spectral radiance with wavelength.



spectral intensity
See: spectral quantities





spectral overlap
In the context of radiative energy transfer, the integral,, which measures theoverlap of the emission spectrum of the excited donor, D, and the absorption spectrum of the groundstate acceptor, A;is the measured normalized emission of D,exitance of the donor at wavenumber , andis the photonis the decadic molar absorption coefficient of Aat wavenumber . In the context of Förster excitation transfer,,is given by:In the context of Dexter excitation transfer,In this caseandis given by:, the emission spectrum of donor and absorption spectrum of acceptor,respectively, are both normalized to unity, so that the rate constant for energy transfer,, isindependent of the oscillator strength of both transitions (contrast to Förster mechanism).See: energy transfer



















spectral radiant flux
Synonymous with spectral radiant power.





spectral responsivity
The spectral output quantity of a system such as a photomultiplier, diode array, photoimaging device,or biological unit divided by the spectral irradiancewhere, simplified expression:is the magnitude of the output signal for irradiation at wavelengthand,is the spectralirradiance of the parallel and perpendicular incident beam at the same wavelength.See also: responsivity



spectral sensitization
The process of increasing the spectral responsivity of a (photoimaging) system in a given wavelengthregion.

spectral spheradiance
Alternative term suggested for actinic flux.





spectrogram
A spectrum as recorded by a spectrometer.

spectrograph
A combination of a spectral apparatus and a camera, which enables an image of a spectrum to berecorded. Spectra are recorded by a photographic emulsion or other means, e.g. two-dimensionalelectronic image sensors.

spectrometer
A general term for describing a combination of spectral apparatus with one or more detectors tomeasure the intensity of one or more spectral bands.See also: sequential spectrometer, simultaneous spectrometer, multiplex spectrometer, filterspectrometer


spectroscope
A device which enables visual observation and evaluation of optical spectra (usually confined to thevisible spectral region).

spectroscopy
Also contains definition of: spectrometryThe study of physical systems by the electromagnetic radiation with which they interact or that thayproduce. Spectrometry is the measurement of such radiations as a means of obtaining informationabout the systems and their components. In certain types of optical spectroscopy, the radiationoriginates from an external source and is modified by the system, whereas in other types, the radiationoriginates within the system itself.

spectrum analysis
The interpretation of the information present in an energy spectrum in terms of radiation energy andintensity.













spherical radiant exposure
Synonymous with fluence.

spherulite
A polycrystalline, roughly spherical morphology consisting of lath, fibrous or lamellar crystalsemanating from a common centre. Space filling is achieved by branching, bending or both, of theconstituent fibres or lamellae.





spin crossover
A type of molecular magnetism that is the result of electronic instability (see electronic stability)caused by external constraints (temperature, pressure, or electromagnetic radiation), which inducestructural changes at molecular and lattice levels. The phenomenon is most characteristic of first-rowtransition metal complexes, e g,. those of FeII. An example of spin-crossover complexes (the termof spin-state isomers is also used) is [Fe(2-pic)3]Cl2·EtOH (2-pic = 2-picolylamine). At the Fe–Ndistance ofthe bond up to), the complex has an electronic low-spin state (1A1), whereas stretching(atinduces the transition to a high-spin state (5T2).

spin density
The unpaired electron density at a position of interest, usually at carbon, in a radical It is oftenmeasured experimentally by electron paramagnetic resonance [EPR, ESR (electron spin resonance)]spectroscopy through hyperfine coupling constants of the atom or an attached hydrogen.See also: radical centre

spin label
Also contains definition of: spin probeA stable paramagnetic group (typically a nitryl radical) that is attached to a part of a molecular entitywhose microscopic environment is of interest and may be revealed by the electron spin resonance(ESR) spectrum of the spin label. When a simple paramagnetic molecular entity is used in this waywithout covalent attachment to the molecular entity of interest it is frequently referred to as a 'spinprobe'.

spin polarization
Static and dynamic spin polarization effects are distinguished. The static polarization of an electronspin occurs in the C–H bonds of aromatic radicals where the σ-electron closest to an unpaired πelectron tends to have its spin parallel to that of the π-electron. Likewise, static spin polarization arisesin the π-system of conjugated radicals: the electron of the doubly occupied molecular orbital prefersto take a closer spatial position to the odd one, which spin is parallel to the latter. The effect reflectsthe energy unfavourable situation if an electron of opposite spin were to come nearby.

spin projection
A component,direction)., of the angular spin momentcan take the values betweenalong an arbitrary axis (usually chosen as the zand :,,...,, . The term is alsoused to denote an operation (spin-symmetry projection) allowing one to eliminate spin contaminationin the cases where wavefunctions are not eigenfunctions of the operator.

spin trapping
Also contains definitions of: spin adduct, spin countingIn certain reactions in solution a transient radical will interact with a diamagnetic reagent to forma more persistent radical. The product radical accumulates to a concentration where detection and,frequently, identification are possible by EPR/ESR spectroscopy. The key reaction is usually one ofattachment; the diamagnetic reagent is said to be a 'spin trap' and the persistent product radical is thenthe 'spin adduct'. The procedure is referred to as spin trapping, and is used for monitoring reactionsinvolving the intermediacy of reactive radicals at concentrations too low for direct observation.Typical spin traps are C-nitroso compounds and nitrones, to which reactive radicals will rapidly add toform nitryl radicals. A quantitative development, in which essentially all reactive radicals generatedin a particular system are intercepted, has been referred to as 'spin counting'. Spin trapping has alsobeen adapted to the interception of radicals generated in both gaseous and solid phases. In these casesthe spin adduct is in practice transferred to a liquid solution for observation in order to facilitateinterpretation of the EPR/ESR spectra of the radicals obtained.





spin-flip transition
A rotation of electron spins, above a critical magnetic field,, in an antiferromagnet from parallelto largely perpendicular alignment, relative to an applied magnetic field,See also: simultaneous pair transitions, for.

spin-glass transition
A second-order transition from a paramagnetic or ferromagnetic state to a spin-glass state in whichspins from moment-bearing solute atoms become ordered randomly in a non-magnetic host such thatthe net magnetization of any region is zero.Examples: Au–Fe, Cu–Mn and Mo–Fe

spin-orbit coupling
The interaction of the electron spin magnetic moment with the magnetic moment due to the orbitalmotion of the electron. One consequence of spin-orbit coupling is the mixing of zero-order states ofdifferent multiplicity. This effect may result in fine structure called spin-orbit splitting.





spin-Peierls transition
A magneto-elastic transition that occurs in quasi one-dimensional antiferromagnetic materials whenthe magnetic free energy decrease due to the formation of singlet spin pairs outweighs the increasein lattice free energy occurring as a result of the dimerization of the regular array. Example: Thetransition in tetrathiafulvalenium bis(dithiolene)cuprate at.

spin-state transition
An electronic transition from a high-spin state to a low-spin state, or vice versa. Example: With anincrease in temperature Co3+ ions in LaCoO3 transform from a low-spin state (spin state () to the high-).



spinodal
Curve defining the region of composition and temperature for a binary mixture across which atransition occurs from conditions where single-phase mixtures are metastable to conditions wheresingle-phase mixtures are unstable and undergo phase separation by spinodal decomposition.Notes:1. The spinodal curve for a binary mixture is defined as the geometrical locus of all states with.2.In the unstable region bounded by the spinodal curve, phase domain separation is spontaneous,i.e., no nucleation step is required to initiate the separation process.

spinodal decomposition
A clustering reaction in a homogeneous, supersaturated solution (solid or liquid) which is unstableagainst infinitesimal fluctuations in density or composition. The solution therefore separatesspontaneously into two phases, starting with small fluctuations and proceeding with a decrease in theGibbs energy without a nucleation barrier.

spin–spin coupling
The interaction between the spin magnetic moments of different electrons and/or nuclei. It causes,e.g. the multiplet pattern in nuclear magnetic resonance spectra.





spiro compounds
Compounds having one atom (usually a quaternary carbon) as the only common member of two rings,e.g.

spiro macromolecule
A double-strand macromolecule consisting of an uninterrupted sequence of rings, with adjacentrings having only one atom in common. Alternatively, a spiro macromolecule is a double-strandmacromolecule with adjacent constitutional units joined to each other through three atoms, two onone side and one on the other side of each constitutional unit.

spiro union
Also contains definitions of: free spiro union, spiro atomA union formed by a single atom which is the only common member of two rings. The common atomis designated as the spiro atom. A free spiro union is one which constitutes the only union direct orindirect between the two rings.

splicing
1.2.of RNA: The procedure by which introns are removed from eukaryotic precursor mRNAmolecules and adjacent exon sequences are joined together (spliced).of DNA: Manipulation for joining together double-stranded DNA fragments with protrudingsingle-stranded 'sticky ends' by means of ligases.

spontaneous emission
That mode of emission which occurs even in the absence of a perturbing external electromagneticfield. The transition between states, and , is governed by the Einstein coefficient of spontaneousemission,.See also: stimulated emission

spontaneous fission
Nuclear fission which occurs without the addition of particles or energy to the nucleus









spreading wetting
A process in which a drop of liquid spreads over a solid or liquid substrate.

sputter yield
The number of particles sputtered from the surface of a target per primary ion.

sputtering
Removal of surface material (atoms, clusters and molecules) by particle bombardment.

square-wave current
In square-wave polarography, the component of the current that is associated with the presence of asubstance B. This component may be either faradaic (if B is electroactive) or non-faradaic (if B issurface-active).

stability constant
An equilibrium constant that expresses the propensity of a substance to form from its componentparts. The larger the stability constant, the more stable is the species. The stability constant (formationconstant) is the reciprocal of the instability constant (dissociation constant).

stable
As applied to chemical species, the term expresses a thermodynamic property, which is quantitativelymeasured by relative molar standard Gibbs energies. A chemical species A is more stable than itsisomer B iffor the (real or hypothetical) reaction,under standard conditions. If for the two reactions:, P is more stable relative to the product Y than is Q relative to Z. Both in qualitativeand quantitative usage the term stable is therefore always used in reference to some explicitly statedor implicitly assumed standard. The term should not be used as a synonym for unreactive or 'lessreactive' since this confuses thermodynamics and kinetics. A relatively more stable chemical speciesmay be more reactive than some reference species towards a given reaction partner.See also: inert, unstable

stable film, metastable film
A film often thins gradually to a thickness at which it either ruptures or converts abruptly to anequilibrium. Rupture under these conditions characterizes unstable films, whereas transition to anequilibrium film characterizes (meta)stable films.













standard atomic weights
Recommended values of relative atomic masses of the elements revised biennially by the IUPACCommission on Atomic Weights and Isotopic Abundances and applicable to elements in any normalsample with a high level of confidence. A normal sample is any reasonably possible source of theelement or its compounds in commerce for industry and science and has not been subject to significantmodification of isotopic composition within a geologically brief period.

standard chemical potential
Of substance B at temperature,, is the value of the chemical potential under specifiedstandard conditions (in the standard state).

standard concentration
Chosen value of amount concentration denoted bySee also: standard molalityorand usually equal to.

standard conditions for gases
Temperature,() and pressure ofpascals. IUPAC recommends that the formeruse of the pressure of 1 atm as standard pressure (equivalent todiscontinued.See: STP) should be













standard hydrogen electrode
For solutions in protic solvents, the universal reference electrode for which, under standard conditions,the standard electrode potential (H+ / H2) is zero at all temperatures. The absolute electrode potentialof the hydrogen electrode under standard conditions can be expressed in terms of thermodynamicquantities by applying a suitable Born–Haber cycle, thus:whereandare the atomization and ionization Gibbs energies of H2,is the realpotential of H2 in solvent S andis the Faraday constant. The recommended absolute electrodepotential of the hydrogen electrode is:







standard pressure
Chosen value of pressure denoted byorprior to 1982 the value(=. In 1982 IUPAC recommended the value) was usually used., but

standard reaction quantities
Infinitesimal changes in thermodynamic functions with extent of reaction divided by the infinitesimalincrease in the extent when all the reactants and products are in their standard states. For the quantitythey should be denoted by, but usually onlyis used. For specific types of reactionsthe subscript r is replaced by: f for formation, c for combustion, a for atomization and superscript ‡for activation.

standard solution
Also contains definitions of: primary standard, secondary standardA solution of accurately known concentration, prepared using standard substances in one of severalways. A primary standard is a substance of known high purity which may be dissolved in a knownvolume of solvent to give a primary standard solution. If stoichiometry is used to establish the strengthof a titrant, it is called a secondary standard solution. The term secondary standard can also be appliedto a substance whose active agent contents have been found by comparison against a primary standard.Concentrations of standard solutions may be expressed inclosely related to those used in specific titrations (as titres).,, or in terms more

standard state
State of a system chosen as standard for reference by convention. Three standard states are recognized:For a gas phase it is the (hypothetical) state of the pure substance in the gaseous phase at the standardpressure, assuming ideal behaviour. For a pure phase, or a mixture, or a solvent in the liquidor solid state it is the state of the pure substance in the liquid or solid phase at the standard pressure. For a solute in solution it is the (hypothetical) state of solute at the standard molality,standard pressure
or standard concentrationand exhibiting infinitely dilute solution behaviour.For a pure substance the concept of standard state applies to the substance in a well defined state ofaggregation at a well defined but arbitrarily chosen standard pressure.







stannoxanes
Compounds having the structure H3Sn[OSnH2]nOSnH3 . Thus tin analogues of siloxanes.

stannylenes
See: stannylidenes

stannylidenes
Carbene analogues having the structure R2Sn:. The older synonymous term stannylenes is no longerrecommended.

star copolymer
A copolymer where chains having different constitutional or configurational features are linkedthrough a central moiety.

star macromolecule
Also contains definitions of: n-star macromolecule, regular star macromolecule, variegatedstar macromolecule
A macromolecule containing a single branch point from which linear chains (arms) emanate.Notes:1. A star macromolecule with linear chains (arms) attached to the branch point is termed an star macromolecule, e.g. five-star macromolecule.2. If the arms of a star macromolecule are identical with respect to constitution and degree ofpolymerization, the macromolecule is termed a regular star macromolecule.3. If different arms of a star macromolecule are composed of different monomeric units, themacromolecule is termed a variegated star macromolecule.

star polymer
A polymer composed of star macromolecules.

Stark effect
Synonym: electrochromic effectThe splitting or shift of spectral lines in an electric field. Also called electrochromic effect.







state diagram
See: Jablonski diagram

state-to-state kinetics
A branch of chemical kinetics concerned with the dynamics of reactions in which the reactant speciesare in known quantum states, and in which the quantum states of the products are determined.





static stability
In meteorology, the stability of the atmosphere in the vertical direction to vertical displacements. Ifis the dry adiabatic lapse rate, dry air is stable if the lapse rateand neutral, unstable if.See: lapse rate, inversion







stationary state
1.2.(in quantum mechanics) : A state that does not evolve with time.(in kinetics) :See: steady state

stationary-phase fraction
The volume of the stationary phase per unit volume of a packed column.

statistical copolymer
A copolymer consisting of macromolecules in which the sequential distribution of the monomericunits obeys known statistical laws.Note:An example of a statistical copolymer is one consisting of macromolecules in which the sequentialdistribution of monomeric units follows Markovian statistics.

statistical copolymerization
A copolymerization in which a statistical copolymer is formed.





steady state (stationary state)
Also contains definition of: steady state approximation (treatment)1.In a kinetic analysis of a complex reaction involving unstable intermediates in low concentration,the rate of change of each such intermediate is set equal to zero, so that the rate equation canbe expressed as a function of the concentrations of chemical species present in macroscopicamounts. For example, assume that X is an unstable intermediate in the reaction sequence:Conservation of mass requires that:which, sinceis constant, implies:.Sinceis negligibly small, the rate of formation of D is essentially equal to the rate ofdisappearance of A, and the rate of change ofcan be set equal to zero. Applying thesteady state approximation () allows the elimination ofwhereupon the rate of reaction is expressed:from the kinetic equations,Note:The steady-state approximation does not imply thatis even approximately constant, onlythat its absolute rate of change is very much smaller than that ofand. Since accordingto the reaction scheme2., the assumption thatis constant would lead, forthe case in which C is in large excess, to the absurd conclusion that formation of the product Dwill continue at a constant rate even after the reactant A has been consumed.In a stirred flow reactor a steady state implies a regime so that all concentrations are independentof time.

Stefan–Boltzmann constant
Fundamental physical constant.

stem cell
Multipotent cell with mitotic potential that may serve as a precursor for many kinds of differentiatedcells.











steradian
SI derived unit of solid angle,.

stereoblock macromolecule
A block macromolecule composed of stereoregular, and possibly nonstereoregular, blocks.

stereoblock polymer
A polymer composed of stereoblock macromolecules.



stereochemical non-rigidity
The capability of a molecule to undergo fast and reversible intramolecular isomerization, the energybarrier to which is lower than that allowing for the preparative isolation of the individual isomersat room temperature. It is conventional to assign to the sterochemically non-rigid systems thosecompounds whose molecules rearrange rapidly enough to influence NMR line shapes at temperatureswithin the practical range (fromto) of experimentation. The energy barriers to thusdefined rearrangements fall into the range of –( –).

stereoconvergence
Also contains definition of: enantioconvergenceThe predominant formation of the same stereoisomer or stereoisomer mixture of a reaction productwhen two different stereoisomers of the reactant are used in the same reaction. When that productinvolved in the reaction is one enantiomer the result has been called enantioconvergence.

stereodescriptor
A prefix to specify configuration (absolute or relative) or conformation. For example R, S; r, s; P,M; Re, Si; E, Z; ap, sp; etc.

stereoelectronic
Pertaining to the dependence of the properties (especially the energy) of a molecular entity in aparticular electronic state (or of a transition state ) on relative nuclear geometry. The electronic groundstate is usually considered, but the term can apply to excited states as well. Stereoelectronic effectsarise from the different alignment of electronic orbitals in different arrangements of nuclear geometry.

stereoelectronic control
Control of the nature of the products of a chemical reaction (or of its rate) by stereoelectronicfactors. The term is usually applied in the framework of an orbital approximation. The variations ofmolecular orbital energies with relative nuclear geometry (along a reaction coordinate ) are then seenas consequences of variations in basis-orbital overlaps.



stereoheterotopic
Either enantiotopic or diastereotopic. (In contrast the term constitutionally heterotopic has been usedto describe identical groups located in constitutionally non-equivalent positions).See also: pro-R, pro-S





stereoisomers
Isomers that possess identical constitution, but which differ in the arrangement of their atoms in space.See: enantiomer, diastereoisomer, cis-trans isomers

stereomutation
A change of configuration at a stereogenic unit brought about by physical or chemical means.See: epimerization

stereoregular macromolecule
A regular macromolecule essentially comprising only one species of stereorepeating unit.

stereoregular polymer
A polymer composed of stereoregular macromolecules.







stereoselectivity
Also contains definition of: diastereoselectivityThe preferential formation in a chemical reaction of one stereoisomer over another. When thestereoisomers are enantiomers, the phenomenon is called enantioselectivity and is quantitativelyexpressed by the enantiomer excess; when they are diastereoisomers, it is called diastereoselectivityand is quantitatively expressed by the diastereoisomer excess.











steric factor
A factor introduced into simple versions of the collision theory of reactions to take care of the factthat the reaction probability depends on the certain mutual orientations of the reactant molecules.See also: collision frequency

steric factor
in polymersThe ratio,, of the root-mean-square end-to-end distance of a polymer chain with unperturbeddimensions,, to that of a freely rotating chain with the same structure,, i.e., in the limit of infinite chain length. The steric factor reflects the effect of hindrance tofree rotation.

steric hindrance
The original term for a steric effect arising from crowding of substituents.

steric isotope effect
A secondary isotope effect attributed to the different vibrational amplitudes of isotopologues. Forexample, both the mean and mean-square amplitudes of vibrations associated with C–H bonds aregreater than those of C–D bonds. The greater effective bulk of molecules containing the former maybe manifested by a steric effect on a rate or equilibrium constant.

steric strain
1.See: strain2.3.4.



steric-approach control
Control of stereoselectivity of a reaction by steric hindrance towards attack of the reagent, whichis directed to the less hindered face of the molecule. Partial bond making is strong enough at thetransition state for steric control to take place. This suggests that the transition state should not beclose to products.See also: product development control

Stern layer
Counter and co-ions in immediate contact with a surface are said to be located in the Stern layer, andform with the fixed charge a molecular capacitor.





sterols
Natural products derived from the steroid skeleton and containing a hydroxy group in the 3 position,closely related to cholestan-3-ol.

stibanes
The saturated hydrides of tervalent antimony, having the general formula SbnHn+2. Hydrocarbylderivatives of SbH3 belong to the class stibines.

stibanylidenes
Also contains definition of: stibinidenesRecommended name for carbene analogues having the structure RSb: (former IUPAC name isstibinediyls). A common non-IUPAC synonym is stibinidenes.

stibines
SbH3 and compounds derived from it by substituting one, two or three hydrogen atoms by hydrocarbylgroups R3Sb. RSbH2, R2SbH and R3Sb (R ≠ H) are called primary, secondary and tertiary stibines,respectively. A specific stibine is preferably named as a substituted stibane. E.g. (CH2=CH)3Sbtrivinylstibane.See: stibanes

stibonium compounds
Salts (including hydroxides) containing an atom of tetracoordinate antimony, of the form [R4Sb]+X− .See: onium compounds







stimulated emission
That part of the emission which is induced by a resonant perturbing electromagnetic field. Thetransition between states, n and m, is governed by the Einstein coefficient of stimulated emission,. CIDNP emission and lasing action are examples of processes which require stimulated emission.See also: spontaneous emission





stochastic sampling
Synonymous with random sampling.

stochastic theories
Theories that treat reaction rates in terms of the probabilities of transitions between the various energylevels in the reactant molecules.

Stock number [obsolete]
Usage not recommended.See: oxidation number

Stockholm convention
IUPAC convention on signs of electromotive forces and electrode potentials.

stoichiometric
Involving chemical combination in simple integral ratios. Characterized by having no excess ofreactants or products over that required to satisfy the balanced chemical equation representing thegiven chemical reaction.







stoichiometry
The term refers to the relationship between the amounts of substances that react together in a particularchemical reaction, and the amounts of products that are formed. The general stoichiometric equation:provides the information that a moles of A reacts with b moles of B to produce y moles of Y and zmoles of Z. The stoichiometry of a reaction may be unknown, or may be very complex. For example,the thermal decomposition of acetaldehyde yields mainly methane and carbon monoxide, but also avariety of minor products such as ethane, acetone and diacetyl. The stoichiometric equation:is therefore only an approximate one. Even when the overall stoichiometry of a reaction is welldefined, it may be time-dependent in that it varies during the course of a reaction. Thus if a reactionoccurs by the mechanism, and X is formed in substantial amounts during the courseof the process, the relationship between the amounts of A, X and Y will vary with time, and no onestoichiometric equation can represent the reaction at all times.

stokes
cgs unit of kinematic viscosity,.

Stokes law
, where is the force exerted on a sphere of radius which is moving through a fluidof viscosity with a relative velocity ; this equation holds at low velocities which are free fromturbulence (called the Stokes region).



Stokes parameters
Of elliptically polarized incident radiation, these are given bywhereandspecify the irradiances of the incident light polarized with their electric vectorsvibrating perpendicular and parallel to the scattering, respectively andbetween these electric vectors.See also: scattering matrixis the phase difference

Stokes shift
Also contains definition of: anti-Stokes shiftThe difference (usually in frequency units) between the spectral positions of the band maxima (or theband origin) of the absorption and luminescence arising from the same electronic transition. Generally,the luminescence occurring at a longer wavelength than the absorption is stronger than the opposite.The latter may be called an anti-Stokes shift.See: coherent radiation

Stokes type radiation
Fluorescence radiation occurring at wavelengths longer than absorption, i.e. the normal case, is saidto be of the Stokes type.

stopped flow
A technique for following the kinetics of reactions in solution (usually in the millisecond time range)in which two reactant solutions are rapidly mixed by being forced through a mixing chamber. Theflow of the mixed solution along a uniform tube is then suddenly arrested. At a fixed position alongthe tube the solution is monitored (as a function of time following the stoppage of the flow) by somemethod with a rapid response (e.g. photometry).See: mixing control



stopping power
Of a substance, for charged particles of specified energy, the average energy loss in passing througha thin layer of that substance, divided by the thickness of that layer.

STP
Abbreviation for standard temperature (or) and pressure (); usually employedin reporting gas volumes. Note that flow meters calibrated in standard gas volumes per unit time oftenrefer to volumes at, not.See also: standard conditions for gases

strain
Strain is present in a molecular entity or transition structure if the energy is enhanced because ofunfavourable bond lengths, bond angles or dihedral angles ('torsional strain') relative to a standard.It is quantitatively defined as the standard enthalpy of a structure relative to a strainless structure(real or hypothetical) made up from the same atoms with the same types of bonding. (The enthalpyof formation of cyclopropane is, whereas the enthalpy of formation based on three'normal' methylene groups, from acyclic models, is. On this basis cyclopropane isdestabilized by ca.of strain energy.)See: molecular mechanics calculation

strain energy
The excess energy due to steric strain of a molecular entity or transition state structure, i.e. distortionsrelative to a reference (real or hypothetical) 'strainless' structure with the standard bond lengths,bond angles and dihedral angles. The strain energy components involve the following destabilizingterms: non-bonded repulsions, bond-angle distortions, bond stretch or compression, rotation aroundor twisting of double bonds, and electrostatic strain. In general, the contributions of these componentsare inseparable and interdependent. A quantitative assessment of strain and strain energies can bemade by taking the difference between the heat of formation of the substance under consideration andthat of a hypothetical strain-free model. Several approaches to the assessment of strain energies havebeen developed based on the use of energies of isodesmic and homodesmotic reactions and on the socalled 'strainless increments', i.e. heats of formation of certain groups (CH3, CH2, CH, C etc).

strain-induced transition
A transition in a solid that is initiated by plastic strain.

stratified film
A film in which more than two thicknesses coexist in a fixed configuration over significant periodsof time.



stratocumulus cloud
A layer of patches composed of laminae or globular masses arranged in groups, lines or waves andhaving a soft, grey appearance; very often the rolls are so close together that their edges join and givethe undersurface a wavy character; the process of formation (cumulogenesis) involves the spreadingout of the tops of cumulus clouds, the latter having disappeared;; usually warmer than; vertical velocities usually.

stratopause
That region of the atmosphere which lies between the stratosphere and the mesosphere and in whicha maximum in the temperature occurs.

stratosphere
The atmospheric shell lying just above the troposphere which is characterized by an increasingtemperature with altitude. The stratosphere begins at the tropopause (aboutheight) andextends to a height of about, where the lapse rate changes sign at the stratopause and thebeginning of the mesosphere.

stratus cloud
A uniform, featureless layer of cloud resembling fog but not resting on the ground; when this very lowlayer is broken up into irregular shreds, it is designated as fractostratus;; widespreadirregular stirring and lifting of the shallow layer of cool, damp air near the ground.



streak tube
Also contains definition of: streak cameraAn image converter adapted to provide scanning or time-resolved images. If the image is recordedthe whole device is an example of a streak camera.

streaming birefringence
Synonym: flow birefringenceThe birefringence induced by flow in liquids, solutions and dispersions of optically anisotropic,anisometric or deformable flow molecules or particles due to a non-random orientation of themolecules or particles. Synonymous with flow birefringence.

streaming current
The electric current flowing in a streaming cell if the electrodes, which are supposed to be ideallydepolarized, are short-circuited. is positive if the current in the membrane, plug, etc., is from highto low pressure side (and in the outside lead from low to high pressure side).



stress graphitization
The solid-state transformation of non-graphitic carbon into graphite by heat treatment combined withapplication of mechanical stress, resulting in a defined degree of graphitization being obtained at alower temperature and/or after a shorter time of heat treatment than in the absence of applied stress.Note:Stress graphitization may also occur in volume elements of a carbon body in the process of heattreatment as a result of the action of internal residual or thermal stresses.

stress-assisted transition
A transition that takes place when an applied stress assists the transition to the new phase.

stripping
The process of removing solute(s) from a loaded solvent or extract. Generally this refers to the mainsolute(s) present.Notes:1. Where appropriate, e.g. when liquid-liquid distribution is used for stripping, the termback-extraction can be used. The terms back-washing and re-extraction are not recommended.2. The recent application of selective stripping of solutes as a separation method leads to someconfusion between the terms stripping and scrubbing. It is recommended that the term scrubbingbe reserved for the operation of removing contaminants (impurities) from an extract (where thescrub raffinate is often recycled to the loading step) and the term selective stripping be usedwhere two or more main solutes are stripped successively from an extract, usually with differentstripping agents, with a view to their subsequent separate recovery from solution for analysis.

stripping isotherm
See: distribution isothermNote:In the graphical representation of stripping isotherms, the axes are often interchanged from those usedto represent the phases for extraction isotherms. It is essential that the axes be clearly labelled.







strong collision
A collision between two molecules in which the amount of energy transferred from one to the otheris large compared with, whereis the Boltzmann constant and the absolute temperature.

structural disorder
Any deviation from the ideal three-dimensional regularity of the crystal structure.

structural formula
A formula which gives information about the way the atoms in a molecule are connected and arrangedin space.

structural stability
Within the Born–Oppenheimer (adiabatic) approximation, this is associated with an energy minimumon a potential energy surface. Structural stability implies that any change in the coordinates of thenuclei can only increase the total energy.

structural transition
A reversible or irreversible transition that involves a change of the crystal structure. Example: Thetransition of NH4Cl at 469 K from a CsCl-type structure to a NaCl-type structure.









styphnates
Salts or charge-transfer complexes of styphnic acid (2,4,6-trinitrobenzene-1,3-diol).See: picrates











subsample
A subsample may be: (a) a portion of the sample obtained by selection or division; (b) an individualunit of the lot taken as part of the sample; (c) the final unit of multistage sampling. The term'subsample' is used either in the sense of a 'sample of a sample' or as a synonym for 'unit'. In practice,the meaning is usually apparent from the context or is defined.

substance concentration
See: amount of substance concentration



substance flow rate
Amount-of-substance of a component crossing a surface divided by the time. For clinical chemistrythe term component is recommended. ISO uses "substance".



substituent atom (group)
An atom (group) that replaces one or more hydrogen atoms attached to a parent structure orcharacteristic group except for hydrogen atoms attached to a chalcogen atom.

substituent electronegativity
See: electronegativity

substitution reaction
A reaction, elementary or stepwise, in which one atom or group in a molecular entity is replaced byanother atom or group. For example,

substitutive name
A name which indicates the exchange of one or more hydrogen atoms attached to a skeletal atom ofa parent structure or to an atom of a characteristic group for another atom or group, which may beexpressed by a suffix or by prefixes.

substoichiometric extraction
Solvent extraction in which the amount of reagent used is lower than that dictated by stoichiometry.If the constants of formation and extraction of the complexes are high, the amount of extracted metalis dictated by the amount of extractant introduced.



substrate
A chemical species, the reaction of which with some other chemical reagent is under observation (e.g.a compound that is transformed under the influence of a catalyst). The term should be used with care.Either the context or a specific statement should always make it clear which chemical species in areaction is regarded as the substrate.See also: transformation

substrate
in biocatalysis1.2.3.The chemical entity whose conversion to a product or products is catalysed by one or severalenzymes.A solution or dry mixture containing all ingredients which are necessary for the growth of amicrobial culture or for product formation.Component in the nutrient medium, supplying the organisms with carbon (C-substrate), nitrogen(N-substrate), etc.

substrate
Also contains definition of: subphase in thin filmsin thin filmsThe terms substrate and subphase refer to a condensed phase that physically supports a film or layer.The term substrate should be used with care in the light of the existing double meaning of the termsubstrate in film science and technology, on the one hand, and in biochemistry, on the other. Theterm subphase applies, mainly, to a liquid phase underlying an adsorption layer or a floating spreadmonolayer.

subtractive name
A name for a modified parent structure in which prefixes and/or suffixes indicate the removal of atomsor groups and, where required, replacement by an appropriate number of hydrogen atoms.

successor complex
The radical ion pair which forms by the transfer of an electron from the donor D to the acceptor Aafter these species have diffused together to form the precursor or encounter complex:



sugars
A loose term applied to monosaccharides and lower oligosaccharides.

sulfamic acids
H2NS(=O)2OH (sulfamic acid) and its N-hydrocarbyl derivatives. Sulfamic acid is called sulfamidicacid in inorganic chemistry.

sulfanes [obsolete]
A term including hydropolysulfides, polysulfanes, polysulfides. Use is discouraged because ofconfusion with the newer systematic name sulfane, H2S, and the numerous names derived therefrom.

sulfatides
Hydrogen sulfate esters of glycosphingolipids. Specific compounds should be named asglycerosphingolipid derivatives, e.g.

sulfenamides
Compounds derived from sulfenic acids, RSOH (R ≠ H), by replacement of –OH by –NR2.May alternatively be considered as alkylsulfanylamines, e.g. C2H5SNH2 ethanesulfenamide orethylsulfanylamine.

sulfenes
S,S-Dioxides of thioaldehydes and thioketones, R2C=SO2.

sulfenic acids
Compounds having the structure RSOH (R ≠ H), e.g. PhSOH benzenesulfenic acid.

sulfenium ions
A term sometimes erroneously used for sulfenylium ions.

sulfenyl groups
Groups having the structure RS– (R ≠ H). This term is derived from sulfenic acids. The synonymousterm sulfanyl groups is derived from sulfane, H2S. E.g. CH3–S– methanesulfenyl, methylthio ormethylsulfanyl.

sulfenyl radicals
Sulfur-centered radicals having the structure RS. (R ≠ H). This term is derived from sulfenic acids.The synonymous term sulfanyl radicals is derived from sulfane, H2S. E.g. CH3S. methylsulfanyl ormethanesulfenyl radical. An older synonymous term is alkylthio radical.

sulfenylium ions
Cations having the structure RS+ (R ≠ H). This term is derived from sulfenic acids. Thesynonymous term sulfanylium ions is derived from sulfane, H2S. E.g. CH3S+ methylsulfanylium ormethanesulfenylium ion.

sulfides
1.2.3.Compounds having the structure RSR (R ≠ H). Such compounds were once called thioethers.See also: thioacetalsIn an inorganic sense, salts or other derivatives of hydrogen sulfide.A term used in additive nomenclature, see imides (2).

sulfilimines
See: sulfimides (1)

sulfimides
1.2.H2S=NH, sulfimide, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives. They are thus related to sulfoxides in thesame way that imines are related to aldehydes or ketones, e.g. (C2H5)2S=NPh S,S-diethyl-Nphenylsulfimide.A term used in Chemical Abstracts Service Index Nomenclature for sulfonylamines,RN=S(=O)2.

sulfimines [obsolete]
A non-recommended synonym for sulfimides (1).

sulfinamides
Amides of sulfinic acids,methylbenzenesulfinamide.RS(=O)OH;thusRS(=O)NR2,e.g.PhS(=O)NHCH3N-

sulfinamidines
Amidines of sulfinicbenzenesulfinamidine.acids,RS(=O)OH;thusRS(=NR)NR2,e.g.PhS(=NH)NH2

sulfines [obsolete]
S-Oxides of thioaldehydes and thioketones. Not recommended because in English the -ine terminationshould be reserved for amines, imines, etc., e.g. PhC(=S=O)H thiobenzaldehyde S-oxide.

sulfinic acids
HS(=O)OH, sulfinic acid, and its S-hydrocarbyl derivatives, e.g. (CH3)2CHS(=O)OH propane-2sulfinic acid.

sulfinic anhydrides
Compounds having the structure RS(=O)OS(=O)R.See also: acid anhydrides

sulfinimines [obsolete]
An obsolescent term for sulfimides (1).

sulfinylamines
Synonym: thionylaminesCompounds having the structure RN=S=O. Formerly called thionylamines.

sulfolipids
Sulfate esters of glycolipids.See also: sulfatides

sulfonamides
Amides of sulfonic acids RS(=O)2NR'2, e.g. PhS(=O)2NHCH3 N-methylbenzenesulfonamide.

sulfonamidines [obsolete]
A term abandoned because of its ambiguous use to mean either RS(=O)=NH2 (sulfonimidamide) orRS(=NH)2=NH2 (sulfonodiimidamide).

sulfonediimines
Compounds having the structure, RS(=NR)2R, formally derived from sulfones by replacing (=O)2 by(=NR)2, e.g. Ph2S(=NH)2 diphenyl sulfonediimine.

sulfones
Compounds having the structure, RS(=O)2R (R ≠ H), e.g. C2H5S(=O)2CH3 ethyl methyl sulfone.

sulfonic acids
HS(=O)2OH, sulfonic acid, and its S-hydrocarbyl derivatives.

sulfonic anhydrides
Compounds having the structure RS(=O)2OS(=O)2R', e.g. PhS(=O)2OS(=O)2Ph benzenesulfonicanhydride.See also: acid anhydrides

sulfonimides [obsolete]
A seldom used synonym of sulfoximides; its use is discouraged.

sulfonium compounds
Compounds having the structure R3S+ and associated anion (generally, but not necessarily, all threeR groups are hydrocarbyl). E.g. [(CH3)3S]+Cl−, trimethylsulfonium chloride, orSee: onium compounds

sulfonphthaleins
3,3-Bis(hydroxyaryl)-3H-2,1-benzoxathiole S,S-dioxides, formed by condensation of o-sulfobenzoicacid with phenols or related compounds, e.g.See: phthaleins

sulfonylamines
Compounds having the structure RN=S(=O)2. (Indexed by Chemical Abstracts Service at the headingsulfimide). E.g. CH3N=S(=O)2 N-sulfonylmethylamine.

sulfoxides
Compounds having the structure R2S=O (R ≠ H), e.g. Ph2S=O diphenyl sulfoxide.

sulfoximides
Synonym: sulfoximinesCompounds having the structure R2S(=O)=NR. (Indexed by Chemical Abstracts Service at theheading sulfoximines). E.g. (CH3)2S(=O)=NPh S,S-dimethyl-N-phenylsulfoximide.

sulfur diimides
The parent compound HN=S=NH and hydrocarbyl derivatives.

sultams
Sulfonamides in which the S-N bond is part of a ring.

sultims
Tautomeric forms of sultams, having a sulfur–nitrogen double bond as part of a ring.

sultines
Intramolecular cyclic esters of hydroxy sulfinic acids. (Named by supposed analogy with lactonesand sultones; but the -ine ending is unfortunate).

sultones
Intramolecular cyclic esters of hydroxy sulfonic acids, analogous to lactones.







superabsorbent polymer
Polymer that can absorb and retain extremely large amounts of a liquid relative to its own mass.Notes:1. The liquid absorbed can be water or an organic liquid.2. The swelling ratio of a superabsorbent polymer can reach the order of 1000:1.3. Superabsorbent polymers for water are frequently polyelectrolytes.

superacid
Also contains definitions of: magic acid, superbaseA medium having a high acidity, generally greater than that of 100 wt.% sulfuric acid. The commonsuperacids are made by dissolving a powerful Lewis acid (e.g. SbF5) in a suitable Brønsted acid suchas HF or HSO3F. (An equimolar mixture of HSO3F and SbF5 is known by the trade name 'magicacid'.) In a biochemical context 'superacid catalysis' is sometimes used to denote catalysis by metalions analogous to catalysis by hydrogen ions. By analogy, a compound having a very high basicity,such as lithium diisopropylamide, is called a 'superbase'.

superconducting transition
A transition at the critical temperature,, below which the resistance of electrical conductorsbecomes zero and magnetic flux is excluded. Examples: The transitions of Nb3Sn, Nb3Al and V3Sito superconductors () and YBa2Cu3O7-x () at.

supercritical drying of a gel
Drying of a gel using a supercritical fluid.Note:Since liquid and vapour are indistinguishable in a supercritical fluid, there is no capillary pressure tocause shrinkage and cracking of the pores formed in the gel.

supercritical fluid
The defined state of a compound, mixture or element above its critical pressure (temperature () and critical).



superequivalent adsorption
This occurs when the specifically adsorbed amount of charge in the inner Helmholtz plane is higherthan the charge on the metal phase, taken with the reverse sign.

superexchange interaction
Electronic interaction between two molecular entities mediated by one or more different moleculesor ions.



superlattice
Also contains definition of: quantum well multilayerA periodic multilayer which is synthetic and where a unit cell, consisting of successive layers that arechemically different from their adjacent neighbours, is repeated. The term quantum well multilayerapplies to the superlattices with artificially created electronic band structures.

superposability
The ability to bring two particular stereochemical formulae (or models) into coincidence (or to beexactly superposable in space, and for the corresponding molecular entities or objects to become exactreplicas of each other) by no more than translation and rigid rotation.



supersaturation
1.2.In chemistry, an unstable system which has a greater concentration of a material in solution thanwould exist at equilibrium is said to be supersaturated.In meteorology, supersaturation of an air mass with respect to H2O vapour is of special interest.It is the saturation ratio minus one, or the percent supersaturation is the percent relative humidityminus 100.







supporting electrolyte
An electrolyte solution, whose constituents are not electroactive in the range of applied potentialsbeing studied, and whose ionic strength (and, therefore, contribution to the conductivity) is usuallymuch larger than the concentration of an electroactive substance to be dissolved in it.

suppressor
A substance which reduces emission, absorption, or light scattering by an interferent, thus removingor lowering spectral interference.

supramolecular chemistry
A field of chemistry related to species of greater complexity than molecules, that are held togetherand organized by means of intermolecular interactions. The objects of supramolecular chemistry aresupermolecules and other polymolecular entities that result from the spontaneous association of a largenumber of components into a specific phase (membranes, vesicles, micelles, solid state structures etc.)

supramolecule
A system of two or more molecular entities held together and organized by means of intermolecular(noncovalent) binding interactions.

surface
The boundary between two phases. It is recommended that for the purpose of surface analysis adistinction be made between 'surface' in general, 'physical surface' and 'experimental surface': Surface— The 'outer portion' of a sample of undefined depth; to be used in general discussions of the outsideregions of the sample. Physical Surface — That atomic layer of a sample which, if the sample wereplaced in a vacuum, is the layer 'in contact with' the vacuum; the outermost atomic layer of a sample.Experimental Surface — That portion of the sample with which there is significant interaction withthe particles or radiation used for excitation. It is the volume of sample required for analysis or thevolume corresponding to the escape for the emitted radiation or particle, whichever is larger.See also: interface





surface catalysis
See: homogeneous catalysis



surface chemical potential
Defined by:whereis the surface excess Helmholtz energy,interfacial Helmholtz energy,is the surface excess Gibbs energyis the interfacial Gibbs energy, andis theis the surface area. Thequantities thus defined can be shown to be identical, and the conditions of equilibrium of componentin the system to bewhereandare the chemical potentials of in the bulk phases α and β. (orhave to beomitted from this equlibrium condition if component is not present in the respective bulk phase.)The surface chemical potentials are related to the Gibbs energy functions by the equations







surface crossing
In a diagram of electronic energy versus molecular geometry, the electronic energies of two statesof different symmetry may be equal at certain geometrical parameters. At this point (unidimensionalrepresentation), line or surface (more than one dimension), the two potential-energy surfaces are saidto cross one another.See: avoided crossing



surface dipole layer
Also contains definition of: surface potentialParticles in the surface region of a phase are subjected to orienting forces as a result of the anisotropicforce field. Polar molecules (e.g. permanent dipoles) may thus be preferentially oriented in the surfaceregion, while polarizable molecules may be polarized (induced dipoles). The array of oriented polarand/or polarized molecules is called the surface dipole layer with which an electric potential drop isassociated, called the surface potential of the phase.

surface electric potential
Given bywhereandare the outer and inner electric potentials of phase β, respectively.





surface (excess) conductivity
The excess conductivity in a surface per unit length and width, symbol.

surface excess energy
Defined by:whereandsatisfy the condition, the total volume of the system. (are the energy densities in the two bulk phases whereandand) and ()are the mean molar energies andare the mean molar volumes of the two phases.

surface excess enthalpy
Defined by:wheresurface.is the surface excess energy,is the surface tension, andis the area relative to a Gibbs

surface excess entropy
Defined by:() and () are the entropy densities in the two bulk phases, whereentropies andandandare the mean molarare the mean molar volumes of the two phases.

surface excess Gibbs energy
Defined bywhereis the surface excess enthalpy, is the thermodynamic temperature,is the surfaceexcess entropy,is the surface excess Helmholtz energy, is the surface tension, andis thearea relative to a Gibbs surface.





surface grafting
Process in which a polymer surface is chemically modified by grafting or by the generation of activesites that can lead to the initiation of a graft polymerization.Notes:1. Peroxidation, ozonolysis, high-energy irradiation, and plasma etching are methods of generatingactive sites on a polymer surface.2. See also: grafting.



surface ions
Ions that are constituents of the surface or which have a particularly high affinity for the surface orsurface sites.







surface pressure
The change of interfacial tension caused by addition of a given species to a base solution. When an areaof liquid covered with a spread substance is separated from a clean area of surface by a mechanicalbarrier, the force acting on unit length of the barrier is called the surface pressure, or , and isequal towhereis the surface tension of the clean surface andthat of the covered surface.

surface region
The tridimensional region, extending from the free surface of a condensed phase towards the interior,where the properties differ from the bulk. The term surface may also be used in this sense.

surface shear viscosity
Also contains definitions of: area viscosity, surface dilatational viscosityFor steady state deformations a surface shear viscosity , and an area viscosity or surface dilatationalviscosity
can be defined. In a Cartesian system with the x-axis normal to the surface, they aredefined by the equations:whereis the shear component of the surface stress tensor,andare theand components ofthe surface velocity vector, respectively, is the surface area, is the time, andis the differencebetween the (steady state) dynamic surface tension and the equilibrium surface tension.

surface states
Energy levels localized in the surface region of semiconductors, which do not bear any direct relationto the bulk energy distribution, but which can exchange electrons with the bulk. In such a case a spacecharge may arise even when (the free charge density) is zero, i.e., whereis thespace charge density andis the charge density associated with the surface states.





surface work
Surface tension is the intensive factor in the differential expression for the work required to increasethe area of the surface of tension. Measured under reversible conditions at constant temperature (andnormally constant pressure) and referred to unit area, this work, the so-called (differential) surfacework, is equal to the static surface tension.









suspension
A liquid in which solid particles are dispersed.



Swain–Lupton equation
A dual parameter approach to the correlation analysis of substituent effects, which involves a fieldconstant ( ) and a resonance constant ( ). The original treatment was modified later. The procedurehas been considerably applied, but also much criticized.

Swain–Scott equation
The linear free-energy relation of the form:applied to the variation of reactivity of a given electrophilic substrate towards a series of nucleophilicreagents. is characteristic of the reagent (i.e. a measure of its nucleophilicity) and is characteristicof the substrate (i.e. a measure of its sensitivity to the nucleophilicity of the reagent). A scale ofvalues is based on the rate coefficients for the reaction of methyl bromide with nucleophiles in waterat, being defined as 1.00 for these reactions and being defined as 0.00 for the hydrolysisof methyl bromide. (Other scales have been devised.)

swelling agent
Fluid used to swell a gel, network or solid.







switching transition
A transition in semiconductive glasses in which, beyond a critical applied voltage, there is anavalanche breakdown of conducting electrons that causes local melting and hence local crystallizationthat gives metallic conductivity.

sydnone imines
Imines of sydnones (i.e. having an imino group in place of the exocyclic oxygen atom).(These structures represent only two canonical forms.)

sydnones
Mesoionic compounds having the 1,2,3-oxadiazole skeleton bearing an oxygen atom attached to the5 position.(These structures represent only two canonical forms).



symbiosis
The term was originally applied to describe the maximum flocking of either hard or soft ligands in thesame complexes. For hydrocarbon molecules, symbiosis implies that those containing a maximumnumber of C–H bonds (e.g. CH4) or C–C bonds (e.g. Me4C) are the most stable.













syn
1.2.3.4.See: torsion angleSee: endo, exo, syn, antiSee: antiFormerly used to describe the stereochemistry of oximes and related systems.See: E,Z



synchronous
A concerted process in which the primitive changes concerned (generally bond rupture and bondformation) have progressed to the same extent at the transition state is said to be synchronous. Theterm figuratively implies a more or less synchronized progress of the changes. However, the progressof the bonding change (or other primitive change) has not been defined quantitatively in terms of asingle parameter applicable to different bonds or different bonding changes. The concept is thereforein general only qualitatively descriptive and does not admit an exact definition except in the case ofconcerted processes involving changes in two identical bonds.See also: imbalance



synchrotron radiation
X-Radiation which results from the acceleration of charged particles in circular orbits by strongelectric and magnetic fields.

syndet
A synthetic detergent; a detergent other than soap.

syndiotactic macromolecule
A tactic macromolecule, essentially comprising alternating enantiomeric configurational base units,which have chiral or prochiral atoms in the main chain in a unique arrangement with respect to theiradjacent constitutional units.Notes:1. In a syndiotactic macromolecule, the configurational repeating unit consists of twoconfigurational base units that are enantiomeric.2. A syndiotactic macromolecule consists of racemo diads.

syndiotactic polymer
A polymer composed of syndiotactic macromolecules.









synoptic scale
In meteorology, the size or scale of ordinary weather systems or cyclones; typicallyhorizontally.

syntectic reaction
A reversible reaction that involves the conversion of two liquid phases,α on cooling:and, into a solid phaseThe maximum temperature at which this reaction can occur is the congruent melting point of the solidphase. Example: The conversion of co-existing K-rich and Zn-rich phases in the K-Zn system to forman intermediate solid phase KZn13.

synthetic graphite
A material consisting of graphitic carbon which has been obtained by graphitizing of non-graphiticcarbon by chemical vapour deposition (CVD) from hydrobcarbons at temperatures above,by decomposition of thermally unstable carbides or by crystallizing from metal melts supersaturatedwith carbon.Note:The term artificial graphite is often used as a synonym for synthetic graphite. The term syntheticgraphite is preferred, however, since graphite crystals can be considered to consist of carbonmacromolecules. Although the term synthetic graphite also covers the CVD product pyrolytic graphiteas well as the residues of carbide decomposition, it is predominantly used for graphitized carbon. Suchcommon use is in line with the above definition. Synonyms for this most important type of syntheticgraphite are Acheson graphite and electrographite.

system
Arbitrarily defined part of the universe, regardless of form or size, e.g. for clinical chemistry, patient,patient plasma, patient urine.





systematic name
A name composed wholly of specially coined or selected syllables, with or without numerical prefixes;e.g. pentane, oxazole.





Szilard–Chalmers effect
The rupture of the chemical bond between an atom and the molecule of which the atom is part, as aresult of a nuclear reaction of that atom.







tactic block polymer
A polymer, the molecules of which consist of tactic blocks connected linearly.

tactic macromolecule
A regular macromolecule in which essentially all the configurational (repeating) units are identical.

tactic polymer
A polymer composed of tactic macromolecules.

tacticity
The orderliness of the succession of configurational repeating units in the main chain of a regularmacromolecule, a regular oligomer molecule, a regular block or a regular chain.

Taft equation
Various equations are associated with R.W. Taft, but the term is most often used to designate thefamily of equations that emerged from Taft's analysis of the reactivities of aliphatic esters, and whichinvolved the polar substituent constantand the steric substituent constant :or the one-parameter forms applicable when the role of either the polar term or the steric term maybe neglected. Nowadaysis usually replaced by the related constant .See also: Hammett equation, ρ-value, σ-constant

tagged
Made identifiable by a label.



tandem mass spectrometer
An arrangement in which ions are subjected to two or more sequential stages of analysis (which may beseparated spatially or temporally) according to the quotient mass/charge. A hybrid mass spectometer isan instrument which combines analysers of different types, e.g. magnetic plus electric sector combinedwith quadrupole. The study of ions involving two stages of mass analysis has been termed massspectrometry/mass spectrometry.



tautomeric effect [obsolete]
See: electromeric effect

tautomerism
Isomerism of the general form:where the isomers (called tautomers) are readily interconvertible; the atoms connecting the groups X,Y, Z are typically any of C, H, O or S, and G is a group which becomes an electrofuge or nucleofugeduring isomerization. The commonest case, when the electrofuge is H+, is also known as 'prototropy'.Examples, written so as to illustrate the general pattern given above, include: Keto-enol tautomerism,such as:The grouping Y may itself be a three-atom (or five-atom) chain extending the conjugation, as in:The double bond between Y and Z may be replaced by a ring, when the phenomenon is called ringchain tautomerism, as in:See also: ambident, sigmatropic rearrangement, tautomerization, valence tautomerization

tautomerization
The isomerization by which tautomers are interconverted. It is a heterolytic molecular rearrangementand is frequently very rapid.See: tautomerism

tele-substitution
A substitution reaction in which the entering group takes up a position more than one atom away fromthe atom to which the leaving group was attached:See also: cine-substitution

telechelic polymer
Prepolymer capable of entering into further polymerization or other reactions through its reactive endgroups.Note:Reactive end-groups in telechelic polymers come from initiator or termination or chain-transfer agentsin chain polymerizations, but not from monomer(s) as in polycondensations and polyadditions.

tellurides
1.2.Compounds having the structure RTeR (R ≠ H). Thus tellurium analogues of ethers.Metal salts of tellurane, H2Te.

tellurones
Compounds having the structure R2Te(=O)2. Thus tellurium analogues of sulfones.

telomerization
The formation of an addition oligomer, having uniform end groups X' ... X'' , by a chain reactionin which a chain transfer limits the length of the polymer ('telomer') produced. An example is thepolymerization of styrene in bromotrichloromethane solution (X' = CCl3, X'' = Br), where Cl3C.radicals are formed in the initiation step to produce Cl3C[CH2CHPh]nBr, with greater than 1 andoften less than ca. 10:See also: oligomerization

temperature
Short form for thermodynamic, Celsius or Fahrenheit temperature.







temperature jump
A relaxation technique in which the temperature of a chemical system is suddenly raised. The systemthen relaxes to a new state of equilibrium, and analysis of the relaxation processes provides rateconstants.See also: relaxation













term symbols
Symbols characterizing the states of atoms and molecules in terms of multiplicity, symmetry of thetotal electronic wavefunction, and sometimes total (orbital + spin) angular momentum. Examples:denotes an atomic state of multiplicity 2 (doublet), electron orbital angular momentum quantumnumber, and orbital plus spin angular momentum quantum number.



termination
The steps in a chain reaction in which reactive intermediates are destroyed or rendered inactive, thusending the chain.



terpenes
Also contains definition of: monoterpenesHydrocarbons of biological origin having carbon skeletons formally derived from isoprene[CH2=C(CH3)CH=CH2]. This class is subdivided into the C5 hemiterpenes, C10 monoterpenes, C15sesquiterpenes, C20 diterpenes, C25 sesterterpenes, C30 triterpenes, C40 tetraterpenes (carotenoids) andC5n polyterpenes.See also: carotenes, carotenoids, isoprenoids, prenols, retinoids, steroids, terpenoids

terpenoids
Natural products and related compounds formally derived from isoprene units (see isoprenoids). Theycontain oxygen in various functional groups. This class is subdivided according to the number ofcarbon atoms in the same manner as are terpenes. The skeleton of terpenoids may differ from strictadditivity of isoprene units by the loss or shift of a fragment, generally a methyl group.

tertiary structure
The spatial organization (including conformation) of an entire protein molecule or othermacromolecule consisting of a single chain.See also: primary structure, secondary structure, quaternary structure



test portion
Synonym: analytical portionThe amount or volume of the test sample taken for analysis, usually of known weight or volume.

test sample
The sample, prepared from the laboratory sample, from which test portions are removed for testingor for analysis.



tetracyclines
A subclass of polyketides having an octahydrotetracene-2-carboxamide skeleton, substituted withmany hydroxy and other groups, e.g. chlortetracycline:

tetrahedral intermediate
A reaction intermediate in which the bond arrangement around an initially double-bonded carbon atom(typically a carbonyl carbon atom) has been transformed from trigonal to tetrahedral. For example,aldol in the condensation reaction of acetaldehyde (but most tetrahedral intermediates have a morefleeting existence).



tetrapyrroles
Natural pigments containing four pyrrole rings joined by one-carbon units linking position 2 of onepyrrole ring to position 5 of the next. Porphyrins are macrocyclic tetrapyrroles. E.g. bilin (a lineartetrapyrrole).

tetraterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C40 skeleton.See also: carotenes, carotenoids, xanthophylls



theoretical ceramic yield
Ceramic yield based on the stoichiometry of the ceramization process.

thermal analysis
A group of techniques in which a physical property of a substance and/or its reaction product ismeasured as a function of temperature while the substance is subjected to a controlled temperatureprogram.See also: enthalpimetric analysis

thermal black
A special type of carbon black produced by pyrolysis of gaseous hydrocarbons in a preheated chamberin the absence of air. Thermal black consists of relatively large individual spheres (diameter) and aggregates of a small number of pseudospherical particles. The preferred alignment ofthe layer planes is parallel to the surface of the spheres.









thermal curing
Curing induced by heating.

thermal fission
Fission caused by thermal neutrons.



thermal lensing
A technique that determines the alteration in the refractive index of a medium as a result of thetemperature rise in the path of a laser beam absorbed by the medium. The lens produced (usuallydivergent) causes a change (usually a decrease) in the irradiance measured along the laser beam axis.See also: photothermal effects

thermal neutrons
Neutrons in thermal equilibrium with the medium in which they exist, in general at room temperature.





thermally-induced transition
A transition that is induced by a change in temperature. Example: RbNO3 undergoes three structuraltransitions below:1. trigonal → CsCl-type structure at,2. CsCl-type → hexagonal structure at, and3. hexagonal structure → NaCl-type structure at.

thermoacoustimetry
A technique in which the characteristics of imposed acoustic waves are measured as a function oftemperature after passing through a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) whilst the substance issubjected to a controlled temperature program.





thermochromism
A thermally induced transformation of a molecular structure or of a system (e.g. of a solution),thermally reversible, that produces a spectral change, typically, but not necessarily, of visible colour.

thermocouple
A device based on the thermoelectric effect, by which two junctions between dissimilar conductors(metallic or heavily doped semiconductors) kept at different temperatures generate an electricpotential.

thermodilatometry
A technique in which a dimension of a substance under negligible load is measured as a functionof temperature while the substance is subjected to a controlled temperature program. Linearthermodilatometry and volume thermodilatometry are distinguished on the basis of the dimensionsmeasured.











thermoelectrometry
A technique in which an electrical characteristic of a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) ismeasured as a function of temperature whilst the substance is subjected to a controlled temperatureprogram. The most common measurements are of resistance, conductance or capacitance.

thermogram [obsolete]
See: enthalpogram

thermogravimetry (TG)
A technique in which the mass of a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) is measured as a functionof temperature whilst the substance is subjected to a controlled temperature program.

thermoluminescence
Luminescence arising from a reaction between species trapped in a rigid matrix and released as aresult of an increase in temperature.

thermolysis
The uncatalysed cleavage of one or more covalent bonds resulting from exposure of a compound toa raised temperature, or a process in which such cleavage is an essential part.See also: pyrolysis

thermomagnetometry
A technique in which a magnetic characteristic of a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) ismeasured as a function of temperature whilst the substance is subjected to a controlled temperatureprogram.







thermometric titration
Synonym: enthalpimetric titrationAn analytical method in which one reactant (the titrant) is added continuously or stepwise to anadiabatic or isoperibol vessel containing another reactant. The enthalpy change(s) of the ensuingreaction(s) causes a temperature change which, when plotted versus volume of titrant, may be used tofind the titration endpoint(s). This is the preferred term for experiments producing plots of temperatureversus volume of titrant in which the main goal is a quantitative determination. Nonetheless, whena calorimetric vessel is used, such that the heat capacity is known, thermodynamic parameters mayalso be estimated from such experiments. An acceptable synonym in that case is enthalpimetrictitration. The use of the adjective thermometric is justified because of widespread historical andcurrent usage, and because a titration of necessity implies a chemical reaction. The term thermometricenthalpy titration has been used, but is not recommended. A method in which the titrant is a catalystfor an indicator reaction that occurs after the endpoint for the analyte reaction should be called athermometric titration with catalytic endpoint detection, not a catalytic thermometric titration.

thermoparticulate analysis
A thermoanalytical technique in which the release of particulate matter from a substance (and/or itsreaction product(s)) is measured as a function of temperature whilst the substance is subjected to acontrolled temperature program.

thermophile
An organism that can tolerate high temperatures and that grows optimally at temperatures above.

thermopile
Several thermocouples connected in series to increase the magnitude of the electric potential.

thermoplastic elastomer
Elastomer comprising a thermoreversible network.

thermoptometry
Also contains definition of: thermophotometryA technique in which an optical characteristic of a substance (and/or its reaction product(s))is measured as a function of temperature whilst the substance is subjected to a controlledtemperature program. Measurements of total light, light of specific wavelength(s), refractiveindex and luminescence lead to thermophotometry, thermospectrometry, thermorefractometry andthermoluminescence, respectively; observation under the microscope leads to thermomicroscopy.

thermoreversible gel
Swollen network in which the junction points are thermally reversible.





thermosetting polymer
Prepolymer in a soft solid or viscous state that changes irreversibly into an infusible, insoluble polymernetwork by curing.Notes:1. Curing can be induced by the action of heat or suitable radiation, or both.2. A cured thermosetting polymer is called a thermoset.

thermosonimetry
A technique in which the sound emitted by a substance (and/or its reaction product(s)) is measured asa function of temperature whilst the substance is subjected to a controlled temperature program.

thermosphere
Atmospheric shell extending from the top of the mesosphere to outer space. It is a region of more orless steadily increasing temperature with height, starting ator. It includes the exosphereand most or all of the ionosphere (not the D region).

thermotropic mesophase
A mesophase formed by heating a solid or cooling an isotropic liquid, or by heating or cooling athermodynamically stable mesophase.

thiazynes
See: hydrocarbylsulfanyl nitrenes







thin film
Also contains definition of: thick filmA film whose thickness is of the order of a characteristic scale or smaller. Since a film may 'look'operationally thin or thick, according to the procedure applied, it is also recommended that themeasurement procedure employed be specified (e.g. ellipsometrically thin film, optically thin film,etc.). It is recommended that the physical specification of the film thickness be used, wheneverpossible (e.g. thick compared to the electron mean free path, thin compared to the optical wavelength,etc.)

thin-layer chromatography
Chromatography carried out in a layer of adsorbent spread on a support e.g. a glass plate.

thio
This prefix properly denotes replacement of an oxygen by a sulfur, e.g. PhC(=S)NH2, thiobenzamide.See also entries prefixed thio-.

thioacetals
Also contains definitions of: dithioacetals, monothioacetalsA term including monothioacetals having the structure R2C(OR')(SR') (subclass monothioketals, R ≠H); and dithioacetals having the structure R2C(SR')2 (subclass dithioketals, R ≠ H, R' ≠ H).See also: thiohemiacetals

thioaldehyde S-oxides
Compounds having the structure RC(=S=O)H. (Also known by the disapproved term sulfines whichincludes thioaldehyde S-oxides and thioketone S-oxides).

thioaldehydes
Compounds in which the oxygen of an aldehyde has been replaced by divalent sulfur, RC(=S)H, e.g.CH3CH2C(=S)H propanethial.

thioanhydrides
Synonym: acid thioanhydridesCompounds having the structure acyl-S-acyl. AlsoCH3C(=O)SC(=S)CH2CH3 acetic thiopropanoic thioanhydride.See: acyl groupscalleddiacylsulfanes,e.g.

thiocarboxylic acids
Compounds in which one or both oxygens of a carboxy group have been replaced by divalent sulfurRC(=O)SH or RC(=S)OH monothiocarboxylic acids, RC(=S)SH dithiocarboxylic acids.

thiocyanates
Salts and esters of thiocyanic acid HSC≡N, e.g. CH3SC≡N methyl thiocyanate.See: isothiocyanates

thioethers
Former name for sulfides RSR (R ≠ H).

thiohemiacetals
Compounds of structure R2C(SR')OH or R2C(OR')SH (monothiohemiacetals), or R2C(SR')SH(dithiohemiacetals), R' ≠ H .

thioketone S-oxides
Compounds having the structure R2C=S=O (R ≠ H). (Also known by the disapproved term sulfineswhich comprises thioaldehyde S-oxides and thioketone S-oxides.)

thioketones
Compounds in which the oxygen of a ketone has been replaced by divalent sulfur R2C=S ( R ≠ H ),e.g. CH3C(=S)CH2CH3 butane-2-thione.

thiolates
Derivatives of thiols, in which a metal (or other cation) replaces the hydrogen attached to sulfur, e.g.CH3S−Na+ sodium methanethiolate.

thiols
Compounds having the structure RSH (R ≠ H), e.g. MeCH2SH ethanethiol. Also known by the termmercaptans (abandoned by IUPAC).

third body
A species, other than the reactant itself, which brings about the energization of a molecule that canundergo a unimolecular process, or brings about a combination reaction between atoms or radicals.In the latter case a third body is also called a chaperon.

thixotropic gel
Gel which has a reduced viscosity on the application of a finite shear but which recovers its originalviscosity when the shear is discontinued.

thiyl radicals [obsolete]
Synonymous with sulfenyl radicals. Due to inconsistencies in use the term is not recommended.



threshold limit value (TLV)
The concentration in air to which it is believed that most workers can be exposed daily without anadverse effect (i.e., effectively, the threshold between safe and dangerous concentrations). The valueswere established (and are revised annually) by the ACGIH and are time-weighted concentrations(TWA) for a 7- or 8-h workday and 40-h workweek, and thus are related to chronic effects. A shortterm exposure limit (STEL) is defined as a 15-min TWA exposure, which should not be exceeded atany time during a workday even if the 8-h TWA is within the TLV-TWA.







TICT emission
Electronic emission emanating from a TICT state.See also: twisted internal charge transfer

TICT state
The acronym derives from Twisted Internal Charge Transfer state, proposed to be responsible forstrongly Stokes-shifted fluorescence from certain aromatics, particularly in a polar medium.See: twisted internal charge transfer



























time-resolved spectroscopy
The recording of spectra at a series of time intervals after the excitation of the system with a lightpulse (or other perturbation) of appropriately short duration.

titrant
The solution containing the active agent with which a titration is made.

titration
Also contains definitions of: acidimetric titration, acid–base titration, alkalimetric titration,chelatometric titration, complexometric titration, coulometric titration, equivalence point,precipitation titrationThe process of determining the quantity of a substance A by adding measured increments of substanceB, with which it reacts (almost always as a standardized solution called the titrant, but also byelectrolytic generation, as in coulometric titration) with provision for some means of recognizing(indicating) the endpoint at which essentially all of A has reacted. If the endpoint coincides with theaddition of the exact chemical equivalence, it is called the equivalence point or stoichiometric ortheoretical endpoint, thus allowing the amount of A to be found from known amounts of B added upto this point, the reacting weight ratio of A to B being known from stoichiometry or otherwise. Termsfor varieties of titration can reflect the nature of the reaction between A and B. Thus, there are acid–base, complexometric, chelatometric, oxidation–reduction, and precipitation titrations. Additionally,the term can reflect the nature of the titrant, such as acidimetric, alkalimetric, and iodometric titrationsas well as coulometric titrations, in which the titrant is generated electrolytically rather than beingadded as a standard solution.

titration curve
A plot of a variable related to a relevant concentration (activity) as the ordinate vs. some measure ofthe amount of titrant, usually titration volume (titre) as the abscissa. If the variable is linearly relatedto concentrations, such as the electrical conductance or the photometric absorbance, the term lineartitration curve is used. When a logarithmic expression of the concentration or activity is used, such asthe,, or the electrical potential in, the curve is referred to as a logarithmic titration curve.

titration error
The difference in the amount of titrant, or the corresponding difference in the amount of substancebeing titrated, represented by the expression: (end-point value - equivalence-point value).





topical effect
Consequence of application of a substance to the surface of the body which occurs at the point ofapplication.

topochemical reaction
Synonym: topotactic reactionA reversible or irreversible reaction that involves the introduction of a guest species into a hoststructure and that results in significant structural modifications to the host, for example, the breakageof bonds. Example: The insertion of lithium atinto the spinel Li[Mn2]O4 with symmetryto yield a layered structure with symmetry.Alternative terms: topotactic reaction, insertion reaction.

topomerization
Also contains definition of: topomersThe identity reaction leading to exchange of the positions of identical ligands. The indistinguishablemolecular entities involved are called topomers. For example in the reaction below the two identicalligating atoms Na and Nb are interchanged by rotation about the C-aryl bond but may be identified byNMR spectroscopy. This is a degenerate isomerization.

topotactic transition
A transition in which the crystal lattice of the product phase shows one or more crystallographicallyequivalent, orientational relationships to the crystal lattice of the parent phase. Example: Transitionsin which the anionic array is unchanged during the transition but cation reorganization occurs, as in:



torquoselectivity
The preference for 'inward' or 'outward' rotation of substituents in conrotatory or disrotatoryelectrocyclic ring opening reactions.



torsion angle
Also contains definitions of: anticlinal, antiperiplanar, clinal, periplanar, synclinal,synperiplanarIn a chain of atoms A-B-C-D, the dihedral angle between the plane containing the atoms A,B,C andthat containing B,C,D. In a Newman projection the torsion angle is the angle (having an absolute valuebetween 0° and 180°) between bonds to two specified (fiducial) groups, one from the atom nearer(proximal) to the observer and the other from the further (distal) atom. The torsion angle betweengroups A and D is then considered to be positive if the bond A-B is rotated in a clockwise directionthrough less than 180° in order that it may eclipse the bond C-D: a negative torsion angle requiresrotation in the opposite sense. Stereochemical arrangements corresponding to torsion angles between0° and ±90° are called syn (s), those corresponding to torsion angles between ±90° and 180° anti(a). Similarly, arrangements corresponding to torsion angles between 30° and 150° or between -30°and -150° are called clinal (c) and those between 0° and 30° or 150° and 180° are called periplanar(p). The two types of terms can be combined so as to define four ranges of torsion angle; 0° to 30°synperiplanar (sp); 30° to 90° and -30° to -90° synclinal (sc); 90° to 150°, and -90° to -150° anticlinal(ac); ±150° to 180° antiperiplanar (ap).The synperiplanar conformation is also known as the syn- or cis-conformation; antiperiplanar as antior trans and synclinal as gauche or skew. For macromolecular usage the symbols , ,,,andare recommended (ap, sp, +sc, -sc, +ac and -ac respectively).

torsional braid analysis
A particular case of dynamic thermomechanometry in which the material is supported on a braid.

torsional stereoisomers
Stereoisomers that can be interconverted (actually or conceptually) by torsion about a bond axis. Thisincludes E,Z-isomers of alkenes, atropisomers and rotamers.

total chemiflux
See: chemical flux





total radiant power
See: spectral radiant power







toxicity
1.Capacity to cause injury to a living organism defined with reference to the quantity of substanceadministered or absorbed, the way in which the substance is administered (inhalation, ingestion,2.3.topical application, injection) and distributed in time (single or repeated doses), the type andseverity of injury, the time needed to produce the injury, the nature of the organism(s) affectedand other relevant conditions.Adverse effects of a substance on a living organism defined with reference to the quantity ofsubstance administered or absorbed, the way in which the substance is administered (inhalation,ingestion, topical application, injection) and distributed in time (single or repeated doses), thetype and severity of injury, the time needed to produce the injury, the nature of the organism(s)affected, and other relevant conditionsMeasure of incompatibility of a substance with life: this quantity may be expressed as thereciprocal of the absolute value of median lethal dose () or concentration ().

toxicodynamics
Study of toxic actions on living systems, including the reactions with and binding to cell constituents,and the biochemical and physiological consequences of these actions.

toxicokinetics
Process of the uptake of potentially toxic substances by the body, the biotransformation theyundergo, the distribution of the substances and their metabolites in the tissues, and the eliminationof the substances and their metabolites from the body. Both the amounts and the concentrationsof the substances and their metabolites are studied. The term has essentially the same meaning aspharmacokinetics, but the latter term should be restricted to the study of pharmaceutical substances.See also: pharmacokinetics

toxicology
Scientific discipline involving the study of the actual or potential danger presented by the harmfuleffects of substances (poisons) on living organisms and ecosystems, of the relationship of suchharmful effects to exposure, and of the mechanisms of action, diagnosis, prevention and treatmentof intoxications.

toxin
Poisonous substance produced by a biological organism such as a microbe, animal or plant.

toxinology
Scientific discipline involving the study of the chemistry, biochemistry, pharmacology and toxicologyof toxins.See also: toxicology

trace element
Any element having an average concentration of less than about 100 parts per million atoms (or less than).

traceability
The property of a result or measurement whereby it can be related to appropriate standards, generallyinternational or national standards, through an unbroken chain of comparisons.

tracer
A foreign substance mixed with or attached to a given substance to enable the distribution or locationof the latter to be determined subsequently. There are several types of tracers which are used:(i) A physical tracer is one that is attached by physical means to the object being traced; (ii) Achemical tracer is a chemical with properties similar to those of the substance being traced withwhich it is mixed homogeneously; (iii) An isotopic tracer is a unique isotope, either radioactive oran enriched, uncommon stable isotope, of the element to be traced; (iv) A radioactive tracer is aphysical or chemical tracer having radioactivity as its distinctive property which allows detection atsmall concentrations and hence after large transport distances. The composition of aerosols in thetroposphere has been used as a qualitative tracer of air masses. The elemental analyses (determinedby neutron activation, X-ray fluorescence, etc.) of the aerosols transported from various sources orsource regions sometimes have characteristic patterns which are used to define qualitatively the originof tropospheric aerosols collected in other geographical regions.

track detector (nuclear)
A detector which makes the paths of ionizing particles visible, either directly (e.g. cloud chamber) orafter suitable treatment (photographic emulsion, polymers).

track (nuclear)
The path of an ionizing particle as revealed by a track detector.



















transfer line
Line provided to carry the sample to be analysed from the sample point to the analytical unit withoutaltering the composition of the sample.

transfer RNA (tRNA)
A single-stranded RNA molecule containing about 70-90 nucleotides, folded by intrastrand basepairing into a characteristic secondary ('cloverleaf') structure that carries a specific amino acid andmatches it to its corresponding codon on an mRNA during protein synthesis.

transferability
Transferability assumes invariance of properties, associated conceptually with an atom or a fragmentpresent in a variety of molecules. The property, such as electronegativity, nucleophilicity, NMRchemical shift, etc. is held as retaining a similar value in all these occurrences.

transferases
Enzymes that catalyse reactions in which a group is transferred from one compound to another. Groupsthat are transferred are C, aldehydic or ketonic residues, acyl, glycosyl, alkyl, nitrogenous, phosphorusand sulfurcontaining groups.

transformation
The conversion of a substrate into a particular product, irrespective of reagents or mechanismsinvolved. For example, the transformation of aniline (C6H5NH2) into N-phenylacetamide(C6H5NHCOCH3) may be effected by use of acetyl chloride or acetic anhydride or ketene. Atransformation is distinct from a reaction, the full description of which would state or imply all thereactants and all the products.

transformation
in gene technologyA process for genetic alteration of a cell following incorporation of foreign DNA.



transient crosslink
Crosslink formed by intermolecular or intramolecular interactions that are unstable under theconditions of use of the material formed.

transient junction point
Junction point in a polymer network that exists only for a finite period of time.

transient network
Network that exists only transiently.Note:The network structure of a transient polymer network is based on transient junction points or crosslinksarising from interactions between polymer chains.









transition
See: n → σ* transition, , π → π* transition, π → σ* transition, , σ → σ* transition

transition coordinate
The reaction coordinate at the transition state corresponding to a vibration with an imaginaryfrequency. Motion along it in the two opposite senses leads towards the reactants or towards theproducts.

transition (dipole) moment
Also contains definition of: electronic transition momentAn electromagnetic wave may induce an oscillating electric moment in a molecule (possibly leadingto absorption if the oscillation frequency is equal to the light frequency). The amplitude of this momentis the transition momentbetween the initial (i) and final (f) states (here assumed to be non-degenerate):whereis the electric dipole moment operator, a vector operator that is the sum of the positionvectors of all charged particles weighted with their charge. The transition momentis a vector inthe molecular framework, characterized both by its direction and its probability.Notes:1. The absorption probability for linearly polarized light is proportional to the cosine square of theangle between the electric vector of the electromagnetic wave and; light absorption will be2.3.4.maximized if they are parallel, and no absorption will occur if they are perpendicular.It is frequently said that a transition is polarized along the direction of its transition moment andthis direction is called the polarization direction of the transition.In the case of a doubly degenerate final state f, each of the two components at the same energyhas a transition moment and the two moments define a plane. The transition is then said to bepolarized in that plane, which also defines its polarization direction(s). This is typically the casefor some of the transitions in highly symmetrical molecules.In the case of a vibronic transition, where both the initial and the final states may be characterizedby (different) electronic and vibrational states, the Franck–Condon principle is often applied.This approximation separates electronic and nuclear descriptions and allows the transitionmoment to be written as a product of a purely electronic transition moment and an overlap integralbetween the two vibrational wavefunctions involved.

transition element
An element whose atom has an incomplete d sub-shell, or which can give rise to cations with anincomplete d sub-shell.



transition polarization
The direction of the transition moment in the molecular framework.

transition species
Any intermediate species in an elementary reaction. An activated complex is an example of a transitionspecies, but the latter term also includes other intermediate species. Transition species have also beencalled transition states, but there is then danger of confusion with a true activated complex, which isalso commonly known as a transition state.

transition state
In theories describing elementary reactions it is usually assumed that there is a transition state of morepositive molar Gibbs energy between the reactants and the products through which an assembly ofatoms (initially composing the molecular entities of the reactants) must pass on going from reactantsto products in either direction. In the formalism of 'transition state theory' the transition state of anelementary reaction is that set of states (each characterized by its own geometry and energy) in whichan assembly of atoms, when randomly placed there, would have an equal probability of forming thereactants or of forming the products of that elementary reaction. The transition state is characterizedby one and only one imaginary frequency. The assembly of atoms at the transition state has been calledan activated complex. (It is not a complex according to the definition in this Compendium.) It maybe noted that the calculations of reaction rates by the transition state method and based on calculatedpotential-energy surfaces refer to the potential energy maximum at the saddle point, as this is the onlypoint for which the requisite separability of transition state coordinates may be assumed. The ratioof the number of assemblies of atoms that pass through to the products to the number of those thatreach the saddle point from the reactants can be less than unity, and this fraction is the 'transmissioncoefficient' . (There are also reactions, such as the gas-phase colligation of simple radicals, that donot require 'activation' and which therefore do not involve a transition state.)See also: Gibbs energy of activation, Hammond principle, potential energy profile, transitionstructure, activated complex

transition state analogue
A substrate designed to mimic the properties or the geometry of the transition state of reaction.

transition state theory
A theory of the rates of elementary reactions which assumes a special type of equilibrium, havingan equilibrium constant, to exist between reactants and activated complexes. According to thistheory the rate constant is given by:whereis the Boltzmann constant andis the Planck constant. The rate constant can also beexpressed as:where, the entropy of activation, is the standard molar change of entropy when the activatedcomplex is formed from reactants and, the enthalpy of activation, is the corresponding standardmolar change of enthalpy. The quantities(the energy of activation) andsame, the relationship between them depending on the type of reaction. Also:are not quite thewhere, known as the Gibbs energy of activation, is the standard molar Gibbs energy changefor the conversion of reactants into activated complex. A plot of standard molar Gibbs energy againsta reaction coordinate is known as a Gibbs-energy profile; such plots, unlike potential-energy profiles,are temperature-dependent. In principle the equations above must be multiplied by a transmissioncoefficient, , which is the probability that an activated complex forms a particular set of productsrather than reverting to reactants or forming alternative products. It is to be emphasized that,andoccurring in the former three equations are not ordinary thermodynamic quantities,since one degree of freedom in the activated complex is ignored. Transition-state theory has alsobeen known as absolute rate theory, and as activated-complex theory, but these terms are no longerrecommended.

transition structure
A saddle point on a potential-energy surface. It has one negative force constant in the harmonic forceconstant matrix.See also: activated complex, transition state









translational spectroscopy
A technique to investigate the distribution of the velocity of product ions from reactions of ions andneutral species.

transmission
See: transmittance

transmission coefficient
See: transition state, , transition state theory





transmission factor
See: transmittance



transmission
in mass spectrometryThe ratio of the number of ions leaving a region of a mass spectrometer to the number entering thatregion.



transoid conformation [obsolete]
Usage strongly discouraged.See: s-cis, s-transSee: cisoid, for use of transoid, as a stereodescriptor

transport control
See: microscopic diffusion control







transposon
A movable DNA element that can be inserted at new sites into plasmids or chromosomesindependently of the host cell recombination system. Prokaryotic transposons can carry genes thatconfer new phenotypic properties, such as resistance to antibiotics on the host.

transtactic polymer
A tactic polymer in which the main-chain double bonds of the configurational base units are entirelyin the trans-arrangement.

trapping
The interception of a reactive molecule or reaction intermediate so that it is removed from the systemor converted into a more stable form for study or identification.See also: scavenger







triazanes
Triazane, NH2NHNH2, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.

triazenes
Triazene, NH2N=NH, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.See also: diazoamino compounds



trimethylenemethanes
The diradical CH2=C(C.H2)2, 2-methylenepropane-1,3-diyl, for which no Kekulé structure can bewritten, and its hydrocarbyl derivatives.

trioxides
Organic derivatives of trioxidane, HOOOH, e.g. ROOOR'. When R' = H , the compound is ahydrotrioxide.

triple point
The point in a one-component system at which the temperature and pressure of three phases are inequilibrium. If there arepossible phases, there aretriple points. Example: In the sulfursystem four possible triple points (one metastable) exist for the four phases comprising rhombic S(solid), monoclinic S (solid), S (liquid) and S (vapour).

triplet state
A state having a total electron spin quantum number of 1.See: multiplicity

triplet-triplet absorption
Absorption which takes place with the transition from the lowest triplet state of the molecule to highertriplet states (T → ) thus leading to the triplet-triplet absorption spectrum.

triplet-triplet annihilation
Two atoms or molecular entities both in a triplet state often interact (usually upon collision) to produceone atom or molecular entity in an excited singlet state and another in its ground singlet state. This isoften, but not always, followed by delayed fluorescence.See also: annihilation, spin conservation rule

triplet-triplet energy transfer
Acronym: TTETEnergy transfer from an electronically excited triplet donor to produce an electronically excitedacceptor in its triplet state.See: spin conservation rule

triplet-triplet transitions
Electronic transitions in which both the initial and final states are triplet states.



tritactic polymer
A tactic polymer that contains three sites of defined stereoisomerism in the main chain of theconfigurational base unit. Example:

triterpenoids
Terpenoids having a C30 skeleton.

tritium
Also contains definitions of: tritide, tritio, tritonA specific name for the atom 3H. The cation 3H+ is a triton, the species 3H− is a tritide anion and3H is the tritio group.

trivial name
A name having no part used in a systematic sense.

Troe expression
A semiempirical description of the rate coefficient for a specific three body reaction [e.g.] which represents well its pressure andtemperature dependence in the region of transition between second and third order kinetics.

tropilidenes [obsolete]
This term has inconsistently been used to mean cyclohepta-1,3,5-trienes or to mean cyclohepta-1,3,5trienes in dynamic equilibrium with bicyclo-[4.1.0]hepta-2,4-dienes, so that the structure of the bulksubstance is indeterminate in the time scale of the method of observation. Use of this term is thereforediscouraged.

tropolones
2-Hydroxycyclohepta-2,4,6-trienones and derivatives formed by substitution.See: tropones

tropones
Compounds that contain the cyclohepta-2,4,6-trienone ring system.

tropopause
The region of the atmosphere which joins the troposphere and stratosphere, and where the decreasingtemperature with altitude, characteristic of the troposphere ceases, and the temperature increase withheight which is characteristic of the stratosphere begins.

troposphere
The lowest layer of the atmosphere, ranging from the ground to the base of the stratosphere (tropopause) atof altitude depending on the latitude and meteorological conditions. About70% of the mass of the atmosphere is in the troposphere. This is where most of the weather featuresoccur and where the chemistry of the reactive anthropogenic species released into the atmospheretakes place.

tropyl radicals
The delocalized radicals derived formally by abstraction of one hydrogen from the CH2 group ofcyclohepta-1,3,5-triene and substitution derivatives thereof.

tropylium ions
The delocalized carbenium ion, cycloheptatrienylium, C7H7+, derived formally by detachment of onehydride ion from the CH2 group of cyclohepta-1,3,5-triene and substitution derivatives thereof.





tub conformation
A conformation (of symmetry group) of an eight-membered ring in which the four atoms formingone pair of diametrically opposite bonds in the ring lie in one plane and all other ring atoms lie to oneside of that plane. It is analogous to the boat conformation of cyclohexane.See also: crown conformation





tungsten-halogen lamp
tungsten lampSee: quartz–iodine lamp, wolfram lamp.Note:Halogens other than iodine may fill the lamp.

tunnelling
The process by which a particle or a set of particles crosses a barrier on its potential-energy surfacewithout having the energy required to surmount this barrier. Since the rate of tunnelling decreaseswith increasing reduced mass, it is significant in the context of isotope effects of hydrogen isotopes.

turbidimetric titration
The process in which a precipitant is added incrementally to a highly dilute polymer solution and theintensity of light scattered by, or the turbidity due to, the finely dispersed particles of the polymerrich phase is measured as a function of the amount of precipitant added.











two-photon photochromism
Photochromic process involving a two-photon process. The process might involve the simultaneousor the sequential absorption of two photons.

two-photon process
A photophysical or photochemical event triggered by a two-photon excitation.





ultrafiltrate
The solution obtained by ultrafiltration, in general not of the same composition as the equilibriumsolution.

ultrafiltration
A separation process whereby a solution containing a solute of molecular size significantly greaterthan that of the solvent molecule is removed from the solvent by the application of a hydraulic pressurewhich forces only the solvent to flow through a suitable membrane, usually having a pore size in therange.



ultraviolet
Acronym: UVRegion of the electromagnetic spectrum extending from aboutdivided into four sub-bands as follows:Vacuum Ultraviolet (VUV)–UV-C–UV-B–UV-A–to. This region is.Note:The notation and the limits of the various regions are as recommended by the InternationalCommission on Illumination (CIE), with the exception that in these recommendations the UV-C rangeis–, including thus the vacuum UV range.

umpire sample
A sample taken, prepared and stored in an agreed upon manner for the purpose of settling a dispute.The agreement usually extends beyond the sample to the basis for reaching a decision (e.g. quantity ofmaterial from which taken, use of a third party and criteria serving as the basis for acceptance, rejectionor economic adjustment). The term 'reference sample' has been used in this context but this term moreproperly should be used in conjunction with a 'reference material' or 'reference standard' which has atrue or assigned value for a constituent or property. One of the characteristics of a reference materialor reference standard is that it must have a negligible sampling error between test portions.

umpolung
Any process by which the normal alternating donor and acceptor reactivity pattern of a chain,which is due to the presence of O or N heteroatoms, is interchanged. Reactivity umpolung is mostoften achieved by temporary exchange of heteroatoms (N, O) by others, such as P, S and Se. Theoriginal meaning of the term has been extended to the reversal of any commonly accepted reactivitypattern. For example, reaction of R–C≡CX (X = halide) as a synthon for 'R–C≡C+ (i.e. electrophilicacetylene) is an umpolung of the normal more common acetylide, R–C≡C− (i.e. nucleophilic)reactivity.





uniaxial pressing
Application of pressure in one direction during ceramization to achieve a uniform densification andthe production of a compact monolith.



unified atomic mass unit
Non-SI unit of mass (equal to the atomic mass constant), defined as one twelfth of the massof a carbon-12 atom in its ground state and used to express masses of atomic particles,.

uniform corrosion
Corrosion is uniform if the time average of the corrosion current through a unit area of anymacroscopic dimension is independent of the position on the surface.

uniform polymer
A polymer composed of molecules uniform with respect to relative molecular mass and constitution.Notes:1. A polymer comprising a mixture of linear and branched chains, all of uniform relative molecularmass, is not uniform.2. A copolymer comprising linear molecules of uniform relative molecular mass and uniformelemental composition but different sequential arrangements of the various types of monomericunits, is not uniform (e.g. a copolymer comprising molecules with a random arrangement as wellas a block arrangement of monomeric units).3. A polymer uniform with respect only to either relative molecular mass or constitution may betermed 'uniform', provided a suitable qualifier is used (e.g. 'a polymer uniform with respect torelative molecular mass').4. The adjectives 'monodisperse' and 'polydisperse' are deeply rooted in the literature, despitethe former being non-descriptive and self-contradictory. They are in common usage and it isrecognized that they will continue to be used for some time; nevertheless, more satisfactory termsare clearly desirable. After an extensive search for possible replacements, the terms 'uniform'and 'non-uniform' have been selected and they are now the preferred adjectives.

uniformly labelled
A selectively labelled compound where all atoms of a particular element are labelled in the sameisotopic ratio.

uniformly labelled tracer
A tracer in which the label is uniformly distributed over its possible positions.

unit cell
The smallest, regularly repeating material portion contained in a parallelepiped from which a crystalis formed by parallel displacements in three dimensions.Notes:1. Unlike in the case of low molar mass substances, the unit cell of polymer crystals usuallycomprises only parts of the polymer molecules and the regularity of the periodic repetition maybe imperfect.2. In the case of parallel-chain crystals, the chain axis is usually denoted by c or, sometimes, b.3. This definition applies to the so-called primitive unit cell. In practice, the effective unit cell mayconsist of more than one primitive unit cell.





unit system
Set of base units, together with derived units, defined in accordance with given rules, for a givensystem of quantities.







unreactive
Failing to react with a specified chemical species under specified conditions. The term should not beused in place of stable, since a relatively more stable species may nevertheless be more reactive thansome reference species towards a given reaction partner.

unstable
The opposite of stable, i.e. the chemical species concerned has a higher molar Gibbs energy thansome assumed standard. The term should not be used in place of reactive or transient, although morereactive or transient species are frequently also more unstable. (Very unstable chemical species tend toundergo exothermic unimolecular decompositions. Variations in the structure of the related chemicalspecies of this kind generally affect the energy of the transition states for these decompositions lessthan they affect the stability of the decomposing chemical species. Low stability may therefore parallela relatively high rate of unimolecular decomposition.)

unstable film
See: stable film, metastable film





upfield
See: chemical shift











ureides
N-Acyl or N,N'-diacyl ureas.

urethanes (urethans)
An alternative term for the compounds R2NC(=O)OR' (R' ≠ H), esters of carbamic acids,R2NC(=O)OH, in strict use limited to the ethyl esters, but widely used in the general sense, e.g.'polyurethane resins'.See: carbamates

uronic acids
Monocarboxylic acids formally derived by oxidation to a carboxy group of the terminal –CH2OHgroup of aldoses, e.g. D-glucuronic acid.

uronium salts
Salts of O-hydronated urea, having the structure [HOC(=NH2)NH2]+X− (and O- and N- hydrocarbylderivatives).

UV dose
A dose of ultraviolet (UV) radiation.





vaccine
An agent containing antigens produced from killed, attenuated or live pathogenic microorganisms,synthetic peptides or by recombinant organisms, used for stimulating the immune system of therecipient to produce specific antibodies providing active immunity and/or passive immunity in theprogeny.

vacuum phototube
A photo-emissive detector inside an evacuated envelope with a transparent window, the photocathode,and the anode. The photocathode can be opaque or semitransparent.



valence
The maximum number of univalent atoms (originally hydrogen or chlorine atoms) that may combinewith an atom of the element under consideration, or with a fragment, or for which an atom of thiselement can be substituted.

valence band
Highest energy continuum of energy levels in a solid that is fully occupied by electrons at.Notes:1. The valence band is lower in energy than the conduction band and is generally completely fullin semiconductors. When heated, electrons from the valence band jump out of the band acrossthe band gap and into the conduction band, making the material conductive. The Fermi levelseparates the valence band from the conduction band.2. In metals the valence band is the conduction band.3.Sample characterized by a (unique) sample axis Z with all directions perpendicular to Z beingequivalent. In other words, the sample properties are invariant to rotation around Z. Uniaxialityexists in many anisotropic samples and simplifies the interpretation of their spectra considerably.

valence isomer
A constitutional isomer interrelated with another by pericyclic reactions. For example, Dewarbenzene, prismane and benzvalene are valence isomers of benzene.See: tautomerism

valence tautomerization
The term describes simple reversible and generally rapid isomerizations or degenerate rearrangementsinvolving the formation and rupture of single and/or double bonds, without migration of atoms orgroups; e.g.See also: fluxional, tautomerism

valence transition
A transition observed in certain rare-earth and actinide materials in which the electronic occupation ofthe 4f or 5f orbital changes with external conditions for example, temperature and pressure. Example:The transition at approximatelywhere black, semiconducting Sm2+S2− changes to goldenmetallic (Sm3++e−)S2−.





van der Waals adsorption
See: physisorption

van der Waals forces
The attractive or repulsive forces between molecular entities (or between groups within the samemolecular entity) other than those due to bond formation or to the electrostatic interaction of ionsor of ionic groups with one another or with neutral molecules. The term includes: dipole–dipole,dipole-induced dipole and London (instantaneous induced dipole-induced dipole) forces. The term issometimes used loosely for the totality of nonspecific attractive or repulsive intermolecular forces.





















verdazyl radicals
Relatively stable delocalized radicals, derived from hydrazyl, H2NN.H, of the types shown, inparticular the six-membered ring:

vertical ionization
A process whereby an electron is removed from a molecule in its ground or an excited state so rapidlythat a positive ion is produced without change in the positions or momenta of the atoms. The resultantion is often in an excited state.



Verwey transition
An electron-ordering transition occurring in a mixed-valent system that results in an ordering offormal valence states in the low-temperature phase. Example: The prototype system, first identifiedby Verwey, is the ferrospinel magnetite, Fe3+[Fe3+Fe2+]O4 in which an ordering of Fe3+ and Fe2+ions within octahedral sites is thought to occur below.

vibrational redistribution
Intramolecular redistribution of energy among the vibrational modes usually giving a statisticaldistribution of their populations, characterized by the 'vibrational temperature'. For large molecules,this process does not require collisions.

vibrational relaxation
The loss of vibrational excitation energy by a molecular entity through energy transfer to theenvironment caused by collisions. The molecular entity relaxes into vibrational equilibrium with itsenvironment.See: relaxation





vibronic coupling
Interaction between electronic and vibrational motions in a molecular entity.See: Jahn–Teller effect, Renner–Teller effect

vibronic transition
A transition which involves a change in both the electronic and vibrational quantum numbers ofa molecular entity, as opposed to purely electronic or purely vibrational transitions. The transitionoccurs between two states, just as in a purely electronic transition, but involves a change in bothelectronic and vibrational energy.

vidicon
A vacuum tube containing a photosensitive area, or target, and an electron gun to read the signalfrom the target. The silicon target consists of a two-dimensional array of Si-photodiodes having acommon cathode and isolated anodes. Irradiation of the target causes the production of electron-holepairs which, by recombination, leads to a depletion of the surface charge.

vinyl carbenes
Carbenes having a vinylic group on a carbenic carbon atom R2C=CRC:RH2C=CHC:H prop-2-en-1-ylidene.See: 1,3-dipolar compoundsR2C+–CR=C−R . E.g.

vinylic cations
Carbocations having the structure R2C=C+–R.

vinylic groups
The vinyl group (CH2=CH–) and derivatives formed by substitution. Informally, a group, such as –OH, attached to the free valence of a (substituted) vinyl group is sometimes referred to as 'vinylic'.

vinylidenes
Carbenes in which the carbenic carbon atom has a double bond to another carbon atom R2C=C:, e.g.H2C=C: ethenylidene.

viologens
1,1-Di(hydrocarbyl)-4,4'-bipyridinium salts.

virial coefficients
Coefficients()inthewhereandvirialequationis the pressure,ofstateforthe molar volume,arealgasthe gas constantthe thermodynamic temperature.

virtual transition
A non-observable liquid-crystal transition that occurs below the crystallization temperature and isdetermined by extrapolation in binary phase diagrams.

viscosity
See: dynamic viscosity



viscous sintering
Also contains definition of: viscous flow sinteringSintering process by which it is possible to densify gels to glasses and ceramics at elevatedtemperatures.





volatilization
The conversion of a solid or liquid to a gas or vapour by application of heat, by reducing pressure, bychemical reaction or by a combination of these processes.Example:

volatilizer
Material added to a sample to increase its volatilization or that of some component of it. Volatilizersincrease the fraction volatilized either by forming more volatile compounds or by increasing the totalsurface area of all analyte particles (e.g. by explosive disintegration or by dispersal of the analyte ina highly volatile matrix).





voltammetric constant
In linear-sweep voltammetry and related techniques, the empirical quantity defined by the equationwhereis the peak current, A is the area of the electrode-solution interface, is the rate of change ofapplied potential, andis the bulk concentration of the substance B whose reduction or oxidationis responsible for the peak in question.

















volumic
Attribute to a physical quantity obtained by division by volume. Charge density may thus be calledvolumic charge which is the electric charge in a section of space divided by the volume of that section.

vulcanization
Chemical crosslinking of high-molar-mass linear or branched polymers to give a polymer network.Notes:1. The polymer network formed often displays rubber-like elasticity. However, a high concentrationof crosslinks can lead to rigid materials.2. A classic example of vulcanization is the crosslinking of cis-polyisoprene through sulfide bridgesin the thermal treatment of natural rubber with sulfur or a sulfur-containing compound.



Walden inversion
Also contains definition of: retention of configurationRetention of configuration is the preservation of integrity of the spatial arrangement of bonds to anchiral centre during a chemical reaction or transformation. It is also the configurational correlationwhen a chemical species Xabcd is converted into the chemical species Xabce having the same relativeconfiguration. The configurational change when a chemical species Xabcd (where X is typicallycarbon), having a tetrahedral arrangement of bonds to X, is converted into the chemical species Xabcehaving the opposite relative configuration (or when it undergoes an identity reaction in which Xabcdof opposite configuration is produced) is called a Walden inversion or inversion of configuration.The occurrence of a Walden inversion during a chemical transformation is sometimes indicated inthe chemical equation by the symbol shown below in place of a simple arrow pointing from reactantsto products.













wavelength converter
A wavelength converter converts radiation at one wavelength to radiation at another detectablewavelength or at a wavelength of improved responsivity of the detector. The classical wavelengthconverter consists of a screen of luminescent material that absorbs radiation and radiates at a longerwavelength. Such materials are often used to convert ultraviolet to visible radiation for detection byconventional phototubes. In X-ray spectroscopy a converter that emits optical radiation is called ascintillator. In most cases wavelength conversion is from short to long wavelength, but in the case ofconversion of long to short wavelength the process is sometimes called upconversion. Wavelengths ofcoherent sources can be converted using nonlinear optical techniques. A typical example is frequencydoubling.









weak collision
A collision between two molecules in which the amount of energy transferred from one to the otheris not large compared to( is the Boltzmann constant and the absolute temperature).See: strong collision

weathering
Exposure of a polymeric material to a natural or simulated environment.



wedge projection
A stereochemical projection, roughly in the mean plane of the molecule, in which bonds arerepresented by open wedges, tapering off from the nearer atom to the farther atom. It is mainly usedto illustrate the conformation of larger cycloalkanes e.g. cyclotetradecane:equivalent to



weighted mean
If in a series of observations a statistical weight () is assigned to each value, a weighted meancan be calculated by the formula:Comment:Unless the weights can be assigned objectively, the use of the weighted mean is not normallyrecommended.

Weller correlation
Empirical correlation for the energy of full charge-transfer exciplex relative to the ground state in nhexane as a function of the electrochemical one electron standard reduction potential of the cationradical produced upon electron donation and standard reduction potential of the acceptor measured ina polar solvent for the donor (D) and the acceptor (A) involvedwithandthe standard electrode potentials of the donor and acceptor,respectively.Notes:1. In the case diethylaniline as donor and aromatic hydrocarbons as acceptors, the last term on theright, i.e.,. This equation assumes a constant Coulomb term and aconstant entropy change within a particular series of partners. is the elementary charge.2. The IUPAC recommendations for the sign and symbols of standard potentials are used in theequation as written above.3. Although not complying with the IUPAC recommended nomenclature for the standard electrodepotentials, traditionally the equation has been written as:withthe standard electrode potential at which the oxidation occurs, andthe standardelectrode potential at which the reduction occurs. This writing of the first term within the squarebrackets is misleading and not recommended.

Westcott cross-section
See: effective thermal cross-section

wet bulb temperature
In psychrometry, the temperature of the sensor or the bulb of a thermometer in which a constantlyrenewed film of water is evaporating. The temperature of the water used to renew the film must beat the temperature of the gas.

wetting
Process by which an interface between a solid and a gas is replaced by an interface between the samesolid and a liquid.





Wiegner effect
Synonymous with suspension effect (in an ion-selective electrode).

Wigner matrices
See: molecular orientation.

Wilzbach labelling
Labelling of a substance by exposing it to tritium gas.

wind rose
Also contains definition of: pollution roseA diagram designed to show the distribution of wind direction experienced at a given location overa considerable period of time. Usually shown in polar coordinates (distance from the origin beingproportional to the probability of the wind direction being at the given angle usually measuredfrom the north). Similar diagrams are sometimes used to summarize the average concentrations of agiven pollutant seen over a considerable period of time as a function of direction from a given site(sometimes called a pollution rose).

wolfram lamp
Incandescent lamp that generates light by passing an electric current through a thin filament wire(usually of wolfram) until it is extremely hot. The lamps are often filled by a halogen gas such asiodine and bromine that allow filaments to work at higher temperatures and higher efficiencies.See: quartz–iodine lamp

Wood horn
A mechanical device that acts by absorption as a perfect photon trap.

Wood lamp
Term used to describe a low-pressure mercury arc possessing a fluorescing layer, which emits in theUV-A region (fromto).

Woodward–Hoffmann rules
See: orbital symmetry



work hardening
Opposite of work softening, in which shear results in a permanent increase of viscosity or consistencywith time.

work of adhesion
Also contains definition of: work of separationThe work of adhesion per unit area,, is the work done on the system when two condensed phasesα and β, forming an interface of unit area are separated reversibly to form unit areas of each of theαδ- and βδ- interfaces.where,andare the surface tensions between two bulk phases α, β; α, δ and β, δ respectively.The work of adhesion as defined above, and traditionally used, may be called the work of separation.





working electrode
An electrode that serves as a transducer responding to the excitation signal and the concentrationof the substance of interest in the solution being investigated, and that permits the flow of currentsufficiently large to effect appreciable changes of bulk composition within the ordinary duration ofa measurement.



ξ- (xi-)
A symbol used to denote unknown configuration at a chiral centre.

x unit
Non-SI unit of length:

X-radiation
Radiation resulting from the interaction of high energy particles or photons with matter.

X-ray escape peak
In a gamma or X-ray spectrum, the peak due to the photoelectric effect in the detector and escape, fromthe sensitive part of the detector, of the X-ray photon emitted as a result of the photoelectric effect.

X-ray fluorescence
The emission of characteristic X-radiation by an atom as a result of the interaction of electromagneticradiation with its orbital electrons.

X-ray fluorescence analysis
A kind of analysis based on the measurement of the energies and intensities of characteristic Xradiation emitted by a test portion during irradiation with electromagnetic radiation.

X-ray intensity
Essentially all X-ray measurements are made by photon counting techniques but the results are seldomconverted to radiant flux or irradiance or radiant exposure. The term photon flux would be appropriateif the measurements were corrected for detector efficiency but this is seldom done for X-ray chemicalanalysis. Therefore the term X-ray intensity, , is commonly used and expressed as photons/unit timedetected. Likewise the term relative X-ray intensity, , is used to mean the intensity for the analytein an unknown specimen divided by the intensity for a known concentration of the analyte element.

X-ray level
An electronic state occuring as the initial or final state of a process involving the absorption oremission of X-ray radiation. It represents a many-electron state which, in the purely atomic case, hastotal angular momentum () as a well defined quantum number.



X-ray satellite
Also contains definitions of: hypersatellite in X-ray spectroscopy, multiple ionizationsatellite in X-ray spectroscopy , non-diagram line in X-ray spectroscopyA weak line in the same energy region as a normal X-ray line. Another name used for weak featuresis non-diagram line. Recommendations as to the use of these two terms have conflicted. Using theterm diagram line as defined here, non-diagram line may well be used for all lines with a differentorigin. The majority of these lines originate form the dipole-allowed de-excitation of multiply ionizedor excited states, and are called multiple-ionization satellites. A line where the initial state has twovacencies in the same shell, notably the K-shell, is called a hypersatellite. Other mechanisms leadingto weak spectral features in X-ray emission are, e.g. resonance emission, the radiative Auger effect,magnetic dipole and electric quadrupole transitions and, in metals, plasmon excitation. Atoms withopen electron shells, i.e. transition metals, lanthanides and actinides, show a splitting of certain Xray lines due to the electron interaction involving this open shell. Structures originating in all theseways as well as structures in the valence band of molecules and solid chemical compounds have inthe past been given satellite designations.

X-ray spectroscopy
X-ray spectroscopy consists of three steps: (a) excitation to produce emission lines characteristic ofthe elements in the material, (b) measurement of their intensity, and (c) conversion of X-ray intensityto concentration by a calibration procedure which may include correction for matrix effects.

xanthates
See: xanthic acids

xanthene dyes
Dyes derived by condensation of phthalic anhydride with resorcinol (and derivatives) or maminophenol (and derivatives), of which fluorescein is the prototype (all such dyes have the xanthenenucleus).See also: phthaleins, rhodamine dyes

xanthic acids [obsolete]
Compounds having the structure ROC(=S)SH. Thus O-esters of dithiocarbonic acid. Salts and estersof xanthic acid are xanthates. Use of this term is not recommended.

xanthophylls
A subclass of carotenoids consisting of the oxygenated carotenes.

xenobiotic
A xenobiotic (Greek, xenos 'foreign'; bios 'life') is a compound that is foreign to a living organism.Principal xenobiotics include: drugs; carcinogens; and various compounds that have been introducedinto the environment by artificial means.

xenon lamp
An intense source of ultraviolet, visible and near-infrared light produced by electrical discharge inxenon under high pressure.See also: antimony–xenon lamp (arc), lamp, mercury–xenon lamp (arc)

xerogel
Open network formed by the removal of all swelling agents from a gel.Notes:1. Examples of xerogels include silica gel and dried out, compact, macromolecular structures, suchas gelatin or rubber.2. The definition proposed here is recommended as being more explicit.

Yang photocyclization
Intramolecular coupling of diradicals of different sizes (1,4-, 1,5-, 1,6-, 1,7-, 1,8-diradicals, as wellas very remote diradicals) formed through intramolecular hydrogen abstraction by an excited ketone,yielding cyclic alcohols of different sizes.







yield stress
The shear stressorat which yielding starts abruptly. Its value depends on the criterion used todetermine when yielding occurs.

ylides
Also contains definition of: nitrogen ylidesCompounds in which an anionic site Y− (originally on carbon, but now including other atoms)is attached directly to a heteroatom X+ (usually nitrogen, phosphorus or sulfur) carrying a formalpositive charge. They are thus 1,2-dipolar species of the type RmX+–Y−Rn. If X is a saturated atom ofan element from the first row of the periodic system, the ylide is commonly represented by a chargeseparated form; if X is a second, third, etc. row element uncharged canonical forms are availableRmX=YRn. If X is an unsaturated atom, doubly bonded to another first row element Z, the negativecharge on Y may be stabilized by π-conjugation, Z=X+–Y−RnZ−–X+=YRn. Such ylides belongto the class 1,3 dipolar compounds. However, 1,3-dipolar compounds with only sextet-containingcanonical forms (e.g. vinylcarbenes ) are not ylides. E.g. Ph3P+–C−H2Ph3P+=CH2 (often calleda Wittig reagent), (CH3)3N+–C−H2, RC≡N+N−–R, (CH3)2S=CHPh(CH3)2S+–C−HPh. Note thatylide is a complete word, not to be confused with the suffix -ylide, used for some radical anions.Subclasses of ylides: Ylides RmX+–C−R2 having the negative charge on carbon are classified by citingthe name of the element X before the word ylide. E.g. nitrogen ylide, phosphorus ylide, oxygen ylide,sulfur ylide. A further specification may be achieved by citing the class name of RmX before the wordylide. Thus nitrogen ylides include amine ylides, R3N+–C−R2, azomethine ylides R2C=N+R–C−R2,nitrile ylides, RC≡N+–C−R2. Some authors, who wish to express the positive charge on X, prefere.g. ammonium ylides over amine ylides; such usage varies according to the heteroatom X and tonational custom. The ylides RmX+–Y−RmX=Y (Y = O, S, Se, Te, NR) are usually named byciting the name of RmX followed by the additive nomenclature term for Y (oxide, sulfide, selenide,telluride, imide, respectively). E.g. amine imides; use of the less systematic synonyms amine iminesand aminimines is discouraged. Some classes of ylides are known by trivial names e.g. nitrones, Wittigreagents (synonymous with phosphonium ylides).See also: betaines, dipolar compounds

ynamines
N,N-Disubstituted alk-1-yn-1-amines, RC≡CNR2. By usage, restricted to this type of acetylenicamine.See: enamines

ynols
Alk-1-yn-1-ols, RC≡COH; tautomeric with ketenes RCH=C=O.

yocto
SI prefix for(symbol: ).

yotta
SI prefix for(symbol:).

Yukawa–Tsuno equation
A multiparameter extension of the Hammett equation to quantify the role of enhanced resonanceeffects on the reactivity of meta- and para-substituted benzene derivatives, e.g.The parameter gives the enhanced resonance effect on the scale (See also: ρ-value, σ-constant) or (), respectively.

ζ-potential
See: electrokinetic potential

Z-value
An index of the ionizing power of a solvent based on the frequency of the longest wavelengthelectronic absorption maximum of 1-ethyl-4-methoxycarbonylpyridinium iodide in the solvent. TheZ-value is defined by:where is inandSee also: Dimroth–Reichardtis in.parameter, Grunwald–Winstein equation





zepto
SI prefix for(symbol: ).



zero field splitting
The separation of multiplet sublevels in the absence of an external magnetic field.







zeta
See: ζ (beginning of `z`)zetta
SI prefix for(symbol:).

zig-zag projection
A stereochemical projection for an acyclic molecule (or portion of a molecule) where the main chainis represented by a zig-zag line in the plane and the substituents are shown above or below the plane.

Zimm plot
A diagrammatic representation of data on scattering from large particles, corresponding to theequation:and used for the simultaneous evaluation of the mass average molar mass,coefficient of the chemical potential,, the second virial, and (usually) the z-average radius of gyration,;is the mass concentration of the solute,the excess Rayleigh ratio, andthe particlescattering function that comprises (usually) the z-average radius of gyration. depends on the solute,the temperature and the type of radiation employed. Several modifications of the Zimm plot are infrequent use; the most common one uses the excess scattering instead of the excess Rayleigh ratio.





Zucker–Hammett hypothesis
This hypothesis states that, if in an acid catalysed reaction,reaction) is linear in(first-order rate constant of the(Hammett acidity function ), water is not involved in the transition state ofthe rate-controlling step. However, ifis linear inthen water is involved. This hasbeen shown to be incorrect by Hammett himself.





zygote
The cell obtained as a result of complete or partial fusion of meiotically (cf. meiosis) produced cells.

